Nick & Jay Duet, Book 1. Quid Pro Quo by Nenia Campbell.
Prologue
2017

Nicholas Beaucroft leaned back in his chair, stretching his long legs
beneath the streamlined metal desk. With the shades drawn, the office was
dark. Gray paint and a mulberry tree growing unchecked beyond the
window were the culprits for the room's bleakness. He could have, and
probably should have, had the gardeners crop the branches, but—no.
He wanted it wild. He wanted to remember.
Seventeen years ago, when he had been a boy, there had been a young
cat in the tree. He and his friends, Jake Van Hoff and Aaron Kranz, had
been out in the yard, unsupervised and listless. They had been wondering
what to do next when they heard the small mew overhead and looked up,
glimpsing what appeared to be a white ball of fluff. He couldn't remember
which of them had thrown the first clod of dirt, or why they had thought
that would coax the kitten down, but suddenly, there had been a blur of blue
and brown and a shouted cry:
What the fuck are you doing?
It had surprised him—the lowness of the voice, the easy vulgarity. How
the owner of the voice had sounded so young and yet so confident. Jake had
nearly shit himself, he remembered with a slight sneer, and Aaron had been
too stunned to move, the clod of dirt crumbling in his hand as his fingers
clenched in involuntary response to the note of authority.
The girl—because the owner of the voice had been a girl—had climbed
the tree, her patched and dirty sneakers hooking on the bark as she
shimmied up the branches to where the kitten was huddled in terror. Her
shorts had been too small, riding up on her thighs in a way that looked like
it pinched, and when she had swung back to the ground, he'd caught a
glimpse of taut, brown midriff. The sight of that had done something to
him, and even though he'd been ten and utterly disdainful of girls by his
own admission, he couldn't bring himself to look away from the tall, leggy
creature who, with her sweatshirt knotted around her long, slim waist like a
kilt, looked like some defiant young goddess.
“W-we were just trying to get it down,” Aaron had stammered. “Nick
started it.”
“It's just a baby.” She'd had the cat cradled against her chest, pitching
her voice low. “Are you such psychotic little freaks that you would throw
rocks at a helpless creature?”
Slowly, Nicholas had allowed his eyes to drift to her angry face, to
drink in the flashing hazel eyes, the pointed chin, the nose with its
unfashionable bump. Girls around here didn't have bumps like that; as soon
as they were teenagers, they all went out and got noses that looked like ski
slopes. She didn't look like the other girls at his school. She didn't look like
anyone he'd ever met; but she was still the most beautiful girl that he had
ever seen.
“Who is that?” Jake had whispered, with equal parts fascination and
annoyance, and for some reason, he had found himself wanting to slug the
other boy in the face.
He had watched the girl march away, still clutching the cat, muttering
to herself as her sweatshirt swished angrily around her hips with each
determined stomp.
“I think that's my new stepsister, Justine.”
The phone rang shrilly, gnawing into his memories so that they
crumbled into nothing. He picked up the phone, toying with a small, stuffed
bird he'd picked up at an estate sale. It was a little blue jay, made of felt.
The jet beads it had for eyes seemed to glitter with the facsimile of life in
the dim light. She never liked her name, he thought, fingering the stitching
on the ruff. She always wanted everyone to call her Jay.
As the woman on the other end of the phone went on, his eyes closed in
impatience, strong fingers clenching minutely so that the fabric began to
buckle in protest over the delicate cardboard base. “Blue jay” was what he,
and only he, had called her.
His little bird.
No longer a girl now, Jay had become a woman: a beautiful woman,
with only a few silvery strands threading through her dark corkscrew curls
like pieces of tinsel, and a keen intelligence in her luminous eyes. He had
stared at the photo that had been provided to him, greedily comparing it to
the one that existed in his mind from when he had last seen her eight years
ago.
Different, but the same. He would know her anywhere. He would know
her blind.
Part of him had wondered whether her effect on him would remain. She
had been twenty-three years old when she left, four years younger than he
was now. In the photograph, she was wearing office attire, looking over her
shoulder while purchasing coffee, her face possessing the watchful calm of
a grazing deer. His eyes had scanned over her fitted skirt and blouse,
unbuttoned enough to reveal a glimpse of something lacy, and he had
instantly gone hard.
On the phone, the woman continued to rail at him and he listened
silently. Though he was careful to make no sound that could be heard over
the phone, he couldn't quite suppress his smile. It warped his swarthy,
patrician features, forming the perfect arrangement of studied cruelty. Jay
would have recognized it instantly and gone running.
“Yes,” he said softly, picking the bird up in his hand. “I understand that
your financial straits are dire. Well, if you wish to discuss it further, you can
arrange it through a lawyer.”
He knew she didn't have a lawyer. She only had Jay to speak for her
now. Sweet, loyal, ethical Jay. That selfsame goodness was precisely what
had propelled her into flight from his arms the first time. Of the two of
them, she had been the one with the tender heart.
Not that she had ever been willing to give it to him.
His fingers convulsed and there was a quiet crack as the bird's hollow
body collapsed. Carefully, he replaced the phone in its cradle, hanging up
on the shouting that was still emanating from the line. In the blue wash of
his computer screen, his gray eyes held an uncanny, arctic gleam.
Nicholas tossed the ruined bird into the trash and smiled grimly as he
turned to the computer and bought himself a plane ticket. I'm going to
possess you, my little blue jay. And I'm going to make you love it. He folded
his hands in front of him and glanced out at the tree.
He only wished he could see her face once she realized she was caged.
Chapter One
2017

There were three things every woman needed in the city: sensible
shoes, an umbrella, and a cell phone. Currently, Jay Varens had none of
these, because some asshole had just cut the straps on her cute leather
backpack and was racing off with it down the street.
“Hey!” she shouted. “Hey! Stop! Thief!”
A few of the passers-by looked at her curiously. Several of them
deliberately looked away.
Helplessly, Jay watched the man dart away with her backpack tucked
under his arm like a football, eventually disappearing down one of the
underground BART tunnels. Why her? Why today, when it was raining?
She couldn't even call the police—the bastard had her cell phone.
Rain continued to pour down from the sky as if from a broken spigot as
Jay schlepped herself to work in her pinching heels. By the time she got to
the office, her light gray sweater with the sewn-on pearls was now a much
darker gray and her curly hair was hanging in tangled clumps around her
shoulders, making her feel like something scraped from the gutters.
“Good morning, Ms. Varens,” said Ian, the elevator man.
She forced a brave smile, trying not to cry. “Hi, Ian. Pretty cruddy
weather, huh?”
“Forget your umbrella?”
“Yeah. I guess I did.”
She managed to keep it together until she got to her desk, which she
shared with Lily Chang, who worked as an administrative assistant for the
other executive in Parker-Hawthorne, LLC. Lily was eating a piece of toast,
which she immediately set down, eyes widening. “Oh no! You're soaked,
Jay. Are you all right? Do you want me to make you a coffee?”
That tiny bit of kindness undid her and a few tears spilled out, along
with a choked-up sob. Jay hated crying, hated it, because it always made
her feel small and powerless.
Her chest tightened as old memories threatened to rush in. Nobody had
helped her then, either.
“I'm sorry.” Jay grabbed a tissue from her desk. “I was just robbed on
the street by a man with a knife and nobody did anything to help. He took
my phone, my sneakers, my umbrella—”
“Your keys?” Lily asked, returning with a steaming cup. “Your wallet?”
“N-no.” Jay sniffed. “I have those. They were in my pocket. Thank
God.”
“Well, that's something. At least now you don't have to cancel your
credit cards.”
Jay tried to remember if she had ever paid for anything with a credit
card on her phone and whether she ought to cancel them anyway. She
logged into her Apple account to track her phone and saw that the phone
thief was speeding towards the East Bay. Probably on BART. Using her
Clipper Card. Bastard, she thought angrily, logging out of her account.
“Thank you for the tea.” Jay sighed and opened up ShiftWare, the
platform they used to keep track of the CEOs' schedules and click through
calls and appointments. “It helped a lot. I felt like I was about to start
screaming my head off. You're seriously the best.”
“Don't I know it,” Lily said, with a little hair flip. “Drinks after work?
I'll buy. We'll invite Grace, if she's not working late again.”
“Great. I like Grace.”
An appointment popped up for Jay to schedule. She glanced at it and
let out a small gasp.
“Jay?” Lily didn't look away from her screen. “You all right over
there?”
“Burned my tongue on the coffee.”
She stared at the name, burned into the screen. Nicholas Beaucroft.
What the hell was her stepbrother doing in San Francisco? The last time she
had looked him up, feeling drunkenly masochistic, he had still been living
in L.A. Had he been looking for her, too?
No, she thought, even as goosebumps broke out beneath her damp and
clingy sleeves. Her LinkedIn was private, inaccessible to anyone who
wasn't in her network, and her Facebook didn't say where she worked. He
took over his father's investment firm when he died, she reminded herself,
trying to quell the panic. It's strictly business—that's all.
But what would Nicholas want with soap and bath oil? In San
Francisco?
No. He had come here to find her, she was sure of it. Given what had
transpired when she had last seen him, Jay could only imagine what his
motives were.
Revenge, probably.
You're going to refuse me again? She could still conjure up his voice so
easily: deep and smooth and painfully cold—an icy river churning with
hidden undercurrents of violence.
Jay looked at the pending appointment and considered trashing it or
pretending she'd never seen it. Tempting, but no. Those types of things
could be traced and she didn't want to lose her job. She didn't want to cost
her boss his. Nicholas could make or break this company with his money.
With his father's money, she corrected herself. He didn't even earn it.
Jay scheduled the appointment for late afternoon the next day and
resolved to leave early.
“So,” she said, turning to Lily with a bright smile, “where are we going
tonight?”

After two Boothby cocktails, Jay's head felt like it was going to float
away on a cloud of champagne. She thanked the Uber driver Lily had
ordered for her before climbing up the stairs to her apartment door. It took
her several tries to fit the key into the lock. She dropped them on the second
attempt and something about the way they looked, all spread out from their
ring on the ground, struck her as hilarious, and she began to giggle
hysterically as she picked them up.
Such a lightweight, Lily had teased her affectionately, while Grace,
who was Lily's cousin, had laughed. I can't take you anywhere, Jay.
Sitting in the trendy cocktail bar in the FiDi district, with the raspberrycolored lights and loud indie music, Jay could almost forget the reason for
the darkness clouding her heart.
Finally, she got the door open and clumsily tossed her keys in the little
ceramic dish by the door as she did up the latch and bolt. Carbon, her cat,
rubbed against her leg, meowing vocally. She bent to pet him, scratching
behind his ears the way he liked. She'd always loved cats. Before Carbon,
she'd had a white cat named Gypsum. She was long dead now, but she had
continued her weird trend of naming her pets after rocks.
She found herself thinking of the gypsum rose Nick had gotten her
when his dad had taken him to Nevada. Back when her collection had been
smaller, it had been the nicest rock she owned. She had been touched. An
olive branch, she'd thought, from her weirdly intense younger brother. How
wrong I was, she thought, staring unseeingly at her tattered old sofa.
It was locked away in a drawer somewhere, now. She hadn't been able
to bring herself to sell it, but she couldn't stand to look at the flattened
cluster of crystals, either. Maybe she should sell it. The one he had given
her was a nice piece and probably worth a lot.
What was he doing in San Francisco? Seeking revenge?
Fear surfaced anew, ready to consume her if she let it. Jay drew in a
breath and walked towards the kitchenette with small, determined steps.
Rocks cluttered many of the available surfaces in her apartment. Once
people found out that she collected them, that was all they tended to give
her as gifts. She had lots of geodes, a few pseudomorphs, a king's ransom of
semiprecious stones. Her favorites were the fulgurites, the spiny bristled
structures that formed out in the desert when lightning struck the earth.
There was a big one on her coffee table, carefully mounted on a wooden
base by a collector friend of hers.
Lightning turned to stone. She stared at the dangerous spikes. That's
what I feel like sometimes.
She was at that point of being drunk where feeling good could easily
turn into feeling bad and was just sober enough to recognize that, so even
though she felt hungry, Jay decided not to eat. She turned on the hot water
boiler instead, thinking it would be nice to have a hot cup of tea.
As she puttered around her studio apartment, she noticed the light on
the answering machine was blinking. Hopefully that wasn't her bank calling
to tell her she'd been scammed. Just thinking about what had happened
earlier, and how no one had helped, filled her with another tide of fresh
anger. She couldn't believe no one had even asked if she was all right.
Look for the helpers, Mr. Rogers had said. Clearly he'd never been to
San Francisco.
She pressed the button for “new messages” and winced when her
mother's nasal voice filled the room. “Justine,” she said, “it's your mother. I
need you to call me right away. It's urgent.”
It's always urgent, thought Jay, folding her arms. Last time, her mother
had called, she had been convinced that she was being “scammed” because
she didn't understand the additional charges on her food delivery. By the
time Jay had finally called her back, her mother had already disputed the
charge and gotten into a shouting match with her bank.
Jay thought about listening to the other two messages first, but decided
against it, quickly dialing her mother's number. “Hi, I got your message,”
she said, a little breathlessly. “What's wrong? Are you all right?” Please
don't let it be about money.
“Your stepbrother got us both disinherited.”
Shit. “He did? Why would he do that?”
“Because he's a bastard,” her mother hissed, “and he clearly has it in
for us.”
Jay wasn't surprised that her mother had forgotten that she was never
even in the will. Damon Beaucroft had never legally adopted her, so she had
never even been in the running.
“What happened?” Jay asked slowly. What did you do?
“Apparently,” she continued in seething tones, “Damon added a
stipulation to his will stating that his wife needed to remain faithful until his
death, or she would lose everything.”
And you weren't, Jay finished for her silently—and Nicholas knew it.
He'd told her as much. “How did that get out?” she asked, falling into her
computer chair, hot water forgotten. She already knew why, already dreaded
hearing it. “How would they even know?”
“Your stepbrother has photographs. The fucking snake. He was always
slinking around the house with that camera of his, and of course, his father
never did a damn thing to stop him.”
Jay felt her throat tighten with unvoiced suspicions. Photographs.
She turned to the computer, typing in a quick search that her mother
should have looked up from the start. Her fingers stumbled only a little; she
told herself it was because she was drunk. “I'm sorry,” said Jay, “but I'm not
sure what you can do. It looks like you could assert something called your
right of election, as his spouse, but that seems to be for general
disinheritance and not for, like, the kind that comes with stipulations. Can
you hire a lawyer?”
“I can't afford a lawyer,” she said. “I'm broke. He'll crush me in court.”
“Did you talk to him?”
“He won't speak to me. I tried calling his office. His secretary wouldn't
let me through.”
Administrative assistant, she corrected silently, far too used to the
dismissive indignity herself. “I'm sorry,” Jay said again, leaning back in her
chair. “I wouldn't fight him on this. It really sucks—but I'm just not sure
what you can do. You know what he's like.”
There was a pause. “He said he would be willing to speak to you.”
Jay's heart froze. She felt the filaments of that chill extend to her veins
before snapping off like sharp, stabbing needles to pierce her throughout her
body with that terrible cold.
“Absolutely not.”
“But Justine—”
“No.”
“He looked up to you,” her mother said pathetically. “You were close.”
Next time I come, I'm going to be inside you.
“Really?” Jay said, in a calm, alien voice. “Close? Is that what you
think we were?”
“Please, Justine. You're the only one who could control him.”
What's the matter, little bird? Didn't work when you ran to Daddy? But
then he's not your Daddy, is he?
“Not even I could do that,” Jay said, only a little faintly now. In her
periphery, the corners of the room seemed to be going dark. “Good luck
with the case if you pursue it.”
“Justine! You're being ridiculous. It's a lot of money and I can't just—”
I'll be your Daddy. You can tell me what's bothering you and I'll make
it all better.
Jay hung up the phone.
He was coming for her. There was no doubt in her mind of it now. Oh,
God.
She'd always wondered if her mother had known what had been going
on between her and Nicholas. Damon had known—the sick fuck had even
encouraged it, in his way—but she had let herself believe that her mother
maybe hadn't seen the way Nicholas looked at her. The way he always
contrived to get her alone.
Now, Jay wondered—at what her mother might have known, at her
willingness to sell her out. Even though her mother had made a career of
stripping, Jay had never once thought of her mother as a whore until now.
Everyone has their price. I wonder what yours is.
Jay pressed play for the remaining messages on the machine with an
attempt at calm. The next one was a voter survey. She deleted it, breathing
more evenly still, knowing that the calm was transient, and would fade
when the effects of the alcohol did. Next one, she thought.
And the phone fell from her nerveless fingers when she heard his voice
fill her room.
“Hello, little bird,” she heard him say, in a voice as textured as raw silk,
“I'm sure by now you've heard from your mother about how she's been
disinherited from my father's will. I'm sure you also know that neither of
you have a chance in hell of fighting me on this—” there was a sound like a
smothered laugh, as if he knew she would be afraid and reveled in it “—I
am, however, open to negotiation with you. I'll be in town tomorrow
afternoon, and I was thinking about stopping by for drinks at Bana. Come
find me there. I'll be waiting.”
There was a click and the line went dead.
Yes, everyone had their price. As Jay replaced the phone with a
trembling hand, listening to the sound of her own rapid breathing, she
couldn't help wondering if she were about to find hers.
Chapter Two
2017

Jay woke up to heavy gray skies and a cat kneading her stomach. For a
heartbeat, the day was a day like any other and she couldn't quite figure out
why her nerves were all lighting up as if she had been plugged into a live
socket. And then she remembered—little bird.
He was coming to her office today because she'd scheduled the damn
appointment. Why had she done that? She should have canceled it, claimed
it was an accident. He would never know.
I could call in sick, she thought, lifting Carbon off her body and setting
him on the floor. She was rarely sick. Her mother used to tell her snidely
that she was as “healthy as a horse” when she was younger, usually
following it with “and you have the appetite of one.” Nobody was going to
come after her for missing one day. She could make it rain PTO if she
wanted.
But could she do that to Lily? To Owen? She only had so many hours
of time off and they had to last her the entire year. Plus, she had scheduled
Nick's appointment so late that, even if he arrived early, she'd already be on
her way home, with him being none the wiser.
Her mother had been wrong about her ability to control Nick, but she
did know how to handle him. He was so used to getting what he wanted that
defiance always caught him off guard. Jay supposed that was what
happened when you grew up with a bastard of a father who expected you to
ask “how high?” whenever he said “jump.”
Jay pulled on a shapeless sweater, pairing it with a pair of tweed pants
and her boots. She looked at her reflection, frowned, and added a pair of
chandelier earrings. As she ate a bowl of cooked spelt berries, she Googled
herself, as she often did, before placing a rush order for her new phone, and
then grabbing her iPod and heading out to catch the train.
Just a normal day, she told herself. Relax. At least it isn't raining this
time.
She just barely made the Northbound heading into the city. Her limbs
somehow felt heavy and jittery all at once. She hated the crowded trains, the
constant sensation of being groped. She hated that losing her Clipper card
meant paying for a ticket with cash, which meant long lines and an anxious
wait. Vanessa Carlton was blasting in her ears but not even that could cover
the screech of the train on the tracks or the shouted curses of the homeless
man in the back.
“Trying out a new look?” Lily asked, when Jay hung her coat up on the
hook. As usual, she looked flawless and put together in an A-line skirt with
a bow and a pressed floral blouse.
“It's cold,” said Jay, by means of explanation. “And it's laundry day,
Ms. Fashion Goals.”
“It looks very cozy,” Lily said, a little mischievously, and Jay sighed.
“Coffee?”
“Yes, please.” Jay glanced at the clock on her computer. “I love you.”
“I'm taken.” She held up a hand, baring a silver ring. “By the BTS
Army.”
Jay rolled her eyes. “Whatever that means.”
“Oh my God,” said Lily. “I never got you into K-Pop? I am the worst
friend ever.”
When Owen Parker and Sheridan Hawthorne walked back in from
wining and dining their clients, Blood Sweat & Tears was playing and Lily
was demonstrating dance moves with fist pumps and shoulder rolls. It was
during one of these latter that Lily saw their bosses entering the building
and Jay wondered if she had gotten whiplash. I didn't know the human neck
could turn so fast, she thought, fighting back a giggle as Lily turned bright
red.
“Good morning, Mr. Parker, Ms. Hawthorne. How are you?”
Sheridan coughed, like she was trying to muffle a laugh, while Owen
said only, “Good afternoon, girls. Ms. Varens, did I get any calls?”
“No, Mr. Parker. There have been no new calls, although you have an
appointment at four.”
“Very good.”
Jay leaned over and quickly switched off the music while the two
executives resumed chatting on the slow walk back to their offices,
although she noticed Owen looking back at her over his shoulder with
raised brows. She smiled guiltily.
“Ah!” Lily tugged at her skirt, smoothing it. “Why didn't you say
something?”
“Because I didn't see them,” Jay said, turning towards her. “I was
looking at you.”
“I am so embarrassed. I need to recover my dignity.” Lily fanned her
face. “I am going to drown my sorrows in the bottom of a poke bowl. Want
to come with? They have a tofu option.”
“Not today,” said Jay. “I'm working through lunch. How about
tomorrow?”
“I'm always up for lunch with you, boo.” A look of concern crossed her
face as she snagged her purse off her desk. “Don't work yourself too hard,
though. Okay?”
“I promise,” said Jay. “I'll swan about and do nothing but make coffee.”
“Atta girl.” Lily clicked her tongue while making finger guns, which
made Jay laugh again as she watched her friend skip down the stairs and out
the door, leaving her alone in the front office with her thoughts and the
clock. 2:45. She had forty-five minutes to go.
It's too quiet. She turned on some quiet music and got up to scan some
documents for one of Owen's meetings to the sweetly wistful strains of
Rachael Yamagata. Even though their company was trying to go paperless,
many of their clients still wanted hard copies to take notes on. She needed
twenty, but the copier had different ideas.
“Out of paper?” Jay muttered to herself. “You have paper, you greedy
son of a bitch.” She filled the tray and pressed buttons, swearing when it
spat out three badly blurred copies.
Maybe she needed to fill the other tray? While she was lifting the rear
compartment, she heard the door chime and the sound of footsteps heading
up the stairs. Now who might that be? Jay wondered, after another
compulsive glance at her watch. Maybe someone looking for the bakery
next door.
But then Jay saw the blurred reflection of the person on the polished
stone tile—swirls of gray and black, like Lily's skirt and hair—and she
turned with a smile. “Back so soon, Lily? Maybe you can help me tame this
ink spewing . . .”
Her eyes drifted up and the papers fell in a scatter over the floor.
“Monster,” she finished, voice just above a whisper.
He stalked closer and his shiny brogues echoed off the tile like the
reports of a rifle being fired. Nick, she thought, and something curdled
inside her under that deliberate stare. He stopped a few feet away and his
eyes dropped insolently, taking her in, before going to the scattered papers.
What the hell was he doing here so early? Had he known she was going
to run? Oh, God, he probably had. She should have called in sick. She
should have—
His coat flared out, drawing her eyes back to him as he bent to one
knee to pick up her scattered papers. She could see the fabric of his shirt
undulate as his arms moved, hinting at the heavy muscle beneath. In her
memories, and her thoughts, Nick had always been a boy: a cruelly intense
boy, mired in the kind of brooding sullenness that eventually become selfindulgent and callous, but a boy, nonetheless.
He wasn't a boy anymore.
Still on the floor, he paused before rising, and when he lifted his head,
she felt his breath stir through her pantleg. The coldness inside her body
solidified, becoming pure ice as awareness of what their respective
positions would look like to anyone passing by drove into her with all the
subtlety of a sledgehammer, making her stumble back drunkenly.
It's really him, she thought, when he handed her the files. At 6'4”, he
was one of the few people she had to look up at. She didn't look up, though.
She refused to give him that pleasure. Instead, she stared at his throat,
clutching the papers to her breast.
“Nick.”
“Blue jay.” He reached out—to touch her hair? Her earrings?—and Jay
scooted another step back. His smile hardened as he let his hand fall. “You
haven't changed at all.”
“Mr. Parker is in a meeting.” She was proud of herself. Her voice didn't
even shake. “Do you need help with something?”
That cold gaze flicked over her again and she was very glad for the
acrylic sweater's thick, shapeless warmth when his eyes lingered briefly on
her breasts. “Are you his little secretary? That's so cute. I'm meeting with
him at four.”
“I'm an administrative assistant.” She spoke through clenched teeth.
“His administrative assistant. And if your appointment isn't until four, why
are you even here?”
“Because you also have an appointment with me.” Nicholas took
another step closer and Jay felt the copy machine hit her back. It let out an
indignant beep, making her jump.
“I can't go out for drinks now,” she said. “I'm still working.”
Another step. “When do you get off?”
Jay looked away, staring at her desk like it was the most interesting
place in the world as she tried not to let his suggestively-phrased question
get to her. “Five.”
“How convenient. That's when my meeting ends.”
I know, thought Jay, and her heart gave a traitorous thud. I scheduled it.
“Bana at five.” He shifted and Jay's eyes swung over to him in alarm. If
he took one more step, their bodies would be touching. “I'm looking
forward to it.”
Jay bit her lip to keep it from trembling.
Nicholas studied her for a moment longer as the now-working copier
revved at her back. She was debating on whether she ought to fake him out
or run for it when he abruptly angled himself away. “I'm going out for a
brief walk. I'll be back in time for the meeting.”
Jay watched him stalk away; he left right as Lily was coming back in.
She glanced up at Nicholas and said something to him—“I'm sorry” or
“excuse me” or “you go ahead”—as if reality had diverged and he were just
some ordinary guy and not . . . himself.
“I got you a matcha latte with soy milk because I'm awesome—they
didn't have oat. What are you—” Lily's eyes scrolled down abruptly and she
continued, in an entirely different tone of voice, “What are you doing down
there on the floor, Jay?”
Her legs had finally given out. “I fell.” Her voice sounded rusty. “It's
these new boots. The soles are slippery,” she added lamely, clutching her
bundle of papers tighter.
Lily didn't say anything else as she set the drinks and food down on her
desk. “Are you all right?” she asked gently, bending down. “Did something
happen while I was gone? Was it that guy?”
“No.” Jay got up and sat at her desk. “I really did fall. I'm actually
feeling a little dizzy. I think—I think I might sneak out early today.”
“That's what happens when you don't eat lunch, Jay.” Lily winked,
though her face was drawn. She obviously didn't believe the lie. “Don't
worry, I won't tell.”
They worked in silence for a while but Jay could sense Lily glancing
over at her every so often, which made her even more self-conscious. Her
hands were visibly shaking and she kept her wrists pressed against the desk
as she typed, trying to control her breathing.
I'll leave when he gets back. She took a sip of her matcha tea and froze
with the straw still in her mouth.
Nicholas walked back in. His eyes went to Lily, who was eyeing him
with suspicion, and then to her, his expression darkly amused. “I'm here to
see Mr. Parker. Is he ready for me?”
Are you ready for me, Jay?
Aware of Lily watching, Jay pressed the intercom button. “Mr.
Beaucroft's here, Owen.”
She glanced at Nicholas and wished she had not when she saw the look
on his face. The heat in it was blistering. Oh yes, she knew that look, just as
she knew exactly what would happen if she went with him for drinks. Jay
sat straighter, locking her back against the building shudder.
You're Daddy's little bird.
“Great, Jay,” Owen was saying, oblivious. “Go ahead and send him in.”
Jay gestured at the door and caught a whiff of citrus as he swept by her,
shooting her another one of those glances as he went, and then the door
closed and the world was moving again and Jay was on her way out the
door, running like her life depended on it.
She didn't feel safe until she was speeding away on the train.
At home, she sat on her sofa with Carbon next to her, nibbling at a
tahini-spread wrap she'd filled with fresh lettuce and fried cauliflower. Her
thoughts were becoming more defined, more reasonable, as her panic
cleared, and she realized that she might have made a big mistake.
Nicholas would be very angry when he realized she wouldn't be
coming. He didn't like being outmaneuvered and he would probably take it
as a challenge. She eyed the phone warily, as if it were a coiled serpent,
bracing herself for the ring, for the sound of his voice.
How had she gotten into this mess? Why couldn't she just have a
normal life? She'd gone from spending her adolescence doing her
homework by the flickering lights in a seedy strip club's dressing room,
only to be hurled into the other wild extreme: a deceptively picturesque
beachside locale whose lurid opulence and tranquil waters were all lined
with vicious, sharp-edged teeth.
Mentally, she included her mother in that latter category, still stinging
from the betrayal. How could she have tried to sell her out to Nick, of all
people?
Of course, it was a lot of money, she conceded bitterly. Millions of
dollars, probably. Her mother liked her as much as she liked anyone, she
just liked money more. It wasn't personal—it never was, not even when it
should have been. Jay wasn't sure what her mother had been slated to
inherit, but she guessed it was either a quarter or half of whatever Damon
owned. Wasn't that typical for spouses with adult children? She really didn't
know much about probate.
Damon had made a career out of making people rich, and it had made
him rich, as well. His house had been huge. The master bath alone had been
as big as the one-bedroom she'd shared with her mom in the Tenderloin.
You could get lost in there; she had gotten lost. Sometimes it felt like she
was still lost, stuck in that house, always running, always trying to stay one
foot ahead.
She had never been comfortable there. People had accepted her
because they were afraid of her stepfather and because they thought she was
pretty, but she had always been looking over her shoulder, consciously
aware of how easily everything she'd worked for could be torn down.
It turns out, most people find perfection really fucking annoying.
Here, in a tiny studio apartment in the Mission, she had carved out a
niche for herself. It was hers, and everything she had now, she had gotten
independently without any handouts. Her life was modest. She had given up
the trappings of wealth and excess when she ran, selling off what remained
of her jewelry, living within her means, and she was perfectly comfortable
with that—
Until Nick had found her.

She's not coming.
Nicholas had suspected she wouldn't be ever since he had come out of
that intolerably dull meeting and seen the empty chair, her dark monitor.
The Asian girl at the other desk had given him a look, like she knew where
he had buried all the bodies. He wondered what Jay had said to her, if
anything, about the meeting. She had never been the type to open up and
confide in others.
What a passionate and achingly lonely girl she had been—so bitter
beneath the sweet. She might have changed, but Nicholas didn't think so.
Not after hearing the music she'd been playing in the office or hearing her
swear softly at the copier. Not after seeing how quickly that bright smile
had withered or how her eyes had filled with fear upon glimpsing him.
Her hands had actually trembled when he'd handed her those papers.
Did she think he'd been planning on dragging her down to the floor and
fucking her in that sterile little office of hers? Did she remember how he
liked to fuck? Maybe that's what made her run. He smiled grimly, running a
hand along his unshaven jaw. Foolish girl. She knew he loved the chase.
Seeing his smile, Owen Parker turned to him and said, “So what did
you think?”
“I'll let you know my final decision tomorrow,” Nicholas said absently,
and the other man looked disappointed but not entirely surprised. “Thank
you for the presentation.”
Damn the presentation, he thought, as the other secretary looked
pointedly away from him. He hadn't come four hundred miles to sit through
a three-hour long bullshit session about the merits of soap and bath oil and
scented candles. What a waste of his time.
He went to Bana anyway, just to give her a fair chance. It was a Turkish
bar that was known for its raki, but they had appetizers and liqueur-based
cocktails, as well as a limited tapas menu. Nicholas stayed for an hour: he
had two drinks, left a generous tip, and then left, thrusting his hands into the
pockets of his blazer to keep out the encroaching chill of the fog.
San Francisco was surprisingly cold. So much more so than
Hollybrook. Only fools and masochists would tread along these
inhospitable beaches, or swim in that iron gray water. He couldn't see how
Jay could possibly enjoy living in this dump. She'd always seemed to like
L.A.
Until you, that dark, niggling voice whispered. You made her run.
Nicholas returned to his hotel, greeting the clerk—a trick he'd learned
from Jay. She said hello to people because she genuinely seemed to like
people; he did it because the service was so much better. Once he was
alone, he leaned against the closed door of his hotel room. Then he stalked
towards the bed, shrugging his coat off and tossing it on a nearby chair as
he began to undo the pristine white fabric that had been beneath it, balling
that up and tossing it, too.
The sheets had been soft enough last night but now they chafed against
his skin. The king-sized bed was too big for one person, but he hadn't
thought he'd be returning here alone. He slid off his belt with a musical
jangle and unzipped his jeans, pulling them down just enough to free
himself. Mr. Beaucroft, she had called him, in that soft, mellifluous voice.
Not as good as what he wanted, but better than Nick: it had just enough
reverence to get him hard.
A sound escaped his lips as he began to stroke himself. As his mind
hazed over with pleasure, he began thinking about how he was going to get
his flighty bird to come to him.
It would be harder this time. He couldn't just grab her off the street or
buy her off the way her mother could be bought off, which meant he was
going to have to resort to his old games and fuck with her trusting little
head. Nicholas arched back, slowly rocking his hips into his own jerking
fist. God, he wished she were a secret deviant. If he was going to blackmail
her, he needed something more on her than just a stripper mother, or a
mildly salacious tape.
Everyone else in our family was depraved, he thought. Her mother,
fucking the pool boy. My father, fucking everyone else. Even he had done
his share of the illicit, largely because of his father, who had seen that first
faint spark of depravity burning inside him and encouraged it to burn. He
still remembered that trip to the brothel when he was eighteen. How that
whore named Ivy had looked and sounded so right in some ways, but so
wrong in the ways that mattered.
He climaxed with a vengeance, spattering hot come on his tensed
stomach. Nicholas leaned over and grabbed a tissue from the nightstand,
cleaning himself off as his breathing eased. No, it hadn't been the same, and
that was why he had stopped seeing her. It was why he had stopped seeing
all women, really, regardless of how prettily they sucked his cock or
begged.
There was only one woman who belonged beneath him, so he might as
well delete the—
It hit him, in a burst of insight: the photograph.
He knew exactly how to trap Jay.
Chapter Three
2017

No new meetings to schedule.
It should have been reassuring, but instead it was ominous; she felt like
someone was holding a gun to her head and she was kneeling in the dark,
waiting to see if it would or wouldn't fire. Jay couldn't believe that he would
come all this way to see her and then simply . . . give up.
Really, it wasn't her fault. Considering everything that had happened
between them, Nick couldn't be surprised that she would never want to see
him again.
No new meetings to schedule.
He had her home phone number. He probably had her cell phone
number, too—too bad that was stolen. Her mouth twisted. Hell, who was
she kidding? He probably had a thousand ways of looking her up. There
was no shortage of resources in the world for a man like him. He could
make her life very painful if he wanted to. The question was, did he want
to?
Jay looked at the door. Maybe he's going to confront me in person and
make a scene.
The thought made her sick. She'd always hated scenes. But Nick
seemed to get off on them.
“Laundry day again?” Lily asked, walking by with a cup of coffee from
Jumpin' Java.
Jay clutched at the fuzzy neck of her turtleneck sweater. “I'm just trying
something new.”
“The Cat Grandma Fashion Handbook?” she quipped. “Step one: wear
a cat hair sweater?”
“It's mohair,” said Jay. “And I'm not a cat grandma—at the most, I'm a
cat aunt.”
I could be an aunt, she realized. Nick's twenty-seven now. I could be an
aunt multiple times over. He could be married—divorced. Why did that
make her feel as if she had a fever? She tugged at her sweater, as if to fan
the heated skin beneath. I don't know anything about him now.
“Okay,” said Lily. “Seriously, Jay. What's going on? You keep staring at
that door like you think it's going to bite you. Are you expecting someone?”
“No,” said Jay. “I'm just not feeling well.”
The door behind them burst open, chatter escaping. “Ms. Varens.”
Owen walked towards her with his arm around—no. “Have you met Mr.
Beaucroft?”
“Yes,” she said, furiously modulating her voice. “Yesterday. In
reception.”
“Jay is such a delight. So is Lily. Sherry and I love these girls.
Yesterday, the two of them were in here dancing to K-Bop music, or
whatever it's called, if you can believe that.”
“I can,” said Nick, smiling humorlessly.
“You're a lucky girl, Jay,” said Owen. “Nick here would like to take
you out to lunch.”
Lunch? The thought of being seated across a table from this man sent
her thoughts into a tailspin. “Oh no,” she said, falteringly. “I couldn't—”
“I find administrative assistants often have their finger on the pulse of
the company.” Nick stepped forward as Owen let his arm drop, his eyes
locked with hers. “I'd love to pick your mind, Jay.”
“Just don't give him too much,” Owen said, with a wink. “Remember
your loyalties.”
My loyalties, thought Jay, feeling her face pale. She sneaked another
glance at Nick, arms folded, head tilted at an angle that could only be
described as predatory.
“Don't worry about marking it off on your time sheet,” said Owen. “It's
company business.”
Painfully aware of everyone's eyes, but especially his, Jay got to her
feet. When she didn't immediately collapse, she grabbed her cheap bag off
the desk. “Okay,” she said. “Let's go.”
“Have fun.” Owen waved cheekily, like he was doing her a favor. He
probably thought he was. Being paid to take lunch with a good-looking man
probably would have made most people's days. But she was not most
people, and Nick was not just any man.
And she was in big trouble.
He walked at her side, looming over her. She hadn't worn her boots
today because they had made the balls of her feet hurt, but now she wished
she had. She would have liked those extra two inches, so he didn't loom
over her quite as much. Even though four inches wasn't much better than
six, it would have made her feel like less of a pushover.
She glanced up at him warily. His face was harsh in profile, shaded by
afternoon shadow. His pale eyes were trained straight ahead on the busy
sidewalk, like he knew exactly where he was going. His dark hair was, as it
had always been, in casual disarray. Any sort of hazard, be it rain, wind, or
even his own fingers, put a curl in his forelock that no amount of hairspray
or gel could tame. And then there was his mouth, firm and unsmiling—
Jay found she could not stand to look at his mouth. Her eyes quickly
dropped.
His clothes were darker today, perhaps because his mood was darker.
His pants and belt were black and the suit coat was charcoal; the only
contrast to all that shadow was a white shirt, left open at the throat to show
off his golden tan.
“Like what you see?”
“I . . . I'm sorry?”
“You should be.” Nick's voice dragged her eyes back up to his face. He
still wasn't looking at her—he had hardly looked at her at all since leaving
the office, in fact—but his anger all but rumbled from him now and he had
clearly noticed her staring. “You stood me up.”
“I thought I could make it. Something came up.” When his eyes shifted
towards her, Jay flicked her gaze away, studying the crosswalk sign with
rapt interest. “I'm busy.”
“So am I.” His low voice deepened, hitting a register that sent a shiver
down her spine. “I don't particularly like it when people waste my time, Jay.
It's worth a lot these days. You're lucky I don't bill you for it.”
They were approaching a building with a familiar green sign. The
Green Grill. She actually really liked this place, but it wasn't the type of
joint that popped up right away in a search. Jay looked at him in alarm, her
mother's words on the phone floating back to her—he was always slinking
around. “Have you been spying on me?” she demanded, crossing her arms.
She had spoken too loudly. Several people looked over, drawn to that
illicit word, spying. A muscle in Nick's jaw jumped when he noticed the
extra attention. “We're not discussing that here.”
“It's a yes or no question,” said Jay. “I think you can manage.”
He gave her another measuring look and this one scared her where the
anger had not fully succeeded because it was deliberately impassive, gilt in
swirls of darker emotions that colored his features like an impressionistic
overlay of pure menace. “Yes, then,” he said coolly. “I hired someone.”
A waitress approached before Jay could demand the obvious followups: What the fuck? Who? Why would you do that? And, Are you
completely insane?
They were seated in the back behind a potted Guiana chestnut that
looked fake and probably was. The table was right next to the open kitchen
and Jay could feel the torrents of oppressive heat from the grill, even from
across the aisle. Nick shrugged off his coat and began cuffing his
shirtsleeves, revealing a watch that probably cost a month of her rent.
Jay fidgeted uncomfortably, pushing up her own sleeves and tugging at
the restrictive neck of her sweater. There was no way she was going to (take
your top off and kiss me) take it off in here. “You hired someone,” she
reminded him tightly.
“Just a private investigator, Jay. It's not like I took out a hit on you.”
“Can I get you anything to drink?” asked the waitress. “Tea? Soda?
Wine?”
“I'll have your house red,” said Nick, which sent another cold chill
through Jay. The last time she'd seen him, he hadn't been old enough to
legally drink. “Go ahead and bring the bottle.”
“Water,” said Jay. “Sparkling, please.” She could feel a headache
coming on.
“So here we are.” Nick picked up the menu. “What remains of the
happy family.”
“We're not family,” Jay said, more defensively than she wanted to.
“Not really. Your father never legally adopted me.” She wouldn't let herself
think about why.
“Poor little bird.” He glanced at her over the laminated folds. “You
tried so hard to get them to love you.”
“Stop calling me bird names.” She hated herself for saying it, for rising
to the bait, even as the words that followed them sank into her like hooks
drawing blood. “Why did you want to see me, anyway? It's been eight
years. I doubt you invited me here to ask about soap.”
“I did come here to invest.” Nick set the menu aside. “I happen to
believe it's very important to take the moral fiber of a company into account
before sinking a ton of money into it.”
Jay scoffed. “Bet your father didn't teach you that.”
“No. You did.”
Another chill. She locked her shoulders against it. “What would you
know about morals?”
“I know a lot about morals.” He dipped to rifle through his briefcase,
pausing to smile up at the waitress who had arrived with the bottles of
Pellegrino and red wine. She took their orders—he got the cauliflower steak
and she got avocado fries—and when she was gone, he slid a piece of paper
towards her, face-down, across the table. “And I know how much they
matter to you, blue jay.”
His face revealed nothing. She slid the paper to the edge of the table,
making it easier to tilt it up. Deep down, she already knew she wouldn't like
what she was about to see, or he wouldn't be sitting there looking at her so
smugly, but this—
The woman in the photograph was naked, and it was the sort of pose
meant to titillate. Her back was arched, her nipples stiff, fingers parting
herself to reveal her glistening . . . everything. The cameraman, whoever
that was—she glanced at Nick—had obviously been kneeling between her
legs, shooting up with a very expensive camera. The resolution was crisp.
“Classy,” she said sarcastically, setting it down. “Who's this?”
“Her name is Ivy. She lives in Mound House, Nevada. It's where I got
you that gypsum rose you decided to sell. You look a little flushed,” he
added pointedly. “Maybe you'd be more comfortable without the sweater.”
“Is this your girlfriend or something?” She pushed the paper back. “Did
you think I'd be jealous?”
“She's a whore from a brothel,” he said bluntly, which made her flinch
as he'd undoubtedly intended. Plucking the paper off the table, Nick looked
briefly at the photo before turning it over again. “I've always thought that
she looks quite a bit like you.”
It took Jay a moment to speak; she was horrified to realize her mouth
had fallen open in shock. Like me? There was so much in there she didn't
want to touch that she was afraid of where to even begin without springing
open some kind of trap. She began to fidget, struggling against the itchy
wool as the heat became unbearably oppressive.
“She's 'ambiguously ethnic,'” said Jay, putting quotes around the words,
“and she has dark, curly hair. Apart from that, she looks nothing like me.”
You goddamn asshole.
“Oh, I don't know about that.” Nick slipped the photo back into his
briefcase just as soon as it occurred to her to grab it. “I think if people saw
this photo online, labeled with your name, they'd take it at face value—don't
you think so? Ivy isn't on social media, so there's really no one to trace it
back to. Except for you.”
Jay felt a bead of sweat roll down her spine. “It's online?” With my
name?
“No.” His smile was wolfish. “Not yet.”
Her hands began to shake and she pulled them hastily into her lap, but
when she tried to take her plate from the waitress, she ended up dumping
half of the fries on the table as a tremor tore down her arm. “Oh my God,”
said Jay, so upset that the waitress immediately lost her faint look of
annoyance and began to apologize profusely to her as she fetched a trash
can. “No, I'm so, so sorry. Thank—” She swallowed raspily. “Thank you.”
“Always so nice to the help,” Nick murmured, following the waitress
with his eyes. “You were constantly sucking up to Yelena. I annoyed her—
but she liked you. Everyone did.”
The waitress had given him two glasses. He filled both with wine but
she shook her head when he pushed one at her, glaring at him hatefully.
This isn't happening. This can't be happening.
“Do you remember,” he continued, swirling his own glass, “the first
day we met? When you saved that little cat that was caught up in the tree? I
remember being so jealous of that furry beast. Nobody ever went to bat for
me the way you did for that damn cat.” He laughed bitterly as he took a sip
of his wine. “It was a fucking cat.”
Jay picked up her water glass and drained it. His dark mood was as
oppressive as a weight. “What do you expect me to say?” she asked, after a
pause. “That I remember? That it was an insight into your true character?
That I'm sorry? I'm not sorry.”
Nick cut his eyes at her and she stopped speaking.
“I told your boss that I'd make my decision tomorrow. That I needed to
think about it. But maybe you've given me doubts, Ms. Varens. Maybe I did
some digging about the company and found that photo of you online
cemented what I already suspected. That your little company isn't worth my
time or my money, and you're not the delight your boss thinks you are.”
Jay felt her breath escape her in a rush. “I'd lose my job. No one would
hire me.”
“I wouldn't say that.” He tapped his briefcase. “I think there's a few
places that would.”
Oh God. Her eyes were filling up with what she thought might be tears.
Inhaling sharply, she focused on a button that had been fastened crookedly
on his shirt, staring at that small piece of imperfection as she struggled to
compose herself. “What the hell do you want?”
“Take off your sweater.”
Jay widened her eyes. “I don't have anything on under it.”
“Bullshit, Jay. You always wear at least two layers.” His smile faded.
“Lose it. Now.”
Fighting him on this point seemed fruitless. She yanked angrily at the
hem and got tangled in the hot, woolen mess of it. When she had it over her
head, her hair was a frizzy cloud from the static and one of the straps of her
camisole was halfway down her shoulder. He looked at it and Jay hastily
slid her top back into place, fighting the urge to cover herself as his eyes
roved over her torso.
“That's nice.” He lingered on the lacy neckline of her camisole before
lifting his gaze to meet hers. Jay wasn't sure what her face looked like; she
was trying so hard not to give in to the urge to cry that she felt like
everything else in it might have been all screwed up. “How you came out of
your foolish whore of a mother is something I'll never understand. One of
the universe's greatest unsolved mysteries,” he scoffed, spearing a piece of
cauliflower.
“Don't talk about my mother like that.” Yes, anger—anger was good.
She could lose herself in her anger and try not to cut herself on whatever
sharp emotion was glinting in his eyes.
“Don't defend her. She sold you to me. Or didn't you wonder how I got
your home number? She gave it to me quickly enough when I suggested it
might be worth her while.”
He said he would be willing to speak to you. Christ. Her mother had
outed herself and she hadn't even noticed; she'd been so wrapped up in the
drama of the moment. Danielle Varens hadn't been blocked by the secretary,
after all. She'd spoken to the devil himself.
And he wanted to cut a deal with her.
“She's broke,” Jay said, as much for her own sake as for Nick's.
“I don't want to hear the excuses. She made herself broke. She could
pawn her jewelry and actually try living within her means for once—I know
you sold some of yours. But she didn't want to do that. She'd rather sell you
instead and that,” he said savagely, “is precisely why that woman is the
foolish whore I say she is. She severely undervalues your worth. I won't.”
Suddenly, it felt like her neck was no longer capable of supporting her
head. With a muffled sob, Jay bowed forward, face in her hands as her hair
spilled forward over her shoulders, and she heard Nick let out an
involuntary breath as she gave him the perfect view down the front of her
skimpy top. Blushing furiously, Jay bolted upright, sitting ramrod straight in
her seat, but it was too late; he'd already seen what he'd seen.
“Fuck,” she thought she heard Nick mutter. He shifted slightly in his
seat and drained his wine glass as a moody pop song began to play from the
speakers.
“What do you want?” Jay asked again. She twisted a strand of her hair.
“Me, I'm guessing.”
“Quit your job.” He spread his arms over the back of his side of the
booth. “Come work for me.”
Jay was no longer sure where she should look. His current posture was
so affectedly careless that it was almost crass. He had been just nineteen
when she had seen him last. That was not a nineteen-year-old man's body.
“One can only assume,” she said to the table, “that you mean on my back.”
His chest hitched in a silent laugh and the buttons seemed to strain
dangerously. “No, Jay. My secretary is terrible—she let your mother
through, for one, after I specifically told her not to, which is obviously very
unacceptable to me. Even if it did work out in my favor. I want you to work
for Beaucroft Assets, and if you do, I'll double whatever you're making at
the soap shop.”
“Really.” Jay didn't bother to hide her disbelief as she hugged the
sweater to her stomach. “You're blackmailing me so you can give me a
raise?”
“This is separate. Consider it a gift for your own sake. I've seen where
you're living. No, I'm blackmailing you because I have something your
mother wants and she appointed you as intermediary to get it from me. She
also really decided to fuck you in the process, but she's not very good at
fucking you, Jay. I think I can fuck you a lot better than your mother can.”
A strangled sound escaped her. “You don't get to talk to me like that.”
“This is business. It's a fuck or get-fucked world out there.” Nick let his
arms fall from the booth as he slid forward. “Guess which side of the table
you're sitting on.”
Anger was almost, but not quite, beginning to eclipse her fear. She
grabbed her sweater and yanked it back over her head, ignoring his quiet
laugh.
“That's what I want, little bird. I want us to continue where we left off.
Just like old times. What can I say? I suppose I've been feeling nostalgic in
my old age.” She felt a tug on her hair. Nick had captured one of the
spiraling locks, twirling it with surprising gentleness in his fingers. When
he brushed her nose with it, she flinched, and he released the strand of hair
as he leaned back. “I'm going to ruin you either way, so you might as well
live a little.”
Chapter Four
2017

Part of Jay had wanted to pick up what remained of her water glass and
slosh it into his face. She could imagine the crashing rush of adrenaline, the
startled gasps that would follow, his seething rage. Go fuck yourself, she
would say, and for a few minutes, it would be wonderful.
For a moment, she allowed herself to bask in the fantasy, to let her
fingers close over her glass and entertain the thought of this alternate-reality
Jay who truly didn't give a fuck. But since Jay did, she raised the glass to
her lips before setting it down hard enough to splash some water on the
table.
I want us to continue where we left off.
“You want me to work for you,” Jay said slowly. “But you also want to
—”
“Fuck,” he supplied, a grim smile touching his mouth. “Say it. You'll be
doing it.”
It wasn't hard to imagine him wearing that same look on his face while
someone on the other side of a desk stammeringly confessed to a
monumental screw-up. Which, she realized with a strange frisson, could
easily be her, if she accepted his wildly inappropriate job offer.
She cleared her throat and stared down at her cold fries. “Contrary to
what you might think, I am a serious professional. I do actual work for my
boss. Good work.”
“I wouldn't touch you in the office. It's bad for morale. I'm not my
father,” he added, the rebuke in the words clear.
Jay blinked, memories of a holiday party coming back to her with
stark, chilling clarity. Cold blue light. Dark hallways. A woman's low sobs.
The sharp, coppery tang of blood.
No, thought Jay. He isn't his father. He's much more terrifying.
“I run a professional business.” Nick refilled his wineglass. His third
glass? Fourth? He didn't seem to be tipsy at all. “I fire people who don't.
How I conduct my personal life is entirely separate from what I do at
work.”
“Not entirely,” said Jay, glancing at her water. Why did she feel like
she'd drunk the wine?
“Perhaps.” His tone was level. “I can be discreet, Jay. Patience,
however, is not one of my virtues. I've got to return to the hotel and head
over to the airport, so I need an answer from you now. Yes or no?”
“Fine.” The word tumbled from her lips, hostile and defiant. “Whatever
you want.”
How hideously easy it was to sign her life away. She was sickened—
with herself, with him, with the whole situation. For a moment, she stared at
the still-full wineglass, sorely tempted.
“Carte blanche?” Nick glanced at her and then at his watch. “Seems
unwise.”
Strangely, she found herself becoming insulted. He had blackmailed
and bullied her into capitulation and now that he'd gotten what he wanted,
he didn't seem to care.
“I'm sorry I'm boring you,” she said icily.
“You aren't. I'm working out some quick math.” He slid his blazer back
on without rolling down the sleeves and grabbed his briefcase, glancing at
her. “If you're done, we can leave.”
Jay immediately stood up, closing her eyes against the sudden head
rush. Nick strode ahead, easily outpacing her. She watched him pay,
watched him smile at the hostess—that was weird. The Nick she
remembered had never smiled like that; he had always been so sullen.
“What were you working out?” she asked. “The tip?”
“My flight,” he responded. “Your flight, too. It's really too bad you
didn't meet me at Bana when I asked. I thought I'd get you in bed at least
once before I left.”
She looked at him so sharply that she stumbled on a crack in the
sidewalk and nearly went flying. He caught her by the arm, pulling her
upright in a way that left her even unsteadier than the near-fall because his
grip was strong and filled with the only the scarcest restraint.
It was the first time he'd touched her in eight years and it was making
her unravel.
“The logistics aren't great,” he said, “so I suppose I'll have to wait one
more day to see you.”
Her body was jolted, hard, as someone shoved past her in annoyance. It
crowded her against Nick, who glanced after the man who had shoved her
in irritation, even as he moved them closer to the edges of the building. One
more day. “You mean tomorrow,” she said.
“Yes, well. It's not wise to agree to the terms of a contract before you
get them in writing.”
She stepped back from him and he let his hands fall back to his side, a
smirk playing on his full mouth. She hated him then, but she hated herself
just a little more, and said nothing else as they walked back in the direction
of her office. Normally, she paid very little attention to her surroundings—
which was probably how her purse had gotten stolen in the first place—but
in her quest to ignore the man at her side, she found herself noticing
everything.
There was a Thai restaurant she hadn't tried; she wished she'd seen it
earlier, because she would have gone there with Lily. Movie posters for The
Disaster Artist, which she wanted to see, and Dunkirk, which she didn't. An
artsy poster for a midnight showing of The Forbidden Zone. In her
periphery, she was aware of Nicholas tilting his head to study her, which
made her look even more intently at the buildings across the street, even as
her heart began to race.
I can't believe he expects me to just go to him—like he thinks I'm oncall, she thought angrily. What am I supposed to do? Uproot my life and
everything I worked for because he's—
She caught herself.
Was that food truck always there?
There was an abrupt tug on her arm, a blur of colors and faces and dark
concrete walls, and then Jay found herself being dragged off into the alley
by her grim-faced stepbrother. “Nick!” she yelped, clutching at the hand on
her arm. “Stop! What are you doing?”
“Don't call me Nick.” Without releasing her, he pivoted so that his back
was facing the busy sidewalk. Before she could demand her release, his
mouth was over hers.
It was—Jay did not have words to explain what he did to her mouth. A
kiss was sweet, tender, a promise of passion. This was demand couched in
raw, animal hunger; as scorching as the heat of the sweltering kitchen: the
unrelenting pressure of his lips on hers promised her own destruction.
Her body sank, her hand still clutching the one of his that was on his
arm. Gently, he freed himself from her grip and put his hands on her waist,
beneath her heavy sweater, touching her through the thin camisole. Her
body jerked as his thumbs traced the shape of her breasts, coaxing her
nipples to stiff, aching points. She moaned into his mouth, which still tasted
like wine, her fingers digging into his shoulders through the tweed blazer as
she lost herself to the sensations of what he was doing to her body. It wasn't
like this before, she thought. He wasn't like this before.
And then rough brick was at her back, catching on her sweater, and
Nick—Nicholas—was at her front, startling her into opening her eyes as her
body brushed against his. She could smell something rotten and was
reminded of where they were and how fast she was breathing.
“You see what I mean,” he said, only a little breathless. His eyes were
on her face. “You told me I could do whatever I want. Is that a condition
you're capable of fulfilling?” His hand, still beneath her sweater, now
inched beneath her camisole, thumbing the edge of her waistband. When
she didn't speak, his grip tightened and he added harshly, “Would you fuck
me in public?”
Jay looked at the empty alley. At the dumpster overflowing with refuse.
Then she saw his self-satisfied sneer and her anger spiked in recognition.
“Sure,” she said. “Go ahead. Should I turn around or do you want it face to
face?”
The sneer disappeared and his face became a perfect blank. He slipped
his hands out of her sweater, strumming over her ribs on the way down.
Carefully, he tugged at the woolen hem, straightening the fabric, and when
his thumbs brushed over her hips, Jay felt curiously lightheaded. I'm too
hot, she thought. This sweater is making me too hot.
“I'm not an exhibitionist.” Nicholas gave her a look of reproof. “And
I'm not a sadist.”
“You could have fooled me.”
Her words hung suspended between them, barbed and dangerous. She
was trembling again; her skin was prickling everywhere he'd touched and
she was almost painfully aware of the texture of her clothes and the way
they were sliding over her skin. Moisture had gathered between her legs and
she felt that, too. Every time she shifted her weight, that cold kiss against
her inner thighs felt like a stinging reprimand.
Nicholas released her, holding her at length. The air that flowed in
between them burned cold. “You're shaking,” he remarked. “Can you
walk?”
“D-don't flatter yourself,” she said. “I'm fine.”
“I'll leave you to sort yourself out, then. I really do need to go. Text me
your flight number and I'll arrange a car to meet you at the airport when you
arrive at LAX. You have my number.”
“I deleted it.” She didn't mention that she'd had to buy a new phone.
Nicholas made a sound she couldn't interpret and pulled out his phone.
She saw his thumbs tap over the screen and then her new phone, which had
the same number, bleeped.
She looked down at it bleakly. He'd sent her a bird emoji.
“Don't delete it this time.” The phone was shoved back into his pocket.
“And don't stand me up again, Jay. I'll expect that flight number before
eight tonight or I'm going to call you—no matter how busy you are. We'll
be in touch.”
He's grown up, thought Jay, watching him walk out of the alley.
She wondered why the thought of that was so utterly terrifying.

There were few things in life Nicholas couldn't get if he wanted them.
Sitting across from Jay in the vegan diner, watching her entrancing face
light up with anger and frustration as she tried to poke holes in his carefully
constructed plan, he thought that there was perhaps something to the
delaying of gratification, after all. It made victory so much sweeter.
She had always been the one thing he could never have.
Control had once been his biggest weakness. Now, he prided himself
on his. Seeing how flustered she had become in the face of it had been
extremely gratifying—although not quite as gratifying as the unexpected
bonus of her presenting him with an unobstructed view of her braless chest
that had him sliding a hand into his pocket to readjust himself.
He could still taste her; beneath the taste of oily breading on her tongue
was the lingering sweetness that was just her, Jay. Sweet Jay. God—how
had he forgotten the feel of her mouth? Or the shape of her breasts? Her
nipples had been so hard beneath that ridiculous sweater and the sounds she
had made as they kissed had been fucking maddening. If she had been
wearing a skirt, he might have fucked her in that filthy alley as a prelude to
what he had in store for her. Just remembering the feel of her body against
his was getting him hard.
Nicholas shook his head viciously, trying to clear the images.
Tomorrow, he reminded himself. She'll be mine.
She didn't belong here, working the grind. Living in an apartment that
was scarcely larger than a shed—he'd seen the photographs of it and looked
up the floor plan; it was small. Smaller than the actual shed of his own
house, where he stored old pool equipment and a grill. No, she belonged in
Hollybrook with him. Where she should have been from the very
beginning.
The thought was tinged with something approaching guilt. He knew
why she'd left. He also knew the reason for the fear on her face and that it
was deserved. His house had never been a home to her and as a young man,
he had used her badly. His father had provided him with plenty of
opportunities to test the mettle of his cruelty and he had insolently seized
upon all of them in his willingness to hurt her.
And his father had been the worst of all.
For reasons Nicholas still did not quite fully understand, Damon
Beaucroft had seemed to want to see Justine Varens destroyed. Perhaps he
had wanted to possess her, too. Considering what had happened the night of
that holiday party, that seemed most likely. Jay had been a beautiful girl and
his father had enjoyed acquiring pretty, costly things—
And what he couldn't buy, he ruined.
Nicholas slammed his suitcase shut and pulled out his phone, checking
his messages. There were plenty of those but none from Jay, which didn't
surprise him. She would probably text him at 7:59, just as she undoubtedly
knew that he would call her at 8:01 exactly if she didn't.
A reluctant smile tugged at his mouth, softening his face. So
predictable.
The smile quickly disappeared as he began scrolling, going to his
calendar app and setting up an invitation with Meghana Srivastava from
HR.
It was overdue. He wanted to get rid of Crystal Yost immediately and
needed to determine a proper course of action before terminating his
secretary—administrative assistant, he mentally corrected himself, the smile
nearly threatening to resurface—and onboarding her replacement without
eliciting a wrongful termination suit or claims of favoritism.
Favoritism seemed the most likely, since he planned to push Jay's
paperwork through the day the position opened. Of course, when they met
the woman, it would be a reprise of high school. She was so good at making
people into her slaves. Owen Parker talked about her like a man with a
crush and the other assistant had been ready to throw him out on his ass for
her sake.
According to the P.I., she was single and didn't seem to have many
close friends. She spent most of her time at home. Which means she lied to
me about being busy. Her little show of defiance amused him, even though
it had cost him a night of having her in his bed.
Send me your resume, he messaged her, adding his email address.
The cab ride to the airport was unremarkable, and the two hour flight to
L.A. was dull. A long night of work awaited him, so he grabbed a coffee on
the way out of the terminal, downing most of it in five scalding gulps as he
walked up to his driver. Despite his exhaustion and general crankiness, he
still managed a quiet laugh when his phone buzzed at precisely 7:59.

Jay felt as if her limbs had each gained fifty pounds as she dragged
herself back to the office. Her heart weighed especially heavily in her chest,
so much so that she wondered that it didn't drag her straight down into the
earth. He did this to me, she thought, pulling open the door that led to their
office suite. He did this, and he barely touched me.
She could feel her face heating up anew remembering that flicker of
dark interest that had lit up his eyes as he studied her in the diner. He was
going to destroy her. He nearly had before, but his vanity and his
egocentrism had rendered him too myopic to truly see into the heart of her
and do the damage that he'd craved. This time, she would not escape
unscathed; he was going to make her suffer and do it so well that she might
even grow to crave it—until it sent her plummeting. Until it left her broken
and bleeding.
Until he ripped her heart out.
The bell jangled overhead and Lily waved from her desk, her face
curious. Jay didn't have time to speak with Lily, though, because Owen was
waiting for her, too.
“Jay!” He beckoned her to his office, which she only went into when
transcribing a meeting or delivering coffee. “Come in, come in. Tell me
how lunch went. I want to hear all about it.”
Well, you see, Mr. Parker, my stepbrother just blackmailed me into
sleeping with him because my mother got posthumously disinherited by my
stepfather for fucking the pool boy, and she really, really wants her cut—so
she pimped me out to him, which kind of sucks. But the food at the
restaurant was great, so over all, I'd give it a C-?
“Where did you two go?” Owen was asking. “Did he seem happy with
the company? Were there any difficult questions? Any pain points?”
Oh God. “It was great,” Jay said, not entirely evenly. She could feel her
face beginning to heat. “We went to the Green Grill. I think . . . uh, I think
he'll invest.”
“That's great news.” Owen looked so heartened that Jay wanted to cry.
“Great work, Jay.”
Jay felt her phone buzz and peeked at it. Send me your resume.
“Um.” Jay swallowed hard as the walls began to tilt. “There's more.”
“Oh?” Owen was still smiling but now it looked cautious. “What is it?”
“He kind of offered me a job and it sounds like he wants me to start
right away.”
“I see.” In a neutral voice, Owen asked her, “How soon is right away?”
“Like . . . tomorrow.” Jay hung her head. “I'm sorry. I had no idea that
he'd hire me.” I had no idea that he would come here at all.
She braced herself as Owen's face flickered in a way that she was
unable to interpret. But then he laughed. “I guess I couldn't hide the bestkept secret in San Francisco forever.”
Jay blinked. “Excuse me?”
“I'm not going to lie, Jay. When Beaucroft said he wanted to meet with
you directly, I did wonder if perhaps you'd been applying elsewhere on the
sly.”
“I wouldn't—” This is better. Let him think this. “I'm sorry.”
“More time would have been better,” Owen admitted with a sigh. “But
I think Lily can pick up the slack while we interview other candidates to fill
your position. You've done excellent work for us, Jay, and even though we'll
miss you dearly, I think I speak for everyone at this company when I wish
you the best at what is sure to be an exciting new opportunity for you at this
stage of your career.”
“You're being—” Jay swallowed “—incredibly understanding about
this.”
“Landing an investor on your way out certainly sweetens the sting,”
said Owen, which made the color drain from her face. “My best wishes to
you, Ms. Varens. Feel free to use me as a reference.”
Jay left Owen's office feeling stunned and sat at her desk unblinkingly.
Lily wandered over, sipping on a drink that was an alarming neon
purple. “What's that?” Jay asked, turning her head to stare at the other
woman and the drink. “Is that glitter?”
“It's a unicorn frappuccino. I got connections.” Lily took a long,
slurping drag. Jay could smell the sugar coming off the concoction from
here. “How was lunch with Mr. Tall, Dark, and Scares the Shit Out of
You?”
Jay laughed in spite of herself because it was really the perfect
description of Nicholas. “He offered me a job at double my salary.”
Lily's eyes flew open. “What?”
“It's in L.A. County,” said Jay. “I start tomorrow.”
“What?”
“Also, I'm stealing Prince Harry away from Meghan Markle. We're
eloping tomorrow.”
“Oh.” Lily slurped another sip. “Well, that's no surprise. I always had
you pegged as a secret gold-digger.”
Jay could not quite hide her flinch. Fortunately, Lily didn't seem to
notice.
“Seriously, Jay—what the hell. What happened at that lunch?”
“Um.” Jay stared at her desk, which, it just struck her, was quite
impersonal. It was as if she had always known on some level that she would
eventually be leaving. “I guess we hit it off. Also, I had a, uh, personal
connection.” Very personal, a small voice whispered.
“Lucky.” Lily sighed. “Now you get to go to sunny L.A. and Work
From Beach while I have to double down on everything, short one friend, as
Owen rocks himself in the supplies cabinet.”
“He wasn't upset,” said Jay. “He was actually very weirdly
understanding.”
“Jay.” Lily patted her hand. “He's losing you. Of course he's upset.”
With that puzzling statement, Lily sashayed back to her desk, still
slurping. For the rest of the day, she played Vitamin C's “Graduation” on
repeat until Jay threatened to go over there and kill her.
“I'm going to miss your threats,” said Lily. “Let's go mourn the end of
an era by getting all gross and nostalgic with drinks.”
“Okay, but I don't know any good bars.”
“Let's go to Bana,” said Lily, sending a ripple of something down Jay's
spine. “It's this hot new Turkish place that opened up just around the corner.
I'll ping Sheridan and Owen. I bet they'd like to come, too.”
“Oh, they're both so busy, though,” said Jay. “They aren't going to want
to see me off.”
But to Jay's surprise, both executives eagerly agreed.
Chapter Five
2017

Jay arrived home from Bana slightly drunk. Even though Lily had only
been joking, things had gotten a little gross and nostalgic—in the best
possible way. It ended up turning into one of those evenings that made her
wish she was the type of girl who went out all the time.
Bana was one of those places that kept the lights dimmed low and the
music turned up loud, forcing you to lean on the small tables to listen to
your companions. The setting was incredibly intimate, almost seductively
so. With the surprisingly strong drinks, Jay thought it was a little like being
stuck in a hazy, intoxicated twilight.
Sheridan Hawthorne told them stories about spending her childhood
summers in the Catskills, adding just enough romantic color that it sounded
like she'd lived through her own private version of Dirty Dancing, which
had Jay and Lily both sighing. Owen, who was slightly drunker, talked
about the time his foot had gotten severely infected after going backpacking
in Indonesia while wearing cork sandals. “I was high,” he slurred, selfdeprecatingly.
“What about you, Jay?” Lily asked. “You never talk about your
childhood. Did you travel?”
“I went to Berkeley,” said Jay, side-stepping the question. “I used to
hike the Oakland hills all the time. They were beautiful, but one time I
almost fell into a canyon. So I guess that made it a can't-yon,” she added,
smiling as she took a small sip of her cocktail.
Everyone laughed—except Lily, who groaned—and the talk turned to
other things. And then “Freak Like Me” had started playing on the speakers
and Jay had frozen, clutching her drink in both hands as the seductive, uptempo riffs of the song she had once loved dancing to filled the room.
I don't want to fuck an angel.
She must have made a face because Owen was looking at her. She
smiled at him, forcing herself to relax, but the memory made her wonder,
suddenly, why Nicholas hadn't threatened her with any photos the way he
had her mother. Especially if he still had that video.
Maybe it didn't occur to him yet, she thought. Lost opportunity and all
that.
After a couple hours of drinking, she and Lily said goodbye to their
bosses and shared an Uber ride home. The driver had been a nice hipster
named Guy, which had made them both giggle drunkenly—“Guy the guy!”
Lily had cried out, and he had smiled like this was the first time some drunk
had ever shouted that from the backseat—and Jay had thanked him
profusely as she slid out of his Volvo on unsteady legs, closing the door on
the floating strains of Wilco.
The alcohol buzzing in her bloodstream made her feel all sloshy, like
all of the things in her limbs had been replaced with water. She stumbled
into her front door and nearly tripped over the rug. Whoops, she thought,
pushing herself up and tugging off her sweater.
While Carbon watched her, clearly disturbed, Jay dragged her suitcase
out of the closet and began to pack what she thought she would need for
Los Angeles. They really only had two seasons down there: beachy and
broiling. In winter, it was a balmy 70 degrees, where it stayed until summer,
skyrocketing into the 90s and beyond. The beaches could be cold at night,
but once she had gotten older, Jay hadn't spent much time on them.
She worked mindlessly, not letting herself think too deeply on what she
was doing and why. Once the suitcase was full, Jay looked down at what
she'd packed and realized she'd filled it with all of her dowdiest, baggiest
clothes, already falling into the mental trap of thinking as she had as a
young woman in Hollybrook.
Her thoughts turned rustily to that stupid resort trip. Oh God, she didn't
want to think about that—it was where everything had started to go wrong.
But once the memories started flooding in, it was like trying to hold back a
dam with her bare hands.
She had been pathetically nervous and excited to go, never having been
to a resort before. Even now, Jay cringed on behalf of her eighteen-year-old
self. At how desperately she had wanted to fit in and be liked. It was funny
how humiliation endured that way, like a wound that never fully healed.
Sometimes it would open up and the sting would be as bad as the first time.
She had been wearing a one-piece swimsuit and a pair of shorts and
Nick had been—Nick. Trying to play it off like he didn't care about what
people thought of him or how he looked, even though she could tell that
he'd tried to style his hair. He'd been wearing the puka shells she had given
him, and after how viciously he'd derided them, she'd been surprised to see
them around his neck. He had been such a cruel and callous bastard back
then.
Girls had been checking him out since they arrived and he hadn't
seemed to notice or care. He'd snapped at one of them on their first day for
getting in his way, a little thirteen-year-old clutching her beach towel who'd
stared at him for too long. From the look in her eyes, Jay knew she was
about to go off somewhere and cry because a cute boy had yelled at her.
It had made her angry, especially when he'd said, “She's just a dumb
kid. She'll be fine.”'
That whole day had been especially awkward and she wasn't sure why.
She had just wanted to go to the beach and veg out in the water. It had
started out nice. She'd talked to a nice college guy from Australia who had
fetched her hat when it had blown off in the waves, and then she had found
a pretty shell on the walk back—and then Nick had gotten into a mood and
stormed off.
And then those other guys had come, almost like they'd been waiting
for him to leave.
“Hey there, baby. How much do you cost?”
“How'd you like a pearl necklace, sugar tits?”
“You legal?”
Even thirteen years later, Jay squirmed to think of it. The incident still
made her feel disgusting, as if something scummy were clinging to her skin.
The way the men had looked at her, like wild wolves poised to tear her
apart, had made her feel like throwing up.
“Go away,” she had said. “I'm with my brother and he'll kick your ass.”
She had pointed out Nick, who, even at fourteen, was beginning to inch
up in height. He had been slim then, only 5'11”, but with the lean
musculature all boys at that age seemed to have as they worked against their
bodies' natural urges to devour everything in sight as they shot up like
weeds. And more importantly, he had the broad shoulders and strong arms
of a swimmer.
The guys had left then, after tossing off another comment about her
breasts, and she had taken Nick's discarded shirt and put it on, feeling like
she wanted to cry. Wishing she was anywhere but that stupid beach.
Wishing she didn't have a body that made people feel as if they had the
right to say things to her like that. Wishing that she didn't feel like it was
her fault.
Then Nick had come back and he had been mean. Really mean. Almost
cruel. It made her wonder if maybe her stepbrother saw her the way those
guys had—dirty, slutty—and was judging her for it. And then, on the walk
back to their family's suite, he'd tried to kiss her.
It was as if she had been wearing a pair of tinted glasses that had
shattered. Suddenly, the world looked different and she knew that it would
never be the same again.
Jay stared at her suitcase, shuddered violently, and took everything else
out. She repacked the suitcase, trying to add a blend of work clothes and
casual wear, before bagging up all her toiletries and tossing them in at the
top in a Ziploc bag. By the time Jay was done, a thin sheen of sweat was
misting her body and the alcohol had worn off enough that the nerves were
creeping in.
She wasn't sure what to do about her apartment or how long she'd be
gone, so she didn't say anything to her landlord. Rent was paid off for the
month anyway, and it was possible she might need to return sooner if things
didn't work out. She wanted to leave herself a path of escape.
Her phone vibrated and she glanced at it, unamused to see a whole
flock of bird emojis. She'd sent him the stupid flight number and he'd sent
her the phone number for the driver along with a pick-up time. Apparently
she was supposed to have responded and he didn't like being ignored. She
stared at the screen for a long time before sending a middle finger emoji.
It buzzed again. Sweat droplet. What was that supposed to mean? That
she was making him hot? Was he flirting with her? The phone slipped from
her nerveless fingers.
She wasn't sure how to flirt with Nicholas. She wasn't sure he wanted
to.
Setting her phone on the nightstand and resolving not to touch it again,
Jay got up and began to empty her fridge. Having a task calmed her, and she
let her mind empty out as she poured out the old stuff and packed
everything that was still good and sealed in a cardboard box.
Holding the box under one arm, she went to the apartment next door,
where she had seen a kid running around before. “Hello,” she said, smiling
brightly at the woman who answered. “I'm your neighbor. I got called away
to visit family and I don't know how long I'll be gone. I have all this new
food in my fridge—I don't suppose you'd like it? I'd hate for it to go to
waste.”

The next morning, Jay gathered together all of her personal documents,
her chargers, her wallet, her keys, her laptop, and everything else, and
loaded them into her suitcase and purse.
She lured Carbon into a cat carrier with his “just for special occasions”
cat food, and he started yowling almost as soon as she closed the door,
which made her feel awful. The yowling eventually died down to anguished
meows, punctuated by long, judgmental silences. I'm sorry, she thought,
wishing she could explain her intentions to the small, sullen animal. It's just
so you won't get hurt. If only there were someone looking out for her like
that.
“Where to?” her taxi driver asked, eyeing the cat carrier nervously.
“San Francisco Airport, please.”
Jay had only been on a plane a handful of times, and always in coach.
She never liked it. Takeoff made her feel like she was being packed into a
rocket that would be hurdled to space. It was incredibly claustrophobic and
made the air in her lungs fizzle like a carbonated drink.
When she got to her gate, she was surprised to learn that her ticket had
been upgraded to first class. For a two hour flight? It seemed so wasteful.
Her irritation rose. Did Nicholas think he could buy her now, throwing
money away for her on frivolous things? How dare he.
She walked onto the plane with the shaking cat carrier and her giant
Longchamp bag and something in her seemed to sigh when she saw the
curtained, padded chairs. Don't be weak, she told herself, as she took her
seat. This is wasteful and he's a bastard for doing this.
Carbon had hissed ominously at her feet when she set him down, as if
in agreement.
The flight had been mercifully short and the comfort of the trip did
make it seem to go by faster. She had met with the driver without issue—
not Vlad, much to her disappointment, but some other man dressed in all
black with a pair of sunglasses—and as the car cruised through Hollybook,
seeing the patchwork of familiar and unfamiliar filled her with something
too bitter to be nostalgia and too aching to be dread. I remember that, she
kept thinking. Or, Oh, that's new.
Her old house looked . . . exactly the same. Just as imposing as it had
when she had been fourteen and starstruck by what had seemed like a stroke
of good fortune tantamount to Cinderella walking up to the fairytale castle
that first time.
My God, I forgot about those colonnades, she thought. It's so
ostentatious.
Her stomach seized up as she rang the bell, bracing herself for Nicholas
to answer the door. Instead, a woman answered it—not Yelena, but a
younger, sterner-looking woman she had never seen before. “H-hello,” she
said. “Uh, where's Nicholas?”
“Mr. Beaucroft isn't here,” the woman said, in English that felt like a
slap. “He's been detained.”
Okay, thought Jay, feeling heat suffuse her face as the woman looked
her up and down like she was covered in mud. She wondered what had
happened to the old housekeeper. By his own admission, Nicholas had
never cared for Yelena, so she supposed it wasn't much of a surprise that he
had gotten rid of her when he'd taken over the deed for the house. The way
this woman was looking at her now made Jay wonder what Nicholas had
said about her to his staff. It didn't seem like it had been complimentary.
“I'm sorry for any inconvenience,” she said. “I'm his sister, Justine.
Jay.”
The woman stepped aside, letting her into the house, making no move
to assist as she watched Jay struggle with her suitcase, purse, and cat. “Mr.
Beaucroft doesn't have a sister.”
What? “There must be a mistake,” Jay said nervously. “I thought I was
expected.”
“You are,” the woman said ominously. “Go ahead and make yourself at
home. I'm Carmela, by the way. I was just on my way out—today was
supposed to be my day off.”
With that pronouncement, she left, leaving Jay standing, stung, in the
hallway alone.
Mr Beaucroft doesn't have a sister.
God, that look. She was still stinging from it. What had he said to that
woman to make her hate her so much? Carmela, clean out the spare
bedroom. I'll need it for my whore, Jay.
Jay heard the beep of an alarm system engaging. Sighing, she set down
her things on the checkered tile floor and massaged her aching arms as she
looked up at the two double staircases. Well, if Mr. Beaucroft was detained,
it wouldn't hurt to take a quick, impromptu tour of the house. Especially
since Carmela hadn't bothered to tell her where she'd be sleeping.
The house was like Nicholas—different, but the same. There had been
a lounge area by the pool that had contained a large glass coffee table and
cabana furniture made out of rattan and cream padding. Nicholas had gotten
rid of all of his father's furniture. There was a white sectional sofa now, and
the room had been repainted a cold, icy gray with a matching rug.
Jay looked out at the blue jewel of the pool, screened by lilies of the
valley in concrete planters and a wooden arbor of grape leaves, with a few
rustling palms growing out of strategic points in the large garden. That
looks exactly the same, she thought. Not that she'd used the pool.
Back in the entryway once more, Jay made her way forward, into the
den. The TV had been upgraded, all of the old video game consoles that had
used to clutter it either packed away or sold, but the blue sofa was still
there. Jay had spent so much time on that couch, watching TV. Nicholas had
even fucked her on it—twice. He'd even kept the same tasseled throw.
She stared at the fabric until it blurred and she had to grab onto the
back to keep from sinking. The ribbed, velvety texture of it beneath her
palms threatened to undo her—Daddy, please, no, someone might see—and
she yanked her hands away as if they had been singed.
He'd always enjoyed making her beg. He probably still does, she
thought, which sent another tide of dizziness shivering over her. I guess I'll
find out.
Nicholas's childhood bedroom was next to the den, but it had been
converted into storage. Everything personal in it was gone. With a shiver,
Jay walked up one of the staircases. There were two of them, a detail that
had really made her feel like she was living in a palace as a young girl. She
went up the left one, glancing at the half-wall that gave a view down into
the den from above. There was a sculpture sitting on it by Louise
Bourgeois. The organic, blobby shape of it had always creeped her out as a
child, and it still creeped her out now.
She opened the door to the master bedroom.
It was completely different: dark instead of light. Unfashionably for
L.A., Nicholas had gone with heavy furniture and austere colors. A
mahogany sleigh bed dominated the right side of the room, turned over with
slate gray and cream-colored bedding. There was a jacquard throw tossed
over all it, picked out in navy, gray, and gold. It looked expensive and
probably was.
The dresser, mirror, and bookshelf were all made of the same redbrown wood and they all looked old, ornately carved with details like
trumpets and Flemish scrolls, which made Jay think that they were probably
Victorian. Much too nice to be thrifted, they'd probably been purchased at
an auction. She traced the wood, cool to the touch; everything was free of
dust.
She glanced at the bookshelf, hoping for some insight into the man that
Nicholas had become, but all of the books there appeared to be more for
decoration than function. Like an interior decorator picked them out to
match the vases, she thought, her mouth turning down. The glossy spines
did match the vases, and none of the spines were cracked or creased.
The other half of the master had a small sitting area with a smaller,
wall-mounted TV and a mini-bar that didn't appear to have been recently
stocked. All of the bottles were half- or a quarter-full. He had a fairly
sophisticated-looking sound system under the TV, next to a CD rack that
was crammed with all of the bands he'd listened to when he was younger:
Deftones, Tool, Nine Inch Nails, A Perfect Circle. Loud and angry music,
throbbing with energy.
Metal Boy. The old childish nickname for him surfaced briefly, ghostlike, before fading.
There was a gray love seat in front of the TV, made of tinted suede,
which had a view into the bathroom and dressing room. She patted the arm
of the love seat to see if it was as soft as it looked before wandering into his
bathroom. Compared to the rest of what she'd seen, it was woefully
underfurnished. When her mother had lived here, the counters had been
cluttered with perfume bottles, jewelry, and cosmetics. Now the drawers
and the cabinets were all empty, some still stained with traces of eyeliner or
lipstick, and the only things on the counter were his.
He didn't appear to share the space with anyone, so he probably wasn't
seeing anyone. And if he was seeing someone, they didn't live here.
Jay left the master bedroom and went wandering down the hall to the
one room in this house that she had been dying to see. She wanted to know
what Nicholas had done to her old bedroom. Had he gone in there and
smashed everything up, or ripped out and painted over every trace of her,
the way he had with his father's den or her mother's bathroom? It would
give her an idea of how much he hated her, how determined he was to
eradicate her presence from this house.
With a shaking hand, Jay grabbed the knob—it wasn't locked—and
twisted the door open. Sucking in a fortifying breath of air, she closed her
eyes and stepped into warmth.
She waited for several seconds, as if bracing for an explosion, and
when nothing happened, she slowly cracked her eyes open.
It looks . . . exactly the same. The voile curtains were open, still
gathered back with one of her old hair clips, which had yellowed and faded
in the sun. Faded pictures of her friends were still tacked to the walls. Her
childhood books cluttered the bookshelf—mostly fantasy, but also
Animorphs, and a couple of smutty romances that she'd purchased as an
older teen.
Nicholas had done nothing to her bedroom. It even had the same
yellow sheets and comforter, the same sunflower motif painted over the
tops of the walls. The plate around the light switch even had its little floral
moldings intact, although the gaily painted colors had begun to fade.
This is freaky, she thought, circling slowly. It's like a shrine.
Feeling numb, Jay went downstairs to get the cat and her suitcase,
lugging both up the stairs to her old room. Once freed, Carbon immediately
darted out of his carrier to hide under the bed, which made her smile
because Gypsum had done the exact same thing when she had brought her
into this same room seventeen years ago.
She removed the top part of the carrier and filled the tray with some
litter she'd packed in her suitcase, putting some kibble in a screwed-off jar
lid she'd packed into her purse.
Once the cat was taken care of, Jay changed out of her gross plane
clothes into a pair of loose pants and a shirt that she'd purchased back in
college that said “The Hush Sound” and couldn't bring herself to get rid of,
even though it was fraying thin. She slung her arms into an equally old
American Eagle hoodie, zipping it all the way up out of habit, and knelt to
examine her bookshelf. As she did, she noticed something gleaming on the
floor next to the shelf.
It was a small piece of rose quartz.
How did that get there? she wondered, but then she remembered—it
was a piece from her own collection, knocked to the floor when she and
Nicholas had fought eight years ago.
The rock seemed to grow hot in her fingers.. She set it down on a shelf
and grabbed a beat-up copy of Joust. Jay leaned back on the comforter of
her childhood bed and settled back to read as the light from her window
changed from pale yellow to dark gold, the turning of the pages growing
less and less frequently with the passing of time as she was consumed by
her thoughts. Eventually, the book fell from her fingers with a loud clap that
scared the cat.
She had fallen asleep.

Nicholas had just gotten out of the last meeting in a long block of
meetings. He couldn't stand presentations; he had to sit there and look
interested for thirty minutes or however the fuck long it took and then start
asking the questions that had everyone shifting and refusing to give him a
straight answer. How much money is this going to cost us? Do you have the
numbers to back that up? Why is this worth my time?
Really, he thought dryly. After years of this, it should stop being such a
goddamn surprise to everyone that he wanted more information. And yet,
here they were. Same old song and dance.
Nicholas had almost been late to this meeting. He'd had to print out all
of his own notes and research the acquisitions himself. Until Jay was
entered into the system and had her own clearance card, he supposed he'd
be fetching his own papers and his own coffee and scheduling all of his own
meetings for the foreseeable future.
He looked down at his administrative assistant's empty desk and let out
a breath. Crystal hadn't been happy about being let go. She had shouted at
him and then burst into tears in the conference room, and then she had
sobbed all the way down the hall like a little primadonna as a grim-faced
security guard trailed behind her holding her box of personal items.
“He's such a heartless bastard!” she had apparently shouted in the
lobby, startling a clutch of interns. He'd heard two of his employees talking
about the incident, before they had noticed him standing there and scattered
like frightened quail.
Heartless, he thought, testing the word as he made his coffee. Yes, he'd
been called that, and worse. There were plenty of people out there who
believed he'd given up his heart and soul to get to where he was now. He
remembered reading somewhere that many top-level executives embodied
personality traits and behaviors that were typically shared by sociopaths.
It made him wonder where the line was.
A security notification popped up on his phone, informing him that
someone was in his house. Jay. He felt a smile forming as another volley of
notifications flooded his phone as she wandered room from room until he
turned notifications off.
Jay was in his house. He stirred at the thought. Something to look
forward to later.
She was going to be nervous. Nicholas could still remember how pale
and shaken she'd looked after he kissed her in the alley. He wondered if he
was going to have to chase her before he fucked her. The thought brought
back memories that sent a dark cocktail of emotions pulsing through him
that made his cock stiffen in his pants. He didn't hate the idea.
I am a heartless bastard, he thought. Poor little bird. She's so fucked.
Even after eight years, he still craved her surrender: the crack in her
voice as she begged to come; the way she looked at him like he was her
everything; the moment when shame and dread turned to helpless desire.
He liked her submissive and sweet, especially when that sweetness came
wrapped up in ribbons and lace, but what really got him hard was the way
she called him “Daddy.” No one else could strike that perfect chord of fear
and devotion.
Nicholas forced his mind to turn back to his work but by the time he
got home, he was thrumming with desire and feverish anticipation. All of
the windows in the house were dark, which was a little ominous. He hadn't
considered that Jay might take a look around the inside of the house and run
—but it was beginning to look as if that might be a distinct possibility. She
wasn't in the den and she certainly wasn't waiting in his bedroom.
But then she wouldn't be, would she?
No. There was one other place she might have flown. Nicholas took
two condoms out of the drawer of his nightstand, sliding them into his
pocket before stalking down the hall. He opened the door to her bedroom,
using his phone as a light, and saw the reflective eyes of a cat watching him
in the darkness. It startled him.
She brought a cat. It didn't appear to be the same one as before. This
one was black. He wondered what had happened to the other one.
Closing the door carefully behind him so the cat wouldn't escape,
Nicholas walked deeper into the room, and the pale blue light caught on the
sleeping form of Jay. He stopped several feet away and looked down at her.
Her hair was tangled around her shoulders and obscuring part of her face,
rendered soft and contented by sleep. Her shirt had ridden up a little and
that line of bare skin above her waistband was utterly beguiling.
There you are, little bird, he thought, shutting the phone off and
unfastening his suit jacket, draping it over the back of her chair. Then he
unbuttoned his shirt. He dropped that on top of his jacket. Kicking off his
shoes as he went, Nicholas swung over her wearing only his jeans,
straddling her hips with his knees as he leaned over her body. She
murmured something indecipherable at the quiet clatter of his phone being
placed on the nightstand. It made him smile.
He ran his fingers over the soft skin of her cheek, tracing over the
bump in her nose, her pointed chin, her lips. They were soft, her lips, like
crushed flowers. He let his knuckles drag down her jaw, her throat, all the
way down the center of her chest. Her heart was beating slowly, a distant
thud through all those layers of clothes. He felt like he was about to drown.
Nicholas dragged down the zipper of her hoodie, baring a soft cotton
shirt. It didn't look like she was wearing anything under it. He dragged the
fabric up until it was gathered beneath her throat and encountered more
soft, bare skin. He was so hard now that it was like a physical ache. He
heard her breathing shift, becoming shallow and syncopated as she woke
under his touch. Yes, he thought, smoothing his hand over the slight curve
of her belly. Come to me, Jay.
And then he lowered his head and kissed her.
Chapter Six
2017

Jay stirred, and for a moment, half-asleep and on the verge of waking,
she thought that she was camping. Someone has left the tent, she thought
randomly, still trapped in that warm, sleepy bubble. I hope there aren't any
bears.
Doubt was pecking at her, though. Like an agitated bird urging her
awake. The darkness was wrong and there were no stars and the light from
the window was in the wrong place. I smell citrus, she thought. Confused
and a little frightened, Jay reached out for where her lamp should be and let
out a garbled sound of panic when her fingers grazed something that felt
like an arm.
“Relax, blue jay.” A mouth brushed her cheek, rough with stubble. “It's
just me.”
What— She wet her lips and was surprised when they burned. “NNicholas?”
“Mmm.”
Her hand shot up as he leaned over her, palm pressing against his chest
as his body dipped to cover hers. Hard, muscled skin jumped under her
touch. He was shirtless. Breathing a little faster, Jay's hand drifted lower
and collided with something sharp: his belt buckle. No shirt, she thought,
waking up very rapidly now, but he's wearing pants.
And then his hand covered her breast and squeezed lightly and Jay
realized what the zipper sound she'd heard in her sleep had really been. “Wwhen—when did you get home?”
How long have you been touching me like this?
“Ten minutes ago.” She felt the sting of his breath on her lips, but he
kissed her neck instead, sending little electric shocks bursting down the side
of her throat in a shower of sensation. “I've been thinking about you all day
. . . about all the things I'm going to do to you.”
Jay inhaled sharply as his bare torso grazed hers. Both of her hands
were on him now, fingers biting into the ridge of his hips. To push him
away, she told herself, but the tipping sensation in her belly at the sound of
his low laugh had very little to do with fear.
“You scared me.” The words sounded uneven to her. “What's the matter
with you? I was asleep,” she added faintly. “Or is unconscious the only way
you can get w—”
His mouth brushed hers, a light touch that firmed when she resisted,
becoming forceful enough that it left her breathless. “Shut up and fuck me.”
A painful tremor seized in her chest as his pelvis pushed into her, driving
her deeper into the quilt. He was hard; she could feel all of him as he settled
between her legs. “I know you remember how.”
At the clip of his teeth at her breast, she moaned, pushing her hips up
against him. Heard him hiss through his teeth: “fuck.” The bed shifted
several times in quick succession and a soft slap of fabric told her he'd
taken off his pants. She held herself stiffly as he tugged her arms out of her
sleeves and yanked her shirt over her head, making her shiver at the sudden
chill.
And then her pants were off, and he was pressed against her—hard and
soft, and full of heat. The one body she knew as well as her own. He smells
the same, she thought wildly, as he lifted his head to cover her mouth in
another one of those possessive kisses. Grapefruit and the sweet, slightly
musky scent of a man's clean skin. She tensed instinctively as he nudged
her thighs with the long, hard length of his cock.
“Spread your legs.”
“N-no, wait,” she said, her voice high and unrecognizable. “Use
protection.”
She heard him swear again. Then he bent over her, groping for
something on the floor, eliciting more bursts of heat and friction as his body
slid against hers. She heard a crinkling sound, which made her relax an inch
—at least he has a condom—until it occurred to her that she ought to be
insulted that he'd come in here assuming that she'd be available for sex.
“Such a good girl.” His voice was deep and slightly mocking, almost
like he could hear her thoughts. “Always following the rules. But that's
what makes you so predictable. That's why you're here right now—” he slid
ungently into her, the sweet torture of it wrenching a sound from her throat
“—with me. Because you always play nice. And I don't.”
Jay felt a surge of shame, pinned beneath him. Full of him and nothing
else. Every breath pushed her closer and when she opened her mouth, she
felt their lips brush in a fleeting taste of pleasure—a slip of tongue at the
seams of her mouth, a tug on her lip, the promise of more—before he began
to thrust. Each one seemed to rip something from her.
It had been . . . a long time.
What had he called her? A good girl—yes, she had tried to be one of
those. Tried, and had not gotten very far because pretty came with a price
and it could make some people ugly.
Being an adult means you pay for it.
She slid her hands over his chest and felt coarse hair and straining
muscle. With a rough cry, she grabbed him by the shoulders, where her
fingers became claws and her nails bit into the suppleness of his skin. “I'm
here because you blackmailed me.”
He let out a hoarse laugh. “Are you sure that's the only reason?”
Tears burned in her eyes and she was glad he couldn't see them. “Fuck
you.”
“Bold of you . . . speaking to me like that.” His voice, only slightly
louder than a whisper, was like opiated syrup pouring through her senses,
causing her to seep deeper into the darkness. In the dark, she didn't have to
look into those arctic eyes or feel herself being gnawed apart by that
predatory gaze. “Or has it been so long . . . that you've forgotten how to
beg?”
No. “No,” she said, too loud in the darkness. Too raw. “I don't want to.
It's wrong. You're my brother,” she added, wincing at how pathetic and
fucked-up she sounded. “This is sick.”
The next thrust was hard and punishing; she felt his hand on her neck,
stroking over the tender marks he'd left with his mouth like a map of where
he'd been. She hated herself for leaning into it, just a little. Hated her
heartbeat for kicking up when his fingers gently squeezed.
“Please.” She wasn't sure what she was asking for. Her body felt ready
to explode.
“Beg.” The word cracked like ice from a melting glacier; it made her
flinch.
“No.”
With a sound of impatience, Nicholas rolled off her, gouging her with
his sharp hip bones as he shifted so that they were spooning. He lifted her
leg with his knee to enter her from behind while reaching between her
thighs with one big hand to stroke her, keeping her jumping flesh pinned
beneath his thumb, not quite touching her where she needed him to touch.
Jay bucked and the arm around her waist tightened, making her squeak
as he began moving again. She could feel his rumble of satisfaction against
her back; this new position let him fuck her more deeply, and the ensuing
sensations were so overwhelming it was nearly painful.
“Nick,” she gasped, crying out when he entered her on another slow,
deep thrust. “Please.”
“I'm not letting you go until you say it.” His teeth lightly grazed her
ear, making her thighs clench involuntarily. He knocked them wider with
his knee as he circled her clit in tighter and tighter loops, pulling back every
time her body bowed under his arm. “I don't think you want to test me.
You're going to end up very sore.”
Arousal shot through her in a dark wave at the next stroke of his hips.
Her shame was melting like rime, leaving her feeling chilled. He knew what
he was doing to her. The pain was fading; now there was just pressure, a
dull, yawning ache, and the smooth glide of his fingertips over her most
sensitive parts keeping her on the verge of climax. You knew it would come
to this.
The words were thorns in her throat, sticking and bruising; she could
feel herself choking over their too-familiar shape, and she spoke them on a
whisper so they wouldn't have her voice. “I'm sorry, Daddy.” She closed her
eyes and felt tears trail down her face. “I'll be good. Please.”
Nicholas let out an explosive breath and shuddered violently, entering
her on a deep thrust that made her yip, first in pain and then in surprised
pleasure as his thumb worked her clitoris. “Yes.” He spread his fingers to
brush her lower belly with a tenderness that seemed at odds with the
roughness of his fucking. “You're still your Daddy's sweet little bird. Isn't
that right?”
Jay wasn't sure what she said to that; everything that came out of her
mouth felt broken. Too tired to do anything else, she brought her head down
in a nod as he pushed her sweaty, tangled curls aside to kiss the nape of her
neck. It made her shiver, as it always had, goosebumps rippling down her
arms, tightening the skin around her breasts. His hand smoothed over her
body with easy possessiveness as he rested his chin on her head and that
was when Jay knew—
This time, he had no intention of letting her go.
Chapter Seven
2000

Jay was in a bad mood as she sat at her mother's little vanity in the
dressing room that all the dancers shared. That was what strippers at the
Beat and Tease liked to call themselves, like it was classier somehow.
Dancers, not strippers.
She'd had to tell her friends that she couldn't go out bowling tonight
because her mom had to work. Now she was doing her Spanish homework
by the flickering bulbs surrounding the cracked and smeared mirror while
“Pour Some Sugar on Me” blasted out of the speakers. It was so loud, Jay
could hear it pulsating through the walls and it was giving her a headache.
Estoy molesta, thought Jay. In Spanish, being “molested” meant
annoyed or bothered instead of the worse thing it was in English. And
having a pregunta meant a question instead of a baby belly.
Spanish, Jay thought, was very strange.
There was a pause and then “American Woman” began to play, and Jay
figured that meant her mom had taken the stage. It was one of her mom's
go-to songs for dancing. She'd had a pole installed in their apartment so she
could practice her routines at home. Jay usually went out when she did.
Watching her mom grind on the pole in her underwear made her feel
uncomfortable.
The songs were how you could tell the older “dancers” from the
younger ones. They got to choose the songs for their own sets and had to
know how to work the crowd. The young ones played songs like
Ginuwine's “Pony” and TLC's “I'm Good at Being Bad.” The older ones—
like her mom—played songs like “American Woman” and Danzig's “She
Rides.”
Jay frowned very hard at her homework and wished her mom would
hurry up.
As if in response to her thought, the door slid open, letting in the sound
of Bon Jovi turned way up. Jay turned expectantly but it was one of the
other dancers, a Latina woman who called herself “Honey Pie.” The men
always snickered when it was announced on stage and Jay had asked why.
“Never you mind,” was the response, so Jay had looked it up at home on
their crappy dial-up and immediately wished she hadn't. Never you mind,
indeed.
“Hola, niña. How goes the homework?”
“It's fine,” said Jay. “How was your dance?”
“My dance was popping, just like my joints in these shoes.” The
twenty-five-year-old dancer peered over Jay's shoulder. “This looks pretty
good. Except I don't know about this foot collection of yours.”
“Rock collection,” said Jay. “We're supposed to write about our
hobbies.”
“Well, then you mean piedra and not pie, and speaking of pies—Me
duelen los putos pies. Be my little amorcita and hand me my sneakers,
won't you?”
Jay handed her the knock-off Adidas, wondering why Honey had just
called her feet “ducks.” Maybe because you felt web-toed after being on
them for too long. “Is my mom almost done?”
“She just finished her set-up,” said Honey. “But now she's out there
talking to some overgrown fresa who thinks the sun shines out of his ass
because he's BFFs with Señor Benjamin Franklin.”
Right on cue, the door opened and Danielle Varens stepped into the
room wearing her lace merry widow and six inch high heels. She was an
incredibly beautiful woman—short and curvy and bronzed, with honey
brown hair highlighted at a salon a block away from their little studio
apartment, and full red lips.
She wasn't alone, though. She was holding on to the arm of an older,
intimidating-looking man whose hair had started to go gray at the temples.
He had the coldest grayest eyes that Jay had ever seen and when he turned
them on her, she felt something inside her freeze.
“Who's the girl?” he said. “She's not one of the strippers, is she?”
Jay felt her face heat and she had to resist the urge to tug down her
shirt. She didn't look like a stripper, did she? She glanced at Honey, who
looked like she could cheerfully kill Jay's mother.
“Oh, that's just my daughter, Justine.” Her mother smiled over her head
at Honey. “I'm taking Mr. Beaucroft to the VIP room for a private dance,
but he wanted to see my little dressing room.”
I bet he did, Jay thought darkly, as his eyes flicked over the dancers'
discarded street clothes, the makeup, her neat little stack of homework
weighted down with a copy of Jane Eyre—his eyes lingered on that, for
some reason. The dirty old fart probably thought he could get a freebie.
Her mother was still talking, still smiling. “Would you be a dear and
take Jay out for an hour?”
Honey muttered something dark under her breath about not being a
babysitter, but a glance at Jay softened the look on her face. “All right.
Come on, niñita. Your mother's buying us both McDonald's for dinner.”
Her mother's smile hardened a little, making her red-glossed lips look
like vinyl, but she handed Honey two twenties. They looked limp and Jay
tried really hard not to think about where her mother had been keeping
those. She glanced at the man, who was staring at her again in a way that
made her stomach twist. Go away, creep.
“Thanks,” said Honey, with a bright, winning smile, plucking the
twenties from her mother's lacquered fingers. “Enjoy your dance, mami.
Come along, Jay.”
Honey steered her down the side exit, which a lot of the dancers
preferred because the exit was unmarked, and in street clothes, no one was
the wiser when you stepped outside the concrete door. Plus, then you didn't
have to walk past the men. Jay's mom usually took the main entrance, and
sometimes she called out “Jailbait coming through!” which horrified Jay
and usually elicited catcalls.
Sometimes Jay found herself wishing that Honey was her mom. Well,
maybe not her mom. That would have been weird. Her long-lost big sister
maybe, who would adopt her and take her away. She looked down at her
bootleg Converse high-tops that she'd bought in Chinatown and were
already falling apart. She'd taped the toe up but it was starting to flop.
Far away, thought Jay, thinking, dreamily, New York or Paris.
“Watch out for that dog shit,” said Honey. “At least I hope it's dog
shit.”
Jay sighed.
The McDonald's by the dance club was a bit shady and had a gross
bathroom. The fluorescent lights were broken and made everyone's skin
look ashy. Jay hovered by the tables, tugging down the hem of her shirt.
She'd gotten taller again and the hem had ridden up, making her conscious
of the bare strip of stomach it revealed and the way the fabric clung to her
chest. That man's words rang in her head—she's not a stripper, is she?—
and made her feel cheap. As cheap as her stupid sneakers.
One of the employees was mopping up the floor. He had one of those
janitors' carts and Mya's “Case of the Ex” floated out from the speakers as
Honey came back with the food. “I got you a fish fillet,” she said. “It's the
freshest thing on the menu because they always have to make them new
because of the tartar sauce. Apple, pie, too, you lucky girl. Buen provecho.”
“Gracias,” Jay said uncertainly. She didn't know that one.
Honey ruffled her hair, which Jay secretly hated. Just because it was
really curly, people always felt like they had a right to put their hands in it.
She did some discreet rearranging as Honey dove into her food. Dressed in
tight jeans and a glittery Hurley sweatshirt, Jay thought she looked very
pretty, and she said so during the next lull.
Honey smiled at her, but something about it seemed a little sad. “You're
quite the looker, too, niña. With that sweet face and that curly hair, your
Daddy must have been some kind of man. You're going to break a lot of
hearts when you're older. How old are you now? Cuantos años?”
“Fourteen,” said Jay. “Mom says I'm too tall, though—and that my chin
is too big.”
Honey's smile disappeared. “Mother's don't always know best,” she
said vaguely, in a cutting way that made Jay wonder. “Bet your mother
thinks she's pretty smart, too, huh?”
“I guess.” Jay picked at her food. “She has a degree from community
college.”
Honey burst out laughing and the sound of it was so loud that Jay
startled. “She has a degree in jack shit. Jay, sweetie, I love you. I love the
shit out of you—most of the girls at the B&T do—but your mother is a
first-degree bullshit artist if I ever saw one, and if she's really thirty-three,
then I'm a virgin.”
The man cleaning up the restroom looked up in sudden interest.
“I don't like that man she was with,” said Jay.
“Good girl. Stay smart and watch out for the men with the serpent eyes.
So.” Honey took a sip of Coke. “What is it like in the mind of Jay? Que
quieres hacer con tu vida?”
She gave Jay a moment to puzzle out the Spanish herself, translating in
her head while her lips moved. “I don't know,” Jay said at last. “Maybe I'd
like to be a teacher or a vet.”
“I fucking love that. You know, I'm thinking of quitting the business
and going back to college myself. Real college,” she clarified. “Not your
mother's degree in mierda. What was it again?”
“Recreation and Leisure Studies—and you should,” said Jay. “Dancing
seems like it sucks.”
“It doesn't have to suck, Jay. But it certainly isn't all that great when
you're moving to a man's beat. Come on, let's go see if your mother is done
with her fresa man.”

When they got back to the Beat and Tease, Jay's mother was waiting.
She had her street clothes on and her coat was zipped. In her hand was Jay's
backpack and Jay hoped she'd been careful when throwing her things in
there and hadn't wrinkled her homework. To Honey, she said, “Thanks for
taking her out. I hope she didn't eat too much.”
“Nope.” Honey looked at Jay's mother's outstretched hand like she
didn't know what she wanted. “Well, have a safe walk home, ladies. I'm out.
Bye.”
“That was two hours' worth of tips,” Jay's mother said, watching her
leave. She heaved a sigh. “Never mind. If this works out, that'll be pocket
change. Come on, baby, Let's go home.”
“If what works out?” said Jay.
“Justine.” Her mother's voice was forbidding. “It's time to go.”
Jay hunched her shoulders as they went out the door but most of the
guys were gone and the ones who were left were stone cold drunk, so her
mother didn't shout anything about “Jailbait.” Jay kind of had the idea that
her mom did it for the attention sometimes, but that was kind of sick, wasn't
it? She wasn't sure why her mother would want to embarrass her.
Her mother did a lot of weird stuff that Jay didn't like, though.
Installing the pole and the mirror in the living area. Stealing Jay's own
clothes to see if she could fit into them (she usually could). Telling people
that she was Jay's aunt instead of her mom. Making people guess her age
when she was drunk. Shouting “Jailbait walking” at the Beat and Tease.
“What did you eat at McDonald's?” her mother asked.
“Diet air.”
“You need to stop growing, baby. Look at this.” She tugged at the hem
of Jay's sweater, pulling it tight over her chest. “I just bought you this top
and it's already too short. And we need to get you a proper bra,” she added,
with a speculative glance. “Have you tried the pencil test like I told you?”
“Mom,” Jay squawked. “Not here.”
“Baby, you know if I fret, it's only because I love you.”
Jay wondered sometimes. “Who was that man back there?”
“His name is Damon Beaucroft. He's an investor from L.A.”
“What's he doing here then?” Jay asked suspiciously.
“Investing.”
In what?
She could tell by her mother's tone that the subject was closed, though,
and besides, they had arrived at the tiny studio apartment in the Tenderloin.
Jay raced ahead to let herself in with her own key. Much to her
disappointment, it was too late for her to call her friends and ask about the
night out. They'd told her that cute guys were going to be there and she
wanted to know if any of them had asked about her.
Probably not, though. Since she was, according to her mother, both too
fat and too tall. Jay sulked on the futon while her mother took off her face,
wrapped in the fake silk butterfly robe she'd bought at K-Mart and thought
made her look like Marilyn Monroe. She seemed smugger than usual and
kept plucking at something around her neck.
When she turned around, it caught the light and Jay saw it was a gold
necklace.
“What's that?” asked Jay, since it obviously pleased her mom and it
never hurt to get into her good graces. The pendant was shaped like a gold
ring and covered with small diamonds. “Is it new?”
“This,” said her mother, holding it up, “could be a ticket to a new life if
I play our cards right.”
“It just looks like a necklace to me,” Jay muttered, rolling back over to
read The Last Unicorn.
“Jay, stop reading that book or it'll ruin your eyes. I don't want to have
to take you to the optometrist and get you glasses. You know what they say
about girls who wear glasses.”
Jay didn't look away from the book. “That they're smart?”
“That nobody wants to date them.” Her mother swiped for the book but
Jay's arms were longer and she held it away, out of reach, before curling her
body around it protectively. “Men don't make passes at girls who wear
glasses, Jay. You're already growing like a little weed. Soon you're going to
be taller than all the boys and then nobody will want to date you, baby.
Especially not with your little nose always buried in a book.”
“I don't want to date anyone,” Jay snapped defiantly. “And if I do, it'll
be someone tall.”
“Tall boys like short girls,” said her mother. “Everyone likes short girls.
They're small and that makes people want to protect them.” She looked Jay
over and sighed. “If you can't be short, then you can at least try and be
pretty, Jay. I wish you'd let me do your makeup and straighten your hair.”
“No.”
She pulled her book even closer to her face, trying to ignore the way
her eyes stung. After a moment, Jay heard her mother make an
indecipherable sound. Then she turned out the light and got on her own
futon with a loud rustle of the covers so Jay couldn't even read anymore.
Jay set down her book, staring up at the ceiling, biting down on her
lower lip which had started to tremble. There was a tight, pinching feeling
in her gut like someone had grabbed her on the inside and squeezed. Am I
ugly?
Chapter Eight
2000

Her mom wasn't around when Jay's alarm went off for school. That was
unusual. Her mom liked to sleep in after a night of dancing, calling it her
“beauty rest.” Jay couldn't remember the last time her mother had gotten up
earlier than she had. Maybe she had to go grocery shopping. Jay got dressed
in embroidered jeans and a peasant blouse she'd bought at a thrift shop. The
blouse had been loose and a little too long when she'd gotten it, so unlike a
lot of the tops her mother had bought for her more recently, it still fit.
She slipped all of her homework into her backpack, along with the
copy of The Last Unicorn and hopped on the bus to Mission High School.
Most of the people on the bus seemed normal but there was a guy with bad
BO who was gripping one of the steel rails and shouting. Jay buried her
nose in her book and studiously ignored him until it was time to get off at
her stop.
Her friends were standing out in front of the school in a cluster.
Kristine was applying watermelon Lip Rageous push-up balm while Leah
and Amy chatted. Amy was leaning on the handle of her rolling backpack,
which always made her look like a little commuter on her way to an airport.
They all turned when they saw her coming.
“Jay!” said Kristine. “We missed you last night!”
“How was bowling?” Jay asked, trying not to sound too bitter.
“Oh my God, it was so fun,” said Amy. “We played two rounds and
some boys from our school showed up in the second. Juniors. Danny
Ramos was there. He asked about you.”
“He did? What did he say?”
“Nothing much. He was just like, 'Oh, where's Jay? Isn't she usually
with you?'”
“Where were you, anyway?” Kristine pressed, capping the lip balm.
“I told you. My stupid mom had to work late, so she took me with her.”
“Here.” Leah pressed something into her hand. “I got you a sticker
from the machine.”
It was one of those skateboarding stickers people liked to slap on their
binders at school. This one showed a little stick figure collapsed on a sofa
with the caption “I Couch Myself.”
“Are you saying I'm lazy?” Jay asked dryly, peeling off the backing and
putting it on.
“Yeah,” said Amy, rolling her eyes. “That's you, Jay. You're like the
epitome of lazy.”
“It's pronounced like 'I pity me,'” said Jay. “Like, epitome the fool who
says it wrong.”
“You're such a nerd. Epitome for being friends with you in the first
place.”
The four of them walked to class, Kristine splitting off to go to
Geometry II while the rest of them went to Spanish I. Jay sat at her desk,
calmly conjugating a list of verbs in the present tense, but beneath the
surface, she was worried. Where was her mom?
After school, her friends wanted to go to Westfield Mall. Amy had seen
some new Urban Decay makeup in a magazine that she wanted to buy. Jay
wasn't supposed to go places without letting her mom know first, but she
was mad at her mom, so she went anyway. She tried on clothes with her
friends but there was nothing there she could afford, or she might have
bought a crepe. When Amy moved to throw out her half-empty smoothie,
Jay said, “I'll finish that if you don't want it. I forgot to eat lunch.” And
breakfast.
“It tastes like salad,” Amy warned her.
It did taste like salad. Jay drank it anyway because she was starving.
When she arrived home, it was dark and the streetlights had come on.
Her mother still wasn't home and there was no note, but that wasn't entirely
unusual. Sometimes her mom went off with a guy and didn't come back for
a few days. Jay always feared the worst.
She picked up the phone and called the Beat and Tease. Rafael, the
bartender, picked up. “Hello?”
“Hello, Rafe. It's Jay—um, I was wondering, is Danielle in?”
“Jay.” He immediately sounded less gruff. “No. She called out for the
next couple of days. You know I'm not supposed to tell people on the phone
whether a girl is in or not.”
“I know. I'm sorry.” Jay hesitated. “Did she say where she went?”
“No idea, sorry.” Something seemed to occur to him. “You're not home
alone, are you?”
“No,” said Jay quickly. Too quickly? “She dumped me off at my aunt's
house in Pacifica. We were just wondering if I needed to stay the night or if
I, uh, needed to go home.”
“Sorry Jay,” Rafe said. “I don't know what to tell you. Have a good
night.” He hung up.
Jay stared at the phone bleakly and then went to the fridge. Still empty.
She wasn't sure why she'd checked. All she'd eaten today was her friend's
gross smoothie so she went to the empty tin of shoe polish where her
mother stashed the money and dialed in for a cheese pizza.
She sat on the porch waiting for it with her knees pressed against her
chest. When the pizza guy came, he gave her a strange look she didn't like
and Jay quickly yanked her hand back after she tipped him so that their
fingers wouldn't brush, squeezing into the doorway with the box and then
doing up the latches and the deadbolt behind her.
She ate the greasy slices while watching the crackly cable. The sound
was bad and she couldn't really see much, but it didn't matter. They didn't
have any of the good channels worth watching. When she was done, she put
what was left of the box in the fridge and went to go wash her hands. They
were out of soap so she used some of her mother's Herbal Essence
shampoo. It smelled better than soap, almost like perfume. She could
imagine herself in a field of flowers if she closed her eyes.
She's not coming back, thought Jay, as she changed for bed.
Strange how the thought could make her feel both relieved and anxious
at the same time. As much as she hated her mother—especially when she
was picking apart her looks or embarrassing her at the strip club—Jay
wanted someone to take care of her. Someone who would always be there,
even if it was hard. Her mother couldn't deal with anything more serious
than a broken nail.
Dressed in a pair of sleep shorts and a strawberry tank top, Jay came
back out into the living area from the bathroom. She tilted her head at the
mirror her mother had put in front of the pole. She was so tall that she
almost didn't fit in the frame and she didn't really have much of a chest. She
lifted a leg, frowning, fascinated by the way the muscles moved beneath the
skin.
Glancing at the mirror again, more shyly this time, she began to copy
one of the dance routines she had seen at the club. Not one of her mother's,
which seemed to involve a lot of bumping and grinding, but one of the
younger girls, like Honey and Angel, who actually danced. Even though she
didn't like watching the girls if she could help it—it made her
uncomfortable for reasons she couldn't quite put into words—she had seen
way more than she wanted to and the steps really weren't all that hard.
If you weren't taking your clothes off, dancing was kind of fun.
Especially without a bunch of guys hollering at you or demanding that you
“take it off.” Her mother didn't have a CD player, so Jay just hummed along
to a Destiny's Child song in her head, thinking that maybe this was what
Honey meant. Dancing was so much better if you were doing it for yourself.

The next day, her mother still hadn't returned. Jay began to wonder if
she had been kidnapped or even died. The thought made her cry. Given her
horrible thoughts about her mom the other day, it was hard not to feel like
she had somehow wished this into occurring.
Sick with worry, Jay grabbed her bag and went to school, but this time
she was too upset to read on the bus. The kindly old woman sitting next to
her kept asking if she was okay, but Jay kept her lips together and moved
seats because she knew if she opened her mouth, she would cry. At school,
she stood around with her friends in their usual spot, with her thumbs
hooked through the straps of her backpack as she tilted her hips back and
forth and gave monosyllabic responses.
When Danny and his friends came up to them to talk, Jay barely
noticed. She knew Kristine, Amy, and Leah were looking at her funny, but
she couldn't bring herself to care. All she could think of was that scene in
Pulp Fiction with the woman conked out, practically dead. That could be
her mom right now, and she wouldn't even know.
Jay ate the leftover pizza for dinner and counted up the money in the
tin shoe polish box. There were only about two hundred dollars in it and she
didn't know where her mother kept the emergency debit card. That wasn't
enough to cover even half of rent, which would have to be paid up in two
weeks. Would her mother even come back before then?
I should call the police, thought Jay, but she was afraid of the police,
too. What if they took her away? What if they yelled at her for not calling
sooner?
What if this was all somehow her fault?
Jay wished she had Honey's phone number, although she wasn't sure
what the dancer could even really do if she called. Honey talked to Jay at
work because Jay was there, but Jay was pretty sure she wouldn't want
some kid calling her up at home, even if the kid was the “little amorcita”
who fetched her sneakers.
She tried to read, telling herself that now she could stay up reading as
late as she wanted, but she was too upset to make sense of the words that
kept blurring before her eyes.
Sniffling, Jay poured herself a glass of water and sat at the kitchen
table, trying to figure out her homework. Doing her algebra and
conjugations helped clear her mind a little because you couldn't be sad and
focus at the same time, but as soon as she was done with her work, all the
bad feelings rushed back in, almost like they'd never even left.
She curled up in bed and cried that night, resolving that if her mother
wasn't back tomorrow, she would call the police for real this time, even if
they did yell at her for not reporting it sooner.
When Jay opened her eyes again, it was light out and she could smell
frying bacon and hear her mother humming “Jolene.” At first, Jay thought
she was dreaming. Her mother never cooked.
“Mom?”
“Hey there, baby.” She pivoted from the stove, wearing what looked
like a new dress and that stupid necklace with the circle of diamonds. “Did
you enjoy sleeping in? I tried to wake you but you were out like a little light
—but I knew the smell of bacon would get you.”
Jay went through several emotions in quick succession that seemed to
flash like a broken traffic light. “Mom, what the hell? Where have you
been? I thought you—I thought you died!”
Her mother laughed. “Died? Baby, no. I was in Vegas.”
“V-Vegas?” Jay swallowed around the angry lump in her throat. “Las
Vegas?”
“Is there any other Vegas?” Her mother smiled beatifically, “I got
married, Jay. You're looking at the new Mrs. Beaucroft of Hollybrook,
California.” Her mother held out her hand. There was a ring on it the size of
a dime. “You're going to have a daddy again.”
Jay stared bleakly at the ring, not sure if she was hearing correctly and
afraid that she was. “Mrs Beaucroft—wait, you mean that creepy guy from
the Beat and Tease?” The one who wouldn't stop staring at me? “You're
marrying him?”
“We are married, Justine. It's a done deal.” Her mother's smile
disappeared. “He's a very generous man.”
“I didn't know where you were,” said Jay. “I called the Beat and Tease.
I called—” She paused. She hadn't called anyone else because there hadn't
been anyone else. “No one knew where you were,” she finished lamely. “I
thought something terrible had happened to you. I was going to call the
police.”
“Oh God, you didn't, did you? I think there's a baggie of weed around
here somewhere.”
There had been, but Jay had found it and thrown it into the trash.
“Mom. Forget the weed! Why didn't you leave me a note?”
“I thought I did.”
“No,” Jay half-shouted, half-sobbed. “You didn't. You—left me—all—
alone.”
To her horror, she started crying, while her mother just stood there and
stared.
“I . . . I'm sorry, Justine. Here, come here, baby. I'm so sorry. I tell you
what, let's go shopping. That always cheers me up when I'm sad. We can go
anywhere you like. You're going to need clothes for your new life.” She
smiled hopefully. “Doesn't that sound like fun?”
Jay looked at her mother's blurry face and swiped at her cheeks.
“Okay,” she said, in a very small voice.

Nicholas Beaucroft was bored.
Even though he was hanging out with his friends, Jake and Aaron, it
was starting to feel like they were always doing the same things, over and
over, like a spinning record.
Aaron's house was especially annoying because Aaron had four
younger siblings. “Go away, Lilian,” Aaron was snapping at his four-yearold sister, who had come in to show off her Tickle Me Elmo. “We're busy.”
They were playing Mario Party 3 but Jake kept cheating, reaching over
and yanking at the joy stick of whoever happened to be winning at the time,
which was usually Nick. So Nick retaliated by robbing Jake with the Boo
ghost every chance he got, even when Jake was down to his last ten coins.
“Stop being a dildo, Nick!”
“You're the dildo,” said Nick, smiling to himself as the ghost attacked
Jake—again.
“Why can't we play at your house, Nick?” Aaron asked glumly,
watching his sister depart. Probably to run off to her mom to tell, Nick
thought. That seemed to be all siblings were good for.
“Because of the decorators,” he muttered. “Dad has people over to set
up my stepsister's room.”
The news had been broken to him yesterday and he still wasn't happy
about it. He didn't want a “new” mother or a “new” sister. He'd had a mom
—and she had died—and he'd never wanted a sister. He liked being left
alone.
“I can't believe your dad got married again,” said Jake. “That's so
lame.”
“Yeah.” Nick sighed. “I'm not thrilled about it.”
“I want to play.” Now Hal, Aaron's seven-year-old brother, was
plopping his butt down on the rug, staring at the TV like a dog begging for
a treat. “Let me play with you guys.”
“No,” said Aaron. “We're in the middle of a game. Go bother Lilian.
She'll play with you.”
“It's my Nintendo, too!” Hal shouted, startling them. “Dad got it for all
of us! Not just you!”
Before any of the boys could stop him, he yanked the switch on the
system, turning it off, and ran away wailing for his mom before any of them
could so much as touch a hair on his head.
“That little shit,” said Jake.
“Dude, that's my brother,” said Aaron. “Only I get to call him a shit.”
“Well, then call him one.” Nick tossed down the controller. “He ruined
our game.”
“Easy,” Aaron said in alarm.
“I feel sorry for you.” Jake rose to his feet, stretching his skinny arms
over his head. “Your new sister is going to screw up your whole way of life,
dude.”
“Probably.” Nick made a face. “I'm bored of this game anyway. Let's
go to the park.”
Aaron shouted something to his mom as Nick and Jake walked out.
Nick's dad didn't care where he went as long as he was back before the
streetlights came on, and Jake's dad was a sheriff, so nobody would mess
with him anyway, or they'd probably get thrown in jail.
Aaron, on the other hand, was a total momma's boy. He was always
asking to use the phone when they went out places so he could call his mom
and let her know he'd be late. Nick thought that was kind of pathetic.
It was too late for the little kids to be out so the three of them had the
park to themselves, apart from some older kids playing soccer in the
distance. They climbed on the jungle gym, Aaron sitting on one of the lower
U-shaped bars, Jake on the swings. Nick shimmied up the pole and hooked
his legs over the topmost frame of the swings themselves, hanging upsidedown like a bat. Pretty soon, his head began to throb as all of his blood
spilled down like an hourglass.
“That's dangerous,” said Aaron, looking up at him nervously. “You'll
fall and crack your head.”
“Hasn't happened yet.” Nick curled up, grabbing the bar with both
hands, and swung down to the tanbark with a thump. He knew it was an
impressive finish because Jake's eyes widened slightly. Turning to Aaron,
he added lazily, “You sound like your mom right now.”
“Shut up.”
“How old is your stepsister?” Jake asked. “She's not a little weenie like
Lilian, is she? I don't want to have to deal with another little kid pulling on
me while I try to play Goldeneye.”
“Hey,” Aaron snapped.
“Nah. Dad says she's older. Fourteen. She's studious and likes to read,”
he added, gagging.
Jake scoffed. “Sounds like a total dog.”
“Maybe she'll drive us places when she gets her license,” said Aaron.
Nick thought about that. His dad never drove him anywhere. The
housekeeper did that, in her broken-down Gremlin. He hated the old car; he
thought it was ugly and couldn't understand why she just didn't get a new
one. “Maybe,” he said doubtfully. “But that's two years from now.”
“Your life is over,” Jake said solemnly. “Rest in pieces, my man.”
Nick flipped him off, but deep down he thought Jake was right.
Chapter Nine
2000

On Jay's mom's last day at the Beat and Tease, she danced to The
Clash's “Rock the Casbah.” Jay sat at the vanity, reading To Kill a
Mockingbird, the book the freshmen at her new school would be reading. At
Jay's current school, they were in the middle of Romeo and Juliet. So far,
she was thinking that she preferred the doomed Shakespeare play.
She was wearing some of her new clothes from the shopping trip her
mother had dragged her on. Her mother had said to get whatever she
wanted and they had walked out with six bags of clothes between them
(most of them her mom's). She was currently wearing a blue velveteen shirt
with tie-dye swirls of aqua and navy, and some new flared jeans that
actually fit.
Her mother had been her usual self, pulling at straps, fidgeting and
fussing at her, tugging at the backs of Jay's jeans to make sure they weren't
too tight. “You've gone up a size.”
Jay hadn't really cared about that until her mother said it like she'd
gotten an F on a test. “I'm taller,” she said defensively.
“Don't take anything that doesn't fit you to Hollybrook. No shirts that
show your belly and no pants that don't hit the top of your shoes. Just bag
them up and leave them on the curb.”
“You show your belly,” said Jay. “You show it to everyone.”
“Justine.”
“Fine,” she'd muttered.
Despite her mother's words, she did feel good in her new outfit. It was
nice to have things that didn't squeeze and pinch, although despite her
mother's instructions, she couldn't get rid of all her old clothes. No matter
what her mother said, her wardrobe simply wasn't big enough to have
everything be a perfect fit. If she wore her shorter tops with high-waisted
pants, no one would even notice.
Hunched over her book, Jay listened to the other dancers talk about the
men outside, their personal lives, the gloomy weather. The mood in the
dressing room was weird today, almost somber. Jay got the impression that
the other women really weren't sorry to see her mom go.
Naturally, her mother had felt the need to flounce in and start telling
everyone goodbye, loudly and with fake tears that wouldn't ruin her stage
makeup. She had taken grainy pictures on a new Nokia cell phone of her
wedding at the Strip. Jay had peered over; it was one of those 24-hour
chapels, all lit up in neon. She managed to hold her phone in a way that
displayed her ring.
“I'm going to miss you all so much,” her mother had chirped on her
way out the door, and as soon as she was gone, Honey had muttered, “Puta
chingada,” before glancing apologetically at Jay.
“She is, though,” said Jay, who had obtained a Spanish-to-English
dictionary from the library and now knew that putos weren't ducks.
Honey stared at her for a moment, wide-eyed, and then she threw back
her head and laughed loudly enough that she startled a woman doing her
eyeliner. “God, I'm going to miss you, sweetie.”
“What do you think of your mother's new man?” a Black woman
named Dulce asked.
“I hate him,” said Jay, which made all of the women laugh, and caused
Honey to ruffle her hair again.
She wasn't sure why that was so funny. She did hate him, and she hated
her mother for doing this to her. For disappearing without telling her, for
upending her life, for dragging her away from everything. She liked her
school and she liked her friends. This was so unfair.
“Why are you going now?” Kristine had asked. “You're leaving in the
middle of the year!”
“My mom got married to some guy.” Jay stared at her new shoes. They
were very white. She was afraid to get them dirty, so even though her
mother had told her not to, she had packed up her older Converse in her
luggage, just in case. “He lives in Hollybrook.”
“Where is that?” asked Amy. “I've never even heard of it.”
“You've never heard of anywhere beyond San Leandro,” Kristine
teased.
“It's on the other side of the state.” Jay kicked a rock. “Eight hours
away. Near Beverly Hills. My mom's excited. She can't wait to shop at
Rodeo Drive. I'm going to hate it.”
“Let's all exchange numbers and emails,” said Leah. “Then we can stay
in touch.”
It won't be the same, though, Jay thought. You'll forget me.
Things would continue to tick along in San Francisco and everything
Jay would be erased.
She had wanted to cry, but she had to be brave—for herself, for her
friends. She didn't want to be seen as a spineless worm and she knew her
mother wouldn't want to see any tears.
Her mother, Jay had quickly figured out, had opinions about literally
everything, and these opinions were gospel truths as far as she was
concerned. It was easier to just nod and tell her that she was right and then
go do whatever it was that she really wanted to do, but Jay wasn't sure how
to do that in her current situation. It wasn't like she could just refuse to
move and stay in San Francisco.
That night, Jay dozed on her futon, staring at the cartons and bags of
her things in the darkness and wondering what the future would bring. She
fell asleep to the red blinking light of the liquor store outside.
When she woke up, her mother was yelling at the movers as they
offloaded the cartons of their belongings out of the apartment. On the curb
out front was a pile of things that hadn't fit into their shiny new life: the
futons, all the old dishes and silverware, Jay's old clothes.
Damon had bought them first class tickets to Los Angeles and a car
was waiting to pick them up. Probably trying to impress Mom, Jay thought
dully, glancing at her mother's shining face. Could he be more obvious? She
just wanted to have her own room and have there not be any rats, so when
she saw where they were going to live, her jaw actually dropped.
It had a gate, and an elaborate facade with a covered porch buffered by
colonnades, as imposing as stone soldiers. There was a walkway to the front
of the house and a sweeping expanse of emerald green lawn. Was all of this
really just for one person? It looked like a hotel.
“We're living here?” It had to be a trick. When her mother nodded, she
said, “Really?”
“Our new home.” Her mother was glowing, pleased with herself,
pleased with the house. When the car stopped, she practically skipped out of
the door, leaving the driver to tend to her things, even though Jay was pretty
sure that wasn't his job. “Why don't you see if you can find your stepbrother
while I make sure the rooms are all sorted out?”
Wait. “Stepbrother?” Jay repeated, but her mother was too far away to
hear.
The driver was stacking the suitcases, muttering under his breath in
what sounded like Russian. “Do you want help?” Jay asked, glancing at the
doors uncertainly.
“No,” he said politely. “Do as your mother told you. I will be fine.”
Okay. Jay brushed dust off her bare legs and knotted her sweatshirt
around her waist. Trust her mother to overlook a detail like that. A
stepbrother. She definitely hadn't told Jay that she'd be sharing the rest of
her life with another kid.
She wondered if he was older or younger. She wondered if he was nice.
With a father like that cold-eyed creep from the strip club, she wasn't sure
how he could be, but she wasn't much like her own mother, either, so maybe
he was different. She wondered what had happened to his real mother and
whether she was still in the picture. Her mother would hate that.
Jay had always been so envious of her friends with siblings. She'd
dreamed about what it would be like to have an older brother to look out for
her, protecting her the way a knight looked after his fair lady, an older sister
to borrow makeup from or ask about boys, or a younger sibling to look up
to her and accompany her on her adventures through downtown San
Francisco.
Jay had always felt like she would be a good big sister. She knew a lot
of interesting facts about the world and she wasn't afraid of bugs or dirt. I
hope he's nice, she thought wistfully.
She wandered around the side of the yard, stopping to investigate some
rose bushes, and then froze. Disappointment had been a major factor in her
young life and she was used to it at this point, but her heart still broke when
she saw her new brother and his little freak friends throwing rocks at a
kitten in a tree. “What the fuck are you doing?”
Jay hadn't even stopped to think—one moment, she had been on the
ground. The next, she was in the tree, limbs bursting with feverish
adrenaline as she scooped up the small, warm ball of fluff with one careful
hand. The way those kids stared at her when she yelled at them! Like she
was speaking alien instead of an Earth language. Especially that stupid,
dark-haired moron who just stared at her the way his dad had. They even
had the same cold gray eyes.
Screw him, thought Jay, reveling in the sharp edges of her anger. Screw
all of them. I hate this place.
Holding the cat, she stormed into the house and immediately found
herself lot. The high ceilings were strangely vertiginous and the checkered
floors made her feel like a piece in a game that she wasn't even sure she
wanted to play. There was a sculpture hanging from the ceiling, ice blue,
with dangling parts that looked like tentacles. It looked ready to fall. Jay
stared at it nervously and the cat mewed softly, squirming against her.
Right, thought Jay, petting it. I've got to find my mom and . . . stepdad.
After wandering around in several loops, Jay found the two of them
sitting in a massive lounge area that exited out to the pool. For a moment,
Jay was so distracted—a pool, my own pool—that she had forgotten what
she had come in for, or that she had just decided she hated this place. Both
of the adults stopped talking to stare at her in bemusement.
Jay held up the kitten, which emitted another mew. “I found this
outside. I want to keep it.”
Behind her, the front door slammed and she found herself with an
audience. It was the three kids from the yard. The cat-torturer gang. The
dark-haired kid was standing in front, as self-appointed leader, with the
other ones—one with a smarmy look on his toady face, the other
bespectacled and trembling—behind him.
He probably thought I came in here to tell on them, she thought
scornfully.
“Justine, no,” said her mother. “You don't know where that thing has
been.”
“I do know. It was in the tree.”
One of the boys giggled at that. She didn't turn to see which one.
“There's a feral cat colony that lives around here,” her stepfather said
without interest. “Animal Control is always coming out here to round them
up and have them destroyed.”
Destroyed? Jay's arms tightened around the cat so tightly that it emitted
a distressed squeak. “No,” she cried, looking at her mom. “You can't let
them kill it. Please let me keep it.”
“Justine.” She was using the voice that came out with men who didn't
tip and store clerks who refused to check in the back. “Put the cat back
outside right now and go wash your hands.”
To Jay's embarrassment, she could feel her eyes filling with tears. “It's
just a baby.”
“Let her keep it, Danielle,” said her stepfather, and Jay looked over at
him in suspicion. She hadn't expected him to be her ally. He gave her a
smile that she suspected was meant to be warm; it wasn't. “Her room is at
the farthest end of the house. If the cat stays in there, we'll never know it
exists.” He pulled out his phone. “I'll have the housekeeper make
arrangements.”
She could feel the cat's little heart pounding against her arm. “I can . . .
keep it?”
“I suppose so.” Her mother sighed. “What do you say, Justine?”
“Um.” Jay swallowed thickly. “thank you . . . Mr. Beaucroft?”
He looked up from his phone. “Damon. Call me Damon, my dear. And
this is my son, Nicholas.”
Jay looked down. The boy had abandoned his friends to sidle up beside
her. He was staring at the cat in a way that made her cover it protectively.
“Justine?”
“It's Jay.” You sadistic little freak. “Just Jay.”
“Nicholas,” said Damon. “Why don't you show Justine her new room?”
“Fine.” The boy glanced at his friends with a look of scorn. “Go set the
game up in the den. I'll be right back.” He started walking towards the
double staircase, looking over his shoulder. “Are you coming or not? I want
to play Nintendo.”
Annoyed, Jay raced after him. The kitten mewed again and he looked
back.
“Is it okay?”
No thanks to you. She swallowed the words back. “I think it's hungry.”
The boy shrugged. “Sounds like my dad will take care of that.” They
came to the top of the stairs where there was a strange half-wall. He pointed
at the statue sitting on top of it. “That's a Louise Bourgeois,” he said,
stumbling over the words. “My dad paid tens of thousands of dollars for it.”
“It's ugly,” said Jay.
The boy blinked at her, shaking his head. Then he leaned up on the
tiptoes of his sneakers in a way that made her worry he might tumble over
the side of the wall. She peered down and saw his two friends sitting on a
blue couch, staring at the title screen of a game. “That's the den. My room's
on the left.” He pointed. “I have the only bedroom on the first floor.”
“Neat,” said Jay.
The boy glanced at her again with another one of those unreadable
looks. Then he started walking like a little boy-shaped robot. “Kitchen and
dining room are downstairs and there's a bathroom too. There's also a bar
and a lounge for the adults. We're not allowed in there, but sometimes I go
in anyway.”
“Why?” she asked, only a little curious.
“Because I can.”
He—Nick—continued walking. There was something strange about
him. Most of the kids she knew spent all of their time playing outside in
front of their apartments, cycling around the cul-de-sacs, playing in the
gutters with cars or action figures. “Do you have a bike?”
“No. Only geeks ride bikes. That's my dad's room,” he said, pointing
into the first door they came to. It was open and she could see a massive
brass bed and what looked like a rococo fainting couch. “We're not
supposed to go in there, either,” he added, ticking off more rooms on their
way down the upstairs hall. Her own strange little tour guide.
Finally, they came to a dead end and one final door. “This one's yours.”
Jay opened the door immediately and in her shock, she relaxed her grip
on the kitten, who immediately raced under the bed to hide. A bed—an
actual bed. Adult-sized too. A queen.
Someone—probably not Damon—had decorated the room for her.
There were sunflowers stenciled on the walls, and there was an empty
bookshelf waiting to be filled for her books, and a padded window seat next
to a bay window that overlooked the mulberry tree outside. Someone had
opened the window to air out the paint smells and it was making the voile
curtains flutter.
She immediately sat on the window seat, curling her legs to her chest.
I've always wanted one of these, she thought, feeling her heart flutter. I'm
going to stay here forever.
Almost as soon as she sat down, she immediately sprang up and began
opening the other doors. One was a full bathroom—she had her own shower
—and the other was a walk-in closet. Jay could feel herself beginning to
hyperventilate. “Oh my God,” she whispered. “This is mine?”
“Chill out,” said Nick. “It's just a room. Haven't you seen a room
before?”
She spun around to look at him. He was crouched in front of her bed,
lifting up the yellow bed skirt to watch the kitten. “Stop that,” she said. “It's
scared. Leave it alone. It'll come out when it wants to.”
The boy pulled back, looking at her for a long moment. “You're weird,
blue jay.”
“Blue jay?”
“You're blue and you squawk a lot and your name is Jay.” He rolled his
eyes. “Duh.”
“I do not squawk,” Jay squawked, as the boy drifted out of her room.
She tugged down her blue shirt, which she now regretted wearing, and
closed the door behind him with a loud slam.
Then she drew in a long, steadying breath and began to unpack her
suitcase.

Jake and Aaron were waiting with the game cued up when he got back.
Nick was gratified that the two wastes hadn't started playing without him,
but it soon became clear that this was less out of any respect for him and
more because they wanted to talk about what had happened outside.
What had happened outside? The blue jay had come swooping out of
nowhere like an infuriated bird. He hadn't been about to throw a rock at the
stupid cat. Jake was the one who was always doing stuff like that; he'd only
been going to throw it at the tree.
He glared at Jake, who was wearing a little shit-eating grin. “Hi, Nick.
How'd it go?”
“How'd what go?” he asked without interest, swinging up on the couch
beside him.
“Your stepsister,” said Jake. “Jay. You were gone awhile. What'd you
do?”
“Took her to her room. She's weird. She acted like she'd never seen a
room before.”
“Well,” said Jake. “I'll give you this—she's not a dog.”
“You were the one who said that,” Aaron pointed out. “Not Nick.”
“I know,” said Jake. “It's my gift to you, dude. You're welcome.”
“Shut up and play. I don't want to talk about my stupid stepsister
anymore.” Nick grabbed his controller and began selecting the settings so
they could all choose their guys. Nick let Aaron choose the level because he
didn't really care, and because Jake was being annoying.
“We've done this one so many times,” he whined predictably. “I'm tired
of the bunker level.”
“Well, we're doing it,” said Nick. “You can pick the next one.”
“God,” Jake muttered rebelliously. “This sucks.”
“Stop whining,” said Nick. “You sound like a baby.”
“I'm taking this ammo,” said Aaron to no one.
“Don't hog all the ammo, you waste. I need ammo.”
“It's battle royale. I don't want you to have ammo. You'll shoot me with
it.”
“Screw you, dude,” said Jake. “Just wait until I find a Kalashnikov. I'll
shoot you with that.”
“I can't believe Dad just let her keep the cat,” said Nick, shifting his
knee up to block Jake from hitting Aaron and grabbing his control stick like
the cheater he was. “I never got a pet.”
“Did you ask for one?” asked Aaron.
“I don't think so.” Nick thought for a moment. “My dad hates dogs.”
“She's a girl,” said Jake, like the answer was obvious.
It wasn't. “So?”
“So girls are good at getting what they want because they cry if they
don't.”
“I've seen you cry,” said Nick. “Does that make you a girl, Jake?”
“Fuck you,” said Jake, and Aaron's head immediately swiveled around
as he said, “Shh!”
“Don't worry about it.” Nick leaned back, pretending he wasn't
shocked. “My dad doesn't care.”
“I wish I lived here,” Aaron said.
“I don't,” said Nick. “You'd probably bring your mom with you.”
They played three rounds of Goldeneye and then Aaron had to go
home. He and Jake went for a walk outside. Jake wanted to swim but Nick
didn't feel like it—he'd done his mandatory hour in the pool—so after a
walk down the hill to the main road, Jake decided that he was going to head
back into town on foot and stop by his dad's office.
Nick walked back up the hill alone. The sky was getting darker as the
sun dipped below the horizon and he noticed his dad's Mercedes was gone.
I hope he took the step-witch with him, he thought. Her fake-nice persona
hadn't fooled him in the slightest.
Bored, he stuck his head into his stepsister's room, opening the door
slowly so the cat wouldn't escape. Jay wasn't in it, but she'd been
decorating. There were books in the shelves now, as well as a collection of
rocks, and lots of clipped-out animal posters with torn edges. Next to her
desk was a ratty-looking backpack that looked gross and old.
Nick looked around, poking through all her things, before closing the
door behind him. I guess they took the blue jay, too, he thought meanly,
secretly hurt at being left behind.
He started for his own room and froze. His stepsister was lying in an Sshape on the couch he and his friends had vacated, with her legs draped
over the arm. There was a bowl of granola perched on her stomach and she
was dipping into it with one hand while switching channels with the TV
remote with the other.
“Hi.” Her voice was cool. “How many channels does this thing have?
I'm already at two hundred.”
“I don't know. I never counted.” Nick moved closer and her leg began
to kick in agitation. She was wearing her sweatshirt now but it was
unzipped and her shirt was riding up her midriff so you could count her
skinny ribs. “You shouldn't eat upside-down,” he said suddenly. “The food
falls back down your throat and then you'll choke on it and die.”
“The muscles in your throat are stronger than gravity when you
swallow,” said Jay. “It's called peristalsis.” Click, went the remote. She
lingered when it showed a group of animals on the TV, staring at a group of
stupid-looking zebras as if entranced.
“You're really weird,” said Nick.
“You're kind of a shit,” she told him, making him bristle indignantly.
“So I guess we're even.”
“This is my house.” He puffed himself up. “If you don't like it, you can
leave, blue jay.”
“It's your dad's house, you dope, and since our parents are married now,
I can't leave.” She sat up, straightening her shirt self-consciously. “So I
guess this is just how things are going to be now. Call me names all you
want.”
Nick watched her for a few seconds longer, feeling strangely frustrated,
and then plopped onto the couch beside her. Jay didn't move, except to keep
clicking, so he helped himself to some of the granola in the bowl, pulling
his legs up on the couch.
“Yelena said we're not supposed to have our feet on the furniture. It
makes the couch dirty.”
“Who's Yelena? It's my dad's house and he doesn't give a shit.”
“Yelena's the woman who cleans your house.” Jay looked at him. “You
don't know her name?”
Nick lifted a shoulder. “She doesn't speak English. She only yells at me
when I get in her way.”
Her face darkened. For a moment, Jay looked like she was going to yell
at him again and he braced herself, flooding with something that was oddly
anticipatory, but she only sighed.
“How old are you?”
“Ten. Almost eleven.”
“Okay, so you might grow out of it.”
“Grow out of what?”
“Being such a shit.” There was a curl to her full mouth now, not
entirely malicious, but it annoyed him. With a growl, Nick grabbed her
hand, trying to take the remote.
“Give it to me.”
“Oh my God,” said Jay. “Stop it.”
“It's my remote,” said Nick. “My TV. You're just staying here until my
dad gets tired of your mom.”
“Oh my God—” She wrenched her arm. “You are so—”
The two of them fell in a sprawl on the floor as a loud moan filled the
room that made both of them freeze.
Jay looked at the TV and turned an interesting shade of red. Nick
turned to look and she began punching buttons, so he only got a glimpse of
orange and pink colors.
“Shit,” she muttered. “Shit, shit, shit.”
“What?” Nick glared down at her. “What was it? Turn it back. I want to
see.”
“Never you mind!” she said sharply, jerking in a way that had him
rolling to the floor. “Get off me! Here's your remote back, you freak.”
Before he could say anything else, she was storming out of the room,
muttering something under her breath.
She left her mess behind her. Nick looked down at the kicked-over
granola and began nudging it under the couch with the tip of his shoe. He
waited until he heard the door slam upstairs before clicking the remote back
to figure out what Jay hadn't wanted him to see on TV.
He found it almost immediately. It was “the fucking channel,” as Jake
called it. The adults on the TV said “fuck” a lot, but apart from that it was
pretty boring. He watched it because his dad had told him not to, but he
couldn't see the appeal. There was a lady wearing weird clothes and a man
doing something that he couldn't see that seemed to be hurting her.
“Yes, baby,” the man kept chanting. “Take it all. Come for Daddy.”
So weird. Nick clicked back to the animal and left it on the dumb
nature show before turning the TV off. Everyone in this house is completely
insane, he thought. I am the only normal one.
Chapter Ten
2000

I am the only normal person in this family, thought Jay, fuming around
her room as she unpacked the rest of her things the movers had dropped off
that evening. She wished she could just ditch this place and live as a
bohemian somewhere. She wasn't entirely sure what “bohemian” meant, but
she had seen the term in a magazine fashion spread and it seemed to involve
things like frilly skirts, crocheted bags, and croissants. Jay liked all those
things.
It didn't take long to put the rest of her stuff away. Her closet was so
big that her paltry amount of clothes looked kind of pathetic hanging all
squashed together in one corner. She spread the hangers out but that was
worse, like a balding guy hiding his pate with a comb-over.
She looked down at her sweatshirt and shorts and felt a wave of shame.
I don't belong here.
A rap on her door made Jay look up. She opened it warily. It was
Yelena. “Te traje estos.”
The housekeeper was holding a school uniform in a plastic dry
cleaning bag and a bunch of cat stuff. “Gracias. Um. ¿Necesito llevar
uniforme?” Nobody had told her that she needed to wear a uniform.
Yelena smiled a little and nodded.
“¿Católica?” There had been a Catholic school not far from where she
lived in San Francisco.
“No. Privada.” Yelena glanced over her shoulder and carefully set the
bag down as Damon went by, shooting the two of them a penetrating look.
“Dinner time.”
Not sure what else to do with it, Jay laid the uniform flat on her bed
and went downstairs, sliding her palm down the polished rail. It made her
feel a little like a princess at a ball.
She went down the hallway Nick had pointed out earlier and eventually
located the dining room. Everyone else was already there and seated. There
was some kind of green stuff in a casserole dish spiced with herbs that
smelled vaguely familiar. Jay wasn't sure what they were, exactly, because
her mother didn't cook.
“Did the housekeeper give you your uniform, Justine?” asked Damon.
“Yeah,” said Jay, fighting the urge to say, You were there watching her
do it. “Yelena gave it to me.”
Her mother shot her a look but her new stepfather didn't seem to notice
the slight emphasis. Nick did, though, and raised his eyebrows in a way that
made her wonder what he knew.
“Good.” Damon set down his wineglass. “Come here.”
“Why?” Jay demanded, instantly wary.
“Justine,” said her mother. “Just go.”
Jay went with a sigh, trying to hide her unease. Damon was a big man
and didn't seem particularly friendly. She didn't like being near him.
Especially not with Nick staring at her like he thought she was going to get
popped one. She wished she'd thought of asking whether Damon yelled at
or hit his kids.
Mom wouldn't marry someone who hit kids, thought Jay, but she
couldn't bring herself to believe this—her mother might be exactly that
oblivious, for all she knew—and shifted from foot to foot as Damon pulled
a blue box out of his coat. That got her mother's attention.
“Oh, no, baby,” she said. “Jay's much too young.”
“All the girls at Hollybrook are little magpies,” he said, with a laugh
that was probably supposed to be charming but just made him sound like a
creep. “They're always looking at each other's jewelry and comparing. The
uniforms are supposed to conceal who has money and who doesn't, but of
course, that won't work for the people who know who to look for and
measure status and worth.”
“That's shallow,” Jay blurted.
“I got Nick a Rolex,” said Damon, ignoring her, although there was a
repressive chill in his voice that hadn't been there before. “I'm giving you
this, Justine. We can't have people thinking that the Beaucrofts don't take
care of their own.” Before she could move, his hand closed over her hand,
tightening when she instinctively tried to pull away—and it hurt.
“Ow,” said Jay, jerking, shooting a look at her mother. Are you
watching this?
“Such a delicate girl.” Damon relaxed his grip instantly and she
watched distrustfully, poised to flee, as he fastened a silver charm bracelet
around her wrist. “There you are, my dear. It's very expensive. Take good
care of it—that's real silver and real enamel.”
“My watch you gave me doesn't work anymore,” Nick piped up. “It
broke two years ago.”
“I'll get you a new one,” said Damon, taking a sip of wine. “A man
should have a watch. We'll get you a waterproof one this time so you don't
ruin it in the water like you did before.”
Nick looked at her. “I'm getting a Bulgari when I'm sixteen.”
“I shudder to think what inventive means of destruction is in store for
it.” Damon pushed the empty box aside—for the housekeeper to clear, she
realized with disgust—and pulled out his phone.
Jay stepped back, skirting the table to get around to the other side, and
her mother gave her another look. “Say thank you, Justine. Your stepfather
is going to think I raised you in a barn.”
“A barn would have been nicer,” Jay heard herself say. Oops.
Across the table, she heard a sound like a muffled laugh, although
when she glanced at Nick, his face was carefully expressionless.
Her mother scowled at her. “Justine.”
“I'm sorry.” Jay rattled the charms of her bracelet without enthusiasm
and added, “Thank you for the bracelet,” before plopping into the seat
across from Nick, where her food was now lukewarm. She prodded at it
with a fork.
“So,” Jay's mother spoke brightly to Damon, “How was your day at
work, baby?”

Being the new kid was never easy. Jay had had to switch schools before
when her mother got dropped from her previous job as a waitress at a good
restaurant near Russian Hill. She'd been younger then, and had showed up
to work high. It was a classy joint, so she was fired, and that was when she
started stripping in North Beach. Jay had finished the year in Marina
Middle School before switching over to Francisco.
She had gone to Francisco for seventh and eighth grade and then her
mother had gotten hired at the Beat and Tease and Jay had started at
Mission High, just south of Dolores Park. She loved her school. It was so
beautiful and everyone there had been interesting and delightfully weird,
just like her. She'd liked her friends and even though she could never invite
anyone over (because of course they would ask about the pole), she'd felt
like she actually belonged there.
The baroque tiled dome crowning the highest tower of the school was
the first thing she saw every day when walking up to it from across the
street, and the way it caught the light sometimes made her feel like she was
going to a school of magic. The theater was cool, too, with the gold leaf
ceiling and its big chandelier. Very Harry Potter. Roaming the halls with her
friends, with the whole city as her extended campus, she felt free in a way
that she never felt at home.
Hollybrook High was—Jay swallowed—totally different. Totally
worse.
It was set back on a rolling green hill with the front all boxed off in
leafy hedges that seemed to say do not enter and do not touch at the same
time. There were palm trees everywhere and each big building was
whitewashed so that it gleamed blindingly in the Southern Californian sun.
Jay had printed out a map that morning from the school's website using
the computer in Damon's office. After some wandering, she managed to
locate the administration office. The woman behind the desk was an older
white woman with a grandmotherly haircut and a surly expression. “Hello,”
she said, looking at Jay over her glasses. “Can I help you?”
“Hi,” said Jay. “I'm new and I don't have a schedule and I'm lost and I
don't know where I'm supposed to go.” She drew in a breath, glancing up
hopefully. “Can you help me?”
The woman's expression softened by about one degree. “Are you
Justine Varens?”
Jay, thought Jay, but she didn't want to push her luck. “Yeah—it, uh,
doesn't say Beaucroft?”
“That's not what it says here.” Jay thought the woman's eyes might
have widened slightly in recognition of the name. “Does your last name
need to be changed?”
“I don't know.” Jay made a note to ask her mom. “Whatever it says
there is probably fine.”
Someone moved behind her and Jay half-turned to see a boy standing
there. A tall boy with skin just a few shades deeper than her own, wearing
the male version of her uniform.
At least he gets to wear pants, she thought, tugging ineffectively at her
skirt.
The woman looked up and smiled. “Michael Valdez. Just in time. I
have your shadow.”
“Shadow?” Jay asked, confused.
“We appoint all new students with mentors who share most of their
scheduled classes to walk them around, introduce them to the other
students, show them the ropes.”
Michael looked her over without bothering to be subtle about it. “Do
you have your schedule?”
“No.” Jay looked at the woman expectantly, who handed her a sheet of
paper over the cubicle barrier. Her name was at the top in blocky typewriter
font. Varens, Justine M. “Thank you,” she said. “Have a good day.”
This time the woman actually smiled at her. It made Jay feel glad.
She left administration with Michael and he led her up the paved
walkway that cut through the grass. “So,” he said, hitching up his backpack.
“Where are you from?”
“San Francisco. The Mission,” she lied. It was a trendier neighborhood
than the Tenderloin.
“No, I meant—never mind. San Francisco, huh? Cool. Like, Golden
Gate Bridge?”
Jay blinked. “Are you asking me if I live on the bridge? Or if the bridge
is in the Mission?”
“Both, I guess,” he said, with an easy smile.
“Well, then, neither. You can't live on the bridge. There's cops who
patrol it. And the bridge is in the tip of the Presidio district, which is
nowhere near the Mission.”
“Wow, okay, Einstein,” said Michael, laughing. “I didn't ask for your
life story.”
“Actually,” Jay said, feeling a little hurt, “you kind of did.”
Michael looked at her again, but this time there was a sardonic tilt to
his mouth. “My bad.” He continued smiling, but his forehead crinkled in
thought. “Did I hear you say you're a Beaucroft?”
“He's my stepdad,” said Jay. “My mom just married him.”
“Who's your mom?” Michael asked, in a tone Jay would soon learn
meant, who are your folks and what have they done to make it worth my
while to remember who you are?
“She's an actress.” It was the lie her mother had instructed her on. “An
aspiring actress.”
“Well, if she looks anything like you, I doubt it'll take long to get her
career off the ground.”
Jay tensed, unsure if she was being teased. Probably. “She's short and
blonde and has pale skin,” said Jay. “She doesn't really look anything like
me.”
“God,” said Michael. “You sure don't hold back, do you?”
“Sorry,” she said instinctively. “What do your parents do?”
“My dad's in real estate—he's a developer,” he added quickly. “He's
worked with Beaucroft Assets a couple of times. Your old man funded some
of his projects. And my mom does charity work.”
“Like soup kitchens? That's nice.”
“Oh God, no,” said Michael, with a laugh. “Like fancy parties where
people pay ten thousand dollars a plate for a dinner catered by a Michelin
chef and then the money gets pooled to save the whales or the orphans or
the whale orphans or whatever.” He looked at her, amusement glinting in
his brown eyes. “Did you fall off a melon truck on your way to Kansas or
something, Justine?”
“Or something,” she said. “And it's Jay. Only my parents call me
Justine.” And I hate it.
“Okay, Jay,” Michael said amiably enough, although she couldn't shake
the suspicion that he was still laughing at her. He walked her to Spanish II
and the conversation died after that. He was also in her freshman English
class, as well as Social Studies class in the afternoon.
Her interactions with him were so awkward that she was surprised
when he invited her to sit with him and his friends at lunch. “It'll be good
for you to meet the right kind of people while you're here,” he said. “I'm
sure that's what your dad would want.”
Stepdad, Jay mentally corrected, looking down at the stupid charm
bracelet. And she didn't really care what he wanted.
She'd been expecting a table full of white kids, since the rest of the
school seemed to be as white as the buildings, but apart from Michael, who
was Latino, two of them appeared to be mixed race and another one was
Asian. Michael quickly reeled off the names, so quickly that she barely had
time to catch them all. Angela Diamante, Clary Claybourne, Jordan
Cahalan, and Quentin Ho. “This is Jay,” he finished breathlessly, sweeping
a hand at her.
Looking them over, while they looked her over right back, Jay began to
understand what Damon had crudely intimated at dinner. You could tell
these kids were all rich. It was in their posture, which was deliberately
careless, almost lackadaisical, like it was their right to take up space. All of
the girls were wearing prominently displayed jewelry.
“I love your bracelet, Jay.” Angela strummed her own necklace, a gold
pendant that had what looked like Roman numerals written around the
black circular stone inside. BVLGARI, Jay realized the name said, familiar
because of Nick. I thought a Bulgari was a car.
“Thank you,” she said absently.
“Is it Tiffany?”
“I don't know.” Jay felt the sharp charms gouge her palm as she
clutched her wrist. “My stepdad gave it to me. It came in a blue box,” she
added lamely.
“Jay here fell off a truck on her way from Frisco. She's Beaucroft's
little stepdaughter.”
Frisco? Jay glared at him and he smiled back at her in a way that made
her stomach feel strange.
“You're welcome to hang with us as long as you don't embarrass us,”
said Jordan, flipping her blonde hair. “It's been so boring. We could use a
little bit of fresh blood around here.”
“Blood?” Jay repeated uneasily, glancing at them.
“Relax, baby cakes,” said Quentin. “We only drink it on Fridays.”
All of them had burst into laughter as bright and sharp as broken glass.
Jay thought about Jordan's words while in Social Studies, tapping her
pencil while the teacher, Mr. Harbin, droned on about prehistoric
communication and cave drawings.
What did she mean embarrass them?
When school ended, Yelena was waiting out in front in the old
Gremlin. Looking around at some of the fancier cars, Jay wondered if this
could count as “embarrassing.” Nick was lying in the backseat of the car
without his seatbelt, arm thrown dramatically over his eyes.
“What are you doing?” Jay asked. “You look like you've got the
vapors.”
“I'm comfortable,” said Nick. “And I don't want to be seen in this car.”
“If we get into an accident and you splatter on the windshield, no one
will see you in this car,” Jay said forbiddingly. “Nobody will see you ever,
ever again. Because you'll be dead.”
Nick reached beneath him and buckled one thigh in the seat before
flipping her off.
“Right back at you, little dude,” said Jay, turning back around in her
seat.
“Siempre así,” said Yelena, glancing at Jay. “Sinverguenza.”
“Silver geisha to you, too.” Nick made his hand into a gun and poked
the seat. “Now drive.”
Yelena gave Jay a long-suffering look and rolled her eyes as she started
the car.
Jay leaned back in the seat as Yelena drove over the rocky, hilly roads.
She was glad when the house popped up in sight, even if it still didn't feel
quite like home. She dumped her backpack in her room and went
downstairs, still wearing her uniform. On the floor of the front hall, she
found Nick's discarded jacket and tie. With an angry sigh, she picked both
up and walked around until she found him in the kitchen, eating a piece of
toast that had been slathered in butter and topped with sprinkles. “Want
some?” he asked, mouth full. “It's called fairy bread.”
Wordlessly, she held up the clothes.
“You don't need to do that,” he said, surprised. “Yelena will take care
of—hey.”
“Go put those in your room like a civilized person, you toad.”
“This place was better without you,” Nick muttered darkly, setting his
plate down on the counter with such violence that Jay was afraid it would
crack. “I miss being here all alone.”
Before she could respond, he was off, tie and jacket clenched in one fist
as he stormed into his bedroom. Jay followed him. “Wait, what do you
mean alone? Where is everyone?”
Nick appeared in the doorway. “I don't know where your dumb mom is,
but my dad is busy. At work.”
“And he just leaves you at home alone all day?”
“Genius.” He folded his skinny arms. “Want to see my room, Brainiac?
Since you're here.”
Brat. She walked through the doorway, without bothering to hide her
annoyance. To her surprise, it was actually fairly tidy—although that was
probably Yelena's doing, not his. His bed was pushed against the far wall
and there was a desk next to it, mostly bare. He had a bookshelf, but it was
packed with magazines and CDs instead of books. She eyed the TV and the
sofa and the speakers and thought, Wow, spoiled, much?
“Pretty cool, huh?” he said, watching her. “Better than yours.”
Still annoyed, Jay hiked her chin up at the posters. “Do you play
sports?”
“I swim on Saturdays. I have meets and I have to practice for an hour
in the pool every day. I like to watch basketball. Dad has season tickets to
the Lakers. He'd probably let you go if you want.”
“I don't like sports,” said Jay.
“Right. I almost forgot you were a nerd for a minute.”
Ignoring him, Jay circled the rest of the room. Pausing at the low table
in front of the sofa, she said, “That camera looks expensive.”
“I guess. I'm still figuring it out. The pictures all come out blurry.” He
shrugged. “You want to see the rest of the house? I don't have anything
better to do.”
“You showed me the house yesterday.”
“I mean the parts we aren't supposed to go.”
Jay didn't like the sound of that—but she could imagine what would
happen if the little shit got into trouble and she wasn't there to put a stop to
it.
This is your life now, Jay. Babysitting this little demon prince.
“Okay,” said Jay, putting the camera back down. “Show me.”
She thought he'd be more gleeful, but just like the way he'd been with
his friends, his affect didn't really change. With a jerk of his chin, he headed
out the door and started for the long hall that led to the kitchen. This time,
he kept walking until they came to a room with navy walls that had sharp
white accents and heavy wood furniture. “This is the bar,” he said. “For the
adults.”
“You mentioned that before,” said Jay.
Nick pointed at the liquor cabinet. “I tried a little of that,” he bragged
casually. “It tasted like Windex.”
“You shouldn't be drinking that stuff, dude. It'll rot your brain.”
“What are you going to do?” he asked scornfully. “Tell on me?”
Jay sighed. “No.”
“Good. You better not. You wouldn't want me as your enemy. I know
things.” With that mystifying statement, he spun on his heel and pointed out
some of the paintings on the wall, reeling off how much his father had paid
for them to the dollar. Gesturing at a plush sofa draped in a fur throw, he
added, “My dad got that couch from Gump's.”
“I don't know what that is.”
Nick squinted at her. “Aren't you from San Francisco?”
“I really doubt your dad and I shop at the same stores.”
“Yeah.” Nick made a dismissive sound. “My dad said you were poor.”
“Your dad is a jerk,” said Jay.
“Whatever, blue jay. I don't care if you're poor or not. Let's go look at
my dad's office.”
“How much longer is this tour going to be? I have homework I need to
do.”
“Come on.” Nick seemed eager to go to the office, for some reason. Jay
wasn't sure why. It was a cold, gray room and there was a computer on the
desk. It was the bulkiest thing in the room. Everything else was sleek and
streamlined. “You ever seen one of these before?”
“Yes, doofus,” said Jay. “This morning. When I printed out the map.”
“Well, I wasn't sure. My friend Aaron thinks you were raised in a box.
You were so weird when you saw your room, like you'd never seen a room
before. He keeps his magazines in here,” Nick added, kicking at a drawer
with his shoe. “And his scotch. I don't touch that one, though. It's fifty years
old.”
“You shouldn't touch any of them,” said Jay. “What are you even doing
in here? Do you just go through everyone's things?”
“Sometimes,” said Nick. “When I'm bored. There's not a lot to do in
this house.”
A horrible thought occurred to her. “Have you been through my stuff?”
“You just got here,” he said, not reassuringly. “I saw you dancing in
your room last night, though. That was weird. Your music's weird, too. Only
a girl would listen to a song about riding ponies.”
Jay flushed. “Stay the hell out of my room, you little creep.”
“Get a lock. That's what my dad does when he wants me to stay out of
things.” His little smirk faded. “My dad will be home soon. We should go
hang out in the den. I'm pretty sure he knows I come in here, but he'd still
be mad if he caught me.”
Jay was torn between going to her room and doing her homework and
seeing how this played out. What a weird kid. She decided to follow him,
watching silently as he turned on the game system and handed her a
controller with surprising courtesy.
“Does your dad have—rules I should know about?”
“Yeah.” Nick dug through the box of games. “Be home before the
streetlights come on, don't break anything that can't be replaced, don't talk
back, and don't embarrass him.”
As long as you don't embarrass us. Jordan's words floated back to her.
Shaking her head, Jay said, “What kinds of rules are those?”
“They're his rules. You'd be stupid not to follow them—although, if he
doesn't catch you doing it, then it's like it doesn't count. You'll never get
ahead by being noble.”
“Is that something your dad says?”
“Yeah, sometimes.” Nick plucked something white off the sleeve of her
jacket. It was a piece of the fur throw from the bar. “Hurry up and pick a
character. I want to play.”
Chapter Eleven
2017

“I want to play.”
Jay's eyes flew open. She found herself wrapped in a man's arms and
for a moment—fear, panic, confusion—bubbled through her, until she
remembered who she was with and what she had done. Oh God, she
thought, drawing in an unsteady breath. What have I done?
She could feel him pressing against her back, hard and warm. He was
running his fingers up and down her arm—I want to play—and she could
feel herself tensing against the touch.
“I know you're awake.” She felt him kiss her cheek. “I can hear you
breathing.”
Jay stared at the bright square of the window as his knuckles dusted
over her breast, catching her hardened nipple between two fingers. She
couldn't seem to get her arms to unbend and remained stiff when he began
kissing down from the nape of her neck. The muscles in her back bowed out
when she felt a light bite between her shoulder blades that had her arching
into his hand. No, she thought, as he stroked her teasingly before letting his
fingers drift down her belly.
“Got you,” he whispered.
It had been different in the darkness. Knowing he couldn't see her had
been strangely liberating. She didn't have to hide. Now, with the sunlight
pouring in, she was completely exposed. There was no hiding. Everything
was out in the open. It made her feel raw.
He made her feel raw.
God, she was sore. There was a stiffness low in her belly that was
blossoming into a dull ache and everything between her thighs felt tender.
She definitely felt ill-used—and that was his fault, too. He didn't have to
take her from behind or use her so callously; he'd chosen to do that, just like
he'd chosen to threaten her and her mother and force her to leverage her
body.
“Blue jay,” he said, a little louder, a little less playful. It sounded like a
rebuke.
She pushed away from him, groping for her discarded hoodie. It was
bright pink, which made it easy to find where it dangled from the edge of
the bed. She slung it on, zipping it up to her throat, and only then could she
bear to roll over and face Nicholas in the light.
“What?” she said, at length.
He was sitting up in a half crouch with one arm draped over his bent
knee—the one he'd been touching her with, she realized, with a rush of
shameful heat. He must have gotten up in the night because he was wearing
a Stanford shirt and flannel pajama pants. The stubble around his lips and
chin had graduated into a morning beard, which made him look feral and
untamed.
One of his eyebrows shot up. “Good morning.”
Swallowing, Jay averted her eyes. “Where are my pants?”
Nicholas regarded her for a long moment before leaning over her body
in a way that had her freezing stiffly as he grabbed them from where they
had either fallen or been tossed to the floor. He dropped them on her
stomach before pulling away.
Jay dragged her pants beneath the sheet, working herself into them by
arching her body and lifting her back, not caring how provocative it looked,
or that she didn't even have her underwear to put on beneath them. An
amused smile played at Nicholas's mouth as he watched her dress.
“You woke me last night with all your tossing and turning. Bad
dreams?”
So many minefields. Even though Jay knew she was being
manipulated, she couldn't quell her sudden unease as she wondered how
long he'd been watching her sleep.
“I dreamed that we were children again.”
His face smoothed out, becoming unreadable. “That upset you?”
“It made me realize how much I hated this house. This city. Growing
up feeling so alone.” She stared down at her hands. “It's still cold. Exactly
like I remembered. I just wanted—”
“What?” His voice was quiet, intense.
But she couldn't bring herself to finish or even think the rest of that
sentence. Not with him. She picked at the fraying sleeves of the hoodie as
she rolled them back down, glancing at him before turning her attention
pack to the pilling terrycloth.
“How long is this going to go on?”
“That depends,” he said, just when she'd given up on him answering.
“Do you know how much your mother was pressing me for?”
Jay sat up and felt a protesting ache in her belly. “No.”
“Fifteen million.”
Jay choked.
“Yeah, it's a lot. A hell of a lot.”
“Is she insane?” Jay whispered to herself. What was her mother
thinking, asking Nicholas for that much? The two of them had never gotten
along, not even at the beginning.
“Well, I've always thought so,” said Nicholas. “Craziest bitch this side
of the Sierras.”
“Nobody asked you.” Shock rendered her defensive, vicious, which she
regretted when she saw the dark flicker of interest in his eyes.
“You did, actually. Did you know the estate was that big? I was
surprised you didn't ask before bravely offering to pay for it. You were
never all that involved with the finances, though.”
“No,” said Jay, speaking through numb lips. “I didn't know it was that
big.”
“A whore from a good brothel might charge five thousand dollars an
hour.” Nicholas sat up and stretched, straining the sleeves of his shirt a little
as the muscles in his arms flexed. “Do you know how long it would take to
pay off fifteen million at that price? Three thousand hours.”
Dread gripped her in a cold, iron fist. Was he calling her a whore? She
didn't trust herself to speak at first and when she did, her voice cracked on
the first syllable. “That seems excessive.”
“I told you it was a fuck or get-fucked world out there.” He lowered his
arms and leaned towards her, his mouth twitching a little cruelly when she
immediately edged back. “That's three thousand solid hours of you fucking
me. One hundred and twenty-five solid days, if you don't work, or eat, or
sleep.”
Jay had run out of bed to back away to. Only air was at her back now.
“No,” she said.
“I did try to warn you. But you were so quick to bargain yourself to me.
Before I'd even asked.”
“I—I didn't know.” She hated herself for stammering. “You tricked
me.”
“No. Whatever I want, were your exact words, I believe. You have no
business acumen. You never did. Of course, I could be nice,” he said, on his
hands and knees now as he cornered her, like a wolf about to pounce, “and
say that you're worth twice or even three times the market price of a typical
call girl. But that's still a lot of sex, Jay. Even if I decided you were worth
fifteen grand an hour, you'd still have to be on your back for just over a
month to work it off.”
She didn't realize she'd slapped him until the sound echoed in her nearempty room like a gunshot. Her hand had jumped, seemingly of its own
accord, before she could have the presence of mind to stop herself. With a
startled sound, she grabbed her own wrist, staring at him in alarm.
Nicholas pressed his hand to his reddened cheek.
Oh shit. Jay felt her heart creep out of her chest and into her throat,
where it began to freeze. “I—”
He held up a hand and she flinched, which made him curl and lower it.
Shockingly, he didn't look angry. She wasn't sure what that look on his face
was, but the intensity of it frightened her almost as much as fury would
have. His eyes, she thought, wilting. They're so cold.
“I told you I don't play nice,” he said at last, in the same even tone as
before, which was more terrifying still. “Fair market value seems more
than reasonable. So with everything else you'll be doing for me, I figure
you'll be here for a couple years, maybe two or three. There's only so many
hours a day I can fuck you, after all, and you wouldn't want me to get
bored.”
Jay sucked in a breath. “No.”
“Yeah, I didn't think so,” he said, with a dark chuckle, even though that
hadn't been what she meant. “So, what do you think, Jay? You want to pay
off some of your mother's debt to me? I'm actually feeling a little hot and
bothered. It must have been the slap.”
“I thought it was going to be a couple days,” Jay said haltingly. “Mmaybe two weeks. Not years.”
“That's really not my problem,” said Nicholas.
“I can't stay here for years.” Her chest felt too tight. “I have an
apartment.”
“Sell it. Or I'll buy you out. Money's no object. You can have your
things shipped here.” He reached out to gently flick her nose. “You're
Daddy's little bird now.”
The dig at her apartment made her angry—as if the only reason she
wouldn't want to leave was money. It was like him upgrading her to first
class without asking. It made her feel cheap.
“I think we need to make something clear,” Jay said, pushing his hand
away. “You don't get to order me around if I'm not at work or in bed with
you—and I want that in writing,” she added, which wiped the amused smile
from his face. “Put it in a contract. I'm not a twenty-four hour convenience
and you don't get to dictate my life.”
“Fast learner.” His brows arched. “But then, you've always been such a
cute little nerd.”
“What are you doing?” Jay yelped when he slid her back from the edge
of the mattress and swung over her hips with an expression that left her
feeling hunted.
“I'm fucking you.” He yanked on her sweatshirt zipper. “So let Daddy
order you around.”
He bit her ear, her neck. Rough, tugging pinches that made her
breathless. She grabbed his wrist, which had settled against her chest. “No,”
she said. “I can't. I'm still sore.”
“That's too bad,” he said, kissing her bared shoulder now. “Sore doesn't
pay the bills.”
Jay felt an unwelcome lick of heat between her thighs as he exhaled
against her collarbone, running his hands over her waist in a way that was
too rough to be comforting. She could feel him pressing against her hip and
a cold sensation crawled down her nape as memories from last night
trickled in. Relax, blue jay. It's just me.
“You sure you aren't up to the task, Jay?” She realized she was still
holding onto his wrist only when she felt his fingers spread and gently
squeeze her breast. “You're breathing like you want it.”
Another stabbing ache made her thighs clench when she shifted. “Shut
up, Nick.”
“Hmm. So we've moved from denial to anger now.”
“What if I suck your dick?” she asked icily. “Does that 'pay the bills'?”
“And thus we come to bargaining.” Nicholas pulled back to look at her.
His eyes drifted to her mouth and turned slightly mocking. “It only counts if
you swallow.”
Jay wanted to slap him again but didn't quite dare. Hitting him before
had been stupid and dangerous. He had never been violent when he was
younger—not towards me, anyway, she amended with a shudder—but he
could be cruel. Oh God, could he be cruel.
“Fine,” she said, biting off the word. “Anything you—” She caught
herself just in time.
Nicholas laughed. “I'll tell you what. Since you're feeling so shy, I'll
even let you keep your clothes on.”
She hadn't been planning on taking them off anyway, but now it felt
like part of this game. This stupid game. Jay zipped her sweatshirt up again
as she slid off the bed to her knees. Nicholas lifted his hips so she could
slide down his pants, running his fingers through her hair in idle
expectation, gathering up falls of it in his fingers so that it spilled out in
tangles that looked like dark copper coils.
“Take me to heaven, blue jay.”
Go to hell, you bastard.
The muscles in his thighs jumped as she took him into her mouth and
she felt a yank on her hair as his fingers tightened. “Good girl.” He tipped
his head back. “Keep doing that.”
A sudden viciousness took hold of her at those words, good girl, and
she wrapped her hand around him, fluttering her tongue over the slit until
he began to twist and groan. When she grazed him lightly with her teeth, he
shuddered, and she saw goosebumps on his arms. “Fuck,” he said, the word
chopped up into multiple syllables, “that feels so fucking good.”
She glanced up and felt an unwilling spear of attraction. Nicholas was
leaning back on his arms, having released her hair. The cords in his throat
were standing out in relief as he stared unseeingly at the ceiling, his broad
chest rising and falling in an erratic rhythm.
Eight years, thought Jay. Her hand slid down his now-slick shaft,
cupping the base of him to run her thumb over the soft, wrinkled skin,
before following the velvety path of his perineum. She heard him suck in a
breath as she tongued the head of his cock again and then she could taste
him—hot and bitter. Jay choked, gagging a little as she pulled away, but
managed to swallow.
Nicholas collapsed back against the bed, with her still kneeling at his
feet. For a moment, he didn't say anything, and then he said, a little
hoarsely, “Let's get some lunch.”

Once Jay had gotten out of the shower, scrubbing herself until she felt
raw, she hovered over her battered suitcase, staring at her clothes. She didn't
want to look prudish but she also didn't want to look like she was trying to
impress him, either. Eventually, she just grabbed the two things closest to
the top: jeans and a floral blouse with a high neck.
When she made her way down to the hall, clutching a cheap little bag
that she'd purchased marked-down at Target, she was alone in the checkered
entryway. It was completely still and silent, as if the house absorbed all
sound. She looked up at the Chihuly sculpture hanging over the foyer, lit up
with glowing blue light. When she'd been a kid, she'd always been secretly
afraid that it would fall on her and shatter, but seventeen years later, it was
still upright and kicking.
“You never did like my father's art.” Nicholas's voice echoed, making
her jump. “I seem to recall you telling me how you thought the Louise
Bourgeois was ugly.”
His dark brown hair was curling and damp, almost black in the
shadows. The jeans he was wearing looked so distressed that Jay figured
they probably cost more than her entire outfit. That kind of calculated
destruction didn't come cheap. He'd swapped out the Stanford shirt for a
white tee and a cuffed chambray shirt, and around his wrist was an
expensive-looking watch. Probably the BVLGARI his father had promised
him. She saw the glint of its diamond face as he adjusted his sleeves, a
strange look on his too-familiar features.
“So?” she asked, knowing she looked defensive and not caring.
“It is what it is. Some of us like real art. And some of us like
sunflowers painted on the walls.” Nicholas had reached her and was
looking up at the jellyfish sculpture. She pettishly wished he wasn't,
because the way he loomed over her was a reminder of how much bigger he
had gotten. When he looked her way again, he seemed relaxed. “Where do
you want to go?”
“I'm vegan,” said Jay. “Apart from that, I don't really have a
preference.”
She walked out with him to the car, feeling extremely uncomfortable. It
occurred to her that she had never actually been in a car with him when he'd
driving, except for that one night at Dave Byron's party when she'd been all
but passed-out drunk. He'd driven her Honda to take them both home, even
though he hadn't had a license. God, he'd hated her Honda. It didn't have
enough status. Unlike his father, who'd gotten through several models of
Mercedes. Nicholas had opted for a Tesla.
“Nice car,” she said tonelessly.
“You want to drive it?”
“No.”
“Suit yourself.” He opened the passenger door, waiting for her to get
in, before sidling around to the driver's side. His hands were loose on the
wheel, his expression thoughtful as he piloted the gunmetal-colored car
through the twisty roads. There was music playing, she realized, suddenly.
One of the metal bands he'd listened to during the college years. He'd used
to fuck her in his room with the music turned all the way up so no one
would hear her when she screamed.
Nicholas glanced at her and his eyes followed hers to the car stereo.
Without saying anything, he reached over and turned the sound off. The
silence that followed was deafening.
I can't do this, she thought, squirming. She could still taste him in her
mouth.
“Where are we going?”
“I know an Afghan place. It's good. Small.”
Jay seized on that. “I don't remember there being an Afghan place in
Hollybrook.”
“It's new. A lot of things are different now.”
Like what? she wondered, leaning back in the seat with her arms
folded, feeling tired in a way that she hadn't since she was working and
going to school. Different doesn't always mean better.
Nicholas pulled into a shopping center that used to have a dELiA*s
when she was young. The restaurant was actually in the space where the
tween clothing store had been.
When he helped her out of the car and looped an arm around her waist,
Jay couldn't quite suppress a flinch. She knew he felt it, too, because the
neutral expression on his face disappeared, becoming—she didn't have a
word for that look. Studious seemed too benign.
He kept his arm around her as they talked to the man behind the
counter, almost like he thought she might be about to run. Jay looked
around the cramped but clean diner. There was no one else inside but them.
“Sit anywhere you like,” the man behind the counter said.
Nicholas immediately went to the back, to a table by the window that
was secluded by a palm plant. A waiter appeared instantly while Jay stared
at some woven rugs that were hanging on the wall. All of them done in the
Afghan style, many with price tags. Nicholas ordered cardamom tea for the
table and lamb skewers.
Jay quickly scanned the menu. “Is there milk in the kidney bean
curry?”
“No,” said the waiter. “No milk.”
“Okay. I'll have that, please, and the pickled vegetable salad.”
Nodding, the waiter gathered both their menus and wandered towards
the kitchen.
“I didn't realize you were a vegan now.”
“Your private investigator couldn't tell you that?”
Nicholas took a long sip of water. “When did you start?”
That's not an answer. Eyeing him distrustfully, Jay said, “I started when
I moved back to San Francisco. It was easy. I gave it a try for a week and
never stopped, and I saved a lot of money by doing my own cooking.
Coconut milk in soups, whipping up aquafaba to make ma—”
Realizing she was rambling, Jay quickly fell silent, all too aware of his
pressing gaze.
Nicholas set the water glass down, nudging it aside. “What do you put
in your coffee?”
“Oat milk. Why?”
“I'm just curious.” He looked down, noticed his watch was crooked,
and adjusted it. “What else have you been doing for the last eight years?”
“What are you doing? Is this a job interview?”
“In a manner of speaking. You are technically on my payroll.” He drew
his fingers down the same cheek she'd slapped. “We could always review
your performance.”
Jay drew herself up and gave him what she hoped was a cold, withering
look. “I've been busy. I couldn't afford to go to grad school, so I waitressed
to pay for my administrative assistant certification. I brought a copy,” she
added pointedly. “In case you want to review it.”
He made a dismissive gesture.
“Fine. So I got that, and while I was working, I was living with a whole
group of other people in their late teens and early twenties in what was
basically a flophouse for fly-by-night college students going to SF State and
other local schools. I was the oldest, even though I was only twenty-three.
They called me Mother Goose,” she added, flushing a little when his mouth
curled.
“Cute. How much did you make a night waitressing?”
What a weird question. “I don't know. Usually fifty to seventy-five
dollars in tips. It wasn't really enough to live on, even with roommates. I
sold all my jewelry and used some of the cash from that to pad my income
when things got hard. I probably would have eventually taken on another
job if I'd stayed there. I liked my roommates, though,” she added abruptly.
“They were all really nice. I ended up dating one of them for a while, which
wasn't smart, but it worked out for about a year.”
Her eyes had dropped to her plate as she toyed with her fork, so she
didn't see Nicholas's face. When she dared look up, his expression didn't
appear to have changed.
“How was the sex?” he asked casually.
“Excuse me?”
“How was it,” said Nicholas, emphasizing each syllable, “when he
fucked you? I'm assuming it was a he. Tell me all about it. I want to know.”
Jay set her fork down with a ping. “It was fine.”
“Dinner is fine. Cable television is fine. I'm asking if, when he was
pounding into you at night with his college boy cock, were you screaming
the walls down, or were you just lying there calculating last night's tips?”
Jay sucked in a breath and glanced around the empty restaurant with a
wave of panic. He'd kept his voice low, but this was still mortifying. “You
are disgusting,” she said, once she'd confirmed nobody had heard. “I'm not
discussing my personal life with you.”
“Interesting,” said Nicholas.
“What?”
The waiter came then with the plates and the tea and Jay clammed up
fast, shooting Nicholas a silencing look. He smiled but it was a dangerous
look on him. It was the smile of a man who might do anything. “Thank
you,” said Jay, looking anxiously at her curry and salad.
Now please leave.
“What was it you said you made in tips per night?” Nicholas asked, as
soon as the waiter was gone. “Fifty to seventy-five dollars, was it?”
“You—” Jay drew in a deep breath. Don't give him what he wants. He's
always been like this. Fucking with people. Getting a rise out of people. It's
what he's good at. She just hadn't realized how much better he'd gotten at it
until now. “You haven't changed at all,” she said at last.
“Now I wouldn't say that.” Nicholas sliced off a piece of sizzling lamb.
“I'm not another fuck-up hiding behind a rich father. I own a company. I
call the shots—and people let me, because they know I get results, one way
or another.” He glanced at her as he popped the lamb into his mouth, and it
made her face feel hot for some reason. “If anything, it's you who's stayed
the same. I bet you still dance in your bedroom.”
Jay took a bite of her pickled salad but the carrots kept sticking in her
throat. She stared at a pink piece of radish, hating this, hating him. Hating
how powerless he made her feel.
“I probably still have that video around somewhere,” he added
offhandedly, making her eyes swing back to his face. “On an old flash
drive. You remember the one.”
“Are you going to blackmail me with that, too?”
“No. It's not exactly career-ending these days, is it? A college girl,
touching herself beneath her clothes? That's just spring break or a weekend
at Vegas. It's the look on your face that makes it so affecting. You make the
same one right when you're about to come. When you bite your lip.” He
regarded her over the rim of the tea cup. “I don't want anyone else to see it.”
Looking into his eyes made her feel as if she were falling upwards into
a winter sky.
Snow-blasted, she thought, and frozen. She actually did feel a little
cold, except with her face, which still felt hot. “You are such an
unbelievable bastard,” she breathed.
“Yeah, I am.” His mouth twisted. “Guess I didn't grow out of it, after
all.”
Chapter Twelve
2017

The drive home from the Afghan restaurant was tense, shot through
with bleak memories and unspoken hostilities. The hostility might have
only been on her end, though; she was so angry, she felt as if she could
hardly breathe around all the words burning in her throat.
As soon as they arrived at the house, Jay immediately went to her room
and slammed the door shut, leaning against it for a long, furious moment—
You're Daddy's little bird now.
It felt like Nicholas would stop at nothing in his personal quest to
humiliate her and make her life hell. Just remembering what he'd said to her
in the diner was enough to make her face burn. And yes, maybe she had
been trying to provoke him. It had been so easy when he was younger and
his temper had burned hotter. But this colder, collected version of her
stepbrother left her feeling wildly uncertain.
Three thousand hours.
Jay heard the sound of his footsteps going up the staircase and then
silence and strode to her bed. She started to lie down and then immediately
sat up. The sheets smelled like sex. She began yanking the sheets off,
balling them up with the pillowcases and the comforter, until all of the
bedclothes had been gathered up in her arms. The sheet was trailing,
though, and she tripped on it on her way down the staircase. Suddenly, the
floor was no longer beneath her feet and Jay shrieked as she slipped,
tumbling the last couple steps onto the pile of soiled bedding.
Upstairs, a door clicked open. Nicholas leaned over the rail, looking
down at her from the balustrade. A dark angel, backlit against the light
pouring in from the window. “You don't need to do that,” he called down to
her. “I have someone who comes and does the sheets.”
“I want to,” she said, too fiercely. “I can do it myself.”
Nicholas gave her a strange look. “You remember where the laundry
room is.”
“Yes,” she said coldly, even though it hadn't been a question.
“Suit yourself, then. If you need me, I'll be out in the pool.”
Jay went to the laundry room but it was like that sudden burst of fire
had been wiped out as quickly as it surged. She shoved her bedding in the
washer and started the machine, taking a moment to push her hair out of her
eyes. What the hell am I supposed to do now?
He still hadn't mentioned her employment—her other employment, she
amended bitterly. She was beginning to wonder if there was an other
employment. If maybe he had just wanted to lock her up in his house as if
she really were a bird.
Lying on the stripped mattress, alone in her time-frozen room, she
scrolled through her phone. There was a text from Lily, sent this morning.
Hey, boo-boo. How's the new job? You didn't forget us, yet, did you? Jay
still hadn't responded because honestly, how could she?
There had been one from her mother, as well. Baby? Did you talk to
Nicholas? She hadn't answered that one, either, typing out a response in
anger that she had instantly deleted.
No, Mom. Didn't really have time to get much talking in while I had his
cock in my mouth.
The really sick thing was, Jay wasn't sure her mother would bat an eye
at her for sleeping with Nicholas to get what she wanted from him. Not as
long as she was successful. Danielle Beaucroft had capitalized on their
relationship before, relegating many of her guardianship duties of Nick to a
teenage Jay, and she was constantly asking her to intervene once he got
older, wilder, and more out of control. She'd wondered why Nicholas had
gone after her mother but it was starting to sound like her mother had gone
after him, rattling wasp nests.
Jay couldn't figure out how to talk to her mother without hurling
accusations or swearing, so she deleted the text without responding. Then
the alarm she'd set for her laundry went off and Jay went downstairs to pop
her things into the dryer, trying to put thoughts of her family out of her
mind.
On her way back to her room, movement from outside drew her back
downstairs, to the window that looked out onto the pool from the lounge.
Nicholas was in the water, swimming. Seventeen years ago, he'd told her
that he used to swim an hour a day. It hadn't really occurred to her that he
might have kept up with it.
As she watched, he stepped out, dripping water from head to toe. He
grabbed a towel from somewhere she couldn't see and began wiping his
face, which caused a rippling contraction of wet muscle that sent a dull
pang through her belly. His body was—magnificent.
I should leave, thought Jay, rooted to the spot. Despite her mounting
disgust with herself, she had trouble looking away. She had wondered at his
tan, at his athletic build—unlike his late father, who'd had the body of an
athlete gone to fat, Nicholas had stayed fit. Broad shoulders. Trim waist.
Long, muscular legs. His broad chest was covered with dark hair that had
become matted by the water. That was new. He must have shaved while he
was swimming. When she had seen him last, his chest had been hairless.
A chill shivered through her like ice in a glass when their eyes met
through the glass.
His mouth was moving, speaking through the satisfied smile of a man
who thought he had his quarry. It looked like he was saying “come here.”
Jay shook her head slowly, backing from the window. That was a
terrible idea.
He started walking towards the house and her heart took flight like a
startled bird. She raced up the stairs two at a time and flung herself into her
room just as she heard his voice calling her name. No, she thought, washed
with hot shame and cold terror. Go away.
She heard him pause outside her room. “Jay,” he said. “Open this
door.”
They both knew the door was inconsequential. If he wanted to get
inside, he could. She closed her eyes as her heart continued to pound,
startling when the base of her spine bumped her desk chair. “D-don't come
in,” she said faintly.
Through the wood, over the throbbing in her ears, she thought she
heard him sigh before padding away.
Slowly, Jay sank into the chair.
She hadn't slept with many men, or even really dated much. Men
frightened her—the way they looked at her body, the things they said about
her, the things they wanted from her. As she got older, the demands and the
comments became less frequent than they had been when she was young,
but every once in a while, she'd see someone studying her and she would
think, I know that look, as she rode out those instinctive waves of selfloathing.
Dante Rojas had been different. Sweet. She'd actually gotten a crush on
him because of his hands, which sounded dirty, but really, she had just
loved watching him cook. He'd wanted to be a chef and was waiting tables
until he could get through culinary school. He practiced at the apartment,
cooking food for anyone who paid for cost of ingredients and gave him a
share. Dante was the one who had taught her how to cook for herself and
really enjoy doing it.
He'd been shorter than her, 5'7”, which she told herself she hadn't
minded. It was good to feel needed, wanted—but only on her terms. He'd
taken her on dates. Cheap ones, since neither of them had money. She didn't
mind the money. Free museum days, picnics in the park, walks around the
Mission looking at things they couldn't afford; she'd loved all of it. No,
what bothered her was the fact that, like so many others, he couldn't seem to
get past the surface of what she was. “You're so pretty,” he kept telling her,
over and over. “She's so sweet,” he told others, also over and over. Once,
drunk, he had confided to her, with unusual candor, “I think you're the
smartest girl I've ever dated, Jay. What do we even talk about?”
That's a good question, Jay remembered thinking, and shortly
afterwards, she had dumped him. The sex hadn't been that great, if she were
being completely honest with herself, and contrary to what that bastard
Nicholas thought, that hadn't really mattered, either. She wasn't going to
break up with a guy for not making her heart pound out of her chest when
she slept with him. But she did remember thinking, a little wistfully, how
much better the sex might have been if he called her filthy names or pinned
her to the mattress with those strong hands of his.
She had never allowed herself to dwell on why she thought those
things.
When her laundry was ready, she ran into Nicholas in the hall, so
suddenly that she had the unpleasant feeling that he'd been lying in wait for
her. His hair was damp and so was the fabric of his shirt, which was
sticking to his body like clingy film. Since he didn't smell like chlorine, she
assumed he'd showered. “Dinner's coming in thirty minutes.”
Jay tightened her arms around her laundry. “What—what is it?”
“Salad.” Nicholas looked her over consideringly. A man studying his
newest acquisition? “No dressing. I can top yours with giardiniera or you
can have balsamic vinaigrette.”
Jay stared at the wall over his shoulder as she began walking again.
“Giardiniera's fine.”
He didn't mention the pool or ask her why she'd run. Jay wondered
about that as she made her bed, just as she wondered why he hadn't forced
his way into her bedroom as he had so many times before. Was this another
one of this games, letting her feel safe? Sitting across from him in the chilly
dining room, Jay found herself thinking: is this the calm before the storm?
She looked down at the salad, ordered from somewhere fancy and
obviously prepared at great expense. The rainbow radishes had been
chopped up into tiny pink rosettes and the giardiniera was fresh and lightly
brined. She stabbed a piece of celery and tried to breathe.
“When does my new job start?”
“I'm pushing the paperwork through HR as fast as it will go. They're
currently going through your background check.”
A subtle reminder of how easily he could destroy her future? She
studied the celery pierced by the tines of her fork. “And it's real? It wasn't
just a ruse to get me back here?”
Nicholas glanced at her. “I wouldn't do that to you.”
“You once told me that you didn't even think women should work,” Jay
pointed out. “You said it made a man look like he couldn't take care of the
women in his life.”
“That was a long time ago.” He picked up his glass. “The job is real.”
“Sure.” She laughed a little bitterly. “Whatever you say.”
The conversation, which hadn't exactly been sprightly before, died after
that. They ate in silence, except for the clink of fork on ceramic, and the feel
of that icy, claustrophobic atmosphere was so transportive that, for a
moment, Jay almost felt fourteen again.
She trudged up the stairs with an icy bottle of water and a heart full of
dread. In her newly washed bed linens, Jay lay tucked under the covers with
her hands folded on her chest and the cat curled between her legs,
wondering if Nicholas was going to visit her to extract another one of his
stupid payments. After all, it seemed to be all he thought she was any good
for.

I'm going to bring you to your knees.
Jay woke up ill-rested and alone, haunted by nightmares that doubled
as memories. She glanced at the clock and groaned—midnight. With
nothing else to do, time was already playing tricks on her in this place. She
pulled her hoodie on over her tank top and wandered downstairs.
There was a light on in the kitchen and she crept in there, thinking it
had been left on by mistake. She froze when she found Nicholas standing
with his hip cocked against the counter as he ate a piece of toast slathered in
butter and sprinkles, just like he'd used to do as a child. Like her, he was
dressed for bed, in flannels and what looked like an old band T-shirt.
“You still eat that trash.”
“I had an Australian nanny before you came,” he said, so casually—
before you came. Clear-cut before and after. “She used to make this for me
to shut me up. It's called fairy bread.”
“Cool.” She skirted past him to get to the fridge and grabbed a water,
feeling his eyes follow her out the door as she made her way to the den.
Like a wolf tracking a sheep, she thought randomly, and then shuddered,
wishing the analogy hadn't popped into her stupid brain.
The TV was newer than the model he'd had before and now, instead of
just cable, which he still had, he also had a couple of subscriptions. She saw
that he'd been watching Vikings on Hulu. Rolling her eyes, Jay clicked to
How the Universe Works and started up the Planets from Hell episode until
her mind was filled with thoughts of ice and fire and darkness.
And Nick.
She straightened almost before she felt the slight dip behind her back.
She looked up in alarm to see him leaning over her. His arms were folded
over the back of the couch and he was close. Close enough for her to feel
the heat radiating from his bare arms against her back.
On the screen was a planet that had been sucked into the gravitational
field of its own star, and was slowly being devoured alive.
“You still watch these.”
“Yes,” she said.
“Can I watch the world burn with you?”
“They're not all burning,” Jay blurted, which wasn't exactly permission.
It wasn't exactly a denial, either, though, and she felt her limbs turn to water
when his mouth formed a smile.
“I'll get some wine.”
Wine? Sitting here and drinking wine with him on the couch that he'd
fucked her on when they were young might be the stupidest thing she could
probably do.
But he came back before she could summon the courage to get to her
feet, holding two empty glasses and a bottle. “Oh good. You're still here.”
He handed her the two glasses as he reached into the pocket of his pants and
pulled out a wine opener. “I thought you might run away again,” he
remarked, opening the bottle with a sound that made her jump.
“I didn't run,” Jay lied, and he gave her a sardonic look.
“Well. It's foolish to even try.” He filled a glass with sloshing liquid the
color of a pigeon's blood ruby. “I know this house like I know the back of
my hand, and I have all the keys.”
Keys. A wintry chill whirled through her. Another reminder that she
wasn't safe.
She stared at the bottle, not recognizing the name of the winery. “I see
you've moved on from sneaking your father's scotch.”
“Mm-hmm. Did you want something harder? I'll give it to you.”
Jay felt her face flush. “N-no.”
Nicholas laughed, nearly spilling the wine as he filled the second glass.
“Jay, you bad girl,” he said, in a dry tone that made her face burn even
hotter. “What a dirty mind you have.”
Heat seemed to drip down her throat. That smile, at once taunting and
dangerous, was like a twisting blade in her chest. “If you're going to be like
this, I'm leaving.”
“Sit down and drink your wine, blue jay.” He handed her what seemed
to be a very full glass. The smell coming off its surface was scaldingly
sweet. “I want to see the cosmos.”
I already brushed my teeth. She stared at the TV, clutching her
wineglass as his arm gradually slid from the back of the couch to settle
around her waist. The narrator was talking about a planet that didn't rotate,
where one side was permanently scorched by its sun and the other was
encrusted by the cold freeze of space.
Beneath her clothes, the skin he was grazing seemed to scorch and
freeze. Guiltily, she looked up at that half-wall that dipped over the den like
the bridge in a spaceship where anyone could peer down and catch them in
the act. Only no one's here to catch me now, she thought, touching the neck
of her sweatshirt to make sure it was still zipped. I'm all alone.
“You made me watch so many of these.” Nicholas sipped his wine,
eyes on the TV, taking in the computer-generated planet as the screen
zoomed in. Smoking oceans of lava and ice-cracked darkness. His fingers
kept stroking her through her sweatshirt, describing lazy, abstract patterns
through the thin material. “Do you have any idea how many Eyewitness
shows you made me sit through as a kid? Sometimes I still find myself
humming the hook to Bill Nye.”
“I thought you hated them,” said Jay, lifting the glass to her mouth.
“If I'd hated them, I would have wrecked the tapes and hidden the
remote from you. That's what I did to your mother. I was always throwing
her tapes in the trash. She used to say someone should slap me. I'm sure it
never occurred to her that that someone would be you.”
His hand drifted a little lower, settling over her hip. Jay swallowed
hard. “You deserved it,” she said, surprised to taste wine on her tongue. In
her nervousness, she hadn't realized that she'd started compulsively sipping
it. It was sweet, which made it go down easier despite the intense burn of
the alcohol. “You're completely heartless.”
Nicholas let out another one of those low, humorless laughs. “You
wouldn't be the first to call me that.” He swirled the wine in his glass lazily.
“Although it does hit a bit harder coming from you. I think you're the only
person who ever thought there might be an ounce of good in me.”
“Is that why you did all this? Did you want to prove me wrong?” Do
you hate me that much?
“You want to know why I did what I did? Because you were the town
golden girl and I wanted you all to myself. And I thought if I knocked you
off that pedestal, you might finally come crawling to me—and you did.
Because of course you did. You were always so goddamn noble, so utterly
consumed by what others thought of you. So eager to fucking please.”
“Fuck you,” she said heatedly. “You blackmailed me. You made me a
prisoner.”
“You're not a prisoner. I'm not going to stop you from leaving the
house. You can go where you please.”
A pulsar swiveled on the screen, bathing its three orbiting planets with
dead, sterile heat as it boiled away their surfaces under gravity and
radiation.
Jay felt like the surface of her was being boiled away, too. Under the
compression of her inexplicably growing anger, she could feel something
hot and shameful churning in her belly, turning over and over again like a
vicious star.
“So I could leave,” she said. “Right now. You would just let me walk
away.”
“If you came back.” He rubbed the hem of her tank top back and forth,
brushing bare skin with each pass. “We have an agreement. You know what
I want from you.”
Jay said nothing. His hand settled on her bare waist, branding her with
its heat. “It may surprise you to learn that as enjoyable as it would be
crushing your mother to a litigious pulp, I'm really not all that interested in
destroying your sterling reputation. But the risk has to be a little painful and
there are always consequences when there is a failure to repay.”
“So you're willing to hurt me,” said Jay. “To get what you want. Just
like before.”
“We have an agreement,” he repeated steadily.
“Then I am your prisoner. I just happen to have a really long chain.”
He sighed. “If that's how you want to see it.”
I'm going to ruin you either way.
Jay looked down at her wineglass and noticed, with some chagrin, that
it was empty and the television no longer seemed quite as sharp or clear. My
head feels like a fish tank, she thought nonsensically. As she sat up, shifting
Nicholas as she moved, she had an image of her thoughts sliding around in
her head like wine in a glass. I'm tipsy.
“Is this about revenge?”
He looked at her, eyes flickering blue in the light of the television.
“Revenge for what?”
“I don't know.” She drew her legs up so she was sitting on her calves
and felt more of that embarrassing dampness kiss her thighs. His hand was
still under her top and she felt it slide over the grooves of her spine. “For
what I did to your father.”
Nicholas plucked the empty wineglass from her fingers and set it on the
floor. “To be honest,” he said, “I was more upset about you leaving than I
was about my father dying.”
“After what you did to me, you couldn't possibly be surprised that I'd
leave.”
His eyes narrowed. “Well, I was. It felt like you punched a fucking hole
in my chest.”
“Poor little rich boy.” She swayed slightly, seduced by her anger. She
was so angry. Where all this anger was coming from, she wasn't sure, but it
made her feel hot and dangerous, ready to combust. “It was always about
you. You, and my mother, and your fucking pervert of a father.”
“How could I resist that mouth?” It felt like she could only half-focus
on his hand skating higher up her spine, she was so transfixed by the
drugging poison of his gaze. “It tastes so sweet,” he said, just grazing her
lips with his, “but the things that come out of it are so bitter.”
“What—”
His mouth sealed over hers and she found herself sitting astride his lap,
as his tongue tangled with hers, lips cruel and biting. A rough kiss that
tasted of hot, sweet wine. She nearly groaned.
His cloth-covered erection was digging into the softness of her inner
thigh. Just as she became aware of this, Nicholas jostled her legs apart, and
then he was pressing against her even more intimately, putting unbearable
pressure between her legs. Suddenly, any movement became torture. He let
out a rough breath as his palm circled around her ribs, fingers plucking at
her nipples just hard enough to make her stomach clench.
His eyes locked with hers, the pupils so large that his irises shaded to a
dull navy. She felt his hand cup her throat, tilting her face towards his. This
time, the movement of his hips was deliberate. Desire, hot and molten,
pounded through her in a vicious, agonizing throb.
“Take your sweatshirt off,” he said, in a low, heavy voice.
Oh God. She was pushing him away almost as the realization of what
he had done become salient, her head sloshing with wine and fear. The
citrusy scent of him seemed to fill the back of her nose, leaving her as cold
as the empty void of space.
My head hurts, she thought in alarm. I feel sick. “What was in that
wine? Did you drug me?”
“No,” he said, tightening his grip on her. “I didn't drug you. It's port.”
“Port?” Port was fortified wine. Strong wine. No wonder she felt like
slush; he'd given her such a big glass. Jay pushed at the solid wall of his
chest, sliding off his lap to the floor and nearly upsetting the wineglasses as
she stumbled away. “I—I'm going back to my room.”
“Jay.” Her name was as sharp as a blade in his mouth. “Come back
here.”
When Nicholas got to his feet, she backed from him, keeping the couch
between them. She could see veins in her periphery: small, throbbing points
of darkness.
“Stay away,” she gasped. “D-don't come near me.”
“Come back here,” he repeated, in a low, dangerous voice. “Now.”
“No,” she said harshly, weaving unsteadily “Unless you're going to
force me.” She looked at him, barely daring to; his face could have been
chiseled from a block of ice. “Is that part of the agreement, too? Do you get
to force me?” A sob escaped her. “Do you get to rape me?”
“Fuck.” He made a harsh sound and gestured to the hall. “Get out.”
As she dragged herself from the room on weak, unsteady legs, she
heard what sounded like the tinkle of broken glass.
And then she ran.
Chapter Thirteen
2017

Even in her twenties, Jay had never had a very good tolerance for
alcohol. It tinted her cheeks a ruddy salmon color and anything more than a
glass tended to make her nauseous. She went to bed with a pounding heart
and a head that spun like a carousel full of monsters.
The sound of a piercing alarm shattered through her wine-soaked
dreams, splicing through her aching head like the bit on a drill. Jay shot up
in bed, her blanket slipping from around her bare shoulders as she covered
her ears with her hands. She could hear Carbon making panicked-sounding
meows. Is there a fire? she wondered, looking around in a panic. Should I
wake Nick?
“Wake up.” The light snapped on and she saw him, a dark and looming
specter in her room. The sound was coming from him—from his cell phone,
she realized. The bastard had actually set an alarm to wake her up. She
groped around for the quilt and realized it was missing. Bastard.
“What the fuck,” she gasped, drawing her knees to her chest. “Get out.”
“Get up.” Already dressed for work, he was wearing a gray blazer and
another white shirt, paired with the dark trousers she'd seen him wearing
before. This time, the belt was slate gray, the contrast drawing attention to
his narrow hips. He was going through her suitcase—what the fuck, she
thought again, this time in anger—but at the sound of her voice, he looked
over his shoulder at her. “I heard back from HR. You're starting your real
job this morning.”
The cruel jab annoyed her, as did his smugness. Like he thinks he's
gotten the best of me, she thought sourly, closing her dry and aching eyes.
As if being right mattered more than—
She shook her head, instantly regretting it. “You could have given me
notice.”
“I am.”
Some notice. Jay pressed a hand to her head, which still felt tender.
That fucking wine. “What time is it? God, it's still dark.”
Nicholas didn't answer, and when Jay looked back at him, she saw him
watching her, making no attempt to hide the fact that he was studying her
breasts. She crossed her arms, fighting to control her breathing when he
began walking towards her.
“No sweaters,” he said, flinging a skirt and a lace top at her. “I want to
see you in this. Be in the kitchen in fifteen minutes. Don't make me come
get you again.”
Again. Jay wondered if that was a reference to what had happened the
other day. His tone was a bit chillier. Remembering the sound of broken
glass chasing her steps down the hall, she bit her tongue and nodded,
watching him stalk out of the room like an agitated panther.
She locked the door behind him and changed in the bathroom. The top
had an opaque bodice with a lace collar and an open lace back. She'd gotten
it at Modcloth a while ago when they were having a sale. She couldn't
remember where she'd gotten the skirt, but it was a tight A-line with a
pleated hem. She wore it with stockings, layering socks over them so her
boots wouldn't chafe.
Her purse still had all her travel stuff in it. She dumped it out, tossing
the little Target purse she'd taken to the Afghan place, along with a handful
of pens and a hairbrush. Her hair was a mess. She ran some cream through
it to keep the curls from drying out, wincing at how tangled and matted it
looked. She knotted it up in a bun, tying it off with a ribbon. After quickly
bending to feed and pet the cat, who had crawled out from the bed, Jay was
ready to leave.
She was responding to Lily—sorry been really busy, how are you?—
when she walked into the kitchen, halting dead in her tracks when his black
shoes crossed her path. She just barely avoided collision. He was looking
her over, from the ribbon in her hair to the heels of her boots.
“You're taller,” he said, but unlike when her mother used to say it, it
wasn't disapproving.
“It's the boots,” she said uncertainly.
Nicholas took a step towards her and her body lurched as she felt the
chill of the fridge against her mostly exposed back. “Don't,” she said,
groping behind her for the door and quickly opening it, throwing up an
immediate barrier between them.
She could tell he didn't like that but he didn't try to close the distance,
remaining where he was. “There's water at the office,” he said after a
moment, watching her slide bottles into her purse. “And a kitchen, too—
unlike your little soap shop.”
Jay let the door close, clutching her bag as if it could be a shield against
him. It's not a soap shop, she thought, annoyed now, without being any less
wary.
“All right,” he said, after a moment. “Let's go.”
“Actually, I thought I might take the bus.”
Nicholas stopped walking. “You're not taking the bus.”
“Okay. Then drop me off at the Starbucks two blocks away. I'll walk.”
He swiveled on his heel to stare at her. “Are you afraid of me?”
“It's not that.” Although it was that. “How's it going to look to people if
the boss and his secretary come out of the same car every morning? They'll
think I'm—” She broke off, unable to say the words: Fucking you.
She could tell from his face that this possibility hadn't even occurred to
him. In his mind, the two events were disparate. Nobody would ever take a
look at him getting out of someone else's car and assume that he'd fucked
his way to the top. He made an irritated noise, something between a scoff
and a sigh. “Fine. I'll drop you off at the Starbucks. But you're riding home
with me, understand? I don't want you walking back alone in the dark.”
“I could take a—”
“Jay.” It was almost a growl. The sound of it sent a little shiver down
her spine.
“Fine,” she said, reaching for her coat. He caught her wrist, but gently.
“You aren't going to want that. This isn't San Francisco. It heats up
quickly here.”
Jay shook his hand off. “Any other helpful advice?”
“Relax,” he said, apparently taking her words at face value. “You're
very tense.”
I wonder why. She walked to the car in silence. The sun was just
beginning to rise, a blush of orange on the horizon gleaming through the
trees of the large mulberry tree out in front. She could smell the roses
blooming, their scent intensified by the morning dew. She was glad he
hadn't ripped those out; she'd always loved the flowers.
In the car, she crossed her legs and glared out the window, missing his
glance at her thighs where her skirt had ridden up and the subsequent
hardening of his jaw. “What did my background check turn up?” she asked,
after a while. “Do they know I'm your sister?”
“This is an investment firm. Not the CIA. We just want to see if you
have a criminal history or a drug habit. It's not like we're launching a full
scale audit.”
That wasn't a no. She could feel herself beginning to panic. “What if
they find out—”
She froze. The car had stopped and his hand was on her thigh, burning
hot through the silk. She looked down at his hand, and then at the window.
They were outside the Starbucks. All of the other early commuters were
milling around inside, under the cozy glow of the lights.
Nicholas spread his fingers. She felt them graze the top of her stocking.
“I want you to do something for me.” His thumb brushed skin.
“Breathe.”
She squirmed out from under his hand and slipped out the door where
the cool air hit her face like a slap. She could smell the strong coffee every
time the doors opened, but as nervous as she was right now, she thought
introducing caffeine into her system might cause her heart to explode like a
malfunctioning fuse. Breathe. She glanced back at the street.
Nicholas's gunmetal-colored car was already speeding away from the
curb.
It was a brisk walk and the socks cushioned her ankles from the tight,
chafing fit of the boots. Beaucroft Assets was located in a cold blue
building that looked intimidating. On the outside, it was a mirrored
monolith that reflected the sky, easily the tallest building around. Even
three- or four-story buildings were noteworthy in a suburb like Hollybrook.
She spied Nicholas's Tesla, parked out front with a permit hanging
from the mirror. He wasn't in it, which meant he was already inside. Jay
swallowed and walked through the doors. Inside, it was spacious and
modern in a way that Parker-Hawthorne, LLC really couldn't be. Sparkling
new fixtures, catalog furniture, big windows that had an unobstructed view
of the distant ocean. When Jay gave her name—Justine Varens—to the front
desk worker, she had a flash of being fourteen and new and totally uncertain
of herself.
“Ah yes,” the woman—Gwen—said with a smile. “Now why don't you
pose over by that wall for me so we can take your picture for your security
badge? Then you can take your seat over there.”
Jay stood where directed, thinking that she might have worn lipstick if
she'd known her photo was going to be taken. Once that was done, she sat
in the aforementioned seat, swinging her legs a little while she waited. Lily
had responded immediately—oh my god, thought you were dead, HI JAY.
She sent a coffin emoji and a bouquet emoji.
Jay snorted. You only want me dead because you know I'd leave you
Carbon when I die.
Lily must have been bored. The response was almost instantaneous.
Yes, I covet the fluffy little kitty-man. Even if his death-floof would mean the
end of my weak and feeble lungs.
Sighing, Jay wrote back, I miss you. How's your day going? Are they
working you too hard?
She felt the phone buzz again but wasn't able to respond because the
HR rep had come over to greet her. “Hello, Jay. It's so good to meet you.
I'm Meghana Srivastava, head of HR.”
“Hi,” said Jay. “It's nice to meet you.”
The introductions of the other new hires were quick. There weren't that
many but their names ran together in her head. The only two who really
stood out were Devon Ng from Aquisitions, because he was wearing a
novelty tie with Marvin the Martian on it, and Obi Musa from Accounting,
because he was apparently vegan too and told her a great recipe for vegan
jollof.
She hadn't remembered Hollybrook being this accepting and diverse.
Everyone had been so focused on status and appearances. She could feel
herself actually beginning to relax until Meghana showed her to her desk
and the nerves immediately rushed back in.
Jay looked around for Nicholas but couldn't see him. With any luck, he
had his own office—far, far away from hers. She glanced at her left, where
another administrative assistant was sitting. From her name plate, it looked
like her name was Annica.
“Do you work for Mr. Beaucroft, too?” Jay asked hesitantly.
“No, I work for Mr. Hartwell, the CFO.”
Jay wondered if more information was forthcoming but the woman
didn't seem interested in conversation, which made Jay miss Lily with a
vicious pang. Remembering her buzzing phone, she pulled it out of her
purse to look at it and saw a screen filled with sleeping emojis.
How's the new job?
Jay snapped a photo of her welcome bag and a Hint water she'd taken
from the fridge.
She received a champagne emoji and three confetti emojis. What about
Mr. Tall, Dark, and S.T.S.O.O.Y.?
I don't know. He's not around.
She received another text instantly but not from Lily. Looking at the
conversation history, and the swarm of bird emojis, she knew who it was
from immediately—No phones at work.
Her shoulders lifted and she looked around. Where are you?
Figure it out. There were three dots forming. I take my coffee black.
Jay set her phone down, deciding to ignore him, and booted up her
computer. To her relief, BA also used ShiftWare. She was glad they were
using software she recognized because Nicholas had about ten times more
appointments than Owen had on his busiest days.
As she dragged and dropped, a new one popped up.
Meeting with Justine Varens.
Jay stared at the screen uncertainly. Was he going to try to fuck her in
one of the conference rooms? He'd told her that he wouldn't mess around
with her at the office.
As she tried to decide what to do, her phone vibrated.
Schedule the meeting. There's a document linked to it. I want you to
read the attached files.
Jay scheduled the meeting for late afternoon and set her phone back
down again. It immediately began to buzz, this time with messages from
both Lily and Nicholas.
Lily: You know what they say, if you can't find your boss, he's probably
behind you.
Nicholas: Where's my coffee, Jay?
Jay glanced over her shoulder just to check and said to Nicholas, You
are an actual child.
Was she imagining the sound of his laughter? The only child to be
featured on Forbes' 30 under 30 list.
Annica was giving her an annoyed look and Jay began to feel selfconscious. She was the only one on her phone. Everyone else was hard at
work. You're going to get me in trouble. Where are you?
Look up, little bird.
Jay tilted her head back, looking up at the raised level of a second suite
of offices. She had ignored them before, figuring it had to be a different
department or maybe even a different company. But no. There was Nicholas
with an entire corner to himself. He was leaning back in his chair, talking
on his phone, but looking at her through the glass divider.
Without breaking eye contact, he picked up a mug and set it
deliberately on the edge of his desk.

She didn't have time to look at her phone again.
When she went up to the second suite of offices, Nicholas ignored her
as she picked up the mug. She had entertained the idea that it could be a
fake phone call but the level of annoyance that was in his tone would be
hard to fake and she knew that voice. He was pissed.
Jay had to have someone show her how to use the coffee machine. A
nice woman wearing a sunflower skirt did and then she invited Jay out to
lunch, so when Jay dropped off the coffee, her annoyance with Nicholas
had abated a bit. Especially when he mouthed, Thank you.
That surprised her. He used to be such an entitled little ass.
She had lunch with Sunflower Skirt, who turned out to be named
Stacey. Stacey also worked in Acquisitions, so Jay said, “Oh, I think I met
someone on your team today. Devon Ng?”
“Yes,” said Stacey. “I'm his manager. I'm currently training him.”
“What does your team do?” asked Jay.
“We develop portfolios of potential businesses we might decide to
invest in by using proprietary leads from a third-party agency. It's entirely
algorithmic, and scored to highlight companies that have potential and share
our values, and they sell their services to other sales and investment
companies. They give us a steep discount because Mr. Beaucroft was one of
their early investors.”
“Oh,” said Jay. “Wow. That's really impressive. I had no idea.”
And then she winced, because maybe that had been a stupid thing to
say.
But Stacey was nodding. “Mr. Beaucroft really rebuilt this company
from the ground up. It's an entirely different beast than what his father
managed. It's essentially a different business.”
“How?”
“Everything. The model, the structure, the mission statement. Of
course, my team helped shape some of that,” she added, bragging a little,
“but Mr. Beaucroft did most of the work.”
“Impressive,” said Jay. “We didn't really talk much about what the
other teams did.”
“They can't squeeze everything into orientation.” Stacey smiled, clearly
pleased. “But here I go, rambling on and on about what I do. What
department are you in, Jay? I don't think I've seen your face around the
office before.”
“I'm an administrative assistant,” said Jay. “I report to Nicholas—I
mean, Mr. Beaucroft.”
“Good luck with that,” Stacey said, with a laugh that wasn't unkind. “I
don't want to scare you on your first day, but he has a reputation for running
his assistants into the ground.”
Jay's phone buzzed, right on cue. She looked at it.
“If you gave him your number, you've already written your epitaph,”
Stacey said, with a grim smile. “The man never seems to sleep and he
works late. He and Crystal, the woman who worked before you, used to get
into fights because she wouldn't get in until eleven or noon.”
“Fights?” Jay asked warily.
“Well, she would yell. I don't know what he did. But don't worry about
it,” added Stacey, looking at Jay's face. “You seem much calmer. I'm sure
you'll be fine. Crystal was . . . tempestuous.”
With those words, she packed up her lunch, tossing over her shoulder,
“Let's do this again tomorrow. I enjoyed our little chat.”
Jay looked at her phone. Did you review the document yet? I don't see
you in here.
I'm on lunch, you toad.
She hadn't realized what she'd typed until she'd already sent the text. A
cold wave of horror washed over her, especially when he didn't respond.
Jay avoided looking in his direction as she sat at her desk and opened
the documents he wanted her to review. She'd thought it would be just a
couple pages, but there were about thirty in total. She ended up printing
them out and tacking the stack to her desk, scribbling notes in the margin of
her notebook as she internet stalked the CEOs of the companies forwarded
by Acquisitions and checked out their social media. It never ceased to
amaze her what some people were willing to post online.
Out of curiosity, she Googled him in between her research on Full
Circle West and Axel Integrated Systems. He didn't seem to have a
Facebook anymore, even though she remembered him having one when he
was younger, and his LinkedIn was private. The photo he'd chosen looked
very severe and she supposed he must have glued his hair down with
something for the photo, because it was the one picture of him she'd ever
seen where his hair wasn't sticking up.
She stared at the picture a moment, curiously unnerved, before Xing
out and going back to work.
By the time her meeting with Nicholas swung around, she was ready to
collapse. It took her ages to find the conference room and a strange pang
shot through her when she saw that he was the only one sitting in it, leaning
back in his chair with one leg crossed over his knee.
“Close the door,” he said, and Jay couldn't quite hide her gulp.
Jay sat across from him and he pivoted in the chair to face her as she
dropped all the papers and notes on the table. “So,” he said, dragging the
manila file again. “You think I'm a toad.”
“You wouldn't stop messaging me,” she said. “It was—” habit? The
thought of falling into habits with this man made her feel a little queasy.
That was a level of comfort she wasn't ready for. “A mistake. It won't
happen again.”
“I'm really not concerned about it.” Nicholas seemed amused as he
flipped through the folder. Looking over the information inside, he said,
“Let's start from the top.”
“Okay.”
“Royal Envoy. Tell me about them.”
“They're a distribution company. They broker the sale of industrial
equipment to large businesses looking to cut costs by purchasing directly.”
He leaned forward so suddenly that she found herself leaning back. His
white shirt buckled a little, baring part of his clavicle. “Who's the CEO?”
Jay looked down at her notes. “Gerald Russo.”
“I don't know who he is. Tell me about him.”
“Um. Well, I guess he looks okay on paper and knows what he's talking
about but he seems to spend a lot of time going off and partying and his
Instagram is full of him bragging about what he—”
Casually, he reached over and slipped her notes away, tossing them into
the trash. “Next one.”
“What?” Jay squawked. “That was an hour of work. I wasn't done. You
—”
“You don't like him, obviously, so I'm not investing in his company.”
Nicholas folded an arm behind his head, holding up the folder like a
disaffected king. “Let's keep it moving. I have another meeting after this
one.”
“But he might be great,” Jay said. “He might make you lots of money. I
don't—”
“Jay.” Nicholas arched his eyebrows. “Would you give him your
money?”
She swallowed hard. “No.”
“There you go then.” He flicked out the folder so it cracked. “Next.”
After the meeting, Jay left him in the conference room, dumping her
extra notes and files into the secure recycling bin by the copier for
shredding. The office had started to empty out, so she went and sat in the
break room and read the copy of Joust she'd brought from her room until
Nicholas came to find her.
“Ready?”
“Yeah.” Jay slipped the book in her bag, trying to suppress the
instinctive urge to look around and see if they were being watched.
She was relieved when she saw that the lot was empty, and even more
relieved once he started driving. On the drive back to his house, she looked
out the window, trying to figure out what had changed and what had stayed
the same. Suddenly, she felt his hand on her leg.
Uneasily, she looked at him. They were at a red light and it was
lighting up the downy hairs on his cheek as he turned to look at her. “You
drive me crazy, little bird.”
His nails grazed her over the edge of her stockings and she let out a
rough breath. Glancing at her, and apparently making a decision, he slid his
fingers higher. She swallowed back her cry, making a distorted, desperate
sound as he slid beneath her underwear.
Nicholas was still staring at the road, but she heard him hiss through
his teeth. “God, you're wet.”
A car pulled up next to them and Jay jerked her leg as he slid a finger
into her. “Nick,” she gasped. “No. Please. Someone—someone might see.”
As quickly as he'd grabbed her, his hands were both back on the wheel.
She was breathing like she'd been rushed and she could feel his awareness
as if it were the hot sun on her skin. She hated him a little for that cool
dispassion, the way he could casually make her fall apart.
For a while, they drove in silence. Then he said, softly, “Come to my
room tonight.”
The air in the car seemed to waver. And then Jay nodded. “Okay.”
Chapter Fourteen
2002

Nick eventually became resigned to the idea of sharing his house with
Jay. Unlike her mother, she wasn't particularly demanding. Not for material
things, not for affection, not for praise. She kept to herself and as soon as
she got her license, she started going out more and more, almost as if she
couldn't stand to be here.
Nick could understand that. He didn't particularly want to be here,
either.
He spent most of his time with Jake and Aaron, blowing off his
homework until five minutes before it was due. There was usually some
nerd around who would let him copy. He found that he didn't even need to
threaten people to get them to do what he wanted. He could just glare at
someone and let them imagine the worst.
He knew he was intimidating. Swimming had given his otherwise
gangly frame some lean, ropy muscle. He'd shot up three inches in height
and all of his old clothes had to be donated. Even though he was only
twelve, he was already 5'2” and towered over his peers. Sometimes his legs
would hurt so badly from the growing pains that he would whine until Jay
sighed and pretended to be Danielle on the phone, calling him in sick so he
didn't have to go to school.
“Will you stay home with me?” he asked, every time.
“No,” she always said, backpack hitched over her arm. “Be a man.”
“Being a man hurts,” he whined after her. “God, you suck. I hate you.”
“Está fingiendo,” Yelena said to Jay. “Es un mimado.”
“Creo que está realmente sufriendo.”
“What are you saying?” Nick snapped. “Speak English.”
“Stop whining.” Jay dug into her bag and handed him a bottle of
Ibuprofen. “Here. But just one of these, okay? Even if it still hurts. They
can make your stomach bleed.”
“Fine,” Nick said grumpily. “I'll just take one stupid pill.”
Nick would lie in the den with the bottle of the pills and play video
games until Danielle or Jay came home. Danielle always seem to be
annoyed to see him there, even though it wasn't her house. “What are you
doing just sitting around? Every time I turn around, you're somewhere.”
“It's my house,” he said irately. “I live here. Feel free to leave if you
don't like it.”
“Someone should slap you,” she would say, over and over, but never
around his father, who he knew she was afraid of, and for the same reasons,
she never hit him. Nick figured she thought he would hit back—and he
would—so he wasn't sure who this someone was that she kept referring to,
but if anyone touched him, his father would kick their ass. Or he would.
As soon as his stupid legs stopped hurting.
When Jay was home, she was usually working on homework or had her
nose buried in one of her books. Or he would open the door to her room and
see her dancing in that weird way that she did whenever she was stressed or
unhappy.
Once in a while, he'd run into her on the couch outside his bedroom,
watching one of those boring science shows she liked. The first couple
times, she'd get up and leave until, finally, he said, “It's fine, you know. I
don't care. Watch your dumb show.”
“Gee, thanks,” she said, sitting back down. “You're such a little
sweetheart.”
He pretended to be bored, staring pointedly at his GameBoy Advance,
but more often than not, he ended up putting the game down and watching
the show with her. It seemed to make the weirdo happy, and it made him
happy, too.
Sometimes he would fall asleep on her and wake up with her arm
around him, feeling warm. Safe. Nobody had ever held him before, or if
they had, he couldn't remember, and he would have rather died than admit
to the fierce and quiet joy it elicited inside him that felt as delicate as an egg
shell around his heart. As if one hard whack would make the entire structure
crumble.
Nick wanted more of that feeling, and he didn't know how to ask for it;
he was afraid it might be taken away, if he did. He suspected that even
asking would make him weak—his father was always saying that women
mocked weakness—and he couldn't bear it if Jay laughed at him, if she
pushed him away. Not when every moment he spent with her felt like it
might be the last.
“Nicholas,” his stepmother shrilled. “Have you seen my new DVD of
White Oleander?”
“No,” he said innocently.
The step-witch could leave in a box, but he found himself thinking
more and more that it would be okay if Jay stayed.
Maybe even forever.

That Christmas, when Nick was gifted a bundle of games to go along
with his new GameCube, he gave Jay the copy of Animal Crossing that
came with it. “This is a dumb girls' game,” he informed her, with
magnanimous solemnity. “You'll probably like it.”
“Thanks,” said Jay, rolling her eyes. She had been given clothes and
jewelry from her mom and his dad, and even though she said thank you and
acted all happy, he could tell that she was disappointed. Couldn't the idiots
see that Brainiac always had her nose crammed in a book? He had gotten
her a gift card to Borders and she had obviously loved it.
Well—Yelena had gotten it, but with his money. And Nick didn't miss
how quick she had been to go, either, once she found out who the card was
for. But she had also patted him on the head and said, in her accented
English, “What a good brother.” So he didn't mind. Much.
“Here,” said Jay, handing him a box. He tore into it.
“What's this?” he asked, disappointed.
“It's a case for your GameCube games. I overheard your dad saying he
was going to get you one. You put the disks in the sleeves so you don't have
to lug them all around in a box.”
“Oh.” He stared at the case, an odd, warming feeling in his throat.
“Thanks, blue jay.”
His dad gave the step-witch a bracelet with an engraving and he could
tell she didn't like it because it didn't have one of those stupid brands she
liked printed on it. “I would always rather be happy than dignified,” she
said, with an uncertain laugh. “What's that supposed to mean, Damon? Is
this a joke?”
“It's from Jane Eyre,” said Jay. “It's about how love makes you give up
your pride because you're so in love that you don't care whether it hurts.”
Nick saw his dad look over at Jay. “What a clever girl you are,” he
said, in a way that sounded a little like a trap. “Have you read Jane Eyre,
Jay?”
“Yes,” she said. “When I was fourteen. It's one of my favorites.”
The step-witch shot Jay a dirty look and Nick thought, Interesting.
“Perhaps I made a mistake,” said Damon. “I thought you told me that it
was your favorite book. But perhaps what you actually said was that it was
your daughter's.”
“Well, you know me,” she said, tossing her hair. “I do go on.”
“Do I?” The words, spoken lightly, made Nick tense. He knew that
tone. He glanced at Jay.
She looked back at him, slightly worried. What? she mouthed.
Afterwards, the step-witch disappeared into the master bedroom and
Damon went out, which he had started doing more and more, lately. For
work, he said, although Nick wondered.
He let himself into Jay's room. She was lying on her bed in her
nightgown and robe with her hair loose around her shoulders. Reading a
book, because of course. “Out,” she said, without looking up.
He came in anyway and dropped a charm bracelet on her stomach. “I
found this in your mom's drawer. It's the one my dad got you two years
ago.”
She plucked it up with a glance. “Oh, I was wondering where that
went. You shouldn't go through people's things,” she added, glancing at
him. “And stop coming in here without knocking.”
“You never do anything interesting,” he said. “I don't know what you're
so worried about.”
“Oh my God,” she said, glaring up at him. “Seriously, dude. Stay out of
my room.”
“I'm not the only one who comes in here,” said Nick. “Yelena comes in
here.”
“Yelena cleans it. She has to come in here. Do you clean it?”
Nick scoffed. “Like I want to touch your crap.”
“Then stay out.”
“Your mom comes in here,” said Nick. “I see her come in once in a
while. That's probably how she stole your bracelet.”
“Maybe I left it somewhere and she thought it was hers.”
“Yeah, right,” said Nick. “You didn't see the way her greedy eyes
bugged out when Dad gave it to you. Also, I saw your mom trying on your
school uniform while you were out.”
“Ugh,” said Jay. “Why? I hate it when she steals my clothes.”
“I think she wants to steal your life,” said Nick, plopping on her bed.
“And maybe your face.”
“That's gross,” said Jay. “Where the hell did you get that idea?”
“Invasion of the Body Snatchers.” Nick kicked his feet up into the air
and made the shrill scream of the pod people pointing out an impostor. “It
was on late at night.”
“You shouldn't be staying up late,” said Jay. “There's things on there
that aren't for you.”
“I've probably already seen all of them. What are you going to do? Tell
on me?”
“You know I won't.” Jay leaned over him to drop the bracelet on her
nightstand. “Thanks for this. Now get out. My mom's not going to steal my
face. Hers is nicer than mine, anyway.”
No, it's not, thought Nick.
“Watch out,” he said, swinging easily to his feet. “I think she really
might be planning on stealing your life. Remember, I know things,” he
added, before closing the door behind him. “But don't worry. Even when
your gross mom rips your face off, I'll still sit across from your ugly,
faceless mug, blue jay.”
Nick heard a thump as she threw her book at him and it hit the wall.
He smiled.

Despite her initial lack of enthusiasm, Nick started to see Jay playing
Animal Crossing all the time. At first it made him happy that he'd pleased
her, but sometimes he would see her playing and even though he had been
on his way to do something else, he would decide that he wanted to play
instead, even though he'd already gotten bored of it weeks ago.
She always conceded and that annoyed him, too. It was like he was
looking for reasons to be mad at Jay and he wasn't sure why, since she was
the least annoying member of his stupid, annoying family, and the only one
whose approval he secretly craved.
He'd been having a bad day. Aaron had just confided that he'd be
moving at the end of the year because his stupid dad was being transferred
to Pennsylvania.
“Can't he hold out for a better offer?” Nick asked. “Maybe then they'll
let him stay.”
“My dad's not yours, dude,” Aaron said, a little bitterly. “If he doesn't
take the job, my dad says they'll just give it to some 'hungry college student
fresh out of school.'”
That made Nick feel worse and he wasn't sure why. Even though it
wasn't his fault Aaron was moving, the way Aaron had said it kind of made
it sound like Aaron thought it was.
Back at home and feeling miserable, he looked around for Yelena,
hoping she had some conchas or Mexican wedding cookies, or if she could
be persuaded to bake some. Instead she was sitting on the sofa with Jay,
chatting with his sister in Spanish while she played.
“What are you talking about?” he demanded, standing in front of the
TV. “Why aren't you in the kitchen?”
“Jesus, Nick,” said Jay. “Because she doesn't live to serve you? She's
on her fucking break.”
Nick made a face at her, but the swear stung. Jay didn't swear much,
especially not at him, so that meant he'd really made her angry. His own
anger spiked in response, a natural defense to the misery gnawing at his gut,
threatening to consume him whole. “Well—what are you talking about
then?” he snapped. “Something stupid?”
“Ay,” said Yelena. “Qué grosero.”
“Nick,” said his sister, in a bleak, warning tone.
“God,” said Nick. “Fine. I'm sorry I hurt your dumb little feelings.”
Jay paused the game. “For your information, toad, Yelena was telling
me about her daughter. Apparently she's a teacher at Hollybrook Elementary
—the school you used to go to.”
“Never heard of her,” Nick said flatly, even though he didn't actually
know Yelena's last name.
Yelena said something in Spanish that had his name in it and he
demanded, “What did she say now?”
“That you weren't one of his daughter's students, dude. Chill.”
It had sounded way too long to be just that and Nick eyed the two of
them suspiciously. “So?”
“So Yelena is going to ask her daughter if she would talk to my school's
principal about starting a volunteer reading program where high school
students read to little kids.”
Yelena beamed at Jay like she was just the fucking best.
“That's dumb,” said Nick. “Who would want to read to a bunch of
dumb little kids? Sounds like a waste of time to me. Anyway, did you even
ask my dad for permission first?”
Jay's face fell. Without looking any less annoyed, she now looked
upset. “Why would I need to ask your dad for permission? How would this
even affect him?”
“Everything affects him,” said Nick, feeling superior. “He knows
people. He knows everyone. You might embarrass him. You're a Beaucroft,”
he added. “And a girl. You aren't supposed to work. Someone might talk to
him about it and then he'd be mad.”
Jay gave him a cold look. “I'm a Varens, dude. Not a Beaucroft. And if
volunteer work embarrasses your asshole dad, that says more about him
than me.”
“Whatever,” Nick said. “Don't say I didn't warn you, blue jay.”
He complained about the incident to his friends in detail the next day
while they were playing James Bond: Nightfire. Jay had ignored him for the
rest of the day and when he had tried to go into her room, he'd found that
she'd anticipated that and placed a chair beneath the knob to keep it from
turning.
They were playing the Fort Knox level and Jake had demanded to be
Bond since it was his house. Aaron was Jaws and Nick was Renard. He
wasn't enjoying himself much, though, even if he was the cool guy with the
bullet stuck in his brain. “Jay is so fucking annoying.”
“She's always annoying you,” Aaron said, rolling his eyes. “What did
she do this time?”
“Thinking that she's so much better than me,” Nick fumed. “Thinking
she's so great. If she doesn't like living in the house with the rest of us, she
can leave.”
“God,” said Aaron. “Try living with my siblings for a day.”
“You're only defending her because you like her,” said Nick coldly.
Aaron turned red. “Shut up, Nick.”
“I think you're a little obsessed with your stepsister, dude,” said Jake.
“You never shut up about her. You used to be so cool, and now it's Jay this,
Jay that. It's super lame.”
“I'm not obsessed,” Nick shot back. “I can't help that she lives in my
house and is ruining my life.”
“Well, I wish she lived in my house,” said Jake, leering. “I'll take her if
you don't want her. She's hot. Don't you agree, Aaron? Isn't Nick's stepsister
pretty hot?”
Aaron glanced at Nick and went pale. “I don't know.”
“I mean, it's not the kind of thing you have to think about, dude. She's
—ow.”
“Shut up,” Nick snarled.
“Shit, bro.” Jake touched his reddened cheek. “I think you broke my
fucking molar.”
“Good. Choke on it.” Nick picked up the controller. “Now stop being
dickweeds and play.”

When Nick went home, his anger went with him, following him like a
dog on a leash. A distance had opened up between him and Jay, and now
sometimes he was aware of her watching him in a way that he really didn't
like. Almost as if she was judging him.
A few weeks after the incident where he yelled at her and Yelena, he
was dragged to some dumb awards ceremony at the high school to
congratulate Jay and her fellow nerds for their volunteer work with the
dumb kids from Yelena's daughter's stupid dumb school.
Jay was wearing a slip dress with a little bolero sweater and when one
of the dumb little kids toddled on stage to hug her, he wanted to barf. She's
not so great, he wanted to say, leaning back and folding his arms. He knew
he was wrinkling his suit and he didn't care.
Bored and annoyed, he glanced over at his parents. Danielle looked just
as bored as he felt, alternating between fiddling with her necklace and her
phone, but his father was watching Jay.
Despite what Nick had said, his father hadn't seemed embarrassed by
Jay at all. He'd given her another stupid bracelet after telling her that it was
“becoming” for ladies to be involved in charity work, and then he called her
a “good girl.” Nick saw the flash of the bracelet when she patted the kid on
the head, sparking silver under the stage lights.
Nick could have told his father not to bother. The step-witch was just
going to steal it. He'd seen the covetous look on her face when his father
fastened the clasp around Jay's wrist.
I'm bored, he thought crankily. I hate this. Jay is so boring. He wished
he'd been allowed to bring his GameBoy but his father had made him leave
it in the Mercedes.
“What a beautiful, selfless girl,” the woman next to him said, and Nick
groaned loudly, earning himself a look from his father.
When they all got home, they went into their respective rooms to chage
out of their formal clothes. Nick deleted her game file on Animal Crossing
and left his door open a crack to wait. When he heard her come down, he
braced himself, waiting for the screeched, “Nick, you little asshole, you
deleted my game!” with his response at the ready—well, maybe you
shouldn't take up so much space.
He was proud of himself for coming up with it. He'd thought it up in
the car.
Nick heard her come down the stairs and listened, hardly daring to
breathe, filled with something too dark and too bleak to be merely
anticipatory as the game booted up. There was a long pause, followed by
silence. The silence was terrible; it made him nervous.
After a while, he ventured out. The TV was off. She'd just . . . left.
Jay said nothing to him about deleting her game, even though he knew
how much she'd enjoyed it, even though he spent the next couple weeks
bracing for retaliation. She'd acted like everything was completely normal
between them but it wasn't—something had disappeared, and Nick couldn't
put his finger on what it was exactly, but the absence of it was like a
physical pain in his chest, fracturing that fragile barrier he'd erected around
his heart, and he wasn't sure how to get back what was missing if he wasn't
even sure what he was looking for in the first place.
Chapter Fifteen
2004

Nick was glad to be starting high school. It was the first step to
freedom and to becoming a real man. No more of the kid stuff—he was
tired of endless rounds of Call of Duty and NBA Live with his friends, and
lounging around the parks like losers because none of their parents were
around to take them anywhere. He was looking forward to the girls and the
partying and, eventually, the cars.
He tugged at his cutaway jacket, which he usually left open even
though the dress code stated you were supposed to have all three buttons
done up. The boys' Hollybrook uniform consisted of the jacket, black pants,
and a knotted red tie, which was supposed to be fastened with a Windsor
knot. Nick rarely wore his and usually left the throat of his shirt open with
the tie shoved into his pocket where it dangled like the tongue of a snake.
The girls wore cropped versions of the boys' jackets and black knee
socks with their black skirts. Some of the girls liked to roll up the
waistbands until the hems were just shy of indecent, seeing how long they
could get away with it until some spoilsport teacher strolled up to them with
a ruler.
Nick watched Amanda Strife, a blonde sophomore, have exactly that
happen to her as he walked up the grass to the main part of campus. The
teacher in question was saying something about “conduct” and “decorum”
while Amanda sullenly pulled down her skirt.
“You know what they say,” Jake said, following his gaze. “The shorter
the skirt, the less it hurts.”
“The less what hurts?” Nick asked absently, turning away.
“You know, like the first time. When you fuck them. Because they
aren't virgins. Easy pussy.”
“Get the fuck off me, man.” Jake had slung his arm around Nick's
shoulders and he quickly extricated himself from the embrace. “Whatever.
It's just sex.”
“Spoken like someone who's never had any.”
That happened to be true, but he didn't need fucking Jake blurting that
out to the school, in front of their friends. A few of the guys snickered, but a
look from Nick shut them up fast. “And what are you? The pussy
connoisseur? You've never had a girlfriend. You wouldn't know a pussy
from your ass.”
Dave Byron, a junior who'd started hanging around, laughed. “Nice
one, Beaucroft.”
“Fuck you, Nick,” said Jake, blushing angrily. “At least I know what
pussy looks like.”
“Oh? What did you do? Scope a look at your mom's when I was done
with her?”
“No,” said Jake. “It was your sister, Jay, and let me tell you, man, it
was so fucking ti—ow.”
Nick lowered his fist, while Jake clutched his arm and howled. “Jeez,
stop moaning. You sound like you're auditioning for porn. Anyone do
anything interesting this weekend?”
“Went to Game Stop,” Alonzo Madeira offered. “Bought a new copy of
GTA.”
“I haven't played that one yet,” said Nick. “I'm getting pretty tired of
my PlayStation.”
“I did Clara Roberts,” Ian Danes offered crudely. “Only, you know,
she's not exactly interesting. At least, what comes out of her mouth isn't
interesting. What goes into it maybe—”
“I hate to break it to you, man,” said Dave, “but nobody here thinks
your dick is interesting. And Clara Roberts is played out. She's like the
Vanilla Ice of people you can have sex with.”
“What about Amanda?” said Jake, still rubbing his arm. “Nick and I
saw her getting yelled at by a teacher again for having her ass hanging out
of her skirt. She's hot.”
“Amanda is hot,” Alonzo agreed. “But you couldn't, like, take her out
anywhere except maybe to the movies. She's kind of slutty. My parents
would kill me if I brought home a girl like that.”
“Unlike the Lacoste Mafia over there,” said Dave, nodding at the group
of senior girls. Nick glanced over and saw Jay with them, lounging against
the fountain. “Those are the kind of girls you bring home to your parents.
My mom would probably cream herself if I went out with Clary
Claybourne. But just try going out with one of them and not ending up with
your dick locked in a purse.”
“Not Angela,” said Alonzo, with a smirk. “She'd bedazzle her name all
over your cock.”
“Jordan and Jay are the only girls in that group who don't scare me,”
said Dave. “But Jordan's high maintenance and Jay doesn't date anyone.
What's with that?” he asked Nick, who shrugged.
Jake, sensing an opening, said, “I hear it's because she—”
“Man,” said Nick. “I am warning you. You're about to start your first
day from a hospital bed.”
“Fucking weak,” Jake muttered. “I'm so tired of you punching my
lights out over your sister.”
“Well, maybe if you stopped running your mouth.”
“Is Justine Varens really your sister?” asked Dave. “You two don't look
anything alike. I thought she was mixed and you're whiter than my granny's
old church bonnet.”
“She's my stepsister,” said Nick. “Her mom's married to my dad. She's
some washed up actress.”
“Nick doesn't let anyone talk about his sister,” said Jake. “I think he
wants to keep her for himself.”
“Oh yeah?” said Nick. “You're just lucky you don't have a sister, Jake.
If she looked anything like you, she'd probably get sent to the dog pound
every time she left the house. Hell, I'd drive her there myself and I bet you
she'd still try to gobble down my cock, just like half the other girls in this
school.”
“Uh oh,” said Dave.
Nick glanced over and blushed. The seniors had gotten up and were
heading to class and from the look on Jay's face, she had definitely heard
the last part of his outburst.
“Shit,” he muttered.
“God,” said Jake. “That's a look. Look like you're in the doghouse now,
my man.”
“I'm always in the doghouse,” said Nick. “Tell me what else is new.”

Jay couldn't believe it was her last year of high school. It felt as if she
were hurtling through a tunnel at full speed. Sometimes, it felt like just
yesterday when she was living in that little one bedroom in the Tenderloin,
working on her homework at that cracked vanity table in the old and filthy
room that smelled like girl sweat and mildew.
She found herself thinking of those shadowy figures from her past—
Honey, Kristine, Amy, Leah. They had disappeared from her life like curls
of smoke, and sometimes she found herself missing them, and feeling
foolish for it. They had probably forgotten even her name.
I've come a long way, she reminded herself. But still . . . she never
really felt like she deserved it. Any of it. No matter how hard she tried.
And she did try to deserve it. She tried to work hard and be kind—even
to people who annoyed her, like Angela Diamante and her constant
cattiness, or Jordan Cahalan and her whole outdated Valley Girl persona
that Jay still couldn't figure out was authentic or ironic, or Derek, the weird
sophomore who followed her from class to class and tried to show her his
Magic the Gathering fan art, one of which, she couldn't help but notice
extremely uncomfortably, seemed to resemble her.
She remembered birthdays and was a good listener, and every time
someone said, “Jay, you're so nice!” it helped fill that empty, sinking void
inside her soul that said, no, Jay, you aren't enough and you never will be.
Yes, she tried so hard, and worked even harder, but it still wasn't quite
enough.
She never felt like she deserved it.
College will be better, she reminded herself, trying to be positive. Once
she got in, she would know that she had gotten in based on her own
individual merit. There was a difference between being singled out and
being chosen.
She also liked her schedule this year. She'd gotten every class she
wanted: Advanced Composition, Spanish VI with the immersive language
lab, Algebra II, Civics, and Modern Dance. Seniors were allowed a free
period for a Physical Education course of their choosing and Jay loved
having Dance to look forward to at the end of the day. On Wednesdays,
after school, she read to the kids from Hollybrook Elementary in the school
library.
The only thing Jay didn't like about her year was Nick.
He'd been such a weirdly intense little kid and then, once he'd entered
middle school, he'd become moody and sullen. Over the summer, he
seemed to have undergone another shift: now he was crude and crass, with
enough popped collars and baggy jeans in his wardrobe to outfit an entire
army of fuck boys. When he wasn't swimming or listening to loud music, he
seemed to be breaking hearts.
There was a girl Jay didn't know waiting for her by her locker, but she
recognized her face and knew she was a freshman. She was also—Jay
cringed inwardly—crying.
“Please talk to your brother for me,” she begged. “We went out last
weekend and I don't know what I did, but it's like he hates me now, and he
won't even talk to me or even look at me, and I just really want to know—
what I did wrong.”
I'm going to kill him. “I'm sorry,” Jay said gently. “He really doesn't
listen to me.”
“He said I had too much experience,” the girl wept, and Jay's mood
darkened further. I'm going to kill him slowly. Oblivious, the girl sniffed and
looked up at her with large dark eyes. “What does that even mean, too much
experience? I've only dated one other guy. I'm not some dumb slut.”
The ease of the word in the other girl's mouth made some of Jay's pity
die away. “I'm sorry,” she said again, a little less gently. “Um, Nadine, is it?
Do you want a tissue? I have one in my bag.”
“It's Natasha. Natasha Wright. And no, I don't want a tissue! You've
been no help at all!”
Jay watched, stunned, as the girl disappeared into the girls' restroom,
letting the door slam shut with a bang behind her. A cluster of girls looked
at it, and then at Jay, before they fell to whispering.
“Wow.” Jordan folded her arms, leaning one shoulder against the wall
of lockers. “What was that train wreck?”
“One of my brother's victims,” Jay said grimly. “He's been super gross
lately.”
“Freshmen boys are always super gross,” said Jordan. “I wouldn't touch
one if you paid me. Are you ready for Dance? I'm honestly super shocked
that Martin Trell is such a good dancer. With those big glasses, he looks like
such a dork, but oh my God, those hips. I hope I get him as my partner.”
Jay followed Jordan as she rambled on, swinging her change of clothes
at her side, and happened to glance over to the Arts and Humanities
building where Nick and his merry band of losers liked to hold court and
pretend to be little lords. As usual, the demon prince was flouting uniform
rules with his open jacket and missing tie, knowing no one would call him
in.
He had the nerve to wink at her. I bet he was the one who sent Natasha
to me.
Glaring stonily, she drew her fingers over her neck and saw a couple of
his friends nudge him. Just before she turned away, she saw him blow her a
kiss.
“I'm going to kill my brother,” she said, to no one in particular.
“You're a Beaucroft,” said Jordan. “You don't need to get your fingers
dirty. Hire someone to take him out.”
“Don't tempt me.”
She put thoughts of Nick and that crying girl out of her head, losing
herself to dance, but as soon as it was over, her concerns reasserted
themselves. Yelena's old Gremlin had finally broken down and she'd scaled
back on hours due to personal reasons, so Nick now carpooled to and from
school every day with Jay. He was usually pretty good about being on time,
even though h complained about her Wednesday volunteer hours in a way
that made her want to slap him, but somehow, Nick found a way to make
his compliance irritating, too.
As she walked out from the dance room, she saw Nick waiting for her
with another girl with him. She immediately got up, fleeing before Jay
could even get a good look at her face, but she recognized that long, silky
waterfall of black hair and her eyes narrowed furiously.
“Stay away from Courtney Ho,” she said, as soon as she was within
speaking distance. “That's Quentin's little sister. He'll kill you if you break
her heart—if I don't get to you first.”
Nick swept himself up from the grass, unconcerned. “Her last name's
Ho? That's perfect.”
“What are you even trying to prove by being such a raging little
misogynist? It's not cool.”
“Well, it's like Dad says, Jay. Sometimes you have to test drive a car to
learn that it's a lemon.”
Jay had never heard Damon say anything like this in her life, but she
wasn't exactly the prime audience for that type of rhetoric. Locker room
talk. Man's talk. She'd heard him say other things, too. Flirting
inappropriately with waitresses her own age—sometimes in front of her
mother. Berating her mother in public. Even his praise could be offensive.
Jay's hand closed absently over the charm bracelet around her wrist. Good
girl.
Shaking off her terrible suspicions, Jay narrowed her eyes at Nicholas.
“I am seriously this close to driving you out to the middle of Coachella
Valley and leaving you there for the vultures to fight over. I better not get
any more girls crying at my locker over you, Nick.”
“Whatever, blue jay,” he said, raking his hand through his gelled curls.
“Stay out of my love life or all be all up in yours. You know you're such an
ice queen, I'm honestly surprised your ass doesn't freeze the seat when you
sit on it.”
“Asshole,” she said.
He snorted. “Prude.”

“You should be more like your sister.”
Nick leaned back beneath the bleachers, his mood stormy, the words of
his guidance counselor ringing damningly in his ears. Behind him, the bare
wood of the fence separating the sports field from the rest of the world was
splintery and badly weathered, snagging on the jacket of his uniform. In his
hand was a pocketknife his dad had gotten him a while ago—rosewood
with surgical grade steel—and he toyed with the blade, flicking it in and
out.
If the teachers caught him with it on campus, he'd probably have been
yanked into the office and threatened with expulsion, Beaucroft or not. But
he hadn't been caught yet.
It never counted if you didn't get caught.
Where was she, anyway? Not that he cared one way or the other, but if
he was going to get yelled at for cutting class, he generally liked to have a
reason for it.
Eventually, he saw the silvery-platinum of Amanda Strife's blonde hair
glinting under the sun. She told everyone it was real, but Nick had noticed
her dark roots one day. Not that it mattered. She could tell everyone her hair
was naturally green if she wanted. He really didn't give a shit.
“Hi,” she said, in a breathless way that suggested she'd been running.
“Sorry. I know I'm late. Ms. Chang is a huge bitch and she wouldn't let me
get up to use the bathroom until I told her it was urgent.”
“Not my problem.” Nick slammed the penknife into the fence, making
her jump. “Come on.”
When her mouth touched his, it was like a blade glancing off metal—it
made something dull and dark inside him briefly light up with violence
before the emptiness came flooding in like a black lake.
It never once occurred to him that the reason messing around always
left him feeling so angry and unsatisfied was because he was craving
something else.
“Hey,” an angry adult voice shouted. “What do you two kids think
you're doing?”
Stupid question, thought Nick, shoving the knife back into his pants as
Amanda tried to flee. Watching her, he thought, Even stupider to run,
though.
The two of them both got dragged into the office for cutting class and
making out, which he thought was stupid. People did way worse things
under those bleachers—or did they think all those cigarette butts and
crumpled condoms were from a squad of horny, chain-smoking bums?
Nick glared at the principal, who looked back at him like he was a
puzzle that needed to be solved. “I expect better from you, Nicholas.”
“So sorry to disappoint,” he sneered.
Amanda had been taken to detention, which Nick figured meant she'd
narced. Her big mouth was probably why they were in this mess in the first
place. He'd just bet she bragged.
“I'm calling your father,” the principal said eventually, and Nick leaned
back with a sigh.
“Whatever,” he said. “Call him. He's not going to pick up the phone.”
But his father had picked up the phone, marching into the office in his
three-piece suit, causing the staff to scatter. He didn't even have to say
anything to suggest his anger and Nick found that fascinating, even as part
of him became instinctively wary about being a target.
“You,” said his father. “Get up. We're leaving now.”
Nick ignored the principal, who was sitting behind his stupid desk and
twirling his stupid tie. He resented being marched off campus like a
prisoner on his way to the firing squad, and when they got to his father's
Mercedes, he flopped into the passenger seat with a put-upon sigh.
“What,” said his father, in low, dangerous tones, “the hell do you think
you are doing?”
“Well, I thought I was making out with a girl who could keep her damn
mouth shut,” said Nick. “But I was wrong, obviously.”
His dad regarded him for a long moment, his sudden fury winking out
just as abruptly as it had flared. “I can't have you embarrassing me like this.
If you're going to do something stupid with your peers, don't get caught,
and for God's sake, don't get me involved.”
“Fine,” Nick muttered. “Can we go now?”
His father started the car. “Why don't you get yourself a proper
girlfriend?”
“The girls in my classes are such a waste of time. They don't give a shit
about anything.”
“Then date an older girl. One of your sister's friends. Nothing wrong
with an older woman. They have more experience, which you sorely need,
and you could end up going to prom as a freshman.”
“Jay would scratch my eyes out. Pass.”
His father scoffed. “Your sister really doesn't have the influence you
think she does. Date or don't, but I better not hear another whisper about
you or your escapades from the school. Do I make myself clear?”
“Crystal.”
When Amanda came back to the bleachers the next day, Nick shrugged
her off. “I'm not in the mood,” he said. “You're not really my type, anyway.
I thought we were just fooling around.”
“Seriously?” she asked, looking hurt. “I just cutted English.”
Nick snorted as he walked away. “Yeah, maybe don't.”
After that, he stopped cutting classes—or tried to—but they bored him
and he found it hard to focus. What he did have was an aptitude for talking
back and getting into trouble. He was in detention so often that Jay
sometimes had to hang around for an hour to wait for him to get out so she
could drive them both home.
He could tell this annoyed her, which pleased him. He liked that his
pretty, popular sister had to answer to him in this one regard; and when she
was waiting around for him, on his dime, she wasn't out with her equally
pretty and popular friends.
“Why did you replace the dry erase markers with sharpies, Nick?”
“I'm not owning up to anything,” he said. “They couldn't prove I did
it.”
“Right,” said Jay. “Which is the only reason you are in detention and
not suspended.”
“Mr. Masefield is always calling on me in class when he knows I don't
know the answer,” he complained. “It's not like he's so perfect. He's always
misprinting the damn formulas on the board. Of course, it's easy when
you're always holding a fucking eraser.”
“That's going to cost about a thousand dollars to replace.”
“My dad makes that much money every time he sneezes,” said Nick,
glancing over to see how angry with him she actually was. Her mouth was a
hard line, nearly erasing the full swell of her lips. “The money's probably
coming out of one of our family's donations.”
“Here's a thought,” said Jay. “What if you actually did the work instead
of letting Mr. Masefield make you look like an idiot? You're good at math.”
“He's the one who looks like an idiot. I'm a Beaucroft and he's some
guy in short pants trying to teach Algebra to a bunch of burnouts. It's not
like it matters. Dad doesn't give a shit. I could pull straight A's and he
wouldn't even blink, and I'll still get in wherever I want because he'll just
endow a library or make a big donation, so in the end, it doesn't really make
much difference.”
“So that's it,” said Jay. “You're not even going to try to do the work?”
“I'll get what I want either way,” Nick repeated. “So I might as well
take the path of least resistance. I'm tired of the bullshit. We can't all be
sweet little angels like you, blue jay. Some of us have dirty wings.”
“You think it's so easy for me?” she asked. “It isn't. I work hard for
everything I have.”
“Yeah, you do,” said Nick. “And you haven't figured out that it doesn't
really matter for you, either.”
Chapter Sixteen
2004

It doesn't really matter.
Jay thought about Nick's words a lot in the following weeks. The
bleakness of them resonated with such harsh dissonance, resounding in that
hollow space inside her body that constantly echoed with the thought: None
of this will ever be enough.
It was her worst fear, summed up eloquently in a single sentence, and
to hear it come from Nick, who had nothing to fear, both chilled and
angered her. It was as if he'd reached inside her and pulled out a piece of her
that she had never wanted to come to light. What did he have to be worried
about, anyway, beyond the usual adolescent ennui? His future was secure.
Jay shook her head and jotted down notes for Composition. She was
brainstorming ideas for her journalism piece. She thought she might
interview the owner of Red Brook Preserves, a local family-owned
company that made jam from the orchards that used to be the property of
the original founders. Mr. Garcia was the dad of one of the kids she read to
on Wednesdays, and the way that young Miguel talked about his dad made
her heart melt.
She wished she had a father like that, someone who made her light up
with pride to talk about.
Smoothing over the page of her notebook, she paused and tapped her
gel pen thoughtfully against the lined surface as her friends' chatter broke
through her thoughts. Jordan was talking about her shopping trip at rodeo
Drive last weekend. She'd gone with Clary because Jay had been watching
one of Nick's swim meets. As usual, she was stuck chauffeuring his ass
around.
Angela was harping on whale tails—the Y-shaped high-rising thongs
that peeked out of girls' waistbands—which Jay figured was probably a dig
at Amanda Strife. After being chased around by another faculty member
with a ruler for rolling up her waistband, she had taken to pulling hers down
so everyone could see her Frederick's of Hollywood thongs.
Jay actually thought it was kind of funny because Amanda at least
seemed self-aware in a way that a lot of girls who were playing a much
longer con with the guys in this school weren't, but Angela seemed to really
have it in for the poor girl. “She's just, like, so slutty,” she was saying.
“Like a little baby stripper. It's disgusting.”
Something cold clenched in Jay's chest. “And what's wrong with that?”
she snapped suddenly.
Angela paused, momentarily derailed. “What?”
“So what if you can see her thong?” Jay closed her notebook with a
slap, startling her friends. “So what if she looks like a stripper? There's
nothing wrong with stripping. They're not whores. They're just dancers who
. . .” she faltered, wilting a little under Angela's glare. “Take their clothes
off.”
“Wow, Jay.” Angela sneered. “You seem really knowledgeable about
strippers all of a sudden. Did you moonlight as one or something? I hear
there's a lot of those kinds of places in San Francisco. They practically have
their own red light district.”
“No.” Jay stared at the blurring cover of her notepad. “I'm just saying
—it's not the same.”
She could feel her friends staring at her and her face flushed, emitting a
heat that seemed to buzz around her like a radiator. Suddenly, Jay felt raw,
exposed—emotionally skinned. Just like how she felt when Nick told her
that nothing she did would matter, no matter how hard she tried. Does
everyone see me like this? she wondered. Am I really that transparent?
The conversation resumed again and she saw Quentin Ho giving her a
probing look that she quickly looked away from.
When the bell rang, her friends all got up to leave without waiting for
her, even Jordan, who she had class with. Jay's eyes stung at the slight and
she deliberately lingered, taking an extra moment to pack her schoolbag.
When Quentin strolled up and held out his hand, she took it hesitantly.
“Thanks.”
“Jay,” he said amiably. “What the fuck?”
“I know. I don't know what came over me.”
“You know Angela's going to go around now telling everyone that
you're a secret stripper.”
“Yeah, I figured.” Jay closed her eyes. “I don't know why she makes
me so mad.”
But that was a lie. She did know. Shit.
“You have to stop letting her mess with you, Jay-Jay,” said Quentin.
“It's been four years. You're like a guitar on stilts, you're so high strung.”
“A guitar on stilts,” Jay repeated, laughing. “That's a new one.”
“Come on. I'll walk you to class. Dance, right?”
“You don't have to be so nice.”
“Babe, I hate to break it to you, but you don't have the patented
trademark on nice. Don't worry about Jordan,” he added, with surprising
sympathy. “She'll come around. She's not really mad at you. She's just
fronting for Angela Diamante because they're going shopping later and
Angie just leveled up in bitchcraft.”
“Fuck Angela Diamante,” Jay said darkly, and Quentin let out a
surprised burble of a laugh.
“Well, there you go,” he breathed. “Justine Varens can be a bitch. I feel
like all might just be right in the universe, after all. You know why Angie's
really mad at you, right? It's because she knows that Michael Valdez only
asked her out to make you jealous, and when your dumb, tightly-stringedguitar-ass self didn't even notice, he dumped her right before school on
Monday.”
“Oh,” said Jay, in a small voice. “I thought Michael actually liked
Angela.”
“He likes you. He asked her out in front of you.”
“In front of all of us,” she said defensively. “I thought it was a romantic
gesture.”
“Babe.” Quentin looked pained. “He invited her out to Bubble Trouble.
Your place. Nobody sucks down boba like you. Angela doesn't even like it.
She only said yes because Michael is fine.”
Jay laughed uncomfortably. “Oops?”
“Well, he's single now. If you want to rectify that fuck-up and suck his
straw. Ow.”
She lowered her hand. “Come on. I barely touched you.”
“It was assault and I'm suing your father for damages so I can retire in
Palm Springs at twenty.”
Stepfather, Jay mentally corrected, but she was smiling by the time
they made it to Arts and Humanities. Nick and his friends were just leaving.
She mentally ticked them off, knowing their faces from seeing them
bumming around the house. Alonzo, Dave, Ian, and that skinny little creep,
Jake, who always looked at her like he was picturing her without clothes on.
Nick glanced up, leveling an unreadable look in her direction. He
looked . . . annoyed for some reason. But just as abruptly, he turned away.
Jay thought she might be reading too much into the exchange until she
heard Quentin ask, “Why is your brother mean-mugging us?”
She started to shrug, until she remembered that one day in the field.
Courtney, she thought, feeling herself becoming annoyed again. “He's been
sniffing around your sister,” she said, hoisting her backpack a little higher.
“He probably thinks I'm snitching.”
“Um,” said Quentin. “You are.”
“Whoops. Anyway, I told him to back the hell off or you'd kill him
dead.”
“Thanks for that, Bizzaro Jay, you unexpected bitch. Like I really want
to duel for my little sister's honor against the captain of the junior varsity
swim team. Have you seen the biceps on that dude?”
“I don't mack on my brother like that, you gross person.” Jay rolled her
eyes. “Like you would really rather see her sad hangdog face across the
breakfast table after Nick's done with her?”
“Don't ask me that right now,” said Quentin. “I'm ready to bring the
pain on her skinny little ass. The little monster told my mother that I got a
B- in Calculus because I wouldn't drive her to a fucking Dashboard
Confessional concert. I am ready to make her weep.”
Jay smiled. “So, what, did your mom ground you?”
“Worse. Every day she conveys to me through a series of eye blinks
and complex gestures that I have disappointed her with every one of my life
choices leading up to this moment. Also, and even more annoyingly, she's
started bragging about Courtney to all of our relatives on the phone
whenever I'm around—” he raised the pitch of his voice “—let me tell you
about my daughter, Courtney, she's so good at figures, oh, wait, let me go
into the other room, Constance, Quentin's here.”
“Wow,” said Jay. “Subtle.”
“Fucking tiger moms. I can't wait until my college acceptances start
pouring in. Once I get into UCLA, Courtney could become class fucking
president and my mom would literally not give one iota of a shit.” He
glanced over at Jay. “Where'd you apply, you bright young thing?”
“My stepfather made me apply to Stanford but I also applied to UCLA,
Irvine, Berkeley, and USC.”
“Spicy. You know Stanford and Berkeley are rivals, right?”
“Yeah,” said Jay. “I've heard that. Don't tell my stepfather, but I hate
Palo Alto. San Francisco got a whole lot worse once all the tech people
started pouring in.”
Quentin shuddered. “The only person in this town I want to fight less
than your scary brother is his scary dad, Jay. And with my blood now
solidly curdled, I'm leaving now. Have fun at dance.”

It was true that Nick really didn't have to work all that hard at anything
he did, but he couldn't just go mentally comatose, either, and the incident
with Amanda beneath the bleachers had taught him that he couldn't openly
flaunt his disregard for the school. Not so blatantly.
Since he had been performing so badly before, doing the bare
minimum now accorded him praise. Nick thought it was a little pathetic
how eagerly the teachers wanted to take credit for his successes, each
thinking that they were the one to inspire change, not realizing that it was
his talk with Jay that had led him to his epiphany. She had to struggle; he
didn't—but there was a happy medium, and he found that he could bargain
his way out of bad grades more easily if he put down a little collateral
upfront. So he turned in his half-assed work and put on a good face for it,
and he coasted his way through classes with a low B-average and no
parental phone calls.
When he wasn't in school, he was either swimming, out with friends, or
going to parties. But the parties were starting to feel more like work now
because the girls wouldn't leave him alone. His friends all gave him a hard
time about it and he could tell they were jealous from the way they teased
him. He played it off, but the whole thing really annoyed him. He wasn't
interested in the attention, especially not from a girl who thought he'd get
off on her vapid act.
But it was like the meaner he was to them, the more the girls wanted to
him. Clinging to his arm, touching his chest, telling them where they'd be
on Saturdays, trying to sit in his fucking lap. He let them do it, and
sometimes he let them do more, but the thought of dating any of them, or
fucking any of them, left him feeling strangely chilled.
“Dude,” said Jake. “Did you see Quentin Ho hanging all over Justine?
What's with that?”
“Why?” Nick asked absently, staring off thoughtfully into space,
although of course, he'd noticed, too. Jay didn't smile like that much
anymore. “You jealous?”
“Fucking Quentin,” Jake said in disgust. “What a fucking nerd.”
“Jay's a nerd.” Nick glanced at him in annoyance, not sure why the
conversation was pissing him off so much. “I guess it's a match made in
heaven.”
“Yeah, but she's a hot nerd. It's different. What?” Jake asked, flinching
when Nick casually lifted his hand. “I was being respectful. Don't fucking
hit me, man.”
Nick maintained eye contact for a moment before letting the hand rake
harmlessly through his hair, hiding his sneer when he saw his friend relax.
“Thank God it's Friday. I'm so sick of this fucking hole.”
“Hey,” said Dave. “Nick. I'm having a party at my house tomorrow.
You should come.”
“Whatever. Maybe I'll show up. I don't have anything else to do and my
stepmom's driving me fucking crazy.”
“Invite your sister,” Dave suggested.
“Jay doesn't go to parties.”
“Ask her.” Dave smiled. “Maybe she'll surprise you.”
“I doubt it.” Nick slammed his empty soda can in the trash. “She's as
predictable as a clock.”
He spaced out through English—it was all about poetry, sappy stuff—
and when he met Jay in the South Quad, he found himself feeling strangely
uncomfortable as she walked up, looking like a poster child for the school
in her perfectly-worn uniform and her too-serious face. Why didn't she
smile more at home? She was so much prettier when she did.
She glanced at him as he slid into the front seat of her little Honda. She
could have gotten a Mercedes and instead she got a fucking Civic, and if
that wasn't just Jay in a nutshell, he wasn't sure what was. He wondered, a
little bitterly, what Quentin thought of her fucking joke of a car.
“Can you turn that off?” he asked, after a moment. Jay was playing No
Doubt on the radio and the bright, poppy ska music was annoying him. “I
have a fucking headache.”
“Wow,” said Jay, glancing at him. “That's cool.”
“What is?” he snapped.
“Nothing,” she said. “I thought you had eardrums of steel, Metal Boy.”
“Well, I don't,” he said, glaring at her. “So either turn it off, or I will.”
“Not your car, dude. My car, my rules.” But she reached over and
switched the music off, just like he knew she would. Her bracelet rattled
and he looked at it. The silver was all scratched.
“That's trashed,” he said, after a moment. “Why don't you throw it out
and get a new one?”
Jay pulled her hand away. “To remind myself,” she said, after a pause.
“Of what?”
“To rely on myself.”
Nick shook his head. “The bracelet tells you to do that? Right.
Weirdo.”
“Toad.”
Nick stared ahead, watching the lines of the dividers slip beneath the
wheels until he felt a little nauseous. “Dave Byron's having a party on
Saturday. He invited us both. Me and you.”
“I don't go to parties.”
“Yeah, I know. I told him that.”
“Oh my God, why? Do you want me to sound like a loser?”
“Funny how you say that like you think it's hard to do.”
“God, you're such an ass.” Without taking her eyes off the road, she
said, “Maybe I will go. I can sit around and talk big and embarrass you in
front of all your friends for a change.”
“Yeah, you're so embarrassing. Such a little goody-goody, beloved by
all. What are you going to do? You couldn't make a tomato turn red.” Nick
rolled his eyes. “I don't care what anyone thinks of me—but you do. Too
much. The only one you're going to embarrass at that party if you try, blue
jay, is yourself. You're such a prude.”
Jay was silent for a moment. “Is that really how you see me?”
“It's how everyone sees you,” he said. “It's how you are.”

Nick pulled on a white T-shirt and a leather jacket to go with his acidwashed jeans. He tried to straight out his hair but as usual, it refused to lie
flat, so he gelled it into intentional disarray. Downstairs, he could hear
shouting and knew, with a pulse of irritation, that it was Jay's mother.
What now? He threw down the comb, making it bounce. Fucking
menopause?
He shoved his wallet and phone into his back pocket and began
walking slowly through the den, craning his neck to hear. “—can't wear
that,” the step-bitch was saying. “It makes you look like you have mannish
shoulders, baby. You should let me take you shopping. We can get you some
new clothes. I know what's best for your figure.”
“Well, it's too late to change now,” said Jay, sounding upset. “Thanks a
lot for letting me know earlier when I actually had time to change.”
Oh, for fuck's sake, thought Nick.
He saw Danielle first. She was wearing a tight pair of jeans and a
leopard-print top that looked cheap but probably wasn't. He'd heard his dad
griping about her credit card bills. Not that money was an issue, but he
wanted his women to look good, and Danielle did not look good.
Nick allowed his lip to curl as he looked at her, and then he turned and
saw Jay.
She was wearing blue stonewashed jeans and a red off-the-shoulder top
that made her skin look like it was infused with cinnamon. He'd never seen
her wear it before, didn't even know she had clothes like that. It didn't make
her shoulders look mannish at all. She looked like a fine-boned doll, and the
way the fabric pulled seamlessly across her breasts made him realize, with a
lurch, that she wasn't wearing a bra.
Nick blinked and looked away. “She looks fine. All the girls dress like
that.”
“Like you know anything about it.” The step-bitch's eyes flicked over
him scornfully. “Men don't know anything about fashion.”
I know you're a jealous whore. The thought surfaced without warning,
gleaming sharply. That's what this was. All those comments, sneaking into
her room, stealing her clothes. Danielle was constantly going after Jay
because Jay was gorgeous and her mother was jealous as fuck.
It was so obvious, he couldn't believe it had never occurred to him
before.
He let out a rough laugh that made both women stare at him. “God,” he
said. “This is too fucking stupid. Come on, Jay. We're going.”
Jay glanced at her mother uncertainly and hitched up her purse. “Bye,
Mom. Don't wait up.”
The ride in the car was silent as Jay navigated the dark local roads.
Dave lived out in the hills in a nice house—although not as nice as theirs.
Nick glanced over at Jay in profile. She was wearing big hoop earrings and
a lip gloss that smelled like sugar. He could smell it from here.
“What's with the outfit? You look like you're trying to be Angela.”
She shot him a hostile, defiant look. “Well, I wouldn't look like a prude
who cares too much about what everyone thinks of me.”
“So you care what I think of you.” He arched his eyebrows. “Really
disproving my point.”
“Screw off,” she said, so seethingly that he was startled into laughing.
After a few minutes, he said, “Why do you let that psycho bitch bully
you?”
“Angela?”
“No, although her too,” he added distantly. “I mean, your mom.”
“I don't. But you can't argue with her. With either of them. You'll never
change their minds.”
“She's absolutely jealous of you, you know.” The words slipped out
before he could stop them.
“My mom?” Jay's earrings jangled as she turned her head. “Why?”
“Because you're prettier than she is. That's why she's always doing the
shit you hate. Pinching you. Mentioning how tall you are. Telling you to
wear more makeup. She only tells you to change when you look good.”
Nick glanced at his phone as it buzzed. Dave texting him, Nick, where are
you, man? Is your sister coming? “She's a deluded old hag.”
Yeah, he typed out. We're on our way.
“She's my mom.” Jay paused. “She's all I have.”
“That doesn't mean she wants the best for you.”
“Does your dad do that?” she asked abruptly. “Comment on what you
do? How you look? Make you feel bad about yourself?”
“He doesn't care what I do or how I look,” said Nick. “As long as I
don't embarrass him, land myself in jail, or get the wrong girl pregnant, I'm
golden.”
“Standards,” said Jay.
“It is what it is,” said Nick. “It's different because you're a girl.”
The party was already in motion when Jay pulled up in her little
Honda. Kids were out front, sprawled on the lawn and chatting. It was
busier inside where food had been set out and someone had erected a game
of beer pong on the kitchen table. Someone shouted his name and Nick
looked up. By the time he looked back around, Jay had already disappeared.
“Nick. My man. Here, enjoy.” Someone pressed something into his
hand.
A joint? No, he didn't want that. He'd played around with pot before
and didn't like how floaty and disconnected it had made him feel. Setting it
on the counter, he helped himself to a beer from an open cooler while
wandering around the house.
Coolio's “Rolling with My Homies” was playing and the air seemed to
be flavored with the skunky smell of pot, sweat, booze, and too much
perfume. He loitered for so long that the song on the mixed CD changed to
Juvenile's “Back That Thang Up,” the rap indecipherable and monotonous
over the sound of the beat and the violins.
Amanda found him in the living room and started dancing with him,
shaking her torso with her arms over her head, spinning around so her
backside was pressed against his hips. Nick obligingly put his hands on her
hips, looking around and wondering if there was anything more exciting
going on upstairs, when he caught a flash of red. Jay was dancing with
Michael Valdez, and Michael had his hands on the bare skin of her waist.
She was swaying in his arms with the same careless ease as when she
danced alone in her room.
The song changed to “Dirrty” and Jay, obviously a little drunk,
stumbled next to Jordan. Nick knew the two of them took Modern Dance
together and the two of them were dancing with a couple of the other girls
now while some of her friends started clapping and chanting, “Go Jay! Go
Jay!” She didn't even seem to realize that she was making a total fool of
herself.
“Ugh,” said Amanda, following his glance. “What show-offs.”
That's funny, thought Nick. Coming from you.
Persisting, Amanda said, “Isn't that your stepsister, Jay?”
“Yeah,” said Nick, looking over again. She was holding an empty shot
glass. “She doesn't drink much.”
“Want to go upstairs where it's quieter?”
“Not really,” he said coolly. “I'm not looking to hook up. I'm here to
have a good time.”
Ignoring the stung look on her face, Nick eased out of her embrace and
slipped outside where the air was cooler. There were a couple people in the
pool but a cold wind had picked up and only the hot tub was packed, mostly
with seniors. He recognized a few of Jay's friends—Angela, Clary, and two
guys whose names he didn't know. The Lacoste Mafia, he thought, with a
snort. Suits them.
He stayed where he was, leaning against the big oak tree in Dave's
yard, sipping his beer in the darkness and watching the clouds hide and
unhide the stars. Jay had been watching a documentary the other night
about the life and death of stars and started sniffling when it got to
supernovae. She was so upset about the idea of a star dying all alone.
The wind was blowing in direction, so he listened to the seniors talking
about college plans and summer travel. And then he heard his sister's name.
“Jay's been acting so weird lately,” said Angela. “First she gets her
panties all in a twist because I said Amanda looked like a stripper, and now
she's in there dancing like one.”
“Senioritis,” one of the guys said knowingly. “It makes everyone act a
little loco.”
“I just don't get what her problem is. What, does she moonlight as a
stripper down in Huntington Beach or something to pay for her college?
She's all over Michael. I mean what the fuck.”
“Didn't Michael just break up with you?” the other guy asked
pointedly.
“That's what I mean. Friends don't steal other friends' exes. It's slutty.”
“You just called her a stripper,” said the first guy. “How friendly can
you be?”
“All I'm saying is, Little Miss Good Girl in there better watch it, or she
might blow any chance of making connections that she has in this town.
Nobody really knows who she is, anyway. She just showed up one day with
the Beaucrofts and expects everyone to accept it. She doesn't even have
their last name.”
“Calm down, honey,” said Clary. “Take a breath.”
“I am just so done with her shit. And fucking Jordan and Quentin
always take her side! Like, whose friends were they first, anyway? And
now Michael likes her—I'm just tired of it,” she said, her voice suddenly
small. “We were friends first and then she came and . . . and ruined our
thing.”
Nick tossed his empty beer bottle aside. It hit a rock with a clang and
rolled, which made them startle. “Dude,” said one of the guys. “Is there
someone in the bushes?”
“Oh shit,” said Clary, when Nick strolled into the light. “I didn't realize
you were out here, Nick. Um, what are you doing out here?”
Nick glanced at Angela, whose expression was both defiant and afraid.
“Nothing much. Enjoying the fresh air. Clearing my head.” He folded his
arms. “Any of you seen my sister.”
The second guy said, “Uh, I think Angela mentioned that she was
inside dancing.”
Angela splashed water at him. It got in his beer can and he said, “Hey!”
Nick watched them squirm for a few seconds longer before heading
back into the house. He and Jay had arrived pretty early; now it was even
more packed than it had been before before. Someone had switched the rap
to hard synth and the heavy beats of Goldfrapp's “Yes Sir” were pounding
out of the speakers, making his ears ring. Eventually he found Jay in the
kitchen. She was sitting at the table with her head between her knees. She
wasn't holding her purse.
“Nich—olash?”
“Time to go,” said Nick.
She blinked at him and made no move to get up. Nick wondered if she
couldn't.
Hissing through his teeth, he bent to drag her up, looping his arms
around her waist to keep her upright. She stumbled a little, just an inch or
two taller than him in her heels.
“Give me your keys. Where is your purse?”
“Dunno.”
Nick tilted his head and saw it kicked under the chair she'd been sitting
in. He leaned her against the table and grabbed it, looping it around his arm
before propelling them both towards the door, against the crush of bodies.
She immediately started shivering. When he opened the door, Jay fell
against him, hands pressed against his chest.
“Nick,” she said, tilting her head up so her mouth grazed the top of his
lip and his nose.
Everything inside him seemed to stiffen up at once. “What?”
“I need to throw up.”
Nick swore right as she dropped to her knees. He just barely managed
to grab her hair before she began to puke her guts out right beneath the tires
of her car.
“How many drinks did you have?” Who made them? If it was fucking
Michael—
“Dunno.” She blinked as she tried to remember. “Two?”
Two. “Two what? Glasses Beers? Shots? Did you mix them? Your face
is all red.”
“Two shots.”
“Jesus Christ. You're a fucking lightweight.”
He bundled her into the seat and buckled her belt, tossing her purse into
her lap before swinging himself up into the driver's seat. They were the
same height now, so he didn't have to adjust the seat. Even though he'd just
turned fifteen, he didn't have a permit yet, but he'd been practicing with
Yelena and Jay and some of his friends. He knew the basics.
Better me than her, he thought grimly. She could barely keep her eyes
open.
“You really can't handle your liquor, can you? What do you do when
you drink?”
“Put water in shot glasses. Tell people it's vodka. Nick, my stomach
hurts.”
“Then you shouldn't have fucking taken the shots.”
She made an unhappy sound and he threw his head back against the
seat.
“Close your eyes,” he said at length. “Let me know if I need to stop the
car.”
Jay whimpered quietly in assent.
Fuck. He drove with a tight jaw, keeping an eye on the speedometer.
Even though Jake was a good friend of his, he didn't think he could count
on the sheriff not to drag them in for underage drinking and driving without
a license. God, his father would probably kill him.
By the time they'd made it home, he was wired and Jay was completely
passed out. Out like a light, as her fucking mother would say. She didn't
move except to groan at him when he got her out of the car and marched
her up to the house. He wasn't quite strong enough to carry her and moving
her was like trying to move a piece of furniture that could drag its feet and
whine.
Fuck, Nick thought again. He glanced at the stairs but decided he didn't
want to risk losing his grip and breaking both their necks. He went to his
room with Jay still clinging to him and dropped her on his bed while he left
to go change. Why did she drink so much? He wondered, tugging on flannel
pants and an old T-shirt before savagely brushing his teeth. Trying to prove
that she can have a good time? Idiot.
When he came back into his bedroom, Jay had taken his pillow and
was hugging it.
“Jay.” He shook her, lightly slapping her cheek. “Give me my pillow
back, you drunk nerd.”
She drooled on it and he leaned back in disgust. Fine, keep it.
Very grumpy now, Nick slid beneath the covers and glared at Jay, but
the longer he stared at her, the more the lines gradually slipped from his
face. Lying on his side, facing her, was curiously intimate and he found
himself aware of her and her body in a way that he'd never been aware of
anyone before. After a moment, he reached out and ran the back of his hand
slowly down her cheek. He could still feel the fleeting burn of her mouth
against his.
With her eyes closed, she looked very young. Not that much older than
him.
“Jay,” he said, in an entirely different tone, as his hand slid down to the
warmth of her throat. He didn't dare move lower, but his eyes drifted to the
swell of her breasts, pushed up by her arms. Want slithered through him,
cold and strangling, tying up his stomach in coils. “Jay?”
“No,” she murmured. “Go away. I don't want it.”
“Jay,” he whispered. “Are you even awake?”
There was a long silence.
“I want the jam,” said Jay.
Nick let out a rough breath. He patted her cheek before flopping over
on his back and switching off the light, but he could still hear her breathing,
could still feel the slight dip of her weight. Without a pillow, the mattress
felt as hard as a rock, and so, strangely, did his stomach.
It was a long time before he finally fell asleep.

Chapter Seventeen
2004

Jay was gone when Nick woke up. He ran into her in the kitchen with
her hair in a messy bun, clutching a cup of tea. She shot him an awkward
smile and mouthed, Thank you.
It made him feel almost, but not quite, guilty for his twisted, bent-up
thoughts. You wouldn't thank me, he thought, not if you knew what I'm
really like.
When Dave texted to ask what he'd thought of the party, Nick set his
phone down and collapsed on his bed, closing his tired eyes. When he
opened them again, it felt like there was a gnawing hole in his stomach.
He'd been dead to the world for hours.
His dad came down when he was polishing off the last of his toast and
Nick was relieved that he hadn't come in five seconds earlier when there
were still a few pieces of rainbow sprinkles visible. Nick didn't think his
father was the kind of man who would approve of fairy bread.
“So,” said his father, in a tone that said he couldn't care less, “how was
the party?”
“Pretty lame,” Nick said carefully. “We came home early—me and
Jay.”
“I see.” His father looked at him for a long moment, letting the silence
build. Nick knew the trick was to create a silent vacuum, which others
would feel the need to fill. It was a classic intimidation tactic, and it
annoyed him to feel it working. “Who drove?” he asked at last.
When Nick still didn't respond, his father said, “I was coming out of
my room for a nightcap and happened to look over the wall and see you
sneaking into your room. I hope you didn't let your sister drive in that
condition.”
“I drove.”
“Police?”
“No.”
“Good.” His father headed down the hall. “You were lucky. Don't let it
happen again. Follow me, Nicholas. I have a few more questions I want to
ask you. In private.”
Nick followed his father into the office. He had never raised a hand to
him before but he found himself wondering, fleetingly, is he going to beat
me? But all he did was slide into his office chair and unlock the bottom
drawer where he kept his scotch. He set out two cut-crystal glasses on the
desk, filling first one and then the other.
“Take it. I know you've been sampling from my liquor cabinet—I
monitor the levels. This is far better than anything you've tried.” He nodded
at the glasses when Nick made no move to reach for a glass. “What was
your sister doing in your room last night?”
Nick swallowed wrong and the burn of the scotch in his windpipe made
his eyes water. “Nothing,” he rasped. “I didn't do anything. I just didn't
want to wake you or fall down the stairs. I wasn't sure where else to put
her.”
“Was there something wrong with the couch?”
Nick blinked. The thought of leaving her in the den hadn't even
occurred to him. “I don't know. I didn't think of it. She said she felt sick and
then she passed out.”
His father sipped his scotch. “You shouldn't have let Justine drink so
much.”
“I didn't,” he said sharply. “She only had two shots.”
“You're a man,” his father pointed out calmly. “It's your job to protect
her. People get the wrong ideas about a girl who can't control herself. Who
sneaks off with boys.”
“We didn't do anything,” he repeated firmly.
His father looked at him, a glint of amusement in his cold eyes. “Be
careful, Nicholas. Sometimes a denial can imply more guilt than a
confession.”
Nick remembered the way he'd touched Jay's sleeping face and stared
down at his glass.
Watching him very closely, his father said, “There are two types of
women in this world. Those who will demand the world from you and those
who will sit back and quietly accept their lot in life. I hope you know the
difference.”
“I do,” he said, which seemed like the best answer.
“I certainly hope so. I don't want you to live with my mistakes. Your
mother was beautiful, brilliant, but crushed by ambition. And Danielle—
well, it's a shame that she isn't a better role model for you and your sister.
Incessantly demanding and shallow. Superficial.”
“Yeah,” said Nick. “You said she was an actress but I've never seen her
in anything. What's she been in?” He made a subtle face at his scotch.
“Porn?”
“She's not an actress. She's a stripper I met in San Francisco.”
“She's a stripper.” Fuck, I knew it had to be something like that. “Why
did you marry her?”
“She was very charming in the beginning. So romantic and starry-eyed.
Have you ever seen Pretty Woman, Nicholas?” He shook his head. “She was
an ingenue—innocent, sweet. Well-read, or so I thought. Poignant. I thought
she would be more like—”
Nick waited, throat tight, but his father didn't finish his sentence. Like
who? Like my mother? For some reason, Nick didn't think his father had
meant his mother, Emma. Crushed by her ambition. As if the hemorrhage
had been her fault. Anger sparked through him.
“Why haven't you adopted Jay?”
“Why?” his father demanded. “Did she ask?”
“No,” said Nick. “But kids think it's strange that we have different last
names.”
“The simple answer is inheritance. Justine's mother gets half of what I
have when I die. Assuming she follows all of the stipulations, and assuming
she doesn't burn through it all, some of that will flow to Justine. I want the
rest of the estate—and the business—to go to you. Justine is a smart, sweet
girl, but that sweetness would be sugar in the gas tank fueling this business.
She's painfully naive, can't lie to save her life, and she doesn't know how to
be ruthless.”
“And I do?” Nick set down his scotch, deciding he didn't like the taste.
“That remains to be seen. Right now you're too wild. I would like to
see you channel that energy into something meaningful and focused.” His
father picked up his glass and emptied it into his own. “This is fifty-yearold scotch. Much too good to waste. When you put time, effort, and money
into acquiring something, then it really ought to be savored.”
Nick pushed back from the desk. “Are we done?”
“For now.”
Nick left.

The next couple months passed in a whirlwind. Jay got accepted into
UC Berkeley, her first choice, and started going to student orientations and
other campus events. Nick poured himself into his swim meets, which
seemed to be the only thing that could boil off some of his relentless,
restless energy. Maybe that was what his father meant, saying that he was
“too wild.” Sometimes it felt like his anger was a starved beast inside him
hungering for the taste of human blood.
Prom happened and Jay went with Michael as her date, along with the
rest of the Lacoste Mafia, but he stopped by their house alone for prom
photos, reeking of Drakkar Noir. “Hey man,” Michael said, wincing just a
little when Nick shook his hand with more force than civility called for.
“Jay said you'll be taking our pictures? I didn't know you took pictures.”
“Yeah,” said Nick. “I'm a good photographer. Let's go outside. I'll shoot
you out back.”
He was a pleased when Michael's smile became strained.
Danielle claimed she had a headache, and retired to her room after
creeping on Michael, and his father was working, so the house was empty
except for them. Nick led them out to the back, next to the lilies and the
pool. Jay wore a strapless lilac gown with silver screening that made her
look like an angel. He snapped a few good ones of her and then took
pleasure shooting the pair of them from unflattering angles that added
imaginary pounds to Michael's slim build.
A few weeks after that, Jay graduated. He was forced to go, sitting out
in the bleachers in the blazing summer heat, despite the tarp the faculty had
erected. After that was a summer that felt far too transient because as soon
as fall started, Jay wouldn't be living with them anymore.
She'd be in Northern California, in Berkeley.
She'd be gone.
And I'll be a sophomore.
Nick stared into his coffee. It was a Saturday morning but now that
school was no longer in session, it could have been any day of the week.
Danielle was fussing with her hair and Jay was poring over a catalog of
college courses. At the head of the table was his father, holding a newspaper
he wasn't reading, while he scrolled through his ever-present phone.
“You know,” he said, “I think we have a lot to celebrate this year, so
I've booked us all into a luxury resort for a brief summer getaway.”
“A resort?” Danielle looked up. “Where are we going? Hawaii? Cabo?”
“Laguna Beach,” his father said, to the step-bitch's obvious
disappointment. “The resort is called Sable Blanc. It's owned by a friend of
mine. In fact, Beaucroft money helped them open their doors back when
they were a new business that was still struggling.”
Nick shrugged, hiding his own dashed hopes. He'd been to resorts
before with his dad and friends. If you went to one overpriced beach, you'd
been to them all. He'd been kind of hoping they would actually go
somewhere cool for a change, like Europe or Asia. It was so typical that his
father would make this into just another business deal.
Jay closed her course catalog and looked up from her breakfast. “What
do we need to bring?”
“Nothing much, Justine,” his father said dismissively. “It's just a resort.
Some summer dresses and a swimsuit and something appropriate for dinner.
Just don't bring anything that would embarrass me.”
Nick recognized the look of panic on Jay's face as she began fiddling
with the pages of her book. She doesn't know what to bring, he realized. She
must not have ever been to a resort before. Probably not even a hotel. Not a
nice one, anyway.
Poor blue jay. She still wasn't quite used to his father. She was so used
to having everyone like her; she hadn't figured out that some people didn't
want to play the game. Their peers fell over themselves trying to please her,
to get into her good graces, and Jay naively assumed everyone in the world
was as nice as she was—but some people, like his father, just wanted to
unnerve. Everything they did was a trap.
Angela bitched about Jay all the time, to anyone who would listen, and
so did a handful of other people in town. Parents whose children had lost
out on awards and opportunities that had gone to Jay. Guys she wouldn't
date. People who wanted to make her seem as cheap and tawdry as paste,
and were infuriated by the mounting evidence that she was flawless.
Nick could have told Jay a lot about the world and how ugly it really
was.
He watched her stare down at her empty plate, her long hair drifting
down past her shoulders. Her catalog was covered in circles and scribbles
and Nick could see a sheet of paper sticking out of it, scrawled with notes.
She glanced up at him warily, bracing herself. “What?”
“I'll help you,” he heard himself say. “I'll take you out shopping.”
“What?” His father spoke as the same time as Jay, his expression
ominous.
Nick glanced at him. “She doesn't know what to wear. I don't think
she's even been to a beach.”
“Yes, I have, you toad,” she broke in.
“Not a nice one,” he corrected her. “And not in Laguna Beach. Hippie
beaches full of rocks and mud don't count. You're going to bring the wrong
thing. I bet you were going to bring shorts and T-shirts. That's not going to
cut it here. Let me help you. I know what other girls wear. I know what's
appropriate.”
His father was still watching him but now his gaze had shifted and
there was something like approval in the glacial depths. “Nicholas makes a
good point. You probably don't have anything suitable,” he said to Jay. “I've
seen how you dress. It's too bohemian. You may borrow my credit card and
drive yourself and your brother to the mall so he can take you shopping.”
The step-bitch looked at his father hopefully, but he only resumed
eating. Ha, thought Nick, watching her return to her phone. Nice try, gold
digger.
“When do you want to go?” Jay asked.
“After lunch,” Nick decided.
When he came down from his room, she was waiting in the foyer,
wearing pedal pushers and a little spaghetti-strapped surplice tunic top
printed with butterflies.
Nick had worn baggy jeans and a tight T-shirt with his wallet hanging
from his belt loops by a chain. It had his father's credit card in it and he was
taking no chances. “That's nice,” he said, as they walked out to her car. He
liked the way the bright blue straps contrasted against her smooth brown
shoulders. “Doesn't seem like you, though.”
“Jordan gave it to me. I just washed it. It's from France.” She made a
face. “I bet your dad thinks it's too bohemian, though. Whatever that
means.”
“Tu es de toute beauté.”
She tugged at a strap of her top, pulling the bodice higher. He thought
her face might have looked a little pink. “You should have taken Spanish.
You're going to regret it later.”
“I'll think about that when I'm in the Côte d'Azur for the French VI
trip,” said Nick. “I'll send you a letter written in the tears of my regret.
Bonjour ma chère soeur. Je regrette de ne pas avoir suivi de cours
d'espagnol. Il est temps de nager dans la chatte.”
“God, how are you struggling in French II if you can speak like that off
the cuff?”
“Because I say things like nager dans la chatte. You drive like a
grandma by the way.”
“I don't want to get pulled over.” Her hands tightened on the wheel for
a moment. “Why did you offer to help me?”
“Because you looked pathetic and I felt bad for you.”
Jay wrinkled her nose and switched on the CD player. “Even when
you're trying to be nice, you're still such a jerk.”
“I like to keep people guessing.”
“There is literally no guessing. You're just a jerk.”
“Mm-hmm. But how much of a jerk? They'll never know. And neither
will you. What the fuck am I listening to?” he asked, nodding at the stereo.
“It's Letters to Cleo,” said Jay.
“Terrible.”
Jay muttered something as she parked her Honda in the giant lot of the
Eden Hill Mall. They wandered past several shops, all with pop music
blasting from the open doors. Eden Hill was an expensive mall, with a big,
ostentatious fountain in the center that had two jumping dolphins
intertwined over crests of molded sea foam. What dolphins had to do with
Eden or hills, Nick wasn't sure, but it had cost a shit-ton of money and the
developers—the Valdezes, he supposed—had put it right front and center
for everyone to enjoy.
“Want to make a wish?” Jay asked, glancing at it.
“No. I don't believe in that shit.”
“I don't either,” she said. “I just thought it might be fun.”
You and I, thought Nick, have very different ideas about fun.
Apart from the fountain, the mall was pretty typical. Open floor plans
and lots of big walls made of highly reflective glass so shoppers could look
at their reflections as they passed. A look on his stepsister's face surfaced;
he'd never seen it before and it took him a moment to realize it was fear.
She was absolutely terrified of fucking up. Their conversation a couple
weeks ago about working hard hadn't really been about him at all—it had
been about her.
The dynamic between them had shifted at some point. She was out of
her depth in this place and because of his name, and the circumstances of
his birth, some things would always be easier for him than they would be
for her. No matter how hard she tried. She glanced at him, causing her hair
to ripple down her back, and in that one, eloquent moment, he realized that
four years wasn't such a vast divide, and it would only grow closer over
time.
“What?” she asked. “Why are you looking at me like that?”
“No reason. I'm just glad you let me help you.”
“Okay.” Jay dragged out the word as she glanced back at the shop
windows. “Start helping me then. Where do we go?”
Nick pointed at a store he knew a lot of the Hollybrook girls shopped
at. Madonna's “Lucky Star” was drifting from its speakers. “In there.”
“You don't have to come in with me, you know,” said Jay, when he
followed her inside.
“I don't trust you not to walk out of here with something stupid like
gaucho pants.”
Jay gave him the finger and began flipping through hangers while he
leaned back and waited. There was a strange smell coming from the clothes,
pungent and chemical. He watched her pick out four sundresses and a pretty
black dress with a rhinestone clasp. She refused to let him help her pick out
a swimsuit. “That's too weird, dude,” she muttered.
“Nobody wears one pieces but kids and old ladies,” he called after her,
when she grabbed a handful of plain solid colored ones that were clearly
intended for athletes. They even had little racing stripes. “Come on, Jay.
Just get a bikini. It's not like you can't pull it off.”
“No,” she said staunchly, walking towards the dressing room.
Beside him, a woman clad from head-to-toe in Lilly Pulitzer laughed.
Nick glanced over at her. “What?”
“I'm sorry,” she said, not sounding very sorry. “You two are so cute—
and she's gorgeous. I wish my boyfriend had gone clothes shopping with me
when I was a young girl.”
Boyfriend? He let out his breath in a burst. Jay?
He stared at the rack of clothes before him unseeingly until Jay found
him again, now carrying several plastic bags. “I'm done. Are you okay? You
have a weird expression on your face. Why are you just standing here?”
“I'm fine.” He wouldn't look at her. “Let's go.”
Jay glanced at the woman in Lilly Pulitzer. “Why is that woman
waving at you? Do you know her?”
“She probably wants to rape me,” Nick said. “Forget about her.”
Jay fell into silence as they walked and he studied the ghostly outlines
of their reflections in the glass. His was slim and scrawny, except for his
shoulders. Jay, at his side, had a lithe build with soft, sloping curves and
that mass of curly hair. Do we look like a couple?
They were on their way to the car when Jay ran into some of the
Lacoste Mafia, although now that they had graduated, her old friends had
moved on from prep wear to things like Dolce & Gabbana and Gucci. Nick
recognized the logos on their bags. The step-bitch liked to shop there, too.
Jordan was instantly recognizable with that long mane of naturally
blonde hair and Clary, who was mixed—Black, English, and Korean, Nick
remembered someone telling him—was probably the third most gorgeous
girl in school after Jay and Jordan.
Unfortunately, fucking Michael was with them, along with some of his
loser hang-ons. Nick recognized one of the guys from the hot tub at Dave
Byron's house.
Jay left him to go speak to the group of them, hugging herself in the
way she did when she was nervous. Playing with her hair, wrapping the
curls around her finger. “We just stopped by the mall for some frozen
yogurt and some light shopping,” Jordan was saying, holding up a bag that
looked anything but light. “Now we're on our way to the beach to have a
good old-fashioned bonfire. You wanna come, Jay? We tried to call you but
you, like, didn't answer your phone.”
“It's dead,” said Jay. “Yeah, I'll come. I've been looking at course
catalogs all day.”
“You can't,” Nick reminded her. “You have to take me home.”
“Right,” said Jay, glancing at her bags. “I need to drop these and my
brother off first. I'll meet you there? Silver Scape, right?”
“Sounds good.”
Jordan and Clary waved and Michael hung back for a moment, saying
something to Jay that Nick couldn't hear before turning and leaving with the
others.
Nick was not happy about being grouped with the bags. “Drop my
brother off?” he repeated, once they were both buckled up in the car.
“Seriously, Jay?”
“Well, you are,” she said, puzzled.
He sat in silence as they drove home, watching her slim hands on the
wheel as she inched along the tortuous freeway. Your brother, he thought
darkly. Well, maybe I don't want to be.
Chapter Eighteen
2004

The resort was the same tacky, whitewashed Mission Revival style as
their school, only with more glass. Nick supposed this was supposed to
capitalize on the beachfront aesthetics that came from the ocean and the
incredibly blue skies but because it was the obvious choice, it disappointed
him.
He liked their rooms better, which were icy and modern. Shag rugs in
cool tones, modern furniture with chrome, white couches. Jay raced around,
acting like a fucking child, exclaiming over everything, before flinging
herself into her room and saying, “Oh my God, I have my own fridge?”
Rolling his eyes to himself, Nick followed the sound of her voice to the
cracked open doorway before pushing open her door the rest of the way.
She was flopped on her bed like a starfish in her shorts and “Counting
Crows” shirt, with a thin polka-dot scarf tying back her hair. “You are so
fucking lame, blue jay,” he said. “Seriously.”
Jay kicked a sandal at him. It hit him in the stomach before bouncing
off. “Close the door. I'm going to change.”
Nick arched an eyebrow. “Need some alone time with the fridge, Jay?”
Her face flushed. “Don't be gross. I'm just going down to the beach.”
“Wait for me,” he said. “I'll go with you.”
She hesitated. “Okay.”
Nick went to his own room, which was nearly identical to Jay's. He
didn't think it was particularly noteworthy. Everything in the fridge was
surprisingly cheap. Mid-tier alcohol in small bottles, the kinds of European
cookies you could easily obtain at international grocery stores. The hotel
had their own branded water instead of Fiji or Evian. He grabbed one and
made a face. It tasted cheap, too, like it had been warmed in the bottle it
came in.
Setting the bottle aside, Nick changed into his swim trunks, throwing
on an unbuttoned shirt so he could go walking around the boardwalk later if
he felt like it. Puka shells and espadrilles, two things he normally wouldn't
be caught dead in, completed the beachy look. He put on his mirrored
sunglasses as he walked out, throwing the room into sepia tones.
Jay was wearing one of her silly one-pieces with pink and white striped
shorts and the sandals she'd kicked at him. Around her throat was a silver
necklace with a diamond-studded bear and a little J. As they clomped out,
he asked, “Where'd you get the necklace?”
She peered at him from beneath her floppy hat. She smelled very
strongly of sunscreen. That was another thing her stupid, leathery spraytanned witch of a mother liked to chide her about, Nick thought. Getting too
dark in the sun. “Your dad gave it to me just now,” she said, after a moment.
“I guess it was because I got into Berkeley. He'd probably be mad if he
knew I passed on Stanford,” she added quietly.
Nick tried to remember the last time his father had given him a gift
outside of a Christmas or a birthday. “Congrats,” he said emptily. “You
excited?”
“Yeah!” she said. “I've been talking to my future roommates, Cori and
Jessi. They're both really nice.”
“Oh, blue jay,” he said, with unexpected heat. “You think everyone is
nice.”
Jay blinked. “I think most people probably are.”
“Only when they want something. That's why I'm not nice. I don't want
shit from anyone.”
“Well, that's jaded.” She gripped the pendant protectively. “To be
honest, I don't even really like the necklace. It's too flashy—like something
my mom would wear. But he was looking at me so I felt like I had to wear it
at least once before throwing it in a drawer.”
“If I don't like something, I don't wear it,” said Nick. “Sell it if you
don't like it.”
“Is that what you're planning on doing with your puka shells?” she
asked snippily. “Because you sure wouldn't stop harping about how they
weren't your style when I gave them to you.”
“I'm wearing them, aren't I?” he asked, touching the necklace. It was
warm from his skin.
Jay looked at him for a moment. There was a strange expression on her
face, as if she had the sun on her eyes. Maybe she did, because she slid her
glasses back on. “I guess you are. I'm glad you like it.”
I don't like it, he thought, willing her to understand. I like you, Jay.
Nick sat on the sand, watching the waves cash over the shore. He loved
swimming but didn't particularly relish the briny reek of the ocean or how
the water teased his hair into stiff spikes.
Jay, predictably, was already in the water. She'd lost her hat in the
waves and it was bobbing away and some blonde surfer guy was helping
her retrieve it. He handed it to her, arm around his board in a way Nick
supposed was intended to show off how cut he was while Jay gripped her
hat in front of her like it was a shield.
Unwilling to watch anymore, Nick leaned back and crumbled a sand
dollar he'd found, breaking the thin pieces of calcium carbonate apart into
little sharp-edged pieces. Jay had told him in the car that they were related
to sea urchins and the little floral patterns were called “food grooves.” And
then her mother had cut her off and said, “Baby, that's enough. I have a
headache. You're such a little chatterbox—give it a rest, won't you?”
Jay, now sodden, trod back to him on bare, sandy feet, falling onto the
sand next to him with a little oomph. “I almost lost my hat,” she said
redundantly. “No more swimming in the ocean for me today, I guess. It's a
sign.”
“That was swimming?” Nick asked, without opening his eyes. “Looked
more like spazzing.”
“You totally belong on this beach,” she told him. “You're such a crab.”
Nick flipped her off.
“Nice,” she said. “Come on, Mr. Crabby Pants. Take a look. I found a
purple dwarf olive on my back from the water. It's in perfect condition.”
“A what?” She was holding out a dime-sized shell the color of an
infected blood blister. “Oh.”
“Quentin said if I found a good shell, he could bore a hole in it for me
so I can thread it with cord,” she said happily. “I hope I can find a scallop or
a California cone.”
At the mention of Quentin, he glanced at her in annoyance, and then
his eyes caught on the silvery rivulets of water gleaming on her breasts. The
cold water had made her nipples hard. Something hot and icy flooded
through him, making his ears ring. He pushed her hand away. “Stop waving
that in my face,” he said. “It reeks.”
“It does not. And anyway, I'm going to bleach it when we get home, so
you won't have to worry about it.” Oblivious to his torture, Jay set the shell
carefully on the corner of her towel, pulling the brim of her hat down over
her face. “If you find another one, let me know. I'd love a sand dollar, too.”
Remembering the sand dollar he'd crushed, Nick felt a brief flash of
regret. It quickly faded as his eyes drifted back to her chest. The suit was
cut deeper than she had probably realized, or she never would have bought
it. With her shoulders pulled back, the material was almost sheer.
Nick heard himself make a strange sound and she looked over at him.
“Are you okay?”
Her eyes were the color of his father's scotch in the light: a clear,
guileless hazel. Nick stared at his stepsister as his veins seemed to burn; it
was like he had a whole colony of fire ants inside his body and they'd all
decided to sting him at once. She's so fucking beautiful, he thought, nearly
reeling from it. Fresh-faced and angelic and almost repulsively attractive.
What if Jay did realize what she did to him—and to other men? How
could she not know? How innocent could a stripper's daughter really be?
It's your job to protect her.
He looked at Jay and saw only concern and unease. Without realizing
it, a fierce scowl had overtaken his features, masking them like a shadow.
He tore off his shirt and kicked off his shoes with such violence that his
stepsister leaned back, covering the shell protectively.
“Hey, watch it! What are you doing?”
“It's too fucking hot on this damn beach. I'm going for a swim.”
The water was terrible: ice-cold and salty, stinging his eyes and sinuses
and filling his trunks with drifting sand. But it soothed the burning and
helped him think clearly.
When Nick glanced back, a group of older guys were talking to Jay,
which filled with him a draining anger. Guys were always talking to Jay. He
dove to hear the muffled rush of the waves beneath the surface of the water
and when he bobbed back up, the guys were gone and Jay was alone and
wearing his shirt around her slender shoulders.
She avoided his eyes as he approached, dripping wet and soaked to the
bone. There were two spots of color high on her cheeks, like she'd been
slapped.
“I'm cold,” she said, in a subdued voice. “Can we go back now? I'm
tired of the beach.”
“Fine. I don't care.” He hadn't really wanted to go down to the
boardwalk anyway.
Jay slipped her sandals on, tucking the shell into the pocket of his shirt
as she tied her towel around her hips like a sarong. She was 5'10” and he
was 5'11” but he had much broader shoulders, so the sleeves of his shirt
flapped down to her elbows. She had knotted the hem around her waist to
keep it closed and it looked absolutely ridiculous with the towel.
“What did those guys say to you?”
“Nothing. They were just lost. I don't want to talk about it.”
“Do they have anything to do with the reason you decided to steal my
shirt?”
“No. And I didn't steal it. I borrowed it because—like I told you—I was
cold.”
“Maybe I'm cold, too,” Nick said idly and Jay shot him an irritated
look.
“You're a boy.”
“Boys don't get cold?” The color in her face intensified as her eyes
abruptly dropped.
“Just drop it,” said Jay. “I'll give it to you in the room.”
God, I wish you would. “It's my shirt.” He tugged at it. “Give it to me
now.”
“Nick,” she snapped, sounding truly annoyed. “Stop it.”
He knew he probably should stop but something inside him had frayed
and broken. He reached for her again and she hit him—not hard, but it was
definitely a hit and it made him grunt. They fell onto the grass with a
shushing sound, Jay beneath him, all those soft curves cushioning the hard
planes of his body. When she squirmed beneath him, he felt it in a thousand
places.
“You asshole.” She shoved at his chest, her hands cool against his bare
skin. “God, I hate you.”
“Do you really hate me, Jay?”
He let himself fall forward onto his forearms and Jay went tense. His
shirt had slipped open and he could feel her chest grazing his with each
breath, their faces mere inches apart. “Nick?” Her eyes were wide. “What
are you—”
Kiss me, he thought dizzily. I want you to kiss me.
“Oh.” It was a small 'oh,' like a squeak. Quick as a flash, she slipped
out from his arm, brushing the grass from her clothes in a quick, agitated
movement. Before he could reach for her or call her name, she was running,
his untied shirt fluttering around her arms as she fled.
She hadn't even realized that she'd forgotten her towel.
Nick bent to retrieve it and felt his necklace give as the string,
weakened by the salty water of the ocean, finally snapped. All of the tiny
white beads rolled into the grass like hail, lost.

Do you really hate me, Jay?
Jay sat in the cabana lounge, clutching her purse. She was wearing one
of the sundresses that she'd bought with Nick, which she now regretted
bringing. She didn't like any of the clothes she had taken with her—
expensive, revealing, not her style at all. What she really wanted was jeans
and a sweatshirt with a hood she could bury herself in.
Beside her was a virgin daiquiri that was slowly melting into
watermelon-colored slush. It was too sweet and had a strong chemical tang
and she didn't like it.
A few guys had come up to her while she had been sitting on her own,
offering to buy her drinks. She'd scared most of them off by telling them
that she was just seventeen and waiting for her mom but one guy had been
creepily persistent, offering to sit there and wait with her, like he fucking
knew, and Jay had immediately gotten up and went to the bar.
Bless that female bartender. She had figured out what was going on and
86'd the creep, letting Jay sit there at the counter with her even though she
was clearly under twenty-one. Jay plucked at the stupid teddy bear
necklace, rubbing her fingers over the diamonds. She kept thinking of
Nick's words to her on their way to the party, so eerily prescient—she's
jealous of you.
Since she was young her mother had been telling her that she was
unattractive—not “ugly,” because that would have been too easy to deny.
Harder to argue that her thighs weren't too thick, that her hair wasn't too
curly, that she really wasn't too fucking tall. Pinching and prodding and
picking apart everything from her hair to her eyes, telling her that she talked
too much.
Guys had always bothered her but guys bothered everyone. Jay had
seen the way they shouted and hollered at the strip club. She just figured
that all men in the world, with very few exceptions, were creeps. But what
if that wasn't the case? What if the problem was actually her?
How'd you like a pearl necklace, sugar tits?
Jay had to blink back a sudden rush of tears.
This whole year—it had just been one thing after another. Michael
calling her the prettiest girl in town and then telling her he'd had a crush on
her for a while, and then patting her condescendingly on the head when she
asked him if it was because of the way she looked, asking her teasingly if it
was because she wanted more compliments.
Jordan had told her that she had been overreacting when she had gotten
angry, that if she didn't get with Michael, Angela was just going to steal him
away again and this time Michael might let her. Jay, still hurt for reasons
she couldn't even begin to explain, thought to herself that right now, that
didn't really sound like such a bad outcome.
And then those creeps on the beach had approached her and made her
feel absolutely disgusting and Nick had—she swallowed—and stared down
at her melting drink. She didn't want to think about Nick or the way he had
looked at her.
Maybe it's good I'm going away, she thought, pressing her face into her
hands. Maybe what I need to do is go away forever and never come back.
When she lowered her hands from her head, movement caught her eye.
It was her reflection in the mirrored surface behind the bar, framed by
gleaming bottles of spirits. There were floral patterns and swirls etched into
the glass that were reminiscent of Victorian Chinoiserie, warping and
distorting the image of her face.
She stared at herself hard but saw nothing remarkable. It was the same
face she saw in the bathroom mirror each morning. To her, it was ordinary.
Hazel eyes, curly hair, light brown skin.
And then, there was another face in the glass, startling her badly—
Nick's, or what Nick's might look like in thirty years, if he let himself be
lost to the vagaries of excess and time.
“Hello, Justine.”
Jay glanced at Damon warily—he was a tall man, standing around 6'3”
and she had the feeling that he used his body to intimidate people. When he
was out with her tiny mother, she looked like a child standing next to him.
He was wearing a vintage Tommy Bahama shirt and slacks, and was the last
person she wanted to see right now apart from her stepbrother.
“I was just about to leave.” She pushed her drink away. “I know I'm not
supposed to be in the bar.”
“That's all right,” he said. “Stay. I could use the company.”
What about what I could use? she thought, irrationally angry. Maybe I
want to be alone.
She slid her drink across its trail of condensation while Damon ordered
an Old Fashioned, wishing desperately that she was alone in her room.
“So,” he said, once he had his drink—she noticed he didn't thank the
bartender, glancing through her as she provided the drink as if she weren't
worth his time. “Where's Nicholas?”
“I don't know. Probably in his room,” she said guardedly.
“I only ask because he seemed out of sorts. He wouldn't tell me why.”
Jay turned away so he wouldn't see her let out her breath. “Sorry. No
idea.” When she turned around again, her stepfather was regarding her
intensely and she wondered if Nick hadn't told him what had happened after
all. But the line of his eyes was lower, level with her chest.
“You're wearing my necklace.” She flinched when he plucked up her
pendant and the rough pads of his fingers grazed her breast. “It looks very
nice on you.”
And now it's going in a drawer forever. Forcing a smile, Jay pulled
away so the pendant fell back against her ribs with a hollow thud.
“Thanks.”
“Congratulations on getting into Berkeley. I do wish you had
considered Stanford, though. You'd be a legacy, you know,” he added. “You
might have told me that you'd been accepted.”
How the hell had he found out? Had he asked her friends? Gone
through the trash? The idea of being watched like that without her
knowledge disturbed her. “I like Berkeley. It suits me.”
“I'm not so sure about that,” said Damon, to her irritation, “but it is
your decision. Regardless, it is a good school and it will present well on
paper. By the time you graduate, you'll have connections, your little
projects. I wish Nicholas had your mind for philanthropy. It's crucial in
small doses.”
“He seems to think he can do whatever he wants.” Like his father.
“Well, yes,” Damon said, leaning on the bar. “He can. He's a
Beaucroft.”
And Beaucrofts get to do anything? Jay had never spoken this frankly
to her stepfather before—not in so many words. He wasn't exactly making
her like him. Normally, she wouldn't have dared talk back but she was
angry and upset, and she knew she would soon be leaving.
“Why aren't I a Beaucroft?” Jay stared hard at the polished counter.
“Why haven't you adopted me?” She could feel him looking at her and said,
dully. “What?”
“It's an interesting question.” He stirred his drink. “I'm surprised you
haven't asked sooner.”
“Well, why haven't you? Is it because I'm an embarrassment to you? I
work hard and I've never embarrassed you or Nicholas or my mother. I was
valedictorian. I got into almost every school I applied to. I work hard. Why
am I the only one who isn't really a part of this family?”
Her eyes stung and she held back the tears with angry impatience.
Don't you dare cry, Jay.
She waited, tense and hardly daring to move, as Damon turned back to
the bar and downed a good portion of his drink in one long swallow. “I
thought I was in love with your mother when I met her,” he said
unexpectedly. “She was so beautiful up there on the stage. This beautiful
blonde creature. Appalling fashion sense, but lissome—a rose in filth, I
thought.”
You odious man, thought Jay.
“She seemed so delicate, wistful . . . innocent.” The way he lingered on
that word made her lock her shoulders in a shudder. “Quoting prose and
poetry. So interested in the marvels and the mysteries of the world, and so
utterly uninterested in my money. Or so I thought.”
She called you her ticket to a new life, thought Jay. She knew exactly
what she was doing.
Wetting her lips, she said hesitantly, incredulously, “My mother . . . she
quoted poetry?”
“Yes,” Damon said, with a venom that surprised her. “She certainly
duped me. At the time, I thought I had found the proverbial whore with the
heart of gold. My own Pretty Woman. You would be surprised at how many
men buy into that fantasy, Justine. The lure of the unjustly fallen woman.
But you know your mother. It wasn't quite that fairytale ending.”
Jay shook her head, thoroughly revolted, but he seemed to take it for
agreement.
“It clicked for me when I gave her that bracelet engraved with the
quote from Jane Eyre. Her alleged favorite book—your favorite book.”
That look, thought Jay, remembering her mother's heated gaze. No wonder.
“That's when I realized that what your mother had actually done was craft a
fantasy persona for herself . . . based entirely on yours.”
Jay couldn't think of what to say, so she said the only thing that came to
mind. “My mother's not a whore.”
“Yes, she is,” said Damon. “She married me for my money, and now
the blush is off the rose. It is what it is, but let's not mince words. She is a
whore. An expensive one.”
“I'm going back to my room,” said Jay. “Have a nice night.”
“Oh, don't be dull. If you don't wish to speak of your mother, we can
talk of other things. Tell me, have you given any thought to what you'll be
doing when you leave college? I understand that you've been seeing
Michael Valdez. Is it serious?”
Jay, clenching the underside of the stool and ready to leap off it,
suddenly found herself wondering where the nice bartender was. Michael
had told her that their fathers did business. Had he enlisted Damon to help
get them back together? “We broke up,” she said flatly.
“I can't say I'm surprised. It never seemed like you were interested in
being a society wife and Michael is very much his father's son—spineless
and quick to bend.”
“I thought you were friends.”
“We're business partners, my dear. Not friends.” He glanced at her. “So
what do you wish to do with your life, Justine? Do you want to go into
business? Do you want to travel? Or would you prefer to stay closer to
home?” She looked down and then up in cold horror. Damon had put his
hand on her knee. Seemingly oblivious to her discomfort, although he must
have felt her tense, he said, “There's plenty of room in the family business
for you. You might not be a Beaucroft now—but perhaps, very soon, you
could be.”
“I—” Jay looked at his hand again. For a moment, it felt like she
couldn't breathe. This has to be a mistake, she thought wildly, despite the
panic thrashing through her. “You mean, when you adopt me,” she said in a
thick voice. “As your daughter.”
She thought, hoped, he would laugh and say, “Yes, Jay, of course that's
what I meant. What did you think?”
Instead, he said, rather coldly, “This coyness doesn't become you.” As
her hand tightened on the cold metal bar beneath the wood, he went on,
“You're already so close to Nicholas and you're an incredibly beautiful
young woman. My colleagues are constantly coming up to me to inquire
about you. And your mother is a ceaseless burden. No, surely you see,
Justine, that this is the ideal solution. For your own sake. You could be
married right after you graduate.”
“To you,” she said, in a high, faint voice.
“You're all alone in the world, my dear. I've seen how men look at you
—you don't know the thoughts that go through a man's mind when they see
a girl who looks like you . . . but I do.” Damon moved his hand higher, just
beneath her thigh, and she saw his eyes dip to study her body through her
dress. “Some women—vulnerable women—need someone older to take
them in hand . . . to protect them from those who would take advantage.”
She was off the stool so suddenly that she nearly dragged Damon off
his. With shaking hands, she tugged down the hem of her dress. “No—I . . .
I think I'd be much more c-comfortable making it on my own,” she said,
feeling like her vocal chords were rusty wires in her throat. “M-maybe I
don't want to be a B-Beaucroft.”
“You're making a foolish mistake, Justine. I am sure you would rather
have me as your ally than as your enemy.”
“Fuck you,” said Jay, shocking herself. The sudden narrowing of his
cold eyes made her very sorry she'd given into the impulse.
“Perhaps I was mistaken,” he said, leaning back. “Perhaps you are as
stupid as your mother.”
Jay let out a breath, closing her eyes briefly.
“It would be awkward to explain a sudden termination of your
enrollment,” she heard him say. “So I will continue to pay for your
university experience. However, should you ever find yourself in any sort of
trouble, I assure you—you will find no quarter with me.”
Jay turned and fled then, heading into her room and slamming the door
hard enough that her mother shouted something about her headache through
the bedroom door. She heard Nick slam his fist against the wall they shared,
and that was just a fresh reminder of how alone she really was. Even if she
told her mother what had happened in that bar, she wasn't sure she would
believe her, and even if she did, she would just be blamed for her own
actions.
And Nick—
A sob burst from her throat and she swallowed it quickly when she
heard the door open again. There was a series of footsteps, the sound of
pure, controlled fury, and then she heard Damon slip into the room he
shared with her mother, followed by the rhythmic, unmistakable rocking
sound of a headboard slamming against the wall and her mother's low
moans.
He wants me to hear, she thought, sick and terrified. Oh my God.
Suddenly, the daiquiri was frothing up her throat and Jay barely made it
to the bathroom before throwing up. When it was over, she washed her face
and brushed her teeth, staring blearily at her red-eyed reflection. Then, and
only then, did she allow herself to cry.
Chapter Nineteen
2017

“Come to my room tonight.”
Nicholas didn't touch her again on the ride home but she was aware of
him in an agonizing way that seemed to hum like electricity against her
skin, and she knew that he was aware of her. It was as if the two of them
were caught up in their own personal storm. He might have loved her once,
but she wasn't going to kid herself into thinking that would save her from
him now. If anything, time had only tempered his obsession, honing it like a
well-kept blade, and he was keeping her on the point of it, poised one thrust
away from total devastation.
They walked in together in silence. Alone in her room, Jay changed out
of her blouse and skirt with shaking hands. All she had were flannel pajama
bottoms and loose T-shirts. Hardly the come-hither clothes he'd probably
envisioned.
She brushed her teeth and padded barefoot into his room, cursing when
she tripped over his brogues. The bed was empty, still unmade from this
morning, and he'd thrown his briefcase on the small couch in the next room.
So he'd been in here, then. Where had he gone?
Maybe he was going to make her wait.
Jay sat on the edge of his bed and slowly reclined against it. The
mattress was comfortable. The sheets smelled like him, basil and grapefruit.
Spicy, bitter, and aromatic, all at once. The grapefruit, she knew, was from a
body wash he liked but she wondered at the basil. She stared at the ceiling
until the darkness at the edge of her vision seemed to slowly creep in. This
is stupid, she thought, clutching the neck of her T-shirt. Why am I even
here?
She slid off the cool sheets and slipped back into the hall, noting the
dim glow of light over the half-wall with the Louise Bourgeois sculpture.
She peered over the edge and saw Nick sitting on the sofa. He'd dragged out
one of his old console games and was playing something with lots of
gunfire and explosions. Well then, she thought, surprised. Guess I get to
sleep in my own bed.
She pulled one of the water bottles she hadn't needed out of her purse
and set it on her nightstand, listening to the pounding of her heart as her cat
curled up on her stomach. Her dreams were strange—surprisingly
unpleasant. More of a series of vignettes composed in impressions and
emotions, rather than something solid and cohesive; they made her feel as if
she had forgotten something terribly important, although what that might
be, she had no idea.
When she woke up, she thought she was a teenager, and she couldn't
understand why the ringing of the school bell was coming from her
bedroom, or why the sound of it filled her with huge bubbles of panic. I'll
be late, she thought. It took her a moment to realize that the sound was
actually coming from her cell phone. Someone was calling her.
It was 1am—had someone died? She swiped for it, startling the cat,
who dropped off her to the floor. “H-hello?” she whispered. “Who is this?”
Please don't let it be my mom.
“Come down to the pool.”
Nicholas? This was so far from what she was expecting that it took her
brain a moment to shift. “What are you doing? It's the middle of the night.”
I thought somebody died.
“Jay.” He stretched out her name, turning that one syllable into an
exhortation to sin. “You said you would come to me.”
“I did come to you,” she mumbled grumpily. “Six hours ago. I waited
for you, but you were playing video games, so I went back to bed.”
“That's what it's like at the top, little bird. You get to keep people
waiting and they still have to jump.”
“I'm too tired to jump. I have to work tomorrow, and I'm going back to
sleep.” You arrogant swine.
“Five minutes, Jay. That's how long you have before I come up there to
get you.”
The phone went dead.
“Shit.” Jay pulled a sweatshirt on over her T-shirt, hating herself for
giving in so easily to his demands. But Nicholas had never been one to
make idle threats, which was exactly how she had ended up as his little
blackmail mistress. The thought opened up a raw wound on her soul,
making her ache. You bastard, she thought, as she padded through the dark
and empty house.
She saw him immediately as she rounded the concrete planter filled
with lilies of the valley. He was just wearing swim trunks and the sight of
his bare, wet chest made her instantly wary when his eyes met hers as he
stood. In the lights of the pool, his irises were a glowing aqua.
The sight of all that water running over his skin made her throat
tighten. She looked away from the rivulets trailing down his abs, clenching
her teeth at the obnoxious, knowing tilt to his smile as he began swimming
again. He looped around for another pass before stopping to tread water a
few feet away from the edge where she was standing. “Like what you see?”
“What,” she began, biting off the words, “do you want?”
“I'm not sure I like your tone.” His eyes flicked over her. “Where's your
swimsuit?”
“I don't have one.” She jammed her hands into her pockets. “I didn't
think I'd need one.”
“That's too bad.” The fluid undulation of his pelvis as he propelled
himself through the water made it impossible to look at him at all. His swim
trunks weren't exactly indecent, but the wet fabric hid very little while he
was on his back. “No clothes in the pool. Take them off.”
Keeping her eyes averted, she said, “I can hear you just fine from
here.”
“Blue jay.” Nicholas slanted her a feral grin. “You know I didn't call
you out here to talk.”
That stung. She blinked rapidly, trying not to let her humiliation show
up on her face, but she had never been particularly good at hiding her
feelings. Especially not from him.
She glanced at him unwillingly. No longer on his back, he was at the
edge again, arms folded over the tiled lip of the pool. He raised his
eyebrows.
“I'm serious. Lose the clothes or I drag you in.”
Jay backed from him, retreating into the shadows as she unzipped her
sweatshirt. The metallic drag of it was so loud, it felt obscene. Only the
pool was lit and she thought maybe he couldn't see her as well as she could
see him, but she doubted it. She shot Nicholas another wary glance. He was
watching her closely with his chin resting on one hand.
She made an impatient sound and turned her back as she peeled her
shirt off, entering the pool in just her panties with one arm covering her
breasts. The water lapped at her skin, warmed, but only barely. The smell of
chlorine burned her nose. It had been years since she'd been in a pool. She
kept to the edge, away from the lights.
Nicholas resumed swimming. She watched him, looking around the
garden nervously. She could smell flowers, the roses and something nightblooming. Jasmine, maybe. A terrible thought occurred to her. “Don't you
have security cameras?”
“Not out here.”
Jay swallowed. “It's cold.”
“I think it's quite nice, actually. Why don't you swim with me? That'll
warm you up.” He circled her with the careless indolence of a cruising
shark. “We can race.”
“That would be stupid.” Jay spun to keep him in sight. “You'd win.”
“Oh, I don't know about that. You might win. I haven't competed in
years and I'm easily distracted.” Another one of those almost-smiles
flickered at the corner of his mouth. “I recommend the backstroke.”
“I don't have time for these childish games. Just do whatever you
brought me out here to do. I want to go back to sleep—and I don't want to
race,” she said irritably, folding her arms tighter.
Nicholas glanced at her, his expression unreadable, before diving again.
Where did he go? She turned, looking around for him in the pool, but his
trunks had been blue like the tiles on the bottom and they had drifted from
the lights. “Nick?” she said.
“I'm sorry,” a voice said, inches from her ear. “I didn't realize I was
wasting your time.”
Startled, she backed into him. Gasping, she skittered away and he
laughed and dove again. When he resurfaced, he was in front of her,
slicking his wet hair out of his face.
“Remind me, how much did we decide your time was worth, Jay?
Thirty-two dollars an hour to have you sit at a desk and five thousand an
hour to bend you over one, wasn't it?”
“You're disgusting,” Jay hissed.
“And you're nervous.” He was hedging her towards the deep end. “Can
you swim?”
“Yes,” she said.
“Good.” He lunged.
Jay shrieked, kicking away from him to dive. Like most kids in
California, she had been taught when she was young, but only enough not
to drown in a community pool. She was a little horrified at how fast he was
in the water, and how easily he caught and wrestled her to the surface.
“You are such a bastard!”
He laughed, waiting a heartbeat for her to catch her breath, and then he
kissed her. His lips were wet and tasted like chlorine. She could barely see
him because her eyelashes were covered in drops of water and burning from
the chemicals. This time, there was a hint of restraint in the way he touched
her: control tightly leashed. It left her aching for something stronger, and
she was glad the water carried her, because her knees felt so weak.
Nicholas abruptly scooped her up beneath her ass and backed her
against the wall, forcing her to wrap her legs around his waist to stay
buoyant. She felt him push against her underwear and squirmed, a nervous
sound escaping her lips when he pried her arm away from her chest and
gathered it, along with her other wrist, behind her back.
The look in his eyes—Jay swallowed hard. “You're not going to . . . to
fuck me in the pool, are you?” she asked weakly.
“No.” He lifted his eyes, pushing a few damp curls of hair out of her
face with his free hand. “I'm not going to fuck you in the pool.” He mocked
her tone, giving the 'F' in 'fuck' a slight buzz. “I do suggest you hold on
tight to me, though. I'm going to be needing this other hand.”
For what? “For what?”
He flicked her nose. “Wouldn't you like to know.”
Trapped without the use of her arms, chest-deep in water, Jay felt a bolt
of pure, white-hot fear lick at her from the inside. She tugged at her arms
and Nicholas made a soft, admonitory sound as he began to move against
her, rubbing his body against hers as he captured her mouth in another
searing kiss, using that gentle friction to part her beneath her clothes until
the hard ridge of his erection was rocking right against her—
Jay's hands convulsed behind her back.
He bit gently at her lip as his hand slid down her belly and into her
waistband. She made a sound against his mouth, which made him kiss her
even more fiercely as he began thrusting his fingers. Beneath the chilly
layer of water, he was warm, but she still found herself shivering.
“I'm slipping,” she said piteously.
“That's why I told you to hold on to me with those luscious thighs of
yours.” He shifted a little, bumping her up with his thigh. “Looks like I'm
not the only one who gets distracted.”
Jay let out a rough breath. “Bastard.”
“Mmm. I don't think you want me to call you that.” He spoke against
her lips. “I might not let you come.”
She met his eyes and felt heat spark in her cheeks when he pulled back
to ogle her in a way that made her squirm. “Funny how you think you're
required for that. I can get myself off.”
Nicholas's smile widened. “Not if I tie you up.”
The sharp gasp that came from her throat seemed to come from
someone else.
“Interesting response,” said Nicholas. “So, what's it going to be? Would
you like to come for Daddy? Or am I going to have to tie your hands behind
your back so you can't play with yourself while I'm fucking you? Because I
will be as soon as we get out of this pool.”
“Ah.” Jay turned her face away when he laughed quietly.
“I didn't quite catch that,” he murmured.
She tensed as that slow, melting heat built between her thighs. “I—I
want to come.” She swallowed hard, hazarding a glance at him. “Please.”
“Please what?”
Wincing inwardly in despair, she heard herself say, “Please, Daddy. Let
me come. I've been good.”
He let out a harshly satisfied sound and finally added the pressure she
needed. She arched with a splash, raising arcs of water from the tranquil
surface. She felt a low, scarcely-perceptible rumble vibrate through his
throat as he slid a hand beneath her head to cushion it from the concrete lip
of the pool as he pressed her more roughly against the wall. “Kiss me.”
She grabbed onto his shoulders with her freed hands. They both broke
water and he kissed her like he was trying to devour the very breath in her
lungs. With her eyes closed, he could have been any man—a man with the
mouth of an unrepentant sinner. He pulled his hand out of her underwear
and she whimpered into his kiss.
Jay felt him smile before he pulled away. “Time to get out.”
Before she could move or think to protest, he'd already scooped her up.
“W-wait.” She scrabbled against him and felt his arms tighten. “Where are
we going?”
“My bedroom.”
“But the cameras—”
“Better hold on tight this time.”
Nicholas walked out with her, still dripping water, through the lounge,
into the foyer, and then up the stairs, forcing her to cling to him at an odd,
ungainly angle to hide herself from view. In the master, he dropped her
ungracefully onto the expensive jacquard bedspread.
“We're going to ruin the sheets,” she said, as he stripped off his wet
swim trunks. “The chlorine is going to make the colors r—”
“Don't care.” Naked, he prowled towards her in the shadows and all the
moisture left her mouth when she caught a glimpse of his cock; it was fully
hard, jutting towards his belly. She felt it brush her as he leaned over her
body to open the drawer of his nightstand to take out a condom. He rolled it
on, barred in ribbons of shadow, and then he yanked her panties down,
leaving them snarled around her calves as he pushed her thighs apart and
slid into her in one smooth, hard stroke.
It was more tender than painful this time; he paused a moment, his own
breathing quick and light. She could feel him looking at her. Then he bent
one of her legs and started to fuck her in a steady, driving rhythm, reaching
beneath her backside and rocking her into his thrusts the way he wanted
until she was arching her hips on own.
“Good girl,” he said, letting his hands fall away, which sent a strange
tingle down her nape.
He came very quickly. Maybe because she already had. If so, he fucked
differently when it was for his own benefit; it was faster and a bit more
brutal, closer to the tempo with which he'd had her suck his cock. It made
her feel a little used.
Maybe that's the point. Jay braced herself against the soaking sheets,
pinned at the hips by his final thrust. He had stopped shuddering, head
lowered to the crook of her neck; she could feel each of his exhalations
fanning softly against her throat, stirring the drying locks of her hair. She
shivered. Her arms were still covered in goosebumps from his low, gravelly
moan.
Nicholas pulled out of her and unhooked her underwear from her legs,
letting them fall to the floor with a slap. He rolled onto his back and when
he pulled her against him, Jay flung out an arm to instinctively halt her roll
that ended up draped over his stomach. She felt the taut flesh jump under
her touch, but to recoil now seemed like an act of weakness, so she let her
hand lie where it was, flat on his abdomen. His other hand curled over his
belly to rest on hers.
Jay let him press her against him, trying not to shake. Her skin still felt
stiff and cold. He leaned down and tugged up the coverlet to cover them
both. Gradually, she stopped trembling but she was unable to relax
completely. His presence was stultifying, suffusing her lungs, seeping into
her every pore. He's so warm, she thought, leaning her head against his
shoulder.
It seemed wrong that he should be so warm when his heart was so cold.
“It's been a while.” She felt him relax beside her, the arm around her
waist slackening in lethargic contentment. Absently, he added, “You come
like you haven't been touched in years.”
Jay stiffened. “Don't say things like that.”
“Why?” He traced his fingers down her back. “Are they true?”
She didn't respond, setting her jaw in an effort to swallow back her
furious retort. But he seemed to feel the sudden tension in her body because
his stomach hitched beneath her hand in a silent laugh and he squeezed her
a little tighter.
“Fine. Don't answer. But I am going to find out what you like about the
dark.”
Her eyes, which had started to slip closed, opened wide. “What do you
mean?”
“You enjoy doing it with the lights off.” She heard the quiet rustle of
his head shifting on the pillow as he looked down at her. “My little
succubus. I heard your breath catch when I mentioned tying you up—what
would you do if I bound your wrists and fucked you in the dark?”
Oh my God. Her fingers clenched involuntarily.
“I see.” She could almost hear his smile. “Well then. Sweet dreams,
blue jay.”

Jay woke up wrapped in Nicholas's arms. Or rather, he was wrapped in
hers. Her arm was still around his waist. She was curled into his side with
her face buried in the crook of his neck. All night, apparently. When she sat
up and tried to turn her head she experienced a painful cramp. Wincing, Jay
allowed her eyes to bounce around the room. It was still dark. Only a bit of
light was flooding in from the window from one of the porch lights; the
orange glow of it glanced off the bridge of his nose, the edge of one arched
cheekbone.
Carefully, Jay pushed back the warm sheets and slipped nude from the
bed, making a face when she stepped on something cold and wet. Those
were probably her underwear, still soaked from the pool. She bent and
grabbed them, fleeing to her room and feeling like she was doing the walk
of shame through her own house.
Not my house, she corrected herself immediately. I don't live here
anymore—it's his.
Carbon was waiting for her, prowling around in agitation. He still
wasn't used to the new room, which made two of them. Jay fed him before
dressing for work, pulling on fresh undergarments, a tie-waist pencil skirt,
and an asymmetric blouse with bell sleeves. As soon as she had her clothes
on she felt better, more like herself. She grabbed a new book from her
bookshelf—Fire & Hemlock—shoving it into her purse on the way out her
door.
Her eyes felt crusty and she swiped at them in annoyance as she went
down the stairs. Stupid Nicholas. Why did he have to wake her up in the
middle of the night? She felt a rush of heat upon catching a glimpse of the
pool from the stairs. She wasn't sure she would ever be able to go near it
again. Not without thinking of what Nicholas had done to her in it.
You come like you haven't been touched in years.
Who said things like that to other people? What was that even
supposed to mean? Jay thought it sounded like an insult and it probably
was. He'd told her she was bad at kissing, once. Maybe he thought she was
bad at sex, too—although if he really thought that, she couldn't fathom why
he'd want to hold her to his stupid contract in the first place. Jay slammed
her purse on a bar stool as she brewed herself some coffee, glancing
impatiently at her phone.
Oh shit, she thought, right as the coffee machine began to sputter. It
was only 4:30am. No wonder she was so tired. Nicholas didn't even leave
for work until 6:30, and his alarm was set for 5:45. She could have gone
back to bed and had another hour of sleep.
Maybe I'll nap on the couch in the den. If she was careful, she wouldn't
even wrinkle her clothes. She'd certainly dozed on BART often enough. Jay
turned towards the kitchen door, orienting herself towards the drawers for a
spoon, and froze at a sudden movement in the hall.
“Morning,” said Nicholas.
“Hey,” she said, in as neutral a voice as she could muster.
He got up earlier than she did, so she had always seen him fully
dressed. But now he was only wearing loose pajama bottoms that rode
dangerously low on his hips, his hair still mussed and disheveled from sleep
—and other things, her brain filled in silently, making her focus intently on
the silverware as she selected a spoon with far more deliberation than
necessary.
“You're up early.” He eyed her appreciatively before turning to open
the fridge door, giving her a view of his bare back that had her studying the
reassuring darkness of her coffee. “Want some toast?”
“I can't,” she said, watching the bubbles gather on the side of the mug.
“Milk.”
“No bread.” Suddenly he was close to her, close enough that she could
feel the warmth from his skin. Holding his plate in one hand, he tilted his
head to meet her gaze. “How do you live?”
“I bake my own.”
“You bake?”
“Sometimes.” Jay looked at him and then away. “If I feel like it.”
“You can use the oven all you want. I never do and Carmela doesn't
bake.”
Jay's mouth tightened at the mention of the rude housekeeper. “What
happened to Yelena?”
“She had a fall a few years after you left. She quit due to health
reasons. Broken hip. I think she lives with her daughter now. Her other
daughter—not the one who teaches.” He turned abruptly, dropping the two
pieces of toasted bread on his plate. “I send her a card every year.”
“You do?”
Misunderstanding her tone, he said, “Not personally. My secretary
sends her a card every year. You,” he corrected himself, “will be sending her
a card every year.”
“Is she all right? A broken hip is pretty serious at her age.”
“I'm surprised you're so invested after what she did to you.”
“What you made her do to me,” Jay corrected, drawing herself up
against the coldness seeping into her chest like icy fog. “You were the one
who drove the wedge between us. And anyway, it's called compassion.”
“Don't worry about it, then. She continues to reap the benefits of her
betrayal. I cut her a generous severance check and send her an additional
one at Christmas that I'm sure warms her heart even more than the card.
Maybe this year you can sign it from both of us.”
“So generous,” she said flatly, glaring down at her mug.
“I can be.”
Nicholas's suggestive tone made her look over at him. He was leaning
back on the counter in a way that was making his stomach muscles flex.
Almost like he was . . . posing. For her.
Jay pressed her lips together. She could imagine his brand of
generosity. “I really doubt it.”
“I'm taking you out shopping with me when I buy groceries this
weekend.” He reached over and tugged playfully at the bow at her waist,
chuckling when she slapped his hand away. “You can get whatever you
want. I can't have my petulant little bird wasting away to nothing.”
“I'm surprised you buy your own groceries,” she said. “Isn't that the
sort of thing people like you typically relegate to the help? Like the
cooking?”
“People like me,” he repeated, clearly amused. “What's that supposed
to mean?”
Rich assholes. She glared at him, because anger was a more stable
refuge than the hurt and regret that were sure to come later once all the bad
things he made her feel hit their mark, and far safer than whatever was
surfacing in her now as he let his eyes slowly drift to her mouth. You're a
bad person, she thought, shifting a little uneasily. Stop looking at me like
that.
“Oh, Jay.” She stared at the hallway, her breaths coming a little faster,
when he brushed her cheek, leaning closer. “You really think you have me
all figured out, don't you?”
Jay's fingers tightened on her mug when he set his plate down. Freeing
both his hands. “You're not exactly hard to figure out, Nicholas.”
“And yet, you still let me get the better of you. What does that say
about you?” Nicholas laughed softly, watching her face. “I'd say it means
you're masochistic.”
“Thanks for the psychology lesson,” she snapped, angry at herself for
rising to the bait. She set her mug down with sudden violence. “You should
go into self-help.”
“Defensive, too,” he observed infuriatingly. “You look so put together,
no one would ever believe how easily you come apart.” His thumb caressed
the line of her jaw, which suddenly felt as if it might shatter like glass. “If
you want to keep it that way, I suggest collecting your clothes from the pool
before the gardeners come by today or it might give them something to
think about. I believe you left them by the planter.”
“The planter,” Jay repeated.
“By the lilies. Where you stripped for me last night.”
“I know where it is.”
“You were a bad girl. Turning your back on me and then hiding in the
shadows. That's why I'll be getting you some nice things to wear for me.
Sheer things that will be more fun to watch you take off than flannel pants
and T-shirts—even if you try to hide.” He was playing with her hair now,
using a lock of it to trace the outline of her lips. “Any suggestions?”
“Saran wrap.”
Nicholas gave her a little swat on the backside that made her hips buck
in surprise. His mouth pressed against her cheek and then he got up and
tipped his plate in the sink.
“Don't be so quick to leave next time. I like to play when I wake up,”
he said, almost as an afterthought. “I'm going to go change. Be ready to
leave when I get back. I'm stopping for coffee after I drop you off at the
Starbucks—do you want me to get you anything for the office?”
Jay shook her head, a little disoriented by the mercurial shift in topics.
Unconsciously, her hand crept up to press against the cheek he'd bussed.
“I'm . . . fine.”
“Good. Text me your clothing sizes before noon. American and
European,” he added, throwing a salacious grin over his shoulder that made
her blush. “I'm thinking silk and lace for you, Jay—Chantilly lace is my
favorite. Look it up. You'll understand why.”
Jay bit back a response, glaring at the expanse of his departing back.
She knew what Chantilly lace was. Shaking her head, she rinsed out her
coffee cup and set it inside the top rack of the dishwasher. She put
Nicholas's plate in there, too, feeling strangely crushed.
You know I didn't call you out here to talk.

Jay's strangely subdued mood followed her to the office. Not even the
brisk walk over from Starbucks helped.
She sat down next to Annica, who had her hair pulled back into a
severe ponytail and appeared very focused in her work. Jay tried to say
“Good morning” but received only a tense smile in response, which was
probably innocent but felt like a slight.
Meeting with Justine Varens.
Jay sighed and scheduled her afternoon meeting with Nicholas, opened
all of the documents attached to the calendar invite, and began printing out
the documents for her note-taking, pausing every now and then to sip at her
Philz coffee, lightly sweetened, with added oat milk.
She tried to be cheerful and couldn't quite succeed, so she poured
herself into the work instead. By the time she had finished reviewing all of
Nicholas's potential acquisitions, she had several pages of copious notes.
Nicholas seemed to be busy, too. he ended up fully booked for the day by
late morning, with only a thin slice of time spared for lunch. She actually
saw him leave for a couple of the meetings—he never looked her way.
This is exactly why you're not supposed to fuck your boss, she thought,
watching him walk through the doors with an older man with graying hair
and a kindly expression. One of the other executives, Jay thought, noting
the cut of his expensive-looking suit. The man was laughing at something
but Nicholas had one of those neutral half-smiles that could have meant
anything.
He did look at her then and for a moment, his mouth twitched into a
real smile.
God, she was fucking her boss. She was fucking everyone's boss. If
anyone found out, she could lose her job. The thought filled her with shame
and terror, and when Meghana from HR walked by and shot a friendly
smile in her direction, Jay couldn't quite meet her gaze.
I am in so much trouble.
When it was time for her own lunch, she wandered into the kitchen and
saw Stacey sitting with a brunette woman who seemed like she was in her
early twenties.
“Hi, Jay,” said Stacey, waving. This time her skirt had rainbow
squiggles on it. “I brought a friend. This is Gen from PR. When something
good happens, they're cheerleaders with a megaphone. When something bad
happens, they fit your problems with cement shoes and give them a dip in
the ocean.”
“I'm not sure if that's entirely accurate,” said Gen, with a roll of her
eyes. “We don't really make problems go away. We just make them smaller.
Fun-sized.”
“Fun-sized problems sounds like a children's mathematics exercise,”
said Stacey. “the kind you do with candy. How are you doing, Jay? Every
time I walk by, you have your face pressed so close to the screen that it
looks like you've been glued there. Is Mr. Beaucroft working you too hard?”
Don't. Think. About. That. “No,” said Jay, swallowing. “Everything's
fine.”
“Well, if he hasn't yelled at you yet, it means you're golden. I hear he's
a yeller.”
Oh my God. “He hasn't yelled at me.” Swallowing, she added hastily,
“But I heard things weren't so great with Crystal. That's unfortunate.”
“Crystal was afraid of Mr. Beaucroft,” said Gen. “She said he made her
very nervous. That was part of the reason their arguments were so public.
Towards the end, she stopped attending meetings when he was there. It was
also why she came in so late—she knew he came in early and wanted to
spend as little time around him as possible. That's what she told me,
anyway.”
That's weird. “I'm, uh, sorry to hear that things were so bad.”
“Gen and Crystal were friends,” said Stacey.
“Work friends,” Gen said quickly, as if to distance herself from the taint
of the negligent employee. “We just got lunch once in a while. We never
really connected—” She broke off.
Jay glanced over her shoulder just in time to see Nicholas sweep by in
a flash of navy.
“Speak of the devil,” Stacey said dryly, watching him disappear around
the corner. “He is intimidating, isn't he? I sometimes forget he's young
enough to be my son.”
Nicholas came out of the kitchen with a bottle of water and a granola
bar balanced in one hand. The other was slipped into the pocket of his
blazer. Noticing he was being watched, he slowed. “Hello, Gen. Stacey.”
Maybe she imagined the pause. “Jay.”
“Hi, Mr. B.,” Stacey said. “Want to join us?”
For a horrifying moment, Jay thought he would. She stared at him with
wide, terrified eyes, which made him break out into another one of those
slow smiles. “Thank you, but no. I can't. Jay,” he said, making her flinch to
attention in her seat. “What's happening with my phone?”
“I—” Phone? His desk phone? “I set it to automatic before I left.”
“Automatic voice mail? Or automatic transfer?”
“Oh, shit—I mean, excuse me,” she said quickly to the two bemused
women, before grabbing her things and retreating to her desk, stumbling a
little in her haste.
Her phone buzzed. Relax. My phone is fine.
You are such a JERK. Are there really two buttons or did you make that
up?
There really are two buttons. You pressed the right one. Also, I'm out of
coffee.
I'm about to pour it over your head.
You know I'd just send you out to buy me a new shirt. Jay glanced up in
irritation at the sound of hushed laughter and caught a glimpse of Nicholas
smiling at his phone. I'd enjoy that.
Jay marched up the stairs with what she hoped was a grim expression.
He swung around to face her, grabbing his mug by the top and setting it at
the edge of his desk.
When she brought it back, newly full, he smiled at her. “Thank you,
Ms. Varens.”
“You're welcome,” she said, just barely level, before spinning on her
heel and walking away.
She could feel his eyes on her and wondered if this was how he was
planning on destroying her. The slow perishing of her soul through a death
of a thousand cuts. He hadn't exactly denied her accusations when she'd
asked him if he was looking for revenge. She just hadn't thought he'd try to
get it by toying with her emotions.
Maybe she'd hurt him more than she'd realized. Maybe she really had
broken his heart.
What he didn't seem to understand was that he had also broken hers.
At her desk, her pile of documents was waiting to be organized for the
meeting with Nicholas. She reached for the top sheet of paper just as the
phone rang.
“Hello?”
“Finally,” said a familiar voice. “Now you listen to me. My name is
Danielle Beaucroft, and I have been waiting and waiting to be put through
to an actual human being at this criminal front of yours. If you don't connect
me to Nicholas Beaucroft immediately, you'll be hearing from my lawyer.”
“Mom?”
“Don't you talk back to m—Justine? Baby, is that you? My goodness, I
almost didn't recognize the sound of your voice. It sounds so deep on the
phone. What on Earth are you doing, answering Nicholas's phones?” she
demanded suspiciously.
“I work for him.” Because you sold me out. You pawned me like a
diamond. Only, if her mother had pawned her diamonds, she might not be
in this situation. “Mom, what are you doing, telling people you have a
lawyer when you don't? You could get in big trouble—”
She stopped abruptly, remembering where she was, shooting a wary
glance at Annica.
“Shh, not on the phone. Where are you, Justine? Are you in Los
Angeles? You haven't been responding to any of my texts and I have no idea
what's going on with our situation.”
“Our situation,” Jay repeated, with slight emphasis.
Her mother let out a breath. “Never mind. Actually, it's so helpful that
you're here now. Put me through to Nicholas, baby. I need to have words
with Nicholas.”
“He doesn't want to talk to you.”
“What does that even mean?” her mother demanded. “Who do you
think you are?”
“I think I'm an administrative assistant,” said Jay, letting some of the
anger that had been boiling up over the last couple days seep into her voice,
“speaking to someone my boss really doesn't want to be talking to. I'm also
thinking that right now, I really don't care for your tone.”
“Tone? I am your mother. And his stepmother, whether he wants me to
be or not. And I will speak to you in whatever tone I want, whether you
want me to or not, because I am not going to stand for any more of this
playing house. Put me through to Nicholas right now, or I swear to God,
Justine, I am going to c—”
Jay hung up the phone.
Annica glanced over, frowning. “Why does your mother want to talk to
Mr. Beaucroft?”
“Um. Ex-business partner.” The phone immediately lit up again and
this time, Jay blocked the number. If her mother wanted to call Beaucroft
Assets, she could do it from a payphone.
Standing up to her mother felt good. So good, that it scared her a little.
The adrenaline from that interaction made her so jittery that she ended up
taking a break to go walk a few paces around the office outside.
By the time her meeting with Nicholas rolled around, she could barely
stay upright in the chair. Her mother was an exhaustive force and she was
still tired from her late night and early rise. She leaned back against the
padding, all but sinking into the fabric holding the files in her lap as she
read down the list while he threw each of the discards into the trash.
“Why even have me print these out?” She slid Element Just across the
table to him. “If you're going to throw them in the trash, I mean. It seems
like a waste of paper.”
“I never told you to print anything. There's a notes function on the
document I sent you. You can even tag me in the comments.” He lobbed the
paper over his shoulder without even looking to check if he'd made it. It
landed right in the basket. “I thought you liked the theatrics of it.”
Jay shook her head slowly.
Nicholas let his hand drop, slumping in the chair in a way that made
her wonder if it was meant to be a mockery of her own posture. “Who were
you speaking to on the phone earlier?”
“Why?”
“You looked upset.”
“It was my mother.”
“I see.” Nicholas folded his arms behind his neck. “And how is the
former Mrs. Beaucroft?”
“Angry,” said Jay. “Threatening to sue with a lawyer she doesn't have.”
“Unwise of her,” he said. “I assume she was dealt with appropriately.”
“I hung up on her and blocked her number.”
“Good,” he said, with surprising vehemence. “That woman always
thought she had you under her thumb. I suppose that's one good thing about
you leaving. She would have destroyed you if you had stayed, the way she
tried to destroy everything else.”
“She wasn't the only one,” said Jay unthinkingly.
Nicholas glanced up at her, with a strangely intense expression that left
his face looking frozen. Then it disappeared entirely, and she could no
longer tell what he was thinking at all.
But his eyes—his eyes were a wasteland, a glimpse into her own
personal hell.
Jay bounced out of her seat, even though the meeting hadn't officially
ended. She could feel his gaze boring into back as she left. If looks could
kill, she'd have a knife in her chest.
It kind of felt like she had one there, anyway.
Chapter Twenty
2017

Jay kept thinking of that look in Nicholas's eyes when she had talked
back to him in his office. She wished she had held on to bright shards of her
riotous anger, keeping them close, but they sliced indiscriminately, and
sometimes it was just far less painful to give in.
You're not the wronged party, she thought. Why don't you get that?
She had gone back to her desk on leaden feet and sat unseeingly before
her computer until it was time to leave and her anger had cooled into hard,
icy crystals of fear.
On the silent car ride home, Jay had looked at his hands on the wheel,
trying not to think about what they might feel like holding her down in
anger.
He could hurt me so easily, she thought. I wouldn't be able to stop him.
She hadn't been able to stop him before.
Are you going to make me chase you?
Nicholas glanced briefly at her before disappearing into his room. Not
the look of a man in the mood for a chase, but he had fooled her before that
way before.
Jay had a restless night, and woke up at 4:30 again, alone and ill-rested
with a churning gut. When he came down at 5:00, he said hello to her,
eating his sprinkled toast at the counter, half-dressed, while she answered in
monosyllables and tried, with mixed success, not to look at him.
Work had been uneventful. Appointments, lunch with Gen and Stacey,
a brief trip out for coffee with Obi. Her mother sent her a series of angry
texts, all of which she deleted and ignored, as if they didn't leave her
shaken. When Nicholas came to collect her in the kitchen, things seemed
almost exactly the same as they had been, only now there was an undertone
of restraint in his actions that she might have called guarded if they had
come from any other man.
He'd ordered dinner again, since they still hadn't been shopping. It was
Thai food this time. Pad Thai for him, red curry for her. He'd remembered
the coconut milk substitution; she could see the little sharpie “V” on her
box, for vegan. She ate the food, feeling his eyes on her. It was very good,
in the way that cheap takeout could sometimes be good—greasy, with a
little too much spice. Pools of hot oil were forming on the surface in golden
bubbles. She could feel it coating her tongue, sticking in her throat along
with her doubts.
Every time she felt herself weakening, she made herself remember the
photograph and the way he had savored her panic when it had felt like she
had been about to fall apart.
“How do you like it?” Nicholas wrapped the vermicelli noodles around
his fork, capping it off with a piece of chicken and a few bean sprouts. His
words were so at odds with the thoughts in her head that she stared at him
blankly as he went on, “I've never been here before.”
“Oh.” Jay swallowed her mouthful. “It's good,” she said hesitantly. “A
little spicy.” It couldn't compare to the incredible food she'd enjoyed in the
city with her friends, but she didn't say that. The other afternoon had been a
painful lesson on the dangers of being too candid.
“Any plans this evening?”
What a strange question. “No,” she said slowly, sipping the last
mouthful of curry. “I was just going to read for a while. It's been a long
week.”
“Am I overworking you?”
That startled her into looking at him again. He was studying her over
his wineglass in that disconcerting way of his that made it seem like he saw
so much more than he did.
“No,” she said, putting her hands in her lap. “The work is fine.”
“Good.” He set down his wineglass. “Because I'd like you to come to
my room tonight.”
Jay had the distinct feeling that she'd just been manipulated. “Your
room,” she repeated.
“Yes.” Nicholas shot her a measuring glance before stabbing a few
more pieces of chicken. “Wear something slutty,” he said casually. “I want
you to look like you want it.”
Jay choked on her Thai iced tea, groping for her napkin. Slutty? The
crude and callous words seemed to have been calculated to drum up a
reaction from her and she was furious with herself for giving him one. “I
don't own anything like that.” She patted her lips with the napkin. “Wearing
those kinds of clothes makes me uncomfortable.”
“I'm sure you can come up with something. You're nothing if not
resourceful. The work you do for me is proof of your ability to innovate.”
He gestured at her empty bowl. “Don't worry about cleaning up when
you're finished. I'll take care of the dishes.”
I want those snowy white wings of yours.
Jay set her napkin on the table with a shaking hand and walked away,
painfully aware of his eyes on her back. Wear something slutty. She went
into her room, feeling like she'd been socked in the stomach. Is he trying to
hurt me?
Maybe this was punishment for talking back to him. He could be
vicious.
She ended up settling on pajamas—sleep shorts and one of the
camisoles she wore under her sweaters. They were the most revealing
clothes she'd brought.
When she dragged herself into his bedroom her heart had already
started to pound, and she was a little horrified to find him still dressed in his
jeans and shirtsleeves.
Nicholas turned and looked her over and at the look in his eyes, she
nearly ran. The only thing that stopped her was the thought of him running
after her and dragging her back in—a thought that was not as terrifying as it
should have been.
“That's the best you could do?”
“I don't know what you expected,” Jay blurted, folding her arms.
When he crossed the room to her, she managed to hold herself still
when he pulled her in for a kiss. The gentleness of it was terrifying; each
soft touch suggested a passion scarce-denied that left her feeling dizzied.
“I'm not going to hurt you,” he said, and those words scared her more than
the kiss, because it meant he planned something that might make her think
he would.
You're still making me pay.
She had spoken the words aloud. His face shifted, becoming as remote
as it had in the conference room, when she had accused him of trying to
break her.
“Do you want to leave?” he asked, the words so reasonable that she
could only stare.
Of course I do, she thought, surprised at the question, surprised that he
could even ask. You're a sick fuck and I hate you. But for some reason, the
words wouldn't come out.
“I see,” he said, his tone dry. “You'd rather pay the tithe and think of
England, is that it?”
She squeezed her eyes shut when he bent to her mouth again. He's
awful, she reminded herself, bracing only a little when his hands landed on
her waist. His grip was unshakable as his fingers spread to span her ribs.
His thumbs were brushing over her nipples, making her skin prickle with
each slow pass. She wanted to hate it. She told herself to hate it.
You can still leave.
As if reading her mind, he pulled away abruptly, scooping her up
behind her knees to drop her back onto his bed. The sheets that had been
ruined by pool water were now gone. In their place were soft and silky ones
the color of ink that rustled suggestively as he backed her against them on
his hands and knees, forcing her to scoot backwards on her arms.
“I would have let you go,” he whispered.
“Don't lie to me,” she hissed, which elicited a ghost of a smile before
his mouth covered hers again. The light in the sitting area was on, but
dimly, and very little of the light filtered to the bed. When he tugged at her
top, she let him remove it, and he started kissing her harder, touching her
harder, touching her more. The textured drag of his clothed body against her
mostly-denuded one made heat gather between her legs. She reminded
herself again that she hated him, but she didn't hate him enough; in the
darkness, he was as familiar as a habit, and just as easy to fall into.
He ran his hands down the length of her body in a way that was like the
slow strike of a match. “You want honesty?” Slowly, speaking against her
lips, he told her: “I still get hard thinking about the way your breath caught
in my pool. I want to tie you up.”
She stared up at his face. Intent and unreadable, shadowed by desire.
“Do whatever you want,” she said, which made him exhale in what sounded
like displeasure. “I really don't care.”
“Whatever I want,” he repeated.
Nicholas slid a box out from beneath his bed that jangled ominously,
shooting a look at her she couldn't interpret before opening the lid and
reaching inside. Jay tried to look, but he pushed her back, blocking her view
of the contents with one broad shoulder.
She was expecting rough rope or cold metal, maybe even something
studded or spiked, but when he leaned back over her, he was holding
padded leather cuffs.
“Give me your wrists.”
She knew it was stupid, but she still gave him her hand. He kissed the
back of it, securing one end of each cuff to the Flemish scrolls around his
headboard and the other around each of her wrists. She couldn't look at him
while he buckled her hands, but her breathing began to quicken. He bent
over her, knees on either side of her hips, letting her feel how hard he was.
“Let me tell you what I want. You, screaming my name, telling me how
much you love being Daddy's slutty little girl while you beg me to go
harder.”
His tone, which had started out almost conversational, dipped abruptly
into a growl. She heard herself gasp. Then he swung off her legs and began
unbuttoning his shirt. She had to look away from that, too, her face burning,
as she heard the jangle of his belt, the soft scuff of his jeans. He disappeared
into the other room and the light threw the contours of his body into relief.
He was completely naked.
She stared at the ceiling, tense and utterly aware, listening to the clink
of glass on glass. She could still feel the burn of his lips on the back of her
hand.
I've changed my mind, she nearly said. Let me go.
When he came back, he was holding a half-empty bottle. Her gut
clenched as she craned her neck to watch his approach. “I—” Jay
swallowed the words sticking in her throat. Keeping her eyes firmly on his
face, she said, “I don't want a drink.”
“It's not for you.” He turned her face towards the ceiling. “Keep still.”
She didn't understand at first—not until she felt the tepid splash of
liquid pool in the base of her throat. It made her startle, but he gripped her
face in his strong fingers until she stopped moving, and then he drizzled a
bit more into the well of her navel, and that slight indent just below her rib
cage, before painting long, sticky whorls of liqueur over her torso, around
her breasts, along the lines of her hips. The last thing he did was touch her
mouth, dragging his thumb over the swell of her lower lip, before sliding
her pants down and bending over her.
And then she felt his mouth—everywhere.
She began to anticipate his touch, but sometimes he would trick her,
breathing softly against her skin before pressing his tongue to a completely
different part of her body. It was torture and soon she was writhing under it,
but there was something strangely freeing in having her wrists bound,
which didn't make sense. It was a bit like the dark. If she couldn't see, she
didn't fear. If she didn't touch, she wasn't responsible. When she finally rode
out that long, drawn-out climax, Jay found herself knotting her hands in her
bonds as he slid inside her.
If she didn't think, she couldn't feel.
He filled her so completely that she found it hard to be aware of
anything else. It wasn't for her, but she came anyway—the small, almostpainful rips of sticky skin adhering and then pulling forcibly away; the
filthy things and dark promises he whispered in her ear; the pressure as he
drove her into the sheets, cinching something inside her so taut that it
seemed to cut off the valve of her lungs.
When he kissed her, he tasted like sex and honeyed whiskey, and it felt
like she'd surrendered her soul.
Maybe she had.

The next morning, Jay awoke to the soft flutter of his breath against her
neck and quickly fled before he could wake. She stood under the scalding
spray of the shower in her room, washing her hair and body, scrubbing
herself until she could no longer feel him in her skin and the only smell
filling her nose was the sweetness of her own apple-freesia shampoo. Her
eyes were stinging; she told herself it was soap. She wasn't sure what she
was feeling, only that it left her chest tight and her throat aching.
I think he might really hurt me this time.
After she showered, Jay pulled on a pair of old jeans and a faded tshirt, pulling a hoodie over it and rolling the sleeves up. Nicholas was
already downstairs, in another expensive-looking pair of jeans and one of
his old metal shirts. She remembered them being loose and baggy over the
skinnier frame of his youth, but now the material was tight, faded from
multiple washes.
For the few seconds before he turned, she could look at him
unobserved. At ease in his body and unconcerned to a degree that nearly felt
shameless. Jay couldn't think of anything that might humiliate him—and
then, with a lurch, she realized all at once that she could.
It was why she was here.
She must have made a sound because he turned. The only sign of his
surprise was a slight widening of his eyes and then his face relaxed into
something that wasn't quite a smile. “I need to run those errands today,” he
said. “I thought you might like to come grocery shopping.”
Jay hesitated a long moment before speaking. “Sure. I'll get my shoes.”
“Take your time,” he said. “I'll wait.”
She grabbed her purse and slipped on the knockoff purple Vans she'd
gotten from Target, before tying her hair into a bun with a little printed scarf
covered in avocados. It had been a gift from Lily, tied around the neck of a
wine bottle for her birthday.
I should really message her, Jay thought absently, fingering the edges
of her phone in her pocket. But maybe that would be weird. I've already
waited too long to get back to her.
It wasn't like they had really been that close, anyway. Lily had probably
only been hanging out with her because of their close proximity at work.
She'd only be bothering her, now.
Nicholas had left the kitchen, moving to the entryway, swinging his
keys around his finger while looking at his phone. When he glanced up, his
mouth twitched.
“What?” she asked, crossing her arms. “We're just going to the store,
aren't we?”
“You're so cute,” he said unexpectedly. “Like the host of a children's
show—the hot one everyone wants to fuck when they grow up.” Jay
whirled around, trying to suppress her unease as Nicholas strolled around
her in a lazy half-circle. He shot her a grin and then deliberately smacked
her ass, jostling her against him as they walked out the door.
She pushed his hand away. “What's wrong with you?”
“I'm a little worked up.” The hand came back, smoothing over her
jeans. “You slipped away again. I told you how I feel about that.”
Jay eyed him warily. Even when he was being playful, his games could
have the constrictive feel of a snare. You wouldn't feel the bite until it was
too late. “Where are we going?”
“Hollybrook Grocery.” His hand fell from her backside as he unlocked
the car and moved to open her door, but she got to it first, swinging it open.
“I happen to believe it's important to support small enterprise within the
local community.”
“I'm surprised they're still in business.”
“They hit a rough patch a few years back when the economy was bad.
A generous donation helped keep them out of the red when they were
floundering.”
“From you?” Jay asked, not bothering to keep the doubt out of her
tone.
“I'm giving philanthropy a try,” he said. “It's great for tax write-offs.”
“Do you even do your own taxes?”
“Of course not.” He lifted an eyebrow. “Do you?”
“Yes,” she said. “Because I'm not an out of touch tycoon.”
“I'm not a tycoon,” said Nicholas. “I'm an investor. I'd be happy to give
you a referral for an accountant. In fact, I'll even pay for yours, if you want.
We'll call it a gift.”
“More philanthropy?” Jay asked, sorely tempted. She hated doing her
taxes. “Or do you still think you can buy your way into people's
affections?”
“Maybe I'm just trying to be nice.”
You're not nice. She swallowed back the words as Nicholas parked the
car and loped around the side to help her out of the door, but she knew in
her heart that they were true. Nobody would ever mistake him for a
gentleman, any more than they would call him nice. His father had been
concerned with appearances and Nicholas had been taught chivalry in lieu
of compassion.
She looked down at his large hand, closed over hers, and pulled away.
When he frowned, she busied herself by rooting through her purse for her
wallet. She could tell he didn't like that, either. Watching her locate her
cracked and peeling wristlet, he said firmly, “I'll get you whatever you
need.”
“You don't need to pay for me.”
“I want to.” His smile was without humor. “I take care of what's mine.”
“You don't own me, Nicholas.”
“No,” he said, in an oddly stilted tone. “On that, we agree.”
With those frustrating words, he locked the car, strolling up to the
entrance like he didn't have a care in the world, leaving her standing by the
Tesla. Maybe he still didn't care. He had enough money that he could just
throw money at his problems until they all went away.
Jay entered after him, looking around curiously. The store hadn't
changed much in the eight years she had been gone. The smell was the
same. The décor on the walls was the same. When she looked at the
checkout area, she saw the same cork board with fliers for community
events.
When she had shopped for herself in San Francisco, she had tried to
keep a careful budget, staying under $600/mo. for food. Vegetables were
expensive, though, even when purchased on sale, and going out to eat
bumped up her expenses to astronomical proportions, especially with
cocktails. Some of those places she'd gone to with coworkers had charged
$25 for a single drink.
It had been so hard living in the city and not being able to enjoy it as
much as she wanted to. Staring at the shelves, Jay realized that now she
didn't really have to worry about food, or about weighing what she wanted
against what she was allowed to have. It was a strange feeling—too heady
to be relief, but tinged by emotions too bitter to be gratitude, she found
herself swamped with an odd blend of resentment, eagerness, and
reluctance, all in roughly equal measure.
I can get whatever I want, she thought. But what is this really going to
cost me?
She began filling her basket with bags of mixed greens, root
vegetables, baby kale, tofu, yeast, cashews, flour, vital wheat gluten, lentils,
chickpeas, and coconut oil. Then, feeling extravagant, she got some
prepared mixes as well, everything from fresh tabbouleh to packaged
curries to vegetable-based broths, a package of microgreens, a big tub of
hummus, a kobocha squash, and a bottle of inexpensive chardonnay. If she
didn't like the taste of it, she thought she could probably cook with it,
although she figured she'd like the taste.
The basket was quite heavy now and she grimaced as she hefted it
away from the wine aisle, looking around for Nicholas. She finally spotted
him in the frozen food aisle but he wasn't alone. Jay ducked back behind the
end cap, rustling a package of cookies.
Who was that woman? She looked a little familiar, which meant she
was probably from Hollybrook High. Natasha? No. Natasha had been the
crier.
“Nick,” the woman trilled. “Nick Beaucroft, is that you? It's Amanda—
Amanda Strife. Do you remember me? We used to make out under the
bleachers in fifth period.”
What? thought Jay, glaring at Nicholas's back. She had a distant
recollection of a curvy blonde with platinum hair two years her junior.
Hadn't Amanda been the one who was always being cited for dress code
violations? She looked very pretty now. Tight jeans and a cardigan left
unbuttoned to show off a tasteful amount of lace-covered cleavage.
Good for Amanda Strife, Jay thought, surprising herself with her own
bitterness.
“No,” Nicholas was saying. “Sorry. I don't remember. I'm bad with
names.”
“I'm sure,” said Amanda, after a brief hesitation. “You must be so busy
now. What are you up to these days? Elizabeth mentioned that you two had
been meeting for drinks.”
Elizabeth?
“I haven't been meeting with anyone lately. I'm swamped with work.”
His head turned briefly down the aisle, giving her a glimpse of his profile.
“Was it Liz Wong?” he asked abruptly. “I believe we met to discuss one of
her husband's projects.”
“Yes,” Amanda said, with far more enthusiasm than really seemed
necessary. “Liz is my friend. And she had nothing but good things to say
about you! She told me I should speak to you, actually, since you're so
involved with the community.”
“Oh?”
“My PR firm is blowing up. We recently moved offices after our latest
expansion, so now we're based in Laguna Beach. We have several very
prominent influencers as our clients—even a couple A-list celebrities. The
expansion is killing me—but in a good way,” she added, leaning forward on
her cart the tiniest bit. “I like having to work for it.”
Jay felt the heat rise to her face. Oh my God, she thought, embarrassed.
Is she—?
“Yeah.” Nicholas folded his arms, drawing Amanda's gaze. “I know the
feeling.”
“You know, I've always thought it was so sweet how you stayed in this
town after what happened with your father and your sister. I mean, look at
you. Big man on campus and you're still doing your own shopping. It's
honestly so humbling.”
Nicholas made a sound Jay couldn't interpret. “You're the first to call
me humble.”
“Well, I'm delighted to be your first,” said Amanda, in a way that really
left no doubts at all to what she really meant. “Would you like to grab a cup
of coffee, Nick? We can talk business. Maybe catch up? I don't think I've
laid eyes on you since high school. You look good.”
“I'll give you one of my cards.” Nick rifled through his jeans pocket,
missing the look of disappointment on her face. “My administrative
assistant will schedule you. Call before noon or I get completely booked.
And now I really need to find someone, so if you'll excuse me—”
Nick turned. Jay fled.

Nicholas shoved the business cards back into his wallet and strolled
past the aisles, scanning them for Jay. It never failed to amuse him how
people just seemed to crawl out of the woodwork at the slightest hint of
success. Like worms surfacing after a heavy rain.
Oh, he remembered Amanda. But forgetting was a simple way to put
people in their place, especially when distance became a necessity. She had
been so certain of him that the brief look of hurt on her face had been
gratifying. Sometimes people needed to be reminded where they stood.
It didn't take long to find Jay; it was a small store and she was wearing
bright colors. He found her in the dairy aisle, staring at the fake milk. At the
first sign of movement, she tensed, glancing at him and then away as he
casually reached around her to grab a few cartons of oat milk and put them
in the cart.
“I wondered where you went.” His body brushed against hers. “Are
you ready to go?”
“I think so.” Jay looked down at her full basket. Not meeting his eyes.
How much of her submission was because of the debt? If she wasn't so
desperately afraid of having her mother ruined and her reputation destroyed,
would she still feel so soft when she fell asleep curled in his arms? Would
she look at him with that same hopeless wanting in her eyes when he
pinned her to the bed? It was in there now, though she was trying to hide it,
and he heard her let out a rough sigh as he impulsively hugged her from
behind, smoothing his hand over her front as he gave her soft little body a
squeeze.
“What are you doing?” She gripped his forearm. “Someone might see.”
“I don't really care.” He toyed with the zipper on her sweatshirt. “Let
them look.”
“Even if it gets back to your office that your secretary is actually your
sister?” She began to squirm and he let her duck under his arm. “You can't
touch me like that in public. Everyone knows someone here.”
“And that's why you always hated it here, isn't it? Because you hate
being noticed.”
Her mouth fell open in surprise. “What makes you think that?”
“Because it's true.” Nicholas stooped to pick up the basket and put it in
the cart, considering its contents while she tried to compose her face. “This
doesn't look like much. In the restaurant you were prattling on about lentils
and aguafaba. I thought you might want to cook.”
“Aquafaba,” she said automatically, clutching the front of her
sweatshirt. “No, I'm fine.”
“Jay,” he said, gratified when she glanced up, attentive and wary. “I'm
serious. Get whatever you need.”
“Fine.” He saw her jaw clench as she looked at the shelves, instantly
defiant. She yanked the zipper up to her throat. “I forgot juice. I'll be right
back.”
Nicholas watched her walk away. The ribbon in her hair fluttered in her
wake.
Amanda went by, glancing at him, and then at Jay, who didn't even
notice her. She stared hard at Jay, eyes narrowed, before doing another take
at him. Isn't that your sister? She mouthed.
Nicholas stared at her grimly until she blushed and walked away.
Hollybrook had a long memory as far as his family was concerned. His
father had dumped a lot of money into this town and once the scandal had
come to light, women began to question their husbands, and men began to
question their loyalties. Jay had been the town golden girl who had refused
to rally behind her family as they tried to close ranks, and he had been the
reformed black sheep who had stepped up when his father died and his
stepmother fell out of favor.
Is this about revenge?
It wasn't—not really. Not for the reasons she thought, anyway. She
thought it was about his father, but it was all about her . . . and how she had
peeled back his armor and exposed that raw part of his soul that he
preferred to pretend didn't exist.
No, he really didn't give a fuck about his father, but Jay's leaving had
filled him with a silent, wasting fury: hot black fire that consumed whatever
it touched, creating a barren void of sensation that had pushed him to dark
extremes in an attempt to fill the emptiness she left behind.
For a year, he had basked in the slow immolation of his own tenuous
constraints; and then, as soon as he'd discovered his limits, he had gotten
bored and disillusioned.
No one else made him feel anything. Not the way she did.
Nicholas glanced around them impatiently, reaching for his wallet
again. As far as he knew, nobody knew what his relationship with Jay had
really been like, either, so there was no need for them to stare so intensely.
Maybe they were waiting to see if he was going to strangle her.
“I like this brand,” said the cashier, holding up the oat milk when they
were at the checkout. “It tastes almost like the real thing.”
“Me too,” said Jay, gripping onto the edge of the counter like she was
afraid of going under. “It's a little sweet, so you don't even need sugar. I just
wish it didn't curdle when it gets hot.”
The cashier hesitated. “Are you together or separate?”
“Together,” said Nicholas, looking at Jay. Daring her to contradict him.
She stared down at her bags, twisting her hair the way she did whenever she
was nervous.
“Together,” Jay echoed without enthusiasm as the cashier turned to her.
You're mine, Jay Varens, he thought. This time, you're not getting away.
Chapter Twenty-One
2017

Jay threw herself into her work with the fiercely contained passion that
cranked all of his internal dials to ten. She was the same way when she
cooked; he had seen her prepping her meals, paying particular attention to
her hands. Normally prone to trembling and shaking, Nicholas had never
once seen her hands falter while she was wielding a knife.
They hadn't trembled in those handcuffs, either.
And the more she gave to him in bed, the more he craved. He hadn't
been keeping count of the hours she spent with him, but he guessed it was
close to thirty. Roughly 1% of the debt based on the value that he had
arbitrarily assigned to her. At this rate, it would take her four years, which
was double the average most couples spent together in a non-transactional
relationship.
No wonder everyone ends up single or divorced, he thought cynically.
The rest of the week flew by in a whirlwind of meetings and
presentations. There were days when his calendar filled up before ten. In the
middle of the week, he had a business lunch with Arthur Hartwell,
ostensibly to discuss the financial health of the company, but also an excuse
for Arthur to write off lunches in Ridgeview on the company's dime. Arthur
had grown up there and was nostalgic about his hometown in a way that
bordered on fanatic.
They met at a Southeast Asian fusion restaurant called Down Buloh,
which was across the street from two unlikely neighbors: a lingerie shop
and an ice cream parlor. Nicholas glanced at both with amusement before
stepping through the doors, where he was greeted immediately by the sound
of running water and harp music, both coming from a discreetly placed CD
player.
Arthur was already there, chatting with the hostess, and the two of
them were seated in the back. Both of them ordered pineapple-fried rice as
a side, but Nicholas ordered the chicken satay, while Arthur ordered the
chili crab. It came in the shell, much to Arthur's bewilderment, and Nicholas
watched with ill-concealed amusement as he began cracking it with the
provided cutter.
“Did you want to try some?” he asked. “It's not that spicy and I've
ordered far too much.”
“No, thank you. I think the crab might clash with the peanut sauce.”
“I'll take the extras home with me then. Maybe the wife can turn it into
stew.”
Nicholas shrugged, possessing neither a wife nor cooking ability, and
Arthur began sliding the shredded crab around on his plate like a guilty
schoolchild.
“Let's get down to brass tacks.” Arthur scooped up some rice with the
crab. “The health of the company is very good right now. We have several
million in the bank and about sixty-five percent of our current investment
portfolio is profitable.”
“And the other thirty-five?”
“Can be written off. We don't get taxed on loss, remember. Just gains.”
“Right.” Nicholas picked up a skewer and began sliding the pieces off
with a fork. “What's our current ninety-day plan? I'm assuming we have
one.”
“I can give you our one-eighty-day plan. By next year, I'd actually like
to see the company go international. We'll have to hire on a new team of
global accountants, but I think it will be more lucrative in the long run. It's a
big world out there, Nicholas. Especially in manufacturing.”
“I'd want to see the projected costs of expansion before I commit to
something that big. We wouldn't just be adding on to Accounting—we'd
need to hire on an entire international team or create a new team and begin
to fill it with existing employees who'd want to make that lateral move. And
lawyers,” he finished grimly. “Lawyers well versed in international tax
laws.”
“There's always growing pains,” Arthur said, wiping his sauce-stained
hands on a napkin. “I'll have Annica pull up our numbers from the last five
years and create a graph. There was a big hiring wave three years ago, and I
can run up those costs. We can do a cross-analysis.”
Nicholas set the empty stick of bamboo on his plate and leaned back.
The only thing more satisfying than a full meal was data-driven metrics.
“Send me an email when you have the numbers and I'll have Jay block
some time off. We can make another lunch out of it.”
“I'll do that. As it happens, there's a new vegan place I've been wanting
to try. Everything on the menu is made with avocados.” Arthur tossed down
his napkin and flagged down the waiter for a take-out box. “How is your
new assistant settling in? She seems nicer than the last one.”
Nicholas, slipping his card to the waiter, was mildly surprised that
Arthur even remembered he had an assistant, let alone a new one. But
Arthur was like Jay that way; he didn't just remember, he cared. “She is.
She's fielding most of Acquisitions' potential leads and doing such a good
job that Stacey seems to be planning on stealing her from me.”
Arthur laughed. “Brave of her.”
“That's one word for it.” The card returned with a plate of kuih seri
muka, a trifle-like dessert made with glutinous rice and pandan custard.
Nicholas ate one, enjoying the floral sweetness of it as he tucked his card
back into his wallet. “I'd call it mutinous.”
“Well, you know Stacey,” Arthur said in amusement. “She considers
herself the captain of her own ship.”
“A captain is nothing without her crew,” Nicholas said. “If she steals
my assistant, I might take it upon myself to deny her request for a hiring
budget.” Arthur laughed again, although he hadn't been joking. Smiling
thinly, he slid the plate towards the other man. “Try it—it's good.”
“You can have mine.” Arthur shrugged back into his coat. “At my age,
I need to watch my sugar intake and I don't think I care much for desserts
that are green. It's been a pleasure, by the way. One of these days, we
should get together outside of work. I don't think you've ever met my wife.”
“No, I haven't.” But he'd seen the picture on Arthur's desk and could
imagine what she'd be like in person—loud, cheerful, unfiltered. Probably
adequate in bed. Not that you could tell that from a picture, but Arthur was
entirely too cheerful for a man enduring mediocre sex. “I'll see you at the
office,” he said aloud. “I'm going to take a quick walk before driving back.”
“I don't blame you,” Arthur said. “If I had your schedule, I'd run, too.”
Nicholas took his time getting back into his blazer before strolling
across the street to the lingerie shop he had spotted earlier. After firmly
shrugging off the overly helpful salesgirl, he picked out a few things for
Jay, crushing the silk and lace in his hands and imagining crushing her body
to his while she was wearing them. The thought of feeling her respond to
his touch through those thin wisps of nothing filled him with such raw
desire that it felt like an ache.
It was the same piercing agony he'd felt every time Jay looked right
through him when they were young. She'd seen him—but not the way he'd
wanted. Not until he'd made her look. He hadn't been able to touch her then,
but now there were consequences for driving him crazy.
He kept the bag in his trunk until dinner that evening, which he had
ordered from the same Thai place as before. She looked everywhere but at
him as she examined a piece of lilac-colored lace. It was one of the
negligees and he saw the exact moment that she realized she was holding
the front of the gown. Then she noticed him watching her and her brows
furrowed as she hastily shoved the fabric back in the bag. “What am I
supposed to do with these?”
“Wear them,” he replied laconically, allowing himself a smile. “Or did
you want help putting them on?”
That made her face fire up like a kiln.
Jay disappeared after that, taking the bag with her. She didn't come out
of her room again for the rest of the evening. Nicholas let her hide,
wondering if she had tried on any of the clothes. He didn't imagine that she
would lounge around in dishabille, but there had been a brief look of
wistfulness on her face as she'd handled the delicate fabric that made him
suspect that she would end up yielding to her curiosity, if she hadn't already.
That look got to him but he made himself wait.
He was very good at waiting.

If one lesson had stuck with her from childhood, it was that gifts never
came without strings.
Nicholas had obviously gone to some trouble. The tags on everything
had been removed but she knew from the feel of the fabric and the detail of
the lacework that they were costly, and they were all in colors she liked, in
textures that felt enticingly good against the skin.
Jay had tried on one of the nightgowns, tempted by the beautiful skirt
which consisted of elaborate panels of silk, mesh, and lace, with the
embroidered flowers spiraling around the body stitched so delicately that it
felt like one touch might cause them to melt like ice. It had seemed
deceptively modest with the floating silk butterfly sleeves and empire waist,
but most of the bodice was open mesh covered by only a few strategically
placed spirals of flowery lace.
It wasn't hard to imagine what he might do to her while she was
wearing this. Not when the heat of his mouth flickering against her like a
torch was such a recent memory. Not when he stared at her the way he did.
That's probably why he bought them. She slid her hand over the ice-blue
silk, thin enough that she could feel the heat of her own hand. Because he
likes control.
But that didn't feel right, either. Control was part of it, yes, but it wasn't
just about control. If Nicholas had only wanted to make her feel powerless,
there were other things he could have done to her. She fingered the stitching
on the roses, caught herself, and looked away.
She was intensely aware of him over the next few days. He seemed to
be watching her more closely than usual, almost as if he were waiting for
something. Even at work, she would look up to find herself the subject of
his study; it was a heavy, ponderous look, with a dark edge that put a catch
in her breathing.
While taking notes during his meetings, she had seen his prospective
clients fall to pieces under that unrelenting stare. One of them had walked
in with a hastily drawn-up contract that would have guaranteed only .5% of
profits for an investment of one million dollars. Nicholas had been furious
and after sliding the unsigned and now-marked up contract back across the
table, had, over the course of an hour, bumped the investment fee up to a
grim 2.5% share of the profits on his holdings. The man had walked out
looking like he'd been hit by a speeding train.
And Nicholas had just sat there afterwards continuing to take notes,
seemingly unaffected by the victory. He had been the exact same with way
at her in the diner, and she had thought he'd been posturing then, but the
other CEO was no longer around to see him flaunt his indifference.
Unless he's posturing for me.
Glancing at the closed door, Jay said, “Isn't that good for you? The
two-percent?”
He glanced briefly at her, before looking back at his screen. That look
of icy menace had faded but his handsome features hadn't quite thawed.
“Three percent would have been better and I probably could have pushed
him up to four. He knew he was fucked. Make sure you send me the notes
from today's meeting, along with a scanned copy of the contract.”
And then he had closed his computer, holding the door for her as they
both walked out.
It had been a strange and chilling insight into his mind that should have
sent her running and she wasn't sure why he was affecting her this way,
when he should have been so easy to despise.
That Friday evening they'd had Chinese takeout and an Alsatian wine.
She had let him pour her a small glass to go with her mixed vegetables and
sesame tofu, which had made her brain feel syrupy and calm. Even when
he'd suggested that she might wear her new clothes, she had felt only a
flicker of panic. “Whatever you want,” she said, because it seemed to annoy
him, and because she was reckless and confused, and because the wine
seemed to loosen her tongue.
She had been about to pour herself a second glass, but Nicholas had
moved the bottle out of reach. “I think you're at your limit, Jay,” he said,
filling his own instead, while she glared at him. Like you care about limits.
“Don't look at me like that. I could drink you under an entire warehouse
filled with tables and you know it.”
That was probably true. His father had always seemed to have a drink
in his hand and she had never seen Nicholas drunk. He wouldn't want to
surrender control. He was always so tightly contained, and had been even as
a boy. The last time she'd seen him really lose it—
He made you cry.
Jay bit her lip, not wanting to remember. Shooting another wary glance
at him, she gathered her dishes to place them in the dishwasher before
going to her room.
Maybe everyone here thought he was a wunderkind, but she knew what
he was like.
Once dressed, she slipped into her robe, knotting the sash firmly in
place, and got into bed.
It was the tug at her midsection that woke her. The bow at her waist
was undone and she could smell that sharp citrus scent. “Nick?” she asked,
still sleepy, but wary now, as well. He was lying next to her, leaning on one
arm. The other was on her face, turning her towards him.
“I let you sleep,” he said, running his hand down her cheek. “You were
out like a light.”
While you watched? “What . . .” She cleared her throat, feeling shy and
nervous and hating herself a little for getting so flustered. “Um. What time
is it?”
He kissed her mouth in response; he tasted minty, which clashed with
the sweetness of the wine still clinging to her tongue. The bed shook as he
rolled over her and his hands smoothed possessively over her bared
collarbone as he pushed open her robe.
“Midnight.” She felt him trace along the delicate straps with a finger,
following the lines of her neck and shoulders, before trailing down her ribs.
It was as if his touch lifted trails of rime in his wake and she was too
exhausted to resist the intoxicating chill that made her body burn even as it
left her feeling cold and vanquished inside. “I was waiting for you, little
bird.”
Waiting for her. She heard him sigh and then he followed the same path
he'd traced before, this time with his mouth, kissing each of her breasts,
before sucking her nipples into his mouth and drawing hard through the
cloth. She inhaled as he bit her very gently, before moving down her belly,
tracing the outline of her sex with his tongue.
“I don't understand you,” she blurted, ashamed at how breathless it
sounded.
“I'm hard to read.” Nicholas added pressure as he kissed her and her
hips bucked against his face. “Do you spend a lot of time trying to figure
me out?”
“No,” she said, as the sleeves of her robe pooled at her elbows.
“No, what?”
Jay cried out as his mouth became less gentle. “No, Daddy.”
“I've spent a lot of time figuring you out. That's why I know when
you're lying to me . . . just like you're doing right now.” He lightly grazed
her with his teeth, the touch making her jump as much as his words. “Why
lie, though? Unless you think about me often.”
Fuck. Jay sucked in a breath that still tasted like mint. “I don't think
about you at all.”
“I bet you touch yourself while you're thinking about me.” Nicholas sat
up to take his shirt off before sliding her robe off her arms. “Just like I
would.”
She could taste herself on his mouth as he kissed her, just beneath the
mint. The kiss was as impassioned as his words were cold and the sound
that came out of her mouth didn't sound much like denial. His fingers
knotted in the fine silk, working the hem higher and higher until lifted her
arms, and he broke the kiss just long enough to tug her camisole over her
head.
Nobody touches me like this.
Jay closed her eyes against the traitorous thought as his lips returned to
hers and her shorts were pulled from her legs. He slid his hand between her
thighs, stroking over her folds in a casually exploratory way before
plunging two fingers inside her and crooking them. Jay gasped into his
mouth as he stroked her from within, before slowly withdrawing his hand
and thrusting into her more quickly, this time while pressing down on her
clit. She found herself gripping him as if she wanted to climb him. She
could almost forget he was paying her to do this.
Almost.
“Just listen to you.” A shudder wracked his shoulders as her hands
dragged over his sides.
All she could think about were his fingers and the seductive menace of
his words.
“I want to see you come,” he told her, as she gasped for breath. “I can
feel it, but I want to watch it—I want to watch you. I still remember how
you bit your lip—the way you arched your back. You were so rough when
you touched yourself.”
It took her a moment to realize what he meant and when his arm
moved, she panicked, all of her desire abruptly swirling away like paint
down a drain. “No.” She grabbed his free hand before he could move
towards the light. “Don't do that. Please.”
“Why not?” He slid his fingers out of her. “Tell me why.” At her
silence, he pressed on, sternly. “Did something happen to you? Did
someone do something to you?”
Yes, she thought, as her breathing quickened involuntarily. You did.
Wetting her cracked lips, Jay managed to say, in a level tone, “I don't
want to look.”
“At?”
“Anything.” She exhaled slowly. “So, please. Don't.”
Nicholas considered her words. The silence stretched.
I know when you're lying to me.
“You're breathing very fast,” he said, which made her eyes snap
automatically towards him, even though it was too dark to glimpse his face.
“You were breathing like this when you ran from me in the den.”
“I don't know what that has to do with this.”
“Don't you?” he asked, in a darkly ironic tone.
Jay stiffened as his hand flexed in hers, freeing himself from her grasp.
No, she thought, as her heart began to pound wildly. Suddenly, it felt as if
she were fighting herself for control.
You're a terrible liar.
When she felt him lean back, she tightened her grip on his neck. His
pulse was so slow. It seemed wrong that it could be so slow, so steady. No,
he was a dangerous man, and once again, she had allowed him to back her
into a corner.
“Wait,” she said. “N-no. Don't go. Please don't—”
“I'm not going to post the photograph if you don't let me rape you,” he
said coldly, and her fingers dug in. Hard enough that she felt his flesh jump
a little under her touch.
Rape.
“D-don't say it like that,” she snapped, letting her hands fall away as
her panic cracked open to reveal the boiling agony underneath. “Those were
your terms. That was your price. You came to San Francisco to . . . to buy
me.” When Nicholas remained chillingly silent, she drew in another breath.
“But I guess that's not surprising since acquisitions seem to be your
specialty.”
“Jay.” Her name was a snarl on his lips.
“What? It's not like you really care about me. This is business—isn't
that what you said to me, Nicholas? You just want to fuck me. Well you
did.” She fell back against the mattress, trying not to cry. “You did. I
wondered how you were going to try to break me this time. I knew it would
hurt—because it always does—but this . . . this is so much worse.”
“Is that what you think?” It was the tone he'd used with that man in the
conference room, right before he'd said, You must think I didn't read this
contract, because there's no fucking way you would ask me to sign this if
you thought I did. “You think that's what I fucking want?”
“Isn't it? I'm surprised you didn't let me get drunk at dinner,” she added
bitterly. “Since you seem to be so in love with the idea of a powerless
captive you can fuck.”
When he spoke, there was no emotion in his voice at all. “I see.” She
couldn't quite suppress her flinch when his thumb slid down her cheek. His
touch was gentle but paired with that icy voice, it wasn't exactly calming,
and when his hand brushed against her throat, she felt a chill. “You have no
idea,” he began, forbiddingly. “You don't know what you—”
“What?” she said, when he cut himself off.
But all he did was laugh—it was a cold, terrible laugh: it was the laugh
of a man who knew he was damned, and no longer cared, and it was just
wild enough to scare her. “If I were half as depraved as you seem to think I
am, ten million dollars would get me so much further than it does with you.
I could tell someone to bend over and they'd ask me which direction.”
“Don't talk to me like that,” Jay said, dizzied by fury and anguish.
“What's the matter? Too crude? Long walks on the beach and kisses
without tongue sound more your speed? Everyone has a price—and I found
yours. There's nothing wrong with being mercenary about it. What you're
doing isn't that much different from paying off a car.”
Anger pulsed through her, so hot and bright that for a moment, it
eclipsed everything—even the fear—and she couldn't even breathe. He
caught her hands in his as she swung out blindly to strike him and arousal
pulsed dully through her at the familiar brutality of it. “I hate you!”
“So tell me to go,” Nicholas said, in that tone of terrible, glacial calm.
“Tell me how much you hate this, and I'll leave right now. Otherwise, I'm
going to fuck you.” Jay jerked in his grip again and this time, he lowered
her hands by the wrists. “Tell me.”
“Fuck you,” she whispered.
Nicholas made a sound, too dark and bleak to be a laugh, as he slid
down his pants.
“You're so predictable.” He ran his thumb along the inside of her wrist,
still so gentle despite the stinging cruelty of his words. She wanted it to
hurt. She wanted another reason to hurt him, when he seemed so immune to
it. “I think you're getting off on this.”
“Fuck you,” she cried.
Nicholas sank into her as her rage vibrated in her throat like a purr.
“Yes,” he said. “Fuck me. Give it all up to me, my sweet, precious bird. I
can take it.”
She thrashed beneath him, hooking a leg around him with such
violence that it was more like a kick. It made him recoil. Their hands were
still clasped and with his body pressed against hers, she could feel the
tension inside him, almost like he was holding himself back. And then he
rocked against her hard enough that he knocked her flat on the bed with a
deep thrust that made her ache. “That's right. Give it all to Daddy.”
Jay bucked again, unconsciously tilting her hips to an angle that would
allow her to take more of him in. He kept her wrists pinned as another
shudder tore through him. This time, the sound wouldn't stop when it left
her lips—it took several heaves of her chest for her to realize that she was
sobbing, each hitching breath splicing the sound into a ragged cry.
Open your eyes and look at me.
The words, relics from her past, stole the air from her lungs. I'm close,
she thought, wondering at how she could feel so good and so bad, all at
once. When she came, it felt like she was on the verge of a black abyss, one
hard push from falling.
“No,” she said, “No, no, no—I can't . . .”
“What do you mean . . . you can't?”
“Please,” she gasped. “Let me go.”
He stilled without releasing her, an indomitable force, and Jay realized,
with a sinking sensation, that she didn't even have to wonder what would
happen if he didn't stop.
“All right.” Nicholas rolled onto his back, pulling her against him. She
didn't resist—she was too surprised that he had given in. As far as she knew,
he yielded nothing to no one. “It's all right,” he repeated, sounding a little
strained. “I won't do anything else.”
She stared bleakly into the darkness as he pulled her hair out of her
face. She could feel him twisting it in his fingers, gathering bunches of it in
a way that caused a series of gentle tugs at her scalp. The feel of his hands
was so achingly familiar.
That wasn't what I meant.
“Nick.”
“Shh.” He brushed the tears from her cheek as she swallowed back
another cry. “Don't cry. I didn't mean to make my little bird cry.” She
winced, turning her head away until her face was buried against his
shoulder, and heard him say softly, “Sweet little blue jay.”
I'll be so, so gentle.
She felt like she was drowning in him. What a lie.
“Tell me what you want,” he said, still calm, but with a strange urgency
fueling his words. “Name anything and it's yours.”
“Forgive the debt,” she said brokenly. “Let me go.” When he didn't
respond, she swallowed back another sob. “Please. If you ever loved me at
all, you'll let me go. You said you would.”
“No,” he said, after a measured pause. “I can't do that.”
She pulled away from him, then. She felt his hands tighten briefly, as if
he were going to hold her prisoner in the cage of his embrace, but then he
appeared to think better of it. Jay grabbed fabric as she left, speeding down
the hall, down the stairs, gripping the rail tightly as she was blinded by
tears, each one burning as cold as a star in a constellation of abject misery.

Nicholas woke up next to a purring cat staring at him with unblinking
yellow eyes. It gave him a start and he stared incredulously as the cat's eyes
slowly closed again. It took him a moment to realize that he'd fallen asleep
in Jay's bed. The pillows smelled like her shampoo.
I can't let you go.
Jay hadn't returned after running off. He was alone, except for the cat,
which had made itself comfortable on the discarded camisole that was now
sporting many small holes and runs in the silk from being copiously
kneaded. Fucking cat.
He pushed himself up and grabbed his pants, which had been kicked to
the floor sometime in the night. The cat hopped off the bed, following him
with its tail sticking straight up like an exclamation point as he tried,
unsuccessfully, to locate his shirt. An unhappy meow chased him out into
the hall as he shut the door on its expectant face.
From his bedroom, Nicholas got a different shirt, glancing instinctively
at the sofa and the bed, even though he knew he would find Jay in neither
place. If she hadn't felt comfortable returning to her own room, she
certainly wouldn't retreat to his. It occurred to him that she might be upset
enough to leave but—no, she wouldn't abandon her pet. Not with him.
It had been like that before. The night of his father's party, he had
returned to find her gone. Her cat, her clothes, her favorite things. She'd
taken what she wanted and left everything else. For weeks, he'd wondered
where she'd gotten the money. Who had helped her get away.
And then, he'd only wondered at how to get her back.
Nicholas walked downstairs and heard a very soft noise come from the
direction of the den. He stopped walking and turned around. There, in the
bluish gloom, Jay was curled in her robe, wrapped in the tasseled throw on
the sofa with her arms wrapped around one of the cushions. Her eyelashes
were clumped, like she'd cried herself to sleep.
As he watched, her eyes opened slowly, and he saw that they were redrimmed. She froze, her fingers seeking the edges of the throw as if to check
that she was still fully covered. The hunted, desperate look on her face
made his chest feel curiously tight.
Did I push her too far?
Nicholas thought she might scream at him but instead she looked away.
Her jaw was tense and she looked like she might bolt if pushed. He couldn't
think of anything to say to her that would be reassuring, so he went to the
kitchen, hovering by the door, and heard the soft creep of her footsteps
disappearing up the stairs. Moving quickly. Nearly running.
Her door was closed when he walked back into the hall. He could just
glimpse it through the rails. She was going to hide. Nicholas bustled around
the house impatiently, waiting for her to come back out, but the door
remained shut. He had the key, but he knew that using it would shatter
whatever remaining shards of trust that still hung tenuously between them,
if any.
He went to his room to shower, and when he came back down to the
kitchen, there was a new plate in the dishwasher, as well as several bottles
missing from the fridge. Almost like she'd stockpiled a hoard of food and
drink up there with the intention of waiting him out all weekend.
If you ever loved me at all, you'll let me go.
Manipulative words. Desperate words. But if she were really that
desperate, why not leave?
Maybe she didn't feel like she could.
Nicholas knocked on her door. He could hear shuffling sounds inside
and then it opened and she was looking up at him with a more composed
version of the look she had given him last night. “Blue jay.” He reached for
her, letting his hand still when she shied from him.
“What?” she asked. “Are you here to fuck me?”
“No,” he said. “Not right now.”
“Are you sure? You're paying a lot for me.” She folded her arms.
“Don't you want your money's worth? You told me yourself, you don't call
me down to talk.”
Nicholas felt a flicker of anger and wasn't sure who it was directed at,
but he recognized the sound of his own words being thrown back at him,
delivered in a mocking cadence of his own voice. She had gotten good at
wounding with her words before she left. When she had first come to this
place, she hadn't been vicious. She had been an odd blend of naive and
jaded, but there was no bitterness. Not then. But that had changed—she had
changed . . . and so had he.
He regarded her as she continued to stand there, bracing herself against
the wall. As if that could mask the trembling in her legs. He saw the resolve
begin to crumble from her face as she fought the urge to look away, and
when he took a slow step forward, she flinched towards the door. Nicholas
stopped moving, remembering how she had backed herself against the
copier.
“I'm here because I want a hiking partner,” he said. “I know you hiked
a lot in Berkeley and that you don't shy away from the difficult trails. I'm
willing to bill the hours to pay your debt.”
She stared up at him, her expression unreadable. “Fine,” she said
coldly. “I'll change.”
“Fifteen minutes,” he said.
The door didn't quite slam in his face, but she closed it just hard
enough to reveal her anger. Too good to be corrupted by the devil, he
thought, but not too good to take the devil's money.
Shaking his head, Nicholas changed into a worn gray shirt and cargo
shorts, sticking his sunglasses into one pocket and his phone and wallet into
the other. Everyone has their price, he reminded himself. He knew hers—it
was her sense of honor, and it was much cheaper than she wanted it to be.
But then, honor wasn't particularly remunerative in a world that didn't value
it.
Especially with how quick all of her so-called friends and family had
been to sell her out.
And now, he had forced her to sell herself.
He grabbed a backpack out of the front closet and began filling it with
water and granola bars. Jay came out of her room while he was lacing up
his boots in the front hall. He watched her climb down the stairs. She was
wearing track pants and a tank top. The jacket that matched the pants was
knotted around her hips and she had tied her hair back into a severe bun.
“I'm ready.”
“Good,” he said. “Let's go.”
Jay swung herself into his car and sullenly buckled herself in. Nicholas
turned on the radio, glancing at her periodically as he drove. She sat stiffly
in her seat with her purse on her lap, picking at the flecking fake leather.
Just as soon as it occurred to him that he could get her a better bag, he
found himself facing the realization that she wouldn't accept it.
Nicholas parked the car in the dusty lot. It was a hot day and the hills
were blazing with light. There were quite a few other cars—more than he
was used to on this trail. Probably people hoping to take advantage of the
fading cloud cover before the afternoon heat became unbearable. Even in
spring, it was hot. Cracked, dry earth where the trees and shrubs just barely
clung to life. Sheets of rock exposed by years of weathering and erosion.
The air had a stale, mineral tang that would periodically be seasoned by a
whiff of some herbal, verdant smell as some unknown plant was crushed
underfoot, releasing its fragrance into the air.
Jay didn't appear to be in the mood for talking. She walked slightly
behind him in silence, redolent of sweat and sunscreen. She had taken a
Modelo baseball cap from his car, squeezing her bun through the bracketing
like a bunny tail, and despite the heat, she was wearing her jacket to cover
her arms. “You're going to want to lose the jacket. You're about to get very
warm.”
She rolled the sleeves up to her forearms. “I would prefer to keep it
on.”
“Your choice.”
“Is it?” she asked.
Nicholas unzipped his backpack and handed her a cold bottle of water,
letting her question hang in the air as he uncapped his own and took a long,
cooling drink.
I would have let you go.
Maybe he was even lying to himself.
The heat was oppressive but it made everything more vivid. Sprays of
mustard flowers and California poppies looked almost neon with the sun
bathing the petals in pure, saturated flashes of color. It was exactly the kind
of thing he knew she loved, and he could tell from the look on her face that
she was trying hard not to enjoy it because she was so upset at him.
But he hadn't been able to get to where he was today by being a poor
read on people; he knew her—he knew her better than anyone—and if he
couldn't offer words of comfort, he could take her out to the hills, plunk her
down in the middle of nature, and dare her not to like it.
At one point, Jay went still, a strange expression on her face. She was
watching a mountain lion skulking in the bushes like a sandy shadow,
holding one of its own spotted kittens in its snowy mouth. The cat glanced
at them, before quickly scampering away, but he was too busy watching her
face, savoring that brief flicker of childlike delight.
“They're shy,” she said, almost to herself. “They only go after small
and easy prey.”
It was the first piece of conversation she'd willingly volunteered all
morning. “Do they eat people?” he asked idly, like he didn't really care
either way.
“Not usually. And if they were going to, they wouldn't go after you.”
“I liked the little one in its mouth. It reminds me of yours.”
She looked at him unwillingly. “Carbon?”
“No. The white one.”
“Oh. I don't have Gypsum anymore.” Jay glanced off into the trees,
visibly withdrawing as she took another sip of water. “She died two years
ago.”
“Where did the other one come from?”
“Lily's mom found Carbon in the garage of her home in San Bruno. He
was part of a litter and her parents needed people to take the kittens. Lily's
allergic,” she added absently, as she picked at the peeling sleeve of her
water bottle, “so I said yes.”
“What made you pick him?”
“He was the only black one. I was so afraid he wouldn't get adopted. If
you go to shelters, they're full of little black cats and kittens nobody wants,
because people are superstitious or think they're evil or because they don't
photograph well.” Her voice broke. “I wanted him to be mine.”
Lucky fucking cat. “I'm surprised you just have the one.”
“I can only afford the one,” she said, in a way that suggested that she'd
probably done the math. “But every year I donate some money to the local
shelter and I—”
She did a double-take and abruptly stopped speaking.
“And you?” he prompted.
“Stop. Stop doing that,” she said. “Using your charm to manipulate me.
It's so cheap.”
“Then tell me how I should be, Jay. You say you don't like it when I try
to charm you, but you don't seem to like it when I'm crude, either. You want
to know what I think? I think you don't hate me as much as you want to.
You've hated me for so long because it's easy, and because you need
something to fight against. I bet you came here expecting the worst, and it
really fucking bothers you that I'm not the monster you expected me to be.”
“Let me guess,” she said, taking a step back. “You're really a nice guy.”
“No,” Nicholas said. “I'm not nice. You were nice. Hollybrook's little
angel. Not me. Everything people say about me is true—but I'm not a
monster.”
“Yes, you are.” She let out a harsh breath like she was fighting to keep
herself from saying more. “I should take your keys and leave you here.”
“I'm sure you could find a way to do that if that's what you really want
to do.” Nicholas brushed a few dead leaves from his shirt. “You were
always the smart one. I never really gave a shit one way or the other.”
“And yet, life worked out great for you. Imagine that.”
“Yeah, it did. Poor little rich boy. Look at me now. Millionaire under
thirty. I'm surprised you didn't turn out more bitter than you are. Life didn't
turn out so great for you, did it, Jay?”
“What is that supposed to mean? Do you think you're saving me from
the gutters by forcing me to play dress-up in your little mansion? My life
isn't shit, you bastard. I had a good job with good friends and an apartment I
earned myself. I love my cat and feel lucky that I can take myself out once
in a while if I work hard and budget responsibly. Everything I did, I did
myself.”
“And I didn't?” he asked dangerously.
“Your father gave you your company,” she scoffed, “just like he gave
you everything else.”
Nicholas turned so sharply that he sent her skittering into the skinny
trunk of the tree. “My father embezzled so much money out of the company
that it was practically hollow. I had to bail it out of the water with a
fiduciary bucket. The lawsuits had us nearly in the red. I had to take out
loans and beg for people to lend me money they knew I might not be able to
pay back to fix what he did. The money your mother seems to think is his—
it isn't. It's all mine.”
“So you're using your own money to control me this time,” she said
shakily. “Big man. Well, guess what. When I was just eighteen, your father
put his hand on my knee and told me how glad he'd be to kick my mother
out if I married him instead. So guess what, Nicholas, I don't actually give a
shit about the money, or I could have been a millionaire under thirty, too.”
She glared at him with bright, watery eyes. “Maybe I'm not the whore you
seem to think I am.”
“When did this happen?”
“At that stupid resort in Laguna Beach. Right before I left for college.”
She swiped her eyes. “I could have been your mom instead of your sister.
How neat would that be? Really neat, huh? Really adds a whole other level
to the whole f—”
“Jay,” he said. “Stop. That's enough.”
Her eyes were bright. “This is all your fault.”
“I loved you.”
“No.” Jay folded her arms. “No. That wasn't love.”
“You were the only woman I wanted. The only woman I have ever
fucking wanted. No one else comes close. No one. My whole life—it's
always been you. There was a time when I would have given anything for a
kiss from you. I would have—” He broke off, thinking of his father, and his
eyes narrowed against the heat. “If I had known . . .”
“What, you wouldn't have been so cruel to me? You wouldn't have—
forced me?” Her voice wavered. “Do you even remember what you did to
me?”
“I remember,” he said. “Is that why you only let me touch you in the
dark, Jay? Because our first time was in a sunlit room and in the dark you
can pretend I'm someone else? Well, I didn't escape unscathed. Not even my
father could do what you did. You fucking wrecked me.”
“Good,” she said. “Maybe it will bleed some empathy into you. I just
wanted someone to love me. No strings attached. That's all I ever wanted—
and people wanted to hurt me for it. My mom. Your dad. You. I never
thought you were going to be the one in that house who was going to hurt
me, but you did—you hurt me worst of all.”
“Yes,” he said, even though it felt like something inside him had
shattered. “I know.”
“And you know what's really sick?” she cried, curling her fingers into
his shirt as if she could claw out his heart. “Sometimes—I didn't hate it. I
wanted to, God, I wanted to—I wanted to hate you. But sometimes I
couldn't and it made everything so much worse because it made me hate
myself instead. Why did you do that to me, Nick? Why?”
“Because you broke me,” he said, “and when the misery cleared away,
all I wanted to do was own you, hurt you, use you, until I made you feel as
broken as I did.”
“You did,” she rasped. “You achieved everything you set out to do, and
you did it twice.”
“I'm sorry.” The words were clumsy in his mouth and Jay didn't react to
them, didn't appear to have even have heard. “I'm so fucking sorry. I fucked
up. I fucked everything up.”
“Nick,” Jay said, and he waited. When she didn't speak, he gathered her
to his chest, and he could hear her muffled cries and feel her tears
dampening his skin through his shirt as he slowly slid down the trunk of the
tree until they were both sitting in the twisted shadow of a manzanita.
Chapter Twenty-Two
2008

Jay's four years at college were the best years of her life. Berkeley was
everything she had missed about San Francisco and the Bay Area in
general: the crunchy weirdness, the great food, the interesting people. It was
like going from paint-by-the-numbers to pure, colorful abstract, and the
only thing that soured it was the knowledge that she had to return home.
To Damon.
And Nick.
She had tried so, so hard to keep from having to go back to Hollybrook.
She'd applied everywhere for jobs but couldn't seem to secure anything
more seasoned than part-time. It was as if she looked great on paper, but for
whatever reason, things fell through as soon as she thought they were lined
up. And she couldn't afford to live here permanently. Not without something
more solid than waitress or comic bookstore clerk on her resume.
You will find no quarter with me.
Her stepfather's warning rang in her ears and she could feel herself
becoming more and more worried as time tightened to a funnel and her
remaining days began to dwindle.
Jay was surprised when they came to her graduation. She honestly
hadn't thought they'd bother. Her mother was wearing a low-cut top with a
thin scarf and matching beaded necklace despite the heat. Damon, as
always, looked as if he'd just come from a business meeting, and glanced at
her with cold eyes. And Nick—Nick had gotten tall.
She looked up at him in surprise when he embraced her, holding his
camera to one side by the strap—he had to be 6'4”. She could feel the heat
of him through his plaid shirt and the strength in his arms was formidable.
Brothers don't hug their sisters like this, she found herself thinking, as his
fingers singed her through her graduation robes and the thin dress she wore
beneath it, tracing over her back in a disconcertingly familiar way that felt
more like a lover than someone welcoming a beloved relative back home.
“Hey, blue jay,” he said, in a low, deep voice. “You're so little now.”
Jay smiled nervously, stepping back from him. You're so big, she
wanted to say, but something halted her. It sounded . . . wrong. Suggestive.
“I'm the same as I always was,” she said at last. “Maybe you changed.”
His mouth curled. “I have,” he agreed solemnly, with an edge to his
voice that sent the same chilling rush coursing through her that his embrace
had. “I'm a man now.”
Jay swallowed hard. One of her last memories of him was as an angry
fourteen-year-old boy, and even though she still wasn't quite sure what had
happened at Sable Blanc with Nick, she was pretty convinced that he had
been about to kiss her when he bent her over on the grass.
Looking at Nick now, Jay realized that she could no longer read him.
His face had thinned out and the shape of it was now alien to her, like
seeing a once-familiar landscape encrusted in ice and snow. All of that
sharp and vicious anger had frozen, and his sangfroid left her feeling
chilled. Her eyes fell uneasily to the camera around his neck. “You were
taking pictures of me?”
“Your mom thought it might be fun if we all pretended we were a
happy family.” He traced the zoom ring in a way that struck her as curiously
vulgar. “You want to see them?”
“I'll look later. I'm sure they're great. I'm sorry I couldn't go to your
graduation.”
“Don't worry about it. The whole thing was a farce. You want me to
take a close-up? You look good with your hair blowing back. I could get
one of you under the bougainvillea.”
Jay hesitated, glancing at the narrow cobbled sidewalk. It was empty.
“Okay,” she said uncertainly.
“Stand under the tree and look at me.”
The ease of the command was unsettling and she looked at him for a
moment before going to stand next to the flowering spray of purple vines.
“Here?”
“Right there.” Nick lifted the camera. “Relax your shoulders.”
Jay let her arms fall to the side, resting one on her hip the way she had
seen Jordan do. She heard a series of clicks and then he bent and shot a few
more, angling up. She stared at the black eye of the camera, biting her lip as
she inhaled the cloying the sweetness of the petals.
“Yes,” he said. “That's the look.”
What look is that? Jay stepped away from the flowers, picking a few of
the petals from her robe. Desperate to change the subject, she said, “I, um,
heard you got into Stanford.”
“Yeah.” Nick let the camera fall back against his chest as he rose. “You
sound surprised.”
“I'm not.” She resisted the urge to roll her eyes. “Of course you'd get
in. You're a legacy.”
“That wasn't the only reason.” He thumbed through the photos and a
lock of his hair fell into his eyes as he bent his head to view the screen. “I
have many talents.”
She was almost relieved when her blustering mother wandered over to
loudly congratulate her for being so smart—“just like her mother.” Jay
could see a few people glancing over at her mother's antics and it
embarrassed her, but focusing on her was still safer than Nick.
“Where shall we go?” her mother asked. “Lunch? I thought maybe
Italian.”
“Perhaps we should load up Justine's things,” said Damon.
“I can do that.” Nick looked over at her. “How much do you have?”
“Not much. Just a few boxes. Everything's already packed. Um.” She
hesitated. “I won't be going back with all of you, though—not right away.
My friend invited me to stay with her family in Half Moon Bay so I'll be
spending a few weeks with her and her family at their beach house.”
“Which friend?” her mother asked, like she actually cared.
“Her name is Jessi Yamato.”
“That's fine,” said Damon. “It's important to build connections with
your friends.”
Nick followed her into her room, ducking under the door frame that
had never struck her as being particularly low before. Jessi, who was
sorting cookware into a box, looked up. “Hello. Jay, who is this strapping
young man?”
“He's my little brother,” said Jay. “And he's only eighteen, so don't be a
sleaze.”
“Jay thinks everyone is as innocent as she is.” Nick stooped to pick up
one of her boxes. “She used to fill shot glasses with water at parties so she
could pretend to drink.”
“Nick.”
“Oh my God,” said Jessi, when Nick left. “Is that true? I thought your
drinks tasted weak.”
“I can't hold my liquor,” Jay said defensively. “Drinking more than one
makes me sick.”
“Why are you yelling?” Cori asked, wandering into their apartment. “I
hear yelling.”
“Jay's been drinking water at parties and telling people it's vodka this
whole time—just like we always suspected. Remember that vodka
screwdriver she had that just tasted like watered-down orange juice?” said
Jessi. “Who called her out? And she has a ridiculously hot brother who just
spilled the dirt.”
“And he's only eighteen,” said Jay. “You forgot that part, Jessi. He
literally just graduated from high school, you unbelievable cougar.”
“What's your brother's name, Jay?”
“Nicholas,” she said. “Nick. Why?”
“Nick!” Jessi called out, making Jay stiffen. “Do you have any more
dirt on Jay?”
“Shut up,” said Jay. “Don't encourage him. Nick, I swear to God—”
“She dances in her room when she thinks no one's watching,” said
Nick, grabbing another box as she flushed. “She especially likes 'Freak Like
Me' by Adina Howard and 'Pony' by Ginuwine.”
Cori clapped her hands and laughed. “Oh my God, Jay. You are such a
dirty girl!”
“No, I'm not!” said Jay. “It's like singing into your hairbrush while
dancing to Blondie.”
“Oh girl,” said Cori. “Spare me the details of what you do with your
hairbrush when you're alone. Nick,” she called out, as Jay fell back against
her suitcase in annoyance, “we need more dirt on our friend, Jay. She's been
so annoyingly perfect—I crave more of this deliciously prurient validation.”
“There is nothing prurient about dancing alone.”
“She cries when she sees pictures of kittens at adoption centers.” Nick
glanced at her thunderous face, a faint smile on his lips. “She also cries
when butterflies come out of the chrysalis or at pictures of supernovae.”
“Why a supernova, Jay?” Cori asked, trying not to grin.
“Because it's sad, okay?” Jay yanked angrily on the handle of her
suitcase. “It means a star has lost its life and by the time we see it, it's so
many billions of light years away that it's already been dead forever, so
we're just seeing something that just . . . died all alone up there in the sky.”
“Oh my God, I think she's actually going to cry. Jay,” Jessi said
quickly. “It's just a star.”
“I'm not going to cry,” said Jay, whose eyes felt curiously sore. “Nick,
you are so dead.”
“Where are you going to school in the fall, Nick?” asked Cori. “Please
tell me it's Berkeley.”
“No,” he said. “I'm going to Stanford.”
“Ew,” said Cori, wrinkling her nose. “Stanturd? Gross. I think you
should go.”
“Sounds to me like you're just jealous you couldn't get in,” Nick said
dryly.
“Gross,” said Jessi. “Jay, your hot brother has overstayed his welcome
by being an elitist snob, and now he needs to be taken out with the rest of
the trash. No red shall mix with the valiant blue and gold.”
Nick rolled his eyes and left. Jay's eyes flicked to the doorway. “Can I
leave my suitcase in here until I come back from lunch with my family?”
“Sure,” said Jessi. “I'll be here. We don't have to be out of here until
five, anyway. You might want to ditch the graduation gown, by the way.
You kind of look like a dweeb,” she whispered.
“Oh. Right.” Jay tugged it off and rolled it up into her purse, wheeling
her suitcase against the back wall where it would be out of the way. She
straightened out her dress, which was pink and embroidered. It had cost
more than she usually paid for clothes, but she had wanted to look nice for
her graduation. “I'll see you soon! We don't usually stay out long.”
We aren't usually much of a family.
“Maybe I should let you pick the music for the drive,” Jessi said with a
wink, making Jay flush. “Your water-swilling, pony-riding, kitten-crusading
queen.”
“Stop,” said Jay, making a face.
Cori waggled her fingers. “Have fun with the fam.”
Part of 'the fam' was waiting outside in the apartment hallway, leaning
into the stairwell with his hands in his pockets. “What the hell was that?”
she demanded. “Are you trying to embarrass me?”
“I don't think I had to try. Too bad you didn't go to Stanford. Red looks
good on you.”
“You are such a bastard. I can't wait until you're off to Bastard
University, you know that?”
Nick laughed and straightened up from the wall. When he walked over
to her, the gesture struck her as oddly predatory. Like a lion, she thought
nervously, stalking a gazelle. “You know, it's sad. Even your flaws make
you more endearing—refusing to drink at parties and crying over pretty
butterflies really isn't the social suicide you seem to think it is.”
“I know that,” she said irritably. “God, sometimes it seems like you
want to humiliate me.”
“Jay,” he said. “If I wanted to humiliate you, I wouldn't tell cute little
stories about you to your friends.” He absently adjusted the sleeves of her
dress, which had gotten twisted beneath her robe. The rough pads of his
fingers on her bare shoulders made her skin prickle in awareness of him.
“I'd just destroy you.”
“W-what?” Jay let out a nervous laugh and stepped back. “Destroy
me?”
“I'm just teasing, blue jay. You shouldn't be so serious. You always
cared so much of what people thought of you.”
Jay tugged at her sleeves, hoping he couldn't see the goosebumps on
her arms as clearly as she could. “Thanks, Nick,” she said flatly. “I missed
you, too.”
“Nicholas.” When she looked at him, he added, “I prefer Nicholas.
Nick's a boy's name.”
Even though it was sunny out, Jay felt a chill as they walked out to
Damon's car.
I'd just destroy you.
He hadn't sounded like he was teasing.

Things were dull while Jay was away. Her mother swanned around as if
she were queen of the fucking castle while his father worked later and later
hours with his secretary, Jeannie Fairbanks, a skinny little mouse of a
woman who always looked as if she were on the verge of running away.
Another Jay, he'd thought, glancing her over. Only not as pretty.
She'd actually come to the house once, looking for his father. Nick only
knew her name because he'd wanted to make sure she wasn't a whore. His
dad frequented strip clubs and singles' bars before meeting Danielle and
now that the luster of the marriage had worn off, Nick figured he was
probably doing it again. Honestly, he was surprised his father hadn't
divorced the bitch and taken another, younger wife—not that he particularly
wanted that outcome, either. He didn't care if his dad was seeing other
women but he didn't want them coming to the house.
“I'm Jeannie,” the woman said. “Um. Jeannie Fairbanks?”
When he stared at her blankly, she flushed, and he saw that she was
actually a little cute under those glasses. “Your dad wanted me to drop off
some documents? They're for work.”
“He's not here right now.” And then, as if he could hear Jay's mental
scolding, he added reluctantly, “Do you want to come in? I can get you a
glass of water.”
“No,” she said, looking at him and then away. “Thanks, though.”
Weird, he thought.
Now that school was over, summer was his to kill until college started
up in the fall. With Jay in Half Moon Bay, he spent most of his time going
to parties, hanging out with Dave, who had dropped out of university to sell
weed while working odd jobs, and Jake and Alonzo.
Nick wasn't sure what had happened to Ian, and he didn't really care. It
seemed like he'd decided to hang out with some of the burn-outs who spent
all their time doing drugs and listening to old 70s rock while hanging out in
their parents' basements playing WoW and Halo.
“I can't believe that all of this is coming to an end,” said Alonzo,
gesturing around at the designer-clad teens, the cheap beer, the loud hip-hop
music. “End of a fucking era.”
“I can't wait,” said Jake. He was going to Chico. “I'm gonna rush so
hard.”
“And then you're going to puke so hard,” said Nick. “You drink like
Jay.”
“My parents said they'd pull tuition if I didn't swing at least a Baverage,” said Alonzo.
“College is tough.” Dave paused to wave at a few people who had
belaedly entered the house. Party-hoppers, from the look of it. Their eyes
were too glazed to be sober. “It's not for everyone.”
“What about you, man?” Jake tilted his head up to look at Nick. “You
gonna join a frat?”
“Probably not,” said Nick. “I'm not really much of a follower.”
“Whatever happened to your sister, anyway?” Dave asked, blowing out
a cloud of smoke.
“She just graduated, come loud,” he added, purposefully
mispronouncing the words to make his friends laugh. “She's in like two
fucking honors societies, too.”
“Your dad must be proud, man.”
“Not really.” Once, it had seemed like Jay could do no wrong and his
father was always giving her little gifts and pats on the head. Now his face
hardened whenever her name was brought up. “I think she pissed him off,”
he said, taking a sip of his beer. “God knows how. She's a little saint.”
“Whatever, man,” said Alonzo. “At least now you don't have to
compete. My parents drive us like we're fucking sled dogs. My younger
siblings live in permanent terror of the parental whip.”
“Kinky,” Nick said dryly. “Do you like it better when your mom whips
you? Or your dad?”
“Screw you,” said Alonzo. “You can do whatever the fuck you want
and your parents don't care.”
Whatever I want, he thought morosely, finishing the can. Not fucking
likely.
Talk of school put them off their respective buzz. Dave smoked himself
into a stupor, watching his party through shuttered eyes while Alonzo and
Jake went off to go play Guitar Hero in the basement. Nick wandered
around until he had a run-in with a girl in a bandage top and a really short
skirt. She gave him an appreciative once-over.
“Do you want to dance?”
“Not really,” he said. “I'd rather play a game.”
She smiled at him, tugging at her top. “What kind of game?”
“A counting game.” Nicholas arched his eyebrows. “You play it on
your knees.”
She went with him to the second floor and he locked the door behind
them while she made herself comfortable on the bed. They made out for a
while, and then he tugged down her top and kissed her there, too, until she
was squirming and he was hard—it didn't take long: she wasn't wearing a
bra and her breasts were nice and he liked the way she was pulling on his
hair.
“I'm not going to touch you,” he told her, looking into her wide, hazel
eyes. “But you can touch yourself all you want. Now get on your knees and
fuck me with that pretty mouth.”
“You're kind of a bastard,” she said, which made his smile widen.
“Yeah,” he said, opening the fly of his jeans. “I am. And I bet you
fucking love it.”
Her resolve lasted all of a minute. Nick leaned back against the bed as
she slid to her knees and worked him over with her mouth. Every so often,
he'd let out an encouraging groan, digging his fingers into his thighs. Yeah,
she loves it.
Nick liked the power dynamics of a blowjob. If he couldn't get hard, it
was their fault for not being good enough at sucking dick. If they didn't
swallow, they were a prude. If they did, they were a whore. He let girls fuck
around with him but he never fucked any of them with his cock and he
didn't usually play back. The performative nature of it left him feeling a
little cold.
Maybe this was weird but at least he wouldn't be getting anyone
pregnant. And girls bragged about sleeping with him anyway, so it wasn't
like anyone was the wiser about his weird little kink. The way his fucking
friends talked, going balls-deep just made you a slave to the pussy anyway.
God, he couldn't wait to leave this place. Palo Alto was the hub of
everything, a constant rush of innovation and networking. At Stanford,
people made friendships that lasted lifetimes—or so he'd been told. He
couldn't believe Jay had turned it down.
His mind drifted to the recent photos she'd been tagged in on Facebook.
Someone had gotten a picture of her kneeling on a rock, wearing shorts and
a bikini top, with her hair streaming down her back. She'd obviously been
swimming, because her hair had been wet and her skin had a dewy,
glistening sheen.
He had printed out that photo, almost breathless with the wrongness of
the act, and hidden it in one of his magazines. The one place no one in this
house would look except him—and he looked. He looked at it at least once
a day, imagining pulling those straps down her shoulders and tasting every
inch of her hot, wet skin, tugging her shorts down and putting his mouth
right over her—
“Ugh.” The girl at his feet looked up at him balefully. “You asshole!
You didn't warn me!”
Nick made a noise of irritation and grabbed a box of tissues of the
nightstand, dropping them in her lap. “What did you think was going to
come out? Confetti?”
“You came on my face.” She wiped at her cheeks furiously. “You got it
on my top—we never agreed that I would swallow,” she snapped. “What
am I supposed to do now?”
“You could lick it off,” he suggested coolly. “I've been told it tastes
pretty good.”
The girl made an outraged sound and threw the box of tissues at him,
hard, before whirling out of the room and slamming the door shut behind
her.
Someone's not graduating come loud.
The thought struck him as particularly funny for some reason and he
threw back his head and laughed.
Chapter Twenty-Three
2008

Jay came home from Half Moon Bay with a tan and a new wariness in
her eyes that hadn't been there before Berkeley. “Hey,” she said, when she
came home, looking over her shoulder like she thought she was being
chased. “I'm back. Where is everyone? Have you been feeding Gypsum like
I asked?”
“Every day for the past four-fucking-years. The thing eats and shits like
a furry dump truck. Relax,” he said, when she pulled a face. “It's fine.
Probably glad to see you. You might have visited. Then you could have seen
for yourself that everything was all right.”
“Yeah,” she said, in a way that clearly meant no. “I know. Things kept
coming up.”
Knowing she was coming home, he'd opted for a tight, white shirt and
some loose sweatpants, and gone to a little trouble with his hair. That curl
was falling into his eye in a way that he thought made him look rakish. The
last girl he'd been with had always been putting her hands in his hair. “You
think it's that shitty here, huh?”
Jay looked at him in a way that made him hold his breath. “I don't
belong here,” she said. “Maybe you don't see that, because you do.”
“Maybe you're not giving yourself a chance to belong. You could, if
you wanted to.” Nick studied her face intently. “You know most of the
people in this town adored you. When was the last time you texted one of
your friends?”
“I text my friends plenty,” she said. “Not that it's any of your business,
but I talked to Quentin just last week. We're meeting for drinks.”
“Fucking adorable,” said Nick. “You two dating now?”
“No,” she said. “We're just friends.”
I bet that's not what he thinks. “Want to watch something? Dealer's
choice.”
“Uh, maybe later,” said Jay. “I should go see to the cat.”
But there wasn't a later. In fact, she seemed to be making a concerted
effort to avoid him, which he knew, because he was so determined to cross
her path. There was no way she could elude him as much as she was
without intent. It was a big house but not that big.
When he saw her reading out by the pool, he would go out there and
start swimming. Sometimes, he would come up to the edge to chat with her
while in the water and sometimes he would just swim. In either case, she
would leave, staying just long enough to make it seem as if it might not be
deliberate. He knew it was. She never looked at him,
When she was in the den, he would sit with her. She would give him
one of those tense smiles and sit as stiffly as a virgin on her wedding night
(was she a virgin? he didn't think so). He kept offering to put something on,
and she would inevitably demur. There were always excuses.
Frustrated, Nick had taken to lounging around half-dressed in the
mornings, because past experience had shown him that even if a girl didn't
like what was coming out of his mouth, she usually didn't mind looking at
his chest. The first time Jay had run into him, clad in his pajama bottoms
and nothing else, she had gotten flustered. “Oh, sorry, I didn't realize
anyone was in here,” she said nonsensically, looking quickly away, but not
before he'd noticed how dark her eyes looked or how flushed her face had
gotten as she left the kitchen still clutching an empty coffee cup.
“Did you lose all of your shirts, Nicholas?” His stepmother yapped like
one of those little teacup chihuahuas all of the yoga bitches had down in the
Valley. “I didn't think we were so strapped for cash that we couldn't afford
to dress you properly.”
“That's funny, coming from you. Remind me, because I've forgotten.
What exactly is your contribution around here? Putting the T&A into PTA?
Feeling nostalgic at charity auctions because the sight of a man waving a
hundred dollar bill makes you yearn for the good old days?”
“Nick,” said Jay, who was reading at the bar area. “Don't talk to my
mother like that.”
“You're a foul-mouthed, disrespectful little boy,” Danielle breathed.
“You know nothing.”
“Yeah?” said Nick. “I know you're a washed-up has-been with stretchmarked tits.”
“Nick,” Jay said again, slamming her book closed. “Stop it.”
Danielle scoffed. “I don't have to stand around and be spoken to like
this. Maybe you'll be able to talk some sense into your Neanderthal of a
brother, Justine. I have a meeting with the ladies of the Hollybrook
Conservation Society.” She shot him a scathing look. “You might start by
informing him that nobody wants to see his hairy underarms.”
Nick watched her storm off with her cold glass of juice. There was a
cocky swing to her backside. He knew why that was. She'd started fucking
the man who took care of their pool. A slim twenty-five-year-old, fresh out
of college. The new tits were probably for him.
He'd snapped some interesting photographs of the two of them in
flagrante delicto. He thought about slapping them down in front of his
father but decided to hold on to the pictures instead. He knew exactly how
angry his father would be about the cheating—but Danielle didn't. She was
the kind of woman who was too arrogant to think she'd ever face the
consequences. But everyone faced consequences—at least, they did, if they
got caught. If she kept fucking around with him like this, she'd learn that the
hard way.
Yes, he knew all about Danielle. He knew where she kept her weed and
her sex toys, and that she had a cache of jewelry in the closet, as if she
thought she might have to flee like a thief in the night. He knew what
position she favored during sex, and that she and the pool cleaner liked to
fuck in the shed where they kept the grill and the spare keys. If she'd kept a
diary, he would have found that, too. He was as familiar with this house as
the back of his hand.
“I really hate your fucking mother,” Nick said, leaning back against the
fridge.
“Don't provoke her then,” Jay said. She was opening her book again,
smoothing the pages out on the counter with careful fingers. “It's stupid.
Fighting with her never solves anything.”
Jay, unlike her mother, had very little to hide. Some erotica novels
hidden behind her fantasy books and a dusty vibrator were all that he had
been able to find. She kept her diary exactly where a girl without any real
secrets would try to hide it. Underneath her mattress.
So obviously, he'd read it. Multiple times.
“. . . sometimes I wish Angel was my big sister and she would adopt me
and take me away. She calls me her 'little love' and I really wish I was,
because I'd rather live with her than my mom.”
She'd been an avid writer when she was young. God, Young Jay had
been so fucking cute. He wanted to go back and kidnap her. Even if she
hadn't written about him all that much (“this kid steals liquor out of his
dad's office”), and when she had, she had gotten him all wrong, he found
himself enjoying the way she wrote about her transition into her new life,
and the passages about her new school, her friends, and the cat (“I can't
believe she's really mine, I love her so much—she knows her name now!”)
just for the glimpse it gave him into her soul.
The entries got less frequent as she got older and busier, which was
sad, because they were also more interesting and filled with what could be
strikingly perceptive observations. “Nick seems so angry lately,” one of the
entries from her junior year read. “Sometimes it seems like he's angry at me
and I'm not sure why. It feels like I've disappointed him.”
During her senior year, she had written a bit about the party that had
gotten her shit-faced for the first time in her little nerd life—“note to self:
never drink again”—but there was no mention of him, which he found
irritating, since he was the reason she'd gotten home in one piece. In fact,
she barely wrote about him at all that year. She wrote about the Lacoste
Mafia, her dates with Michael Valdez, prom, and all of her niggling
insecurities (“Why do I feel like I'm never going to be enough?”), so he felt
like he deserved a reference or two, even if it was just a footnote.
Instead, she seemed desperate, bitter. Whole passages complaining
about feeling as if no one saw her, about the mean-spiritedness of her
classmates, and a sharp resentment towards anyone who told her she was
beautiful. “It's like they think that looking at me means that they own a
piece of me,” she wrote, pressing so hard with the pencil that she had
smeared graphite on the pages, “and this gives them the right to say
whatever they want about me as long as they pay me upfront with empty
compliments.”
The bitterness surprised him; he had never heard her complain about
anyone in such stark terms. What surprised him even more was that,
towards the end of the journal, a few months after her eighteenth birthday,
she had written very shyly about touching herself, or wanting to.
“I'm not sure what to think about,” she had written. “So I just picture
some faceless stranger kissing me in the dark.” In very small font after that,
as if she were trying to hide the words from even herself, she had added, “I
think I want him to be rough with me, but I'm also scared it will hurt.”
God, that was hot—especially for Jay, who seemed like the buttonedup type who'd always insist on missionary. He wondered what “rough”
meant to his prude of a stepsister.
“It feels really strange to think about,” she had concluded,
frustratingly vague.
Tell me more, he had thought. Tell me exactly how it feels strange, Jay.
That blend of innocence and longing had made him so achingly hard that
he'd gotten himself off in her bathroom, to the sweet, lingering scents of her
apple-freesia shampoo and vanilla bean candles. Afterwards, he'd read
further, hoping for more. More illicit confessions. More about how she
craved to be touched. But after her graduation, the pages had abruptly
stopped.
Looking at her now, staring down at her book, he found himself
wondering what thoughts were going on in her mind. He hadn't expected
her to be quite so cynical or so passionate. The journal had provided some
interesting insights but he wanted to know more about the girl who could sit
looking so composed while secretly desiring to be ravished by a stranger.
“Why are you looking at me like that?”
“No reason,” he said mildly. “Just trying to see what you're reading.”
She lifted the cover, giving him a glimpse of a blue-toned background
that said Fire & Hemlock. “I really wish you wouldn't talk about other
women the way you do.” She set the book back down, still open, on the
counter, even though she hadn't turned a page since her mother left. “Your
dad does it, so maybe you feel like you have to, too. But I hope it's not who
you are.”
Nick pushed off from the fridge. “You've been gone for four years, blue
jay. I don't think you know me well enough to discuss me or my moral
upbringing.” He leaned over the counter, right next to her, propping his
head up on one arm. “You really don't know what I'm like. But you know
your mother. You can't sit there and tell me that you think she's a good
person.”
“I think she's a flawed person.” She stared at the book. “Like you, or
me, or anyone else.”
“Bullshit. I'm nothing like your mother—and neither are you.” He
tapped the back of her wrist and saw her shoulders tense. “Don't let her drag
you down with her because she will. How's the book?”
She folded her hands over the pages. “It's good. You wouldn't like it.”
“Why not?”
“I've seen what you read. Horror and chaos. Ayn Rand. This isn't that.
It's fantasy.”
Oh Jay, he thought, darkly amused. If only you knew what I've really
been reading. I could tell you a thing or two about fantasies. “Maybe I'll
surprise you.”
Her eyes flicked towards him. “If you really want to read it, I'll lend it
to you when I'm done.”
Nick shrugged his shoulders and padded towards the door. As he did,
she slid off the stool, closing the book as she prepared to leave, as well. Still
watching her, he nearly ran into his father, who seemed to be on his way out
of his office. Jay, behind him, froze, eyes widening.
He noticed she edged slightly closer to him.
“Good morning,” said his father, glancing at them. “What are you two
up to?”
Jay, with that wary, watchful expression still on her face, brushed
against Nick's bare arm. That brief contact of skin on skin was electric. The
book fell from her hand with a slap that made her jump. His father bent to
pick it up and handed it to her, and he didn't miss how gingerly she accepted
it from him or how much her hand was shaking. And neither, he knew, did
his father.
“Thanks,” she said haltingly, hugging the book to her chest. “I was . . .
just leaving.”
What was that? Nick watched her scurry to her room.
“She seems jumpy,” his father remarked.
“Yeah,” Nick said, glancing at him.
I wonder why.

A few days later, his father rapped on his door. Nick was lying on his
bed, listening to a mix of Nine Inch Nails and A Perfect Circle on his iPod.
The music was loud and he hadn't heard the knock, but he had seen his
father's shadow and tugged down the side of his headphones. “What?”
“I thought you and I might take a trip before you go off to college next
month.”
Nick tugged down the other side of his headphones. “Like a family
trip?”
“No. Father and son. I was thinking Las Vegas.”
“Fine,” said Nick. “When?”
“This weekend.”
Nick shrugged. He'd gone there with a couple friends before, although
he'd been too young to gamble at the time, so all he'd really done was see
the shows and eat out a lot. He was still too young to gamble at most places,
but at least when you were eighteen, you could do something.
“Fine,” he said again, after a moment. “I'll get my shit together.”
Nick was somewhat surprised that his father had contracted with Vlad
to drive them. “Hey, man,” he said, earning himself a perfunctory head tilt.
The only person he'd ever seen the man smile at was Jay. “I feel like I have
my own personal bodyguard,” she'd said to him. “Just like on the Princess
Diaries.” And then Vlad had told Jay that he had studied krav maga and the
two of them started talking like old buddies while he had huffed in the
backseat.
Jay had texted him. Mom wants to know where you're going. Is it for
orientation?
Shaking his head, Nick threw his suitcase in the trunk and climbed into
the backseat with his father apparently opting to ride shotgun with Vlad.
Nick didn't mind having the back to himself. His legs were so long, he liked
the option of sitting sideways or he quickly got cramped.
We're going to Vegas. I'll get you a racy postcard.
Ugh. Please don't, she wrote. Mom's going to be really upset. She loves
Vegas.
He wondered if that was why his father had organized this trip. To
make his wife jealous and put her in her place. He had a vague recollection
that they had gotten married in the city eight years ago. Proof that what
happened in Vegas didn't always stay in Vegas.
It'll be fine. Dad will buy her off with something shiny and all will be
forgiven.
There was a pause. Is that what you really think is going on?
Nick stared at his phone thoughtfully. Did she know about the cheating,
too? Maybe she thought she and her mother were going to be kicked out.
He could have told her not to fret about it. A high-profile divorce case
would cause more problems than it would fix, and his father wouldn't want
to reward a woman who strayed from him with half his estate.
Just enjoy your books, Brainiac. I'll think of you while I'm living la
grande vie. After a moment of consideration, he added, Don't worry about
your mother. Seriously.
She sent him an angry face. He sent her a heart and then she stopped
responding at all.
“Who are you messaging?” his father asked from the front seat,
glancing at him in the rear view mirror. “One of your friends?”
“A girl,” he said vaguely, shoving his phone into his pocket. Maybe I
tipped my hand.
“I don't think I've ever seen you with a girlfriend.”
Nick glanced at Vlad, wishing they weren't having this conversation in
front of him, even though he didn't seem to care and his father had probably
slapped him with an NDA. He flicked his hair out of his eyes impatiently.
“I'm not really interested in any of the girls around here.”
“You're not gay, are you?” his father demanded.
What? “No,” said Nick. “I'm not fucking gay. I just don't like vapid,
female bullshit.”
“Perhaps that's wise,” his father conceded. “Women tend to peak in
college, although so do their expectations. In high school, you aren't
expected to marry every girl you fuck.”
Nick glanced at his phone. “Didn't you marry Mom in college?”
“I was a bit dishonest with you,” his father said, leaning back in his
seat. Ignoring the question, he couldn't help but noticing. “We aren't going
to Vegas until Sunday, and only briefly on the way back. We're actually
heading to Carson City.”
“But that's seven hours away,” said Nick. “Why are we going there?”
“You'll see,” his father said vaguely, tilting his head down as if
preparing for sleep.
Nick put his headphones on, shuffling through his iPod until he landed
on Puscifer. He liked a lot of the songs, but “Rev. 22:20” had always been
his favorite. He'd thought he was too wired to sleep, but when he opened his
eyes, it was because the car had stopped in a little dirt patch.
“Where are we?” he asked, sitting up in his seat. “Did we get lost?”
“We're not lost.”
His father had Vlad park in front of one of the unmarked buildings and
swung out of his door like he knew where he was going. Nick got out more
slowly, frowning as he tossed his iPod beneath the seat. There was a sign
outside the sun-peeling, faded exterior, hand-lettered in tacky flamingo-pink
script with a crude painting of a fruit tree with a knot in the trunk that
looked undeniably sexual, with several big, overly shiny cartoon cherries
that looked like butts.
The fuck. He stared at the sign, wondering if he should snap a picture of
it to show his friends. Jake would like it. “The Cherry Orchard?” he said.
“What is this place?”
Some weird fruit stand?
Ignoring him, his father walked up to the door and went inside. Nick
took a picture of the sign before following his father. He quickly realized it
wasn't a fruit stand. The interior was like a scummy reception in a lowbudget hotel, but cleaner. Only the dust, yellowish-gray like the body of a
silverfish, got in. A couple of other guys were inside already, but none
would meet his eyes.
His father was talking to the older man at the reception desk, who
looked over at him. He was given something that was glossy and bright,
like a yearbook. The pages were sticky and a little ragged. “Pick one,” his
father said.
Pick one? Nick flipped through the book. It was a bit like a model's
portfolio, except with lots more girls. There were four to a page, all grainy
photos of the girls wearing lingerie.
It clicked for him then. “Is this a brothel?”
“I'm not going to have you going away to college and embarrassing
yourself,” his father said in response, which seemed to be a yes. He handed
him two condoms. “In case the first one breaks.”
“Thanks, Dad.” Nick couldn't quite keep the sarcasm out of his voice
but he kept flipping through the book. Jesus Christ, did his dad really think
he was such a fucking lost cause that he had to buy the pussy now? There
was no shortage of girls willing to blow him. He looked down at the
pictures sulkily. There were a lot of blondes. He supposed blondes must be
popular.
Then Nick straightened. “I'll do her.” He pointed at a girl with light
brown skin and long curly hair who had a slightly sullen tilt to her full
mouth. “She's the only one I want.”
His father glanced at the girl for a long moment, expressionless. “Ivy?”
“She's available,” the man at the desk said helpfully. “She's in room
twelve at the end of the hall. I'll phone her and let her know you're coming.”
Coming being the operative word, Nick thought. Shooting a last look
over his shoulder, he went down the hall. His footsteps echoed. They'd
opted for tile halls like a hospital, probably because it was easy to clean.
They were pungent with the chemical tang of artificial cirtrus, as if they had
just been scrubbed. Beneath it, he could make out the faint funk of sweat
and old come. He knocked on the door of room 12, wondering if he was
being an idiot.
What kind of loser paid for sex?
“Come in,” said the voice inside, high and girlish, when he knocked.
No, he thought instinctively. It needs to be low.
“Ivy?” To his disappointment, she looked slightly older than her photo,
which must have been taken a while ago. Closer to thirty than twenty. But
her makeup was flawless and her pink bra and panty set was completely
sheer. She only had a very thin strip of hair on her pussy. “I'm Nicholas.”
“What do you like to be called, Nicholas?”
For a moment, he almost said, Why do you care? And then it occurred
to him why she would, and he nearly blushed, which annoyed him.
“Anything,” he said. “I don't care.”
He stepped into the room, looking at the fluffy pillows that were
probably covered in fluids. He could smell perfume—fake sugar. It made
his chest feel tight. So did the way she was playing with her hair, twirling
her finger in her curls, pulling the strands taut and then letting them bounce
free. Jay does that, he thought, watching her.
“Don't use that voice with me,” he said suddenly. “The baby one. I
don't like it.”
Ivy glanced at him. He couldn't tell if he'd offended her. “Okay,” she
said. “Whatever you want.” She paused, looking him over, and something
in her face softened. “Come here.”
Nick went to her. She hadn't moved from the bed this whole time and
allowed him to push her flat on the mattress. Straddling her hips, Nick
pressed his mouth to hers and kissed her as he reveled how all of her soft
curves cushioned his much harder frame. He cupped her breast, squeezing
gently, and felt her nipple harden against his palm. She ran her hands briefly
under his shirt, making a faint murmur of appreciation as she worked his
fly.
She took the condom from him and put it on, almost like she could tell.
He watched her slim hands move expertly over his achingly hard cock with
a deliberate gentleness that nearly undid him. When he slid inside her it felt
—hot and tight, were his first thoughts, which shouldn't have been sexy, but
it was. It felt incredibly fucking good and he had to fight against the urge to
come.
His father's words rang in his mind—embarrass yourself. He'd heard
girls laughing about the guys who blew their loads and finished early.
Gritting his teeth, Nick imagined his cock stuck in a bucket of ice as he
fucked into that warm, wet heat.
“Yeah,” she gasped. “I love the way you fuck me, Nick.”
“Call me Daddy,” he said impulsively, thrusting into her hard. I think I
want him to be rough with me, but I'm scared it will hurt. “I'll be your big,
strong Daddy, and you'll be my sweet little bird. That's what I want.”
Nick glanced at her, seeing what she thought of this, but her eyes were
closed. “Okay, Daddy,” she said huskily. “Whatever you say.”
He did come, then, shuddering inside her with his hands clenching on
either side of her face.
“Oh yeah,” she breathed, heaving beneath him. “That was nice, Daddy.
You're so good.”
Nick gave her a look; he didn't appreciate being condescended to. He
knew it was supposed to last longer than five minutes. “No, it wasn't,” he
corrected her, breathing a little shallowly himself. “But that's all right. Show
me how to make you come.”
Again, she leveled him with that slightly unreadable look. But she took
his hand and spread her legs wider so he could see the firm little bud at the
apex of her slit. She guided his fingers to it, at first directing his touch, but
after a while, her hand fell away and he slid two of his fingers inside the
still-slick passage as he traced tight, hard circles over her clit.
“How does that feel?” he asked.
“Harder,” she said, hips bucking. “Please, Daddy. Please.”
When he pushed down with his thumb, she cried out. This time, Nick
was pretty sure it wasn't entirely fake. She was so wet—and with her eyes
closed, leaning back into the pillow of her own dark, silky curls as she
arched under his hand, she looked so much like—
Fuck. His cock swelled again and he leaned over, growling ferally,
“Again.”
Chapter Twenty-Four
2008

Jay met Quentin for drinks at Acciaccatura, a boutique-style brunch
spot in the downtown area that locals simply shortened to Accia. Her
mother liked going there for Sunday mimosa brunches and getting drunk
with her girlfriends, and so did a lot of the other men and women in town.
But it was still a pretty classy place. There were potted cypress trees
outside, framing a sign on a folding chalkboard that advertised the daily
specials. Today's was goat cheese arugula quiche and pomegranate
mimosas.
Quentin stood up when she entered. On a Wednesday afternoon it really
wasn't that crowded and she had no trouble picking him out in his boldstriped rugby shirt. He was also wearing acid-washed skinny jeans that
gathered artfully at the tops of his Balenciaga sneakers.
“Jay.” He held out his arms and she stepped awkwardly into his
embrace as he squeezed her gently. “It's been forever. I'm so glad to see
you. Hollybrook has been so stupid since everyone left.”
She smiled and sat down. “You mean, none of them came back?”
“Why would they? There's literally nothing to do here in this
overpriced bedroom community unless you want to shop, get drunk, or
fuck.”
A coiffed woman at the next table looked over and shot Quentin a dirty
look before turning back to her friends and saying something, shooting him
a series of angry-looking glances.
Quentin slanted a sideways grin at her. “Oh, and you can only pick two.
Guess what she chose?”
Jay had to cover her mouth with a hand to keep her laugh from
escapaing. It did anyway, in a high-pitched, unattractive snort. She was
relieved when the waitress came to take their orders. Jay ordered a lemon
drop and a butternut squash soup and Quentin got bacon-wrapped dates and
a dark 'n' stormy.
“Wow,” she said, after the waitress had taken their paper menus away,
“that's kind of strong for brunch. Did you have a bad day or something?”
Quentin made a face. “Dad's having me help out with the hotel. Let me
tell you, managing a bunch of high-maintenance white women who freak
out every time their European hair dryer blows out an outlet isn't exactly a
picnic.” He glanced at her. “No offense.”
“Are you saying I'm high-maintenance?”
“No,” he said. “That's why I said no offense.”
Their drinks came and jay took a long sip of hers. The alcohol hit her
like a hammer and she leaned back in her chair with a sigh. “What
happened to the rest of our group?”
“Well—Jordan is dating some hot French guy twice her age who treats
her like his little sugar baby when he isn't spiriting her off to the French
Riviera or Maui. She posts pictures of her shopping hauls on her blog and I
hear she's being sponsored by Escada now.”
Quentin scrolled through his phone and held up a pic. Jay recognized a
slightly older Jordan on the arm of a very attractive-looking guy with
silvery hair who looked like a less-grizzled Gerard Butler. “Wow,” said Jay.
“He is cute.”
“Lucky cunt.” Quentin flipped his phone around, earning himself
another glare from the woman at the next table. “Let's see. Angie does
makeup videos now on YouTube. They're not bad but she's always trying to
get people to follow her on Facebook and it comes off as a little thirsty.
Clary just finished up at Santa Barbara where she met all the right people,
and now she's interning at some ritzy social media website in Los Angeles
and seems to spend every weekend clubbing in Malibu.”
He leaned back in his chair with his drink, slinging an arm over the
back. “And then Michael, well, you know—he's working for daddy.
Bulldozing fields to develop shit. Malls, probably. I hear he still asks about
you. By which I mean, he asked me about you, You're the one who got
away. I'm honestly surprised nobody snapped you up.”
Jay laughed a little nervously. “I'm meeting him for drinks, too.”
“Drinks-drinks? Or, like, you-and-me drinks?”
“Which answer will make you pick up the tab?”
“You shameless flatterer.” Quentin grinned. “I'd date you in a heartbeat.
Whatever. Do something about it or don't. I'm just saying, he's still willing
and available.”
“Maybe I should hold out for the hot French millionaire,” Jay
deadpanned.
“Sorry, Jay, but you don't exactly scream trophy wife—unless it's a
trophy for trivia night. God, can you imagine. Picture a show where women
have to answer Jeopardy questions to date the bachelor. But would that be
empowering or exploitative? I'll have to think about that and draft up a
proposal.”
“For a thesis?”
“No, Jay. For an agent. Academics get jack.”
Their food came and Quentin immediately started savaging the bacon
like it was going out of style. Jay blew on her soup and took a sip. It was
good—nutty and sweet, warming her to her toes. They didn't eat much food
like this at home. If it couldn't be seared or turned into some kind of pasta,
Damon had very little interest in eating it.
“So what's new with you?” Quentin asked, between bites. “Didn't you
just graduate?”
“Yes, with highest honors from one of the best universities in the entire
country—and I still can't get a job anywhere. My last job was working at a
comic store as the literal only non-male cashier and creeps kept coming in
and asking if I was one of the collectibles. I thought geeks were supposed to
be nice. That was why I took the job.” She glanced at Quentin, whose smile
became a little subdued. “I don't suppose your dad is hiring anyone at the
hotel?”
“Sorry, babe. You know I'd put in a word for you, but times are tough.”
“Yeah,” Jay said glumly, taking another sip of her drink. “Tell me about
it. I feel like I've applied everywhere in town. I never thought I'd be living
at home again after graduation.”
“At least you live in a mansion,” Quentin pointed out. “Maybe try
name-dropping your stepfather some more. He still has most of this town in
his pocket—it might help you get a job.”
No fucking way am I turning to him for help. “Maybe.”
“How's the rest of your family? I've seen Nick around with his friends.
Is he off to school or is he planning to slum around like Dave and peddle
designer weed or—?”
“My mom and stepfather are exactly the same as they were before I
left,” said Jay. “Damon and Nick are off on some sexist boys' trip to Vegas
and my mother is moping around because she wasn't invited and thinks my
stepfather is going to have an affair with a cocktail waitress. And Nick's off
to Stanford in the fall but he's been—” Jay hesitated. “He's been acting
really strange.”
Quentin's eyebrows shot up. “Strange how?”
“Well . . .” Jay took another sip of her drink. “I think . . . he might . . .
have a crush on me.”
“Nick does?” Quentin choked on his drink, thumping his chest. “Your
stepbrother, Nick? Isn't he half your age?”
“Keep your voice down!” Jay hissed, taking another bracing sip of her
lemon drop. “Half my age would be eleven, which would not only be
disgusting, but also illegal, you freak. Nick's only four years younger, but
it's still not a great look. He's still practically a kid and I don't know what to
do about it.”
“Well, there's one thing you can do about it,” Quentin said dryly.
“I'm serious,” Jay said, glaring. “It is freaking me out. I've been hiding
in my room.”
“I bet you're the first girl who's ever run away from Nicholas
Beaucroft. You remember how girls were always throwing themselves at
him back in high school. People used to take bets on who he'd finally date.”
Do you really hate me, Jay?
“I remember.”
“Don't sweat it, Jay. It's probably just an innocent crush.”
Jay pressed her face into her hands. Remembering how she'd been
cornered between him and his father and the hot brush of his skin against
her arm. Remembering the way he'd looked at her when he'd taken her
photograph and said, that's the look. “I don't think so.”
“Well, it's not like it's incest,” said Quentin. “There's no law that says
you can't fuck him.”
One of the coiffed ladies summoned a waiter. “Excuse me, can we be
seated at another table?” Jay heard their leader say, before dropping her
voice confidingly and pointing at Quentin.
The water turned. “Excuse me,” he said gravely, “but I'm going to have
to ask you both to finish up and leave.”
“Oh,” said Quentin. “Sure, no problem.” The waiter left and Quentin
tilted his head towards the smug-looking coiffed woman. “Ms. Yates, is that
you? You check in all the time at the Bayview with your twenty-year-old
son—I'd recognize you anywhere. I just think it's so sweet when kids stay
close to their parents as adults. So many of them aren't attentive to their
parents.”
He dropped his napkin on his plate, strolling out of Accia, arm-in-arm
with Jay. When she looked over her shoulder, she thought “Ms. Yates”
looked rather flushed and defensive.
“Let me guess,” said Jay. “She doesn't have a twenty-year-old son.”
“Never seen her before in my life,” Quentin said cheerily. “But I heard
her introduce herself to the waiter when she decided to rat us out, and what
goes around comes around, my sweet, Jay-Jay, and now all of her snooty
friends think she's getting pounded by her boy-toy at my hotel.”
“I can't believe you got us kicked out of Accia,” Jay sighed. “What am
I going to do?”
“Find a new restaurant. Oh, you meant about your stepbrother? Don't
fuck him. It's too weird.”
“Thanks, Quentin,” she said flatly. “Where would I be without you?”
“Probably still inside the restaurant, pondering your future as a quasiincestuous cougar.”
Jay hit him on the arm.
“Lawsuit,” said Quentin.
“I hate you so much.”
“Everyone does.” Quentin stroked her arm. “Except you, baby cakes.
Come on, let's grab coffee.”

His father had apparently paid for two hours, so Nick was able to end
the session with a leisurely blowjob. “Come back and see me sometime,”
Ivy said in a low voice, right as he was buckling his pants. Even though he
was satisfied, it sent a pleasant current rippling through him.
“Maybe,” he said noncommittally, not wanting to seem too eager. The
sex had been good, but thoughts kept intruding—that the color of her light
eyes was too flat, that her perfume was too sweet, that her voice had too
much fry in it. That none of this was enough.
Suddenly, he felt very ready to leave.
Straightening his clothes, Nick walked down that tiled hall to the
reception area, which was now empty except for the man at the desk. He
peered out through the one-way glass at the parking lot, but Vlad was
standing outside the empty car, smoking. Apparently, his father had also
decided to indulge.
Nick found himself wondering whether his father had ever been to this
place before and whether he'd ever fucked Ivy. The thought made him feel a
little sick, although he supposed Ivy probably fucked a lot of men. Maybe
even thousands.
He wondered how many guys Jay had fucked.
“I'm going for a walk down the road,” Nick tossed off over his shoulder
at the receptionist. “If my dad asks.” He didn't stick around to see if the man
had heard or even listened.
It was hot and dusty and there wasn't much to see outside. The ground
was cracking as if the earth itself was splitting apart beneath his feet like a
rotten melon, choked with native weeds and grasses like Indian ricegrass
and globemallow. In the distance, he could see a rickety-looking train track
and the rusty carcass of an abandoned car missing its wheels and a host of
other parts.
There was trash in the bushes—the usual shit like cigarette butts and
plastic bags, but also used condoms. Like maybe people had driven out here
to fuck and just couldn't wait. Shaking his head, Nick kept walking.
Overhead, he heard the distant cry of some sort of bird—a hawk, maybe, or
a vulture. Something that sounded like it belonged in the desert.
At the end of the road, Nick came to a little shanty of a store with a
folding sign outside that said “Rocks and Jems—big Sale.” the misspelling
and random capitalization should have put him off, but he was feeling bored
and uncaring and the blazing white heat of the sun was relentless.
He stepped inside and felt the arctic blast of a cheap air conditioner that
growled overhead like a rabid dog. There was a strange, sour smell like old,
decaying wood, and Nicholas looked around doubtfully, trying to decide if
he wanted to leave and head back to the car or not.
“Hi there,” said a badly sunburned man sitting at the register. “Can I
help you?”
“I'm just looking.”
There were bins of all kinds of rocks. Semiprecious stones you could
scoop into a fraying velvet bag for five bucks. Tiny glass jars filled with
gold suspended in liquid solution. Prospecting kits. Kids' stuff, he thought
dismissively, moving to examine the things in glass cases. There was
something that looked like a cluster of brown barnacles, like one of his
dad's expensive sculptures. “What's this?”
“That's a gypsum rose,” said the man. “A whole lot of it. You'll find it
around here if you're lucky. They sell balls of them for about one, two bucks
each at most of the stores around here. Rarer to find it in clusters like that.”
I could get it for Jay. She had a rock collection and Nick was pretty
sure that she didn't have anything like this lying around in her room.
Studying it, he asked, “How much?”
“Three-eighty.”
It had the sound of a man feeling out a price and Nick suspected he
could have bargained himself down from the tourist sucker charge, but he
just shrugged his shoulders and said, “Fine.”
His dad was probably done by now, anyway. Wondering where he was.
Or else he'd driven off and left him here in the desert. Wouldn't that be a trip
to remember.
Nick paid the man and left the Rock and Jem store, heading back down
the road, sweating a little in the heat. His father had taken Vlad's place, who
was now sitting at the wheel, and was leaning against the door, smoking a
cigar and radiating sexual gratification.
“I wondered where you went. You didn't run off and leave the girl
hanging, did you, Nick?” At the tight, contrary shake of his head, his father
nodded, eyes drifting down to the bag in his hand. “What's that you have
there?” he asked, blowing out a leisurely smoke ring.
“A gift for Jay.”
“Ah. How sweet.” Apparently finished, his father crushed the cigar into
the dirt beneath his leather shoe. “I'm sure she'll be appropriately grateful. I
need to get that mother of hers something so she doesn't bitch at me. We can
check out some of the pawn shops in Vegas.” He glanced at the bag. “I don't
suppose they sell jewelry in that store you went to for your sister?”
Nick thought of the turquoise bracelets and quartz earrings. “Not the
kind she'd wear.”
“Damn. Well, I suppose it'll just have to wait until we make the drive
back down. It's on our way home, after all,” he added, with a self-effacing
laugh. “I had no idea how quickly that woman would take to the high-life,
or that the more I sank into her, the more her personality would worsen. It's
really quite a shame.”
“She's a gold-digger,” said Nick. “What did you expect?”
Nick thought he might be in trouble for insulting his stepmother—his
father was always saying that a man's wife was a pale reflection of himself
—but all his father did was lean over and ruffle his hair. “Usually money
makes women more biddable—not less.”
“Right.” Nick turned towards the car but his father didn't seem inclined
to go in.
“You're close to Justine, aren't you, Nicholas?”
Why did he always call her Justine? Guardedly, Nick said, “Yeah, she's
fine. I like her okay.”
“Yes.” His father drew the word out in a way that made him recall a
time that didn't seem so long ago, when he had asked, “What was your
sister doing in your room last night?” This conversation had the same
feeling of a trap slowly snapping shut. “She's very good at getting people to
like her. But I didn't ask if you liked her, Nicholas. I asked if you were
close.”
“Not that well,” he admitted. “Not since she went away to college.”
“She's a strange girl. Her mother named her after a book by the
Marquis de Sade. Have you read it?” Nick shook his head. “It's about a
sweet, sanctimonious little girl who invites her own ruination because she
never learns how the world really works. It's ironic, almost cruelly so—
especially since Danielle never actually read the book. She just liked the
name.”
“Her mother's an idiot,” said Nick, latching on at last to something
solid.
“Yes,” his father said thoughtfully. “But Justine, in her own way, is also
an idiot.”
“No, she isn't,” Nick said, forgetting himself. “She's not like her mother
at all. She has a college degree. She speaks fluent Spanish. She volunteers
at—”
“Nicholas.” His father's voice halted his furious torrent of words. “I'm
not denying that she has her charms. I'm sure she'll even marry for them
someday, and possibly even well. But she's vulnerable in a way that you and
I will never be, because you are part of a legacy and she is the daughter of a
whore. And yet, she lacks the self-awareness and the gratitude that would
allow her to properly overcome her faults. She is arrogant, and willful, and
blind, and that,” he said, with something almost like anger, “will be her
downfall.”
It's your job to protect her. Something went cold in Nick's chest. “I'm
not sure what you're telling me to do.”
“Nick.” His father's voice was firm. “I'm not telling you to do anything.
I'm merely saying that you have a lot to fall back on and Justine has only
herself. If something were to happen to her, she would only have you and I
to turn to. Her mother is trash and any kind of investigation would only
cause her sordid past to get out. I am merely intimating that a reminder
might be beneficial.”
His father's words haunted him on the drive home, and no matter how
loud Nick turned up his music, he couldn't push them from his mind. They
kept floating back, because everything his father had said about Jay was
true. She was always telling people what they should and shouldn't do,
getting her panties in a twist over some perceived injustice. And her words
did bother him. Sometimes for weeks because the implications—that he
was a burden, that he didn't know what real work was, that he was
intolerant, that he was a childish annoyance—filled him with anger that
churned like a black and vicious sea, because it all hit a little too close to
home.
And for that, he couldn't quite figure out if he was angrier at himself or
at her.
As he watched her tilt her head up and warmly thank Yelena for dinner,
he could feel that uncertainty crystallizing, becoming sharp and deadly.
Look at me, he thought, filled with desperate want, helpless anger, and
countless other emotions too dark and tangled to name. Why don't you ever
look at me?
Jay did look at him and her smile faded. She looked down at her plate,
rolling up the sleeves of her sweatshirt to bare her tanned forearms and her
hair slid forward to hide her face. “What did you do today?” he asked, and
it came out sounding like a challenge.
“I, um, had drinks with Quentin Ho.” Aware that she was being
watched, she glanced around the table uneasily. “He's running the Bayview
for his dad,” she added unnecessarily.
“James Ho is an excellent businessman,” his father said, looking hard
at Jay. “His father built the hotel when this was all still mostly orchards to
house the money men who came through to buy and sell. He understands
what needs to be done to succeed and prosper.”
“Yeah,” Jay said quietly. “Quentin's great.”
“How's Courtney?” asked Nick.
Jay threw him a look of disgust. “Still dating Lance Nguyen.”
“Hey.” He threw up his hands. “I didn't say I wanted to date her.”
“So,” Danielle said, drinking her second glass of wine. “Did you have
fun in Vegas?”
“We lost money,” said Damon, sliding a box towards her. “But I got
you this, my dear.”
“Oh,” said Danielle, quickly becoming mollified as she opened the box
to reveal a diamond-studded Cartier bracelet. She slid it over her wrist and
held up her hand to admire it. “Look, Justine. Isn't this simply gorgeous? I
think I saw this very one in Vogue, only in rose gold.”
“Neat.” Jay rubbed absently at the back of her hand.
“I didn't forget about you, Justine,” his father said, which made her
fingers jerk. “But they didn't have anything that would appeal to your niche
tastes. It's a shame you don't wear the jewelry you're given. There are
women who can only dream of having wrists like yours.”
Jay's mother stopped admiring the bracelet to glare at Jay, who put her
hands in her lap. “Jay,” she said. “Stop slouching. Sit up straight or you'll
pinch your diaphragm.”
“Can I be excused?”
“You may,” his father said. “Don't bother with the dishes. Yelena will
get them.”
Jay ignored him, picking up the dishes and emptying the uneaten
remains into the green waste before popping them into the dishwasher. They
all heard it slam shut before she slipped out. “Perhaps she's upset about
something,” his father said thoughtfully. “A boy, perhaps.”
“I don't know what's going through her head,” said Danielle. “She's so
moody.”
Nick slipped away while his parents talked, but he was aware of his
father watching him leave. He stopped by his own room to get the bag
before going to her door, which was closed. When he knocked, he heard her
voice say, hesitantly, “Yes? Who is it?”
“It's me,” he said. “Can I come in?”
Nick heard the sound of the lock as the door swung open. Her hair was
gathered in a ponytail and she had swapped out her shorts for track pants.
She looked beautiful.
Wordlessly, she pushed the door open wider for him to enter.
Her cat was asleep in its basket, clutching a toy in slumber. Her
collection of rocks was still on top of her bookcase and stacks of CDs were
cluttered on her desk. Artists he didn't know. Corrine Bailey Rae, Frou
Frou, Jewel, and Jem on the top. Beneath those, but not dusty either, were
Souls of Mischief, Usher, and Nas. She kept her room neat. Everything was
put away.
Nick glanced at Jay, who was shifting from foot to foot.
“What do you want?” she asked, not unkindly.
“I got you a present in Nevada. I didn't want to give it to you at dinner.”
Her dark eyebrows shot up. “Oh. Thank you. But, uh, why?”
“I'm going to college,” he said. “It'll be something to remember me by
when I'm gone.”
“God, Nick. That makes it sound like you're dying.” Jay accepted the
bag from him and began carefully peeling the tissue paper away. She
always did that. It had driven him insane when he was younger. Just open it,
he had wanted to shout at her. Why are you torturing us by drawing it out?
Now he found himself wondering how it would feel to have those careful
fingers dancing along the skin of his throat as she slowly unbuttoned his
shirt.
There was something to be said for torture.
“Oh,” she said again, hefting the stone out of the bag. “Wow. What is
it? Is it a statue?”
“You don't know what it is?”
“No.” She frowned. “Should I?”
“It's a gypsum rose,” he said. “A stone found out in the desert. You
named your cat after it.”
“Oh.” There was a hidden shard of enthusiasm buried in the
exclamation. “That's amazing.”
She likes it. “I thought you'd like it.”
“I do. Where did you get it?”
“In a pawn shop,” he said cagily. “They had lots of weird things people
pawned to pay for gambling. I didn't think you'd want a Cartier bracelet or a
purse.”
“This is really, really thoughtful.” She went to her bookshelf and began
moving some of the stones aside to make room for the gypsum. “Thank you
so much, Nick. I love it.”
She turned and he saw her eyes flare in surprise at how close he was
standing to her, the pupils wide and dark. For a moment, she had the same
trapped look that she'd had outside the kitchen, but then she stepped
forward and carefully hugged him. He was wearing an old band T-shirt and
the weight of her breasts against the thin cotton made him draw in a breath.
She's so soft, he thought, putting a hand on the small of her back. She smells
like apples.
“Jay,” he said harshly, and she stiffened as his hand slid down the
grooves of her spine.
“Thank you for the gypsum.” She stepped back from him, eyes sliding
away. “I should—”
“I'm in love with you.”
Jay sucked in a breath. “What?”
“You heard me.” Nick folded his arms. “I love you.”
“But you—” Jay flinched, looking up at him as if only just realizing
how tall he was. He saw the muscles in her throat work, tissue-thin beneath
the skin. He wanted to kiss her there, in that soft hollow beneath her ear.
Kiss her hard enough to leave a mark. “Nick,” she said at last, in a slow,
careful voice he didn't care for, “you're only eighteen.”
“So? I'm legal. I'm not a virgin anymore,” he added carelessly. “In case
you're worried about despoiling me.”
“You're my brother.”
“No. I'm your stepbrother. We're not blood relatives. And to be honest,”
he said, taking a step closer that had her skittering away from the bookshelf,
“living under the same roof kind of does it for me. It's so much easier.” He
paused. “Kinkier.”
Jay fell on her mattress. “I need you to go now.”
“It's not just about the sex,” Nick went on quickly, walking towards her
bed. “You're all the shit that other girls are supposed to be but aren't. You're
sweet and charming and caring and smart. All of it—and I love it.” He
crouched, cupping her face in his hands. “I love you. And I want you so
fucking bad I really can't stand it, Jay. I think about you at night.”
“Oh my God,” Jay said faintly. She wrapped her fingers around his
wrists, pulling back. “Nick, please stop. This can't happen.”
“Why not? Is it because you don't want me?” Nick let her move his
hands away. “Or is it because you're afraid to fuck me? Do you think it'll
hurt? I wouldn't hurt you. Or do you think it's wrong?” he demanded
abruptly. “It isn't. I looked it up and it's perfectly legal to f—”
“Nick.” She had gone white. “Stop. No. I'm saying no.”
“No,” he repeated, staring at her. “Why, no? You owe me that much.”
Jay rose from her bed. That shattered expression was still on her face
but now she looked angry.
“I don't owe you anything. Me being under your roof doesn't
automatically make me available for your . . . pleasure and I'm really sorry
to hear that our relationship has just been that to you, because it was never
that to me. I thought things were different. That you were different.” Her
eyes slid to the bookshelf and she let out a breath. “I thought you were
different from your dad. I thought you were actually capable of being kind
instead of—”
“Instead of what?” he barked.
“Instead of trying to buy people,” she said. “As if they're things.”
“God, you sound so naive right now. What do you think your fucking
mother does, huh? You think she has problems with being bought? I really
don't think it's the end of the world you seem to think it is.”
“Get out,” she said, in a breathless, angry voice.
“Unlike you, I know how the world works and it's not nice, and it's not
kind. You could be drowning in a room full of people and all they'd do is
lean over and spit in the water. It's a fuck or get-fucked world out there, and
if you don't see that, it's because you're the one being bent over.”
“That's a horrible thing to say to me.” Jay blinked and looked away.
“That's your problem. You're so entitled, you think everyone just exists to
serve you. That there aren't any consequences for what you do. If you can't
get something from someone, it's like—it's like they aren't even real to you.
You want to know why I'm not attracted to you, Nick? It's because of your
personality. No matter how many times you take your shirt off, the way you
talk about anyone you consider beneath you is still really, really gross to
me, and you don't even seem to care how you sound and it's just . . . such a
waste. You are such a waste,” she added bitterly. “You could do so much
good with what you have and you don't, and I just want you to leave.”
“Really,” Nick said, in a tone of deathly calm. “Is that what you think?
I'm just a waste of space to you?”
“That's not what I said.”
“But it's what you mean. You think you're better than me, Jay? Is that
what this is? Do you think you're some kind of fucking saint? I know a few
things about you that could raise some eyebrows. You're not the perfect
little angel that everyone thinks you are. I know you can be bad, too.”
“Stop it.” She raised her voice, trying to speak over him. “I never said
—”
“Shut up, Jay. Shut up and listen to me, because I'm only going to say
this once. Nobody gets to make a fool out of me—not even you. Enjoy the
victory. Fucking savor it. Because one day, I'm going to come into my own,
and then I'll have power and you'll still be you. We'll see how the scales tip
then because I'm not going to forget this. I'm going to bring you to your
knees.”
The sadness dripped out of her eyes, leaving them cold. “Get out of my
room.”
“To your knees,” he repeated, stabbing a finger at her chest that had her
falling back against her bed.
And then he whirled out of her room and the door slammed behind
him, echoed by his heart.
Chapter Twenty-Five
2008

After her confrontation with Nick, Jay threw herself into the task of
finding a job. She downloaded a template for her resume and made sure it
was up to date, padding her meager college positions until her stint as a
cashier and a waitress made her look like a plucky restaurateur who
excelled at middle management. She read and reread it, sending a copy each
to Cori and Jessi to look over and read.
I'd hire you in a heartbeat, Jessi wrote back immediately. And Cori,
several hours later, said, YOU GET THAT JOB.
Their enthusiasm made Jay feel a tiny bit better, so she applied to a
whole bunch of positions nearby, including a couple she wasn't interested in
at all, figuring that maybe a quarter of them would call her back at least,
and of those, maybe three or four would be genuinely appealing.
Nothing happened, though. None of the places called her back, not
even the ones she'd thought she was overqualified for, like receptionist for a
local daycare, which stung.
It was like nobody even wanted to give her the time of day.
Maybe try name-dropping your stepfather more. He still has most of
this town in his pocket.
Jay shivered and her stomach went hard and tight as she remembered
the weight of his hand on her bare knee. The careless way he'd grazed her
breasts when plucking up her necklace.
I am sure you would rather have me as your ally than your enemy.
The comment he'd made about her wrists made her want to throw up.
No way was she turning to Damon for help. It sickened her that Quentin
would even suggest it, that he thought she was the type of girl who would
run right to a man whenever things got hard.
But Nick had implied the same thing.
Jay couldn't believe Nick had said what he had to her. The betrayal of it
was enormous, shattering. She had cared for him when she was young, had
hoped that the strange protectiveness she felt for him might evolve into
some deeper friendship when he got older, but he had willingly ingested his
father's poison and allowed it to transform him into—whatever this was.
She didn't like it, but that brief flash of hurt in his eyes had still scored
her soul. And when she had seen it freeze over, becoming cold and jagged
like ice, she had felt the first spark of fear because those were not the eyes
of a man inclined towards forgiveness.
Jay stared bleakly at the job website she was scrolling through and
abruptly sat up. The Bayview Hotel was hiring an office assistant? But
Quentin had told her they weren't hiring.
Maybe the listing is old, she thought—but, no, it had gone up two days
ago, just one day before she had met her friend for drinks. And if he was
acting manager, he would have known that it was up.
Remembering his strange expression at lunch, she found herself
wondering if maybe he had known. But then, why didn't he want her to
know about the job?
Her fingers were dialing the number for the hotel almost before the
suspicion in her mind had even taken shape. Some part of her subconscious
warned that she wasn't going to like the answer, and that maybe it was even
better not to know, but by the time that line of logic had solidified, the
phone was ringing and she had convinced herself that she needed to know.
“Hello?” said a pleasant-sounding female voice. “This is the Hotel
Bayview. How can I help you?”
“Hi there,” said Jay, affecting the snooty voice her mother liked to use
now. “I need to speak to Quentin Ho immediately, please. It's regarding an
extremely private, extremely urgent matter.”
“Hold on,” the woman said, sounding a little less pleasant. “I'll
transfer.”
Jay waited, her heart pounding in her ears.
“Hello,” Quentin's voice came floating through. “This is Quentin Ho.
How can I help you?”
“Quentin,” said Jay. “I—I saw the job posting. What's going on? Do
you not want me working for you?” Am I embarrassing? “Why would you
lie to me?”
Quentin sighed. “Look, baby cakes. I hate to be the one to tell you this,
but Beaucroft put a moratorium on anyone hiring you. It's nothing official,
but he made it known that he wouldn't fund anyone who had you. You know
I like you a lot, but we can't afford to have your dad pull out as an investor.
It would kill us—especially now. I'm sorry.”
“Why didn't you tell me?” Why didn't anyone tell me?
“I figured it was because he was training you in the family business
and didn't want anyone poaching you away. A non-compete clause.”
Oh my God. Jay felt her throat squeeze with tears. I am so screwed.
“Why are you looking for a job, anyway?” Quentin sounded puzzled.
“It's not like you need to work. Your stepfather is literally the richest man
around for miles.”
“Thanks Quentin,” Jay said. “Thanks a lot.”
She hung up before he could respond. Nothing he could have said
would have made the situation any better. It was like the house was an iron
corset strangling her, making it harder to breathe, and everyone wanted to
pull the laces.
Drinks with Michael didn't help. They went to one of the mid-tier
wineries, Esperanza by the Bay, which specialized in Spanish-style wine.
Michael got a flight and Jay had a single glass of albariño. She wasn't sure
why she'd gone. Maybe she was looking for comfort or maybe, deep down,
she just wanted to feel wanted. But for the right reasons, not the wrong
ones.
She was disappointed, though. Michael hadn't changed at all. “Give us
another chance,” he said to her. “My parents adore you, Jay. Our fathers do
business. There's no reason we shouldn't be together. You're the perfect girl
for me.”
But are you the perfect man for me? Jay wondered.
Somehow, she didn't think so, and she came home feeling angry and
bitterly disappointed.
Her mother continued to go out, blithely ignorant to the cold waves of
hostility that shuddered through the house. Or maybe, Jay thought, she did
notice, and going out was just her means of escape. Jay was incredibly
aware of Damon's cruel study, but she was even more aware of Nick, who
looked at her as if she were something distasteful.
She tried to console herself. He's going away for college in less than a
month and he can't really do anything for me. Not like his father.
But normal eighteen-year-old boys didn't have Nick's money. Or his
viciousness.
She decided to avoid him. When he entered a room, she left it. She
began staying away from the pool entirely, no longer going outside to read
by the lilies. The only place she couldn't escape him was at dinner, where
her mother would chatter at the silent room, either enjoying the attention or
compulsively filling the silent void.
Damon ate the food Yelena prepared in silence and Nick would just
look at her, the sharpness of his gaze making her feel like her heart was
being shredded in her chest.
Enjoy the victory.
She didn't feel like she'd won. She felt like she'd lost everything.
Fortunately, Nick was gone most of the time. Out with his friends,
going off to orientation, cleaning his room to purge it for college. Boxes of
things began migrating out to the curb, which Yelena lugged out through the
hall, red-faced and sweating. Old magazines and ancient playthings began
to pile up in front of the house.
When Nick and Damon were out, which was often, Jay helped when
she could. Yelena was getting on in years and really shouldn't have been
doing the heavy-lifting. The fact that he left the task for her to do anyway
despite his able-bodiness was just another example of his blatant
selfishness. There was no reason he couldn't take his own things out
himself.
Jay ran into him while carrying out one of the boxes, spotting him too
late. He'd come home early from his outing with Jake. His arms came out to
grab the box, steadying it and her while keeping it from colliding with his
chest. Suddenly, the heavy box in her arms felt weightless.
She looked at him unwillingly and found herself the subject of his
study. Her jeans and T-shirt had felt modest before but the way he was
looking at her now made her feel dirty.
“Are you with the help now?” he asked, in an icy tone of restraint. “I
didn't think you were that desperate.”
Jay tugged on the box. “You know, you could take your own shit out to
the curb.”
“I think I'll leave it in your capable hands.” He let his grip falter and
gravity, and the box, made her shoulders sink as she frantically tried to keep
from dropping it. “How's the job search going?”
Does he know what his father did to me? “It's great. So, so great.” You
asshole. “I can't wait to get out of this house,” she said viciously, swerving
to avoid him with the box. “As soon as I do, I'm never coming back.”
She could feel his eyes on her as she left. Even though there were more
boxes, Jay abandoned Yelena to the task and fled to her room, where she
stayed with the door locked until dinner, trying not to think about the way
Nick was trying to intimidate her with his body. He was her stepbrother and
until recently, she had seen him as her younger brother: a boy.
It was like that moment at the resort all over again, this time in reverse.
Her stepbrother was a man now, with a man's body and a man's desires—
and she wasn't sure she could unsee that, nor could she force out the images
that came to her mind, unbidden.
Quentin's words came floating back. There's no law that says you can't
fuck him.
The next day, Yelena came knocking on her door, wringing her chapped
hands. “Hola, mija. Por favor, necesito ayuda para mover la mesita afuera
de la casa.”
“Nick's low table?” Jay asked. “¿La mesita baja? Ya voy. Um. ¿Está
Nick aquí?”
“No en este momento.”
“Okay.” If he was out, she didn't mind helping. Jay got up from her
desk, where she had been applying to more jobs, and knotted her sweatshirt
around her waist. “Let's go.”
Yelena led the way down the stairs, through the den. Jay hadn't been in
Nick's room in a long time. The bed was still in the same place it had been
when he was a kid, with the desk squeezed next to it. Half-nightstand, halfworkspace. All mess, thought Jay, eyeing the piles of paper and trash. It
looked like he'd been attempting to tidy things up, there were several plastic
bags on the floor, all filled with garbage and waiting to be taken out.
Naturally, it hadn't occurred to him to do it himself.
His computer stood in the middle of it all, headphones dangling
precariously on the edge of the monitor. She reached out to straighten them
automatically and the monitor flickered on. She glanced at it, and then
away, not wanting to see something she shouldn't.
Jay quickly moved to the low table, which had once held Nick's camera
and other equipment but all of that had been relegated to the desk. Looking
at the Nikon he had used to take her photograph at graduation mere days
ago made her throat tight. She gripped one edge experimentally and tried to
lift it, grimacing a little. “Es tan pesada,” she said to Yelena, who was
standing in the door, watching her worriedly. “Necesito dos personas.
¿Lista?”
“No,” said Yelena, fingering the hem of her blouse. “Siento.”
“Yelena?” Jay asked, feeling suddenly very nervous. “¿Qué—?”
“Hi, Jay.” She stiffened as Nick moved to stand next to the smaller
woman, who suddenly looked as if she would rather be anywhere else. He
was wearing sweatpants and a faded raglan shirt that drew attention to his
broad shoulders. “Thanks, Yelena,” he said pointedly. “You can go now.”
“What—” Jay felt her voice shrivel in her throat when he closed the
door. What are you going to do? What the fuck was that? The two questions
warred in the back of her mouth and she couldn't get either of them out. It
felt as if she might choke if she tried. “What was that?”
“I told her that you'd been avoiding me,” Nick said, taking a few steps
deeper into the room. “That we had a fight. I asked her to get you alone
because I knew you wouldn't come to me if I asked. I don't think she really
believed me, though—she made me promise not to hurt you.” He glanced at
her. “You're her darling little mija after all. And yet, that didn't stop her
from selling you out for a price. Everyone has their price. I wonder what
yours is.”
Jay's heart knocked against her chest. “I don't have one.”
Nick stepped closer and she felt the computer chair brush against her
legs. “We'll see.”
Jay took another step backwards and just when it occurred to her that
sideways might have been better, Nick caught her by the arms and kissed
her.

Jay's protest cut off as his mouth sealed over hers, their noses bumping.
She tried to turn away, and but he moved with her, catching her by the chin
to correct the awkward angle and devour her as he'd been aching to do for
years. Nick's hand nearly trembled as his thumb stroked over her throat. She
tastes sweet, he thought. Of course she tastes sweet. It was like the first,
illicit sip of his father's scotch burning down his throat with the taste of the
forbidden.
When his hand fell to her breast, she jerked from him, uttering a hoarse
scream as she lost her balance and fell into his computer chair. It started to
spin lazily until he bent a leg and stopped it with his knee. For a moment,
she looked as if she were about to leap up, but he was still standing very
close and her face was level with his hips.
He watched her realize that as the color fled from her face.
“You know,” he said, looking down at her as she squirmed and looked
anywhere but at him. “You talk to me like I'm your kid brother, but I'm not
your brother, blue jay. I'm the next Mr. Beaucroft and I'm a man who's at
the end of his fucking rope. Because of you. And who are you, anyway?
You're nobody. Anything could happen to you and no one would care.”
Jay said nothing, but the tendons in her jaw were standing out in relief.
She flinched again when he moved, but all he did was take a step back
and turn the chair back towards the desk. “Are you threatening me?” she
asked. “Just because I wouldn't—”
“Look.” He cut her off, unwilling to hear her give voice to his
grievance in those low, wounded tones. She tensed as he leaned on the back
of the chair, close enough to stir the wisps of hair clinging to her neck, as he
dragged the mouse. “I want to show you something.”
“Well, I don't want to see i—” She paused. “What's Jay.mp4?”
“I thought you didn't want to see it.”
“Play it.” There was a catch in her voice. “Play it now.”
He played the video. He'd seen it before, many times, so he watched
her face, which went ashen. When the color returned to her skin, it was in
red blotches that spread from her cheeks to her throat.
“No.” She let out a rough breath that made him hard as she looked
away. “Oh my God.”
“See?” he whispered, letting his eyes drift to the screen. He watched
her fingers slide beneath her top. A few minutes later, when she moved
below her waistband, the motions would be the same: urgent and ungentle.
“Not so innocent. As far as videos go, it's not that explicit, but that's what
makes it so hot.”
“You sick fuck,” she said. “How the hell did you get this?”
“Well,” he said, “off my camera, obviously.”
Jay lunged and he backed off, throwing up an arm to defend his face.
But she had been going for the mouse. Before he could stop her, she had the
video deleted, and the trash emptied.
“Fuck you.” She glared up at him heatedly, breathing hard, before
swinging up from the chair.
Nick sat back on his bed, watching her stalk to the door. He couldn't
help it—he laughed. “Did you really think it would be that easy? That's not
the only copy I have.”
Jay stopped walking. “What?”
“What you deleted—that was a copy. I have the original on a flash
drive. God, you're naive. No wonder you have everyone in this fucking
town fooled.”
“Give me the flash drive,” said Jay.
“Does Quentin know your mom's a whore?” he asked idly, crossing his
legs. “Does Michael? Their parents both work in a reputation-based
industry; they aren't going to want you dating their sons. Especially not if
they find out just how much like your mom you really are.”
She spun around. “My mom,” she said fiercely, “is not a whore. She
was a dancer.”
“That's not what people are going to call her when they find out.” He
glanced at her face, which was pale and grim. “Or you. You'd be surprised
how many people in town really aren't a fan of sweet, perfect Jay—or how
eager they'll be to rip you apart. People like Angela, who want to tear you
down. People like Jake, who want to make you feel dirty. And plenty more.
It turns out, most people find perfection really fucking annoying.”
“What do you want?”
“I thought you didn't have a price,” said Nick. “Isn't that what you just
told me?”
“It's not my price,” Jay snapped, folding her arms. “It's yours. Tell me
what it is.”
“I want those snowy white wings of yours,” he said. “You think I'm
such an unattractive, entitled piece of shit? Fine. I'm willing to pay with my
silence, but you'll have to give up some of your morals in return. I don't
want to fuck an angel.”
Jay flinched again. Her eyes looked too bright, like she was going to
cry. “You're pathetic,” she said bitingly. “You're literally ruining my life
because I wouldn't sleep with you.”
“Pathetic?” he repeated, glancing at her. “No, Jay. Pathetic is burning
all your bridges and then acting like a wounded deer when you're caught
holding the gas can. Leave if you don't like it.” he said coldly. “Otherwise,
you can take your top off and kiss me.”
She looked at him, hesitating for so long that he thought for sure he'd
overplayed his hand. He had savored the idea of making her suffer,
incensed by the idea of her wanting to leave—but the thought of hurting her
was unpleasant. There was no pleasure in possessing something of value if
it came in shattered fragments and what he was proposing would break her,
he knew.
It had never really occurred to him what he might do if she refused.
“A kiss,” she said. “That's all you want?”
“For now,” Nick said. “You were careless, blue jay. The video is just
the tip of the—”
“That's enough.” Jay crossed her arms to pull her shirt off, muffling her
voice. “Fine.”
He studied her hungrily as she looked down at her hands. She had a
curvy figure, not quite thin, with a thickness in her hips and belly that gave
her body an enticing softness. His eyes drifted up her waist, to her ill-fitting
bra. “The bra, too. Give it to me.”
Jay threw it at him, taking it off quickly and folding her arms before he
could get much of a look. She came towards him on shaking legs and
pecked the corner of his mouth before trying to pull away, but Nick was
expecting that and managed to grab her by the hips and pull, lifting her
beneath her backside as he did so she ended up spilling into his lap.
Holding onto herself the way she was, there was no way for her to push
him away and she ended up loosely straddling him, with her back to the
floor. She yelped, and for a few disoriented seconds, her arms slipped,
giving him a brief but unimpeded glimpse of her breasts.
Nick leaned in. “Don't give me that schoolyard shit. Kiss me.”
Jay wouldn't look at him. She could clearly feel his erection and it was
making her very uncomfortable, because she was shifting all her weight to
her knees in an effort to keep herself off his lap. He turned her face towards
his and kissed her again, stroking along her jaw as he coaxed her lips open
with his tongue as he pushed his way into her resisting mouth. She
remained still, so he let his hand spread, caressing her neck.
When his fingers drew over her nape, she shivered, and he whispered,
“Like that?”
Her shoulders immediately hunched. “No,” she hissed, her voice full of
venom.
“You're a terrible liar.” Nick stroked down the silky skin of her back
and her eyes drifted again, fixating on something over his shoulder, even as
her skin jumped under his touch. He pressed his mouth to hers again, still
cupping her throat. “Your heart's pounding. I can feel it.”
She gave him a look that seared him to the bone. It was filled with
anger, and gave her clear, hazel eyes the stultifying power of a calefacient.
“You know why I wanted you?” he spoke against her mouth, running
his hands up and down her sides as her bare arms prickled with
goosebumps. “You've never been like the other women in this town. They
know they're going to marry rich and everything they want is given to them,
so they don't try to be interesting. They don't want to save the world or see
the sights; the only thing they care about is framed in their bedroom
mirrors.”
Jay pulled her head back, squirming in his lap in a way that left him
breathless. “I don't want to hear this.”
“But you need to hear this, Jay.” He kissed his way up from the corner
of her mouth, across her jaw, until he reached her ear. She let out an
unsteady breath when his teeth grazed over the tender shell of it. “Your
mother is one of those women. She fits right in with the rest of that sorry
fucking crowd. But you—you surprised me from the very first day. You're
so goddamned good. Really. I hate your mother but I'm also so glad she
married my dad because she brought you home . . . to me.”
She was still stiff, arms tightly folded. He gave her a cool smile and
spread his hands along her ribs, trying to cup her breasts. Jay folded her
arms tighter, shaking her shoulders to shrug him off, grinding against his
hips in a way that had his breath coming out in a shuddering gasp.
“What are you—” Jay bucked, horrified, as his arm tightened around
her waist, keeping her pressed against him with one hand knotted loosely in
her hair as the dampness of his come seeped into her jeans through his
sweatpants. “Oh my God,” she said. “You're disgusting.”
“Get used to it,” he told her, tugging at her lip. “Next time I come, I'm
going to be inside you.”
Chapter Twenty-Six
2008

Jay fled from Nick's room, pausing only to zip herself into her
sweatshirt before flinging herself into the den. Her lips were burning and
her jeans were—no, she wasn't going to dwell on that, or the terrible things
he'd said to her, the way his hands had felt on her back, the way he'd looked
at her—
God, the way he'd looked at her.
People often told her she was pretty. Sometimes it was the first thing
they said to her, and they often said it in a way that suggested that looking
the way she did made her face and body theirs to comment on. Whether it
was a woman saying “I wish I had your skin” or a man shouting “nice ass”
out his car window, it always carried a vaguely possessive tone, as if she
were something they could acquire, even if it was in pieces.
Nick had looked at her as if she were already his.
Don't think about it, she instructed herself. Just run.
It wasn't until she was safely locked into her bedroom that she realized
he still had her shirt and bra. In her blind panic, she had forgotten to take
them. Instinct and nebulous suspicions made her suspect she probably
wouldn't want them back now.
With a shudder, Jay stripped off her remaining clothes and took a long,
hot shower, trying not to think about why her skin felt so sensitive under the
beat of the spray.
Next time I come, I'm going to be inside you.
When would that be? He was having a party on Saturday to celebrate
the end of summer and his acceptance to his top choice. Damon and her
mom were going to Vegas to renew their vows or something stupid like that.
It had been her mother's idea and she wasn't sure why Damon had agreed,
since he obviously didn't love her mother anymore if he ever had, but
neither would be back until Monday, which meant she'd be stuck here alone
with him.
And he—Nick—was going to fuck her.
Jay wondered if he was going to do it before or after the party. Was he
planning on giving his friends a play-by-play of her performance? The
thought made her eyes prickle with unshed tears as she punched her arms
through the sleeves of the ratty old sweater she liked to sleep in.
It's going to hurt, her brain whispered. He said he'd destroy you, and
this time, he will.
She checked her email again but none of the places she had applied to
called her back and there were no messages or phone calls either. She was
so disheartened that she closed out of her pending applications without
finishing them. If things were this bad now, no one was going to want to
have anything to do with her at all if Nick followed through on his threat.
Her phone buzzed. She looked at it dully. Quentin. I'm sorry Jay.
She put the phone down and didn't respond.
Through the door, she could hear Yelena calling up for dinner. Jay
stayed in bed. She didn't think she would be able to meet Nick's eyes and
see the expectation in there.
Yelena knocked on her door. “Jay? Mija?”
You sold me, Jay thought. You sold me to him.
“¿Estás bien?”
Jay said nothing, rubbing her face, unconsciously tracing the path Nick
had blazed with his mouth. No, she thought. Nothing is ever going to be
okay again.
Yelena eventually went away, presumably to report to her family that
she wouldn't be coming down. Her phone buzzed a few minutes later and
she picked it up in irritation, thinking it was Quentin and another one of his
useless apologies. She nearly dropped it.
Are you hiding from me?
Nick. The last thing he had sent her had been a heart, which unnerved
her enough that she hadn't responded. She could see it there in the history,
mocking her. How quickly he flipped from “I'm in love with you” to “I
don't want to fuck an angel.”
She stared at his message for a long time, trying to read the tone. Was it
a taunt? Did he feel remorse? Or was it a reminder that she was trapped
here and that for her, there was no escape?
Leave me alone sounded too pathetic. Go away was too
confrontational. And fuck you sounded like a challenge. In the end, Jay said
nothing, which probably only proved him right.
She was hiding.
Jay went to her computer and booked a room for the weekend at the
Bayview. If Nick thought she was just going to lounge around and wait for
him, he was wrong.
When it came to hiding in plain sight, she had ten years of practice.

The next morning, Jay noticed her booking had been canceled because
the charge had been declined. That made her angry—Damon oversaw their
accounts and she had never been one to make wasteful purchases. The last
thing she'd gotten that had exceeded $100 was her graduation dress. In
college, most of her budget had gone towards school materials and food.
Jay pulled on jeans and a tank top and the sweater she'd slept in. She'd
used to wear her hoodie around the house, but now she no longer wanted to.
She pulled her hair into a tight ponytail as she went down the stairs. The
kitchen was empty, except for Yelena, who was doing the dishes. Nick was
nowhere to be seen, which meant he was probably still asleep, and her
mother was outside in the garden.
Jay knocked on the door to Damon's office. “Come in,” she heard him
say.
I can't believe I'm doing this. She entered, mapping out all points of
escape. Damon was sitting at his desk. “Justine,” he said, smiling in a way
she didn't care for. “What a surprise.”
Yeah, she thought. I just bet it is.
“Go ahead and close the door.”
“I'd rather not.” She leaned against it instead, ready to bolt. “Did you
cancel a pending charge on my card?”
She could tell he didn't like the defiance or the accusation. He set down
the pen that he had been toying with, a Montblanc, leaning forward to study
her in a way that made her fold her arms over her chest. “Yes,” he said. “I
did. Why would you need to go to a hotel?”
“For a girls' weekend,” Jay said defiantly.
“Well, I'm afraid you'll have to cancel or postpone,” Damon said,
leaning back. “I need you here to keep an eye on Nicholas and his friends.”
A hysterical giggle bubbled up her throat. She swallowed it back down.
“He's eighteen. He can keep an eye on himself. And I'm twenty-two. I
should be able to make my own purchasing decisions.”
“I would agree,” Damon said, very slowly—as if she were slow. “If it
were your own money.”
“Well, you certainly took care of that, didn't you?” Jay had told herself
that she wasn't going to snap, but she found she couldn't help it. All of her
anger was boiling over like a pot of water left too long on the stove. “I'm
not staying here alone with your son. He's been inappropriate.”
Damon made a sound. “Really, Justine. Inappropriate? What does that
even mean?”
“He touched me,” Jay said, forgetting to keep her voice low. “He said
he would—”
“Justine.” His voice was cold. “I've made you a part of this family.”
No, you haven't. “I've put up with your disrespect. I've even paid for your
college education. And you spend my money on whatever you wish, which
I permit to an extent, but ultimately, the final call comes to me.”
Shaking with fury, Jay took a step forward. “But—”
“But,” he said, cutting her off, “I won't have you making up lies about
my son, lies about this family. Words have consequences, my dear—legal
consequences, in some cases. You can't just go around telling people these
kinds of vile, outlandish stories whenever you don't get your way. One day,
Nicholas will inherit the company and I don't want any scandals in his past
that might compromise the business.”
“The business,” Jay repeated. “But you—”
“That's enough.” He stood up from the desk and Jay immediately
moved closer to the door. “I've tried to be patient with you, but frankly,
Justine, your behavior leaves much to be desired. You've become willful,
ungrateful—” his eyes flicked over her baggy sweater in distaste “—and
slovenly. It's a disgrace, what that school has turned you into. The last thing
this world needs is another man-hating little bitch. A good girl stands
behind the men in her family.” He folded his arms, regarding her coldly.
“You are a good girl, aren't you, Justine? You used to be.”
“No,” she said.
“That is a shame. I'm afraid I have no use for a petulant child who
refuses to listen to her betters. Even your mother knows when to back
down, because she knows she is entirely dependent on my financial support.
As are you.” He took a step towards her. “Now, I suggest you forget
whatever Nicholas said to you that set you off and do as you're told.”
Jay felt a cold chill wash down her spine. “You're whoring me out to
him.”
“Don't be so crude,” said Damon. “You're still a lady—barely—and it
isn't becoming.”
“Oh, so swearing bothers you, but the fact that you and your son are
both sick fucks, doesn't?” Jay stammered, trying to remain calm. “You can't
do this to me. I'm going to go out and tell everyone what really goes on in
this h—”
Damon slammed his fist against the door with a bang that echoed
through the house.
Jay jumped, glancing at his arm, inches from her right cheekbone.
When he pulled back, she saw blood on his knuckles; it had left slight
discolorations on the splintered paint he'd buckled with his fist. “You will
do no such thing if you want to keep that pretty face.”
Jay fell back against the door trying to avoid him when he reached for
her. His hand was clammy, like raw meat. She had to set her teeth to keep
from screaming.
“You're an adult, as you were quick to point out, which means you can
do anything you want. But being an adult means you pay for it. I suggest
you think hard on what that means and how it pertains to our previous
conversation. You'll get no further assistance from me, so do not come to
me about this again. You won't like the consequences.”
He pushed her out of the office, making her stumble at the touch of his
hand at her lower back. She twisted, spilling into the hall, and whirled
around just in time to see the door closing.
“Perhaps Nicholas can be moved to pity you. You two used to be so
close.” The door closed behind her with a click. She could still see the
brownish smudge on the door.
Used to.
Stunned, Jay walked into the kitchen to get herself a glass of water. The
ice clinked into the glass, echoing the dissonance of her thoughts.
Being an adult means you pay for it.
Now go be a whore for my son.
“What's the matter, little bird?”
Jay jumped, causing the ice to shiver in the glass. Slowly, she turned to
see Nicholas leaning against one of the bar stools. She glared at him,
despite the lump in her chest. Little bird?
“Don't call me that.” She turned back to the blinking light of the ice
dispenser. “H-how long have you been there?”
“Long enough to see you stumble out of there like a drunk at closing
time.” He slid off the stool in a sinuous movement that had her whipping
back around. “Didn't work when you ran to Daddy? But then, he's not your
Daddy is he?”
Jay's fingers tightened on the glass. “You were eavesdropping on me.”
“No. But it wasn't exactly subtle that you were trying to narc. I knew
you would. Poor blue jay. I could have told you he doesn't give a shit about
who I'm fucking.”
She made a sound, like she'd been punched in the diaphragm. “We're
not fucking.”
“God, it sounds so prim and tedious when you say it.” His hand
brushed her face, barring her escape. “You're not going to bore me, are you,
Jay?”
“Yes. It's going to be awful.” She swallowed. “You'll hate it.”
“I doubt that.” His lips moved against hers in something too fleeting to
be a kiss. He was wearing a shirt but it was clinging to his chest in a way
that made the fabric look damp, outlining all those ridges of muscle. “I
think I'm going to find you very, very exciting.”
Fear bubbled through her again, as bright as a sparkler, as he fingered
the strap of her tank top possessively. “I heard a slam. Did my father hurt
you? There's a dent in the door.”
“Why do you care?” she asked woodenly. “It's like you said. He's not
my daddy.”
“No,” he said, the low register of his voice sending a chill through her
that was colder than the glass in her hand. “He isn't. But I could be. I'll be
your Daddy. You can tell me what's bothering you and I'll make it all
better.” His hand covered her left breast, flattening over her pounding heart.
“I don't let people mess around with what's mine.”
Jay jerked her shoulders.
“So.” Nick moved even closer, crowding her against the fridge. “When
do you want to fuck?” The contrast between the searing heat of his body
and the cold metal at her back was making her chest tight. He ran his hand
down her side, the way he had in his bedroom, touching her in that alarming
way that traversed the boundary between reverence and degradation. “I've
been feeling pretty mouthy. I think you need to come over and convince me
to shut me up.”
Her hand trembled and then she remembered the ice. With a gasp, she
sloshed it into his face and he threw up his arm, cursing, giving her just
enough time to run.
She fled up the stairs and into her room, locking the door firmly behind
her. Her insides felt as if they had been replaced by hot liquid and every
drag of the rough weave of her sweater made the tips of her breasts ache.
She could still feel the hot impression of his hand, as if it had been branded
into her skin. I can't do it, she thought, feeling as if she were about to fly
apart. I can't.
One way or another, this was going to break her.
Chapter Twenty-Seven
2008

It had been a while since Nick had thrown a party at his own house. His
father didn't like the noise or the mess and the step-bitch was always lurking
around with her tits hanging out, trying to mack on his friends, and it was
usually more trouble than it was worth anyway to have a bunch of strangers
in his house, fucking with his shit.
Nick wasn't really sure why he'd bothered. Maybe because it felt like it
was his last chance to have one of those old school house-shakers before the
demands of college. Maybe because he was bored and wanted to feel
something. He set down the Jack and Coke he'd been drinking. So much of
it had melted that it tasted like the dregs of an watered-down soda fountain.
He set it on the bar counter, wiping his hands on his jeans. He felt
something, all right.
Frustrated.
Jake and Alonzo were both excited for college. For Jake, it meant
pussy, and for Alonzo, it symbolized freedom. But Nick was thinking that
for him, it was just going to mean more work. He had decided to declare
Finance as his major, and his schedule was already making his head ache.
Financial Analysis, Statistics, Econ, and one of the required undergrad
English classes, of which there were two parts. Like one isn't enough, he
thought grimly. He hated writing.
Math, he didn't mind as much. There was only one right answer, and it
was just a matter of getting to it fast enough. Logic was cold-blooded, full
of sangfroid—just like chess, which he'd played a handful of times with one
of his tutors who thought it would help him focus in Calculus. He hadn't
minded that, either, not that he could tell anyone. You couldn't play that
game without getting yourself branded as a nerd just like Jay.
Nick thought Jay would be pretty bad at chess. She didn't take loss
well. She would probably scramble around the board trying to save each
and every piece, while her opponent plowed through her defenses, and
because she was so trusting, she would fall for every trap.
She'd always fallen for his.
The thought of her made him stir a little. So had the way she'd looked
at him earlier—that wide-eyed, fearful look filled with injured dignity and
the slightest hint of anger. It was the last Nick had seen of her all day. She
thought her cute little ass was safe in her room.
She had no idea how wrong she was.
You could come downstairs and join me, he messaged her, keeping up
the illusion. He didn't really expect a response. The odds of her coming
down here in a tight dress and picking up a drink were about the same as
him going to a church and becoming a priest.
After shrugging off someone who tried to get him to go into the pool,
he noticed Jake. He started in that direction, annoyed to feel a pull on his
arm. “Come on, Nick,” the girl said. “A bunch of us are going to do water
wrestling. Weren't you on the swim team?”
“I'm not wearing my trunks and have other stuff to do. You go ahead.
What, Jake?”
“Where's the food, man? There's no fucking food in your house. I'm
starved.”
One glance at his reddened eyes and Nick could guess why. “Have you
been smoking Dave's shit in the house?” he asked, folding his arms. “I told
you how my dad feels about weed.”
“N-no,” said Jake. “Only out by the pool. Like you said.”
“Good.”
“Is there food, though?”
“Go bug Dave,” he said impatiently. “I'm getting the food.”
Nick pulled out his cell phone and ordered a few pizzas, and asked
Yelena to pick up soda and chips from Hollybrook Grocery, which earned
him a cool stare and a muttered phrase in Spanish. He supposed she was
still mad at him for enlisting her to trick Jay.
Oh well. She'd get over it. It wasn't like he'd forced her to take the
money. She'd agreed to sell Jay out. He looked at her closed bedroom door
and his heart hardened a little bit.
You're going to find out exactly how much your soul costs, little bird.
He'd roped off the staircases to keep people from fucking in the
bedrooms and roped the liquor cabinet in his dad's study shut, too, in case
people decided to help themselves. People often did. He'd stocked a pretty
good bar in the kitchen, full of top and middle shelf booze, and someone
had brought a lot of Ciroc. There was an open case of Four Loko, too, but
he wasn't going to be touching that.
Nick glanced at his phone as he headed outside. Jay hadn't responded.
It was that easy for her to look away and pretend he didn't exist. A waste.
Outside, someone had started playing Kings of Leon's “Sex on Fire.”
He went out through the lounge, where the doors had been thrown open.
The deck was wet from people coming in and out of the pool. There were a
bunch of people he didn't know, but a couple of them waved, so he waved
back absently on his way to the detached garage. Probably Dave's friends.
He let himself in with the keys, closing the door behind him. They
didn't really keep much out here. Stuff for the pool, holiday decorations, a
big freezer that was supposed to be for meat but since they never grilled
anything, it was mostly just mildewed and empty. The step-bitch and her
lover liked to fuck on it. The circuit breaker was out here, too, and next to
that was a little wooden box mounted on the wall that kept the spare keys to
the house.
Nick grabbed the one he wanted, attaching it to his key ring, and left
the garage.
“Hey, Nick,” some girl said, grabbing his arm. “Drink this.”
“Smells like drain cleaner,” he said. “Looks like drain cleaner, too.”
She giggled. “It's called Sex in the Driveway. Wanna try it?”
“Maybe you should give your Sex to someone else,” he suggested, and
then his eyes flickered, catching a glimpse of a red and white van. “I have
to go.”
He answered the door and paid for the pizza, which he set in the
kitchen with the booze. He was beginning to remember why he didn't do the
party shtick. It was fucking exhausting.
“Great party, my man,” said Dave, who was lurking in wait for the box
like a stoned vulture. “I'm gonna miss your ass when you're working the
grind. Is that the 'za? I could go for some 'za right now.”
“Literally no one calls it that,” said Nick. “You fucking weirdo.”
“Food!” Jake said, like he hadn't been gorging on chips earlier. “You're
the best, Nicholas.”
“Yeah, I am,” said Nick, raking a hand through his hair. “Now I have to
go take care of something upstairs, so if you really want to show me I'm the
best, keep everyone down here and don't bug me for about an hour or so
unless the house is on fire. Comprenez-vous?”
“What, gotta go rub one out or something?” Jake asked, mouth full of
cheese.
Nick gave him a look. Jake swallowed hard.
“No one upstairs,” he repeated. “Got it. Have fun doing your thing.”
Nick clapped him on the shoulder just a bit too hard. “Good man.”
And then he slid under the rope and went upstairs.

Danielle and Damon had left that morning with Vlad, who was driving
them to LAX.
Jay, ensconced in her room with a hoard of granola and water bottles,
settled in for a long, miserable wait. She had thought reprisal would be
swift and vicious, but Nick had done nothing to her for throwing the ice into
his face. Maybe he planned to exact the cost of it from her flesh.
Money didn't seem to make parties better, just louder. From the stereo
downstairs, she heard the heavy blast of a bass line. Rap or hip-hop, she
thought. Nothing else had that kind of beat.
At one point, her phone buzzed. You could come downstairs and join
me.
Yeah, thought Jay. How about never.
It had been a pretty dull day so far. She'd updated her Livejournal,
scrolled around on a few forums on the fansites of some authors she liked
(on the Mercedes Lackey one, she was PegasusWarrior11). She'd tried to
read but couldn't really focus; her mind kept wandering.
To him.
Curious, she watched a few of Nick's guests arrive through the window.
She had seen some of the guys before at the house, including that walking
sleazeball, Jake, but she didn't recognize many of the girls. They were all
incredibly beautiful, wearing skin-tight clothes with easy confidence and
makeup that seemed to make them glow. Had they gone to HHS or were
they from other schools? She could only imagine how they knew her
brother.
Watching them sway up to the door, some of them in thin cover-ups
over their swim suits, others in club wear, Jay found herself wondering
what it was like to walk around with that much confidence. Had she ever
been like that? Maybe when she was younger. It had been so long.
Someone turned the volume of the music up and she actually
recognized this one. “Gimme More” by Britney Spears. Ugh. Jay rose from
her bed, stretching her stiffening joints, and turned on her own CD player,
popping The Sundays's “Reading, Writing and Arithmetic” album.
Her room filled with the mellow sound of faded guitars and soft female
voices. She relaxed.
When she sat in her desk chair, Gypsum, who had been lurking at her
feet, immediately hopped onto her lap. With people coming in and out of
the house, Nick had turned off the AC and it was a bit hot and sticky to have
a cat on her lap, even with the breeze coming from her window. She took a
sip of water, troubled, as she ran her fingers through the cat's silky white
fur.
She had only seen Nick once this morning. He had been wearing faded
jeans and a tight black T-shirt splashed with a vividly colored dragon. Ed
Hardy, she thought, or one of the knockoffs. He had glanced at her and the
look in his eyes—a hot, calculating look that slid over her entire body to
scald her with its heat—had frightened her. Even though she'd been wearing
another one of her light, crocheted sweaters, it had left her feeling naked.
I need to get out of here. Out of Hollybrook. Out of L.A.
But how was she supposed to do that without any money? Damon's
words echoed menacingly in her ears—being an adult means you pay for it.
What, exactly, was it that she was paying for? Not wanting to marry a
creep who was twice her age? Touching herself in her own room and
forgetting to lock the door?
Jay shook her head. Even if she pawned all her jewelry, anything she
got would be eaten up by rent and travel. And how was she going to get a
plane ticket if Damon kept canceling her charges in the stupid joint account
he'd set up for her when she was still underage? Before, she would have had
a friend buy it for her—but now, she was questioning her friends. Both
Yelena and Quentin had been so quick to sell her out. If she couldn't trust
them, who could she trust?
Jay leaned her head back against her chair while Gypsum purred. She
drew in a deep, long breath as the breeze rifled the curtains and fluttered her
posters. A soft click made her lift her head and then she jumped up so
suddenly that her cat hissed and fled underneath the bed.
“W-what the fuck are you doing in here?”
Nick was leaning against her bedroom door, arms folded, with one foot
pressed against the paneling. “Do you mean why am I here? Or how did I
get in? If it's the latter, it's because I know where we keep all the keys to
every room in this house. And if it's the former—” He let his sneakered foot
fall to the floor. “I think you already know.”
She skittered out of the way when Nick crossed the room, but his goal
was her CD player. She stared at him in confusion, as well as annoyance,
when he popped the disk out and replaced it with one of her older CDs.
Slowly, he began inching the volume up.
“What are you doing?” she snapped, grabbing the back of the chair
when he toed his shoes off. She recognized them—they were Converse, but
from a limited edition partnership with John Varvatos. His were black
leather. She swallowed, looking up at him. The edges of the dragon were
outlined in gold and throwing off metallic sparks that were only slightly less
fiery than the veins of red in his dark hair. “I was listening to the other
thing. Put it back and get out.”
“It's too quiet.”
“What?”
“I don't want anyone else to hear you.” He crossed his arms to pull off
his shirt. “When we fuck.”
Jay felt her heart spasm when Nick started walking towards her, barechested. Stalking her. Like he's going to attack. Fear lit up her insides in
shimmering red waves as the beat of the music he'd put on pulsed in her
ears like a second heartbeat. Her grip on the chair tightened.
“Are you going to make me chase you?” he asked, looking at her
intently. “Or do you just really want me to bend you over that chair?”
The muscles in his triceps twitched before his shoulders did and Jay
yelped and pushed he chair at him before sprinting for the door. Nick was
faster, though, and caught her around the waist, holding her tightly against
him like a prize with her back squeezed up against his front.
“It's almost like you're trying to provoke me,” he said. “Deleting files
off my computer. Throwing cups of ice at me. Making me chase you. Being
a bad girl is exactly what got you into this position in the first place—or
have you already forgotten what's at stake?” His breath was hot against her
ear. “Do you need to watch the video again?”
“I'll scream,” said Jay, shivering when he pushed her hair aside and
kissed the back of her neck.
His laugh, low and deep, turned her knees to water. “You do that.”
There was a sharp yank that had her instinctively raising her arms. He
tugged her sweater and tank top off, tangling her hair up in the process and
causing it to frizz. She immediately hugged herself again when he put his
hands on her waist and turned her around to kiss her.
It was like he was trying to devour her. The way he touched her body
was a little clumsy but he was a good kisser. That disturbed her; it felt like
information she shouldn't have. Jay tried to edge back and he looped an arm
around the base of her spine, jostling her closer as he recaptured her mouth
and stroked his tongue over hers in a shivering series of caresses that made
her mouth tingle. He'd been drinking; under the sharp sting of alcohol, she
could taste a sweet and cloying syrup that lingered on his tongue.
“You're not very good at this,” he murmured, with a tilt to his mouth
that made her heart pound even harder. He ran his knuckles down her face,
along the underside of her chin. “I hope you fuck better than you kiss.”
That stung, piercing through the fear and anger in a venomous barb of
humiliation. “What do you know about it?” she said angrily. “You're just a
boy.”
His eyes drifted over her in a leisurely examination that disturbed her
because something about it was so adult. “I know what good sex feels like.”
“Then why are you here?” she asked. “Go to her. Or did you blackmail
her, too?”
“My first time was with a whore. Dad drove me to a brothel in
Nevada.” He traced slow, feathering strokes down her back, up her sides,
winding her tighter with each unhurried caress. Against her folded arms, her
nipples hardened. The cold dispassion of his words while he was touching
her like this was jarring, but that didn't seem to be stopping her body from
responding to him anyway. Smiling a little sharply, he added, “You came
this close to being my first.”
“That's horrible.” Jay choked on the words. “I can't believe Damon
would just—”
“What?” He was frowning now, and it rendered his chiseled, patrician
features brooding.
“Take his teenage son to a brothel.” Jay shook her head, feeling like she
was about to cry. “Your first time should mean something. You shouldn't—
you shouldn't pay for it.”
“Oh?” Nick's gaze became hard. “Is that how it was for you, Jay?
What, did you get fucked in a sunflower field or something? Who was your
first, anyway? Was it Quentin or Michael? I was never entirely sure which
of them you were screwing. Or was it both? I hear Quentin's bi.”
“It's none of your fucking business,” Jay snapped.
“Fine. Don't tell me.” He ran the back of his hand down her backside
before giving her a squeeze between her legs that left her feeling weak. “It
doesn't matter anyway. You're mine now.”
Still holding onto her, Nick reached around to unzip her jeans. Torn
between covering herself and stopping him from going further, Jay hesitated
only a moment before grabbing his wrist.
His eyes dipped to her breasts before rising to meet her gaze with
arrogance. His hand flexed in her grip. With a painful throb of awareness,
she realized that the only reason she was still holding onto him was because
he was allowing it. “Is there a problem?”
“I—” Something hit the backs of her legs. The bed. “I don't have
protection.”
“I do.” His hand slid out of hers. She felt the burn of his palms on her
sides. Touching her too much. Making her feel feverish. Her hips bucked
weakly when he ran his fingers down her belly, into the open fly of her
jeans. Pressing through her underwear. “Lie down.”
Jay stood, paralyzed. Unable to focus on anything but his fingers. He
planned this.
Nick sighed harshly and slid his hand out of her jeans. He scooped her
up beneath her backside. She cried out when her back hit the mattress with
a creak of springs that had the cat shooting out in a white blur and made a
second, more desperate sound when Nick swung himself on top of her. His
belt was hanging open and she could feel the cold drag of the metal on her
stomach when he leaned over her, pushing her hair out of her eyes with his
knees on either side of her hips.
“Fuck,” he breathed. “Look at you.”
When he bent to her, she pressed herself against the mattress,
squeezing her eyes shut. He kissed her cheek, her neck; he sucked hard at
her throat, as if trying to leave a bruise. She made a sound of protest as he
kissed down her ribs, exhaling, before gently biting the underside of her
breast. Her nipples hardened; he kissed those, too. The heated pull of his
lips as he circled her pinned flesh with his tongue made cold moisture bead
between her thighs.
“You're so beautiful.” Nick ran his hand over her hip. “I've always
thought so. Sometimes I don't think I can stand it.”
“Don't,” she said.
“Beautiful,” he said again, “and sweet—but not to me. Why aren't you
sweet to me?”
Their bodies began sliding together in an oddly deliberate way and she
opened her eyes, sucking in a breath when she realized he was working
their pants off. She pushed against his broad chest, which was firm and
smooth beneath her fingers, girded by lean muscle. Immovable.
“Nick, please,” she said, which made him glance at her and slip his
hand between her legs.
No. She tried to close them, and he wedged a knee between her thighs.
Her eyes flicked up to his, which were dark and assessing; the pupils were
like black holes suspended in their pale irises. “Seems like this is doing
something for you.”
He parted her and began to stroke her with a soft, strumming pressure.
Jay squirmed, feeling shameful, wilting a little under his intense stare. She'd
been touched before, but not while watched. Not in bright sunlight. Not like
this. She looked away but she could hear his breathing pick up, and the
friction behind his touch softened, becoming as smooth as molten glass.
Oh God. “No,” she blurted.
“Liar,” he whispered. “I know that look.”
Jay's eyes flew open in outrage and she lifted her leg, twisting to
deliver a jab with her knee. His face shifted—not to anger, no, but
something hotter and darker. He leaned back, out of striking range, and
reached for his jeans on the floor. Before she could struggle upright, he was
over her again, on his knees, sliding a condom over his considerable length.
That made her look away, but not quite fast enough, and when he
kissed her again, letting more of his weight fall against her body, she could
feel him—all of him—cradled between her thighs. A pressure that she knew
would blossom into pain. When she shifted against him, the pressure
became even more persistent. Uncomfortable.
“No.” Jay grabbed him. “Wait. I don't—”
“What?”
“Please.” Jay was breathing so hard, it took a moment to speak. “I'm
scared,” she said, in a small voice. His eyes snapped to hers and she looked
at the curtains, not knowing how to deal with that face, speaking all in a
rush. “It's going to hurt and you're—I haven't . . . please.”
“Shh.” She felt his lips brush her cheek, almost tenderly, and relaxed an
inch thinking he might let her go. “Stop crying.”
Was she crying? She squeaked when he shifted against her and he let
out another harsh breath. The weight of him was compressing her lungs and
it felt like the room was going dark. There was a ringing in her ears that was
as loud as shrill sirens. “Please don't hurt me.”
“Jay,” he said. “Open your eyes and look at me.”
Slowly, her eyes slid to his—in the sun-drenched room, they were the
color of arctic ice.
“Nick?”
“Yes. I'm right here.” His mouth covered hers in another one of those
slow, deep kisses that made her feel like she was drowning. His lips tasted
like salt. Jay dug her fingers into his shoulders and felt the skin of his back
flinch, but if it hurt, he didn't say so. “My sweet little blue jay. Just relax.
You're safe with me. I'm not going to hurt you. I'll be so, so gentle.”
Gentle? Her panic, which had been receding, flooded back in a
deafening torrent as she felt the muscles of his thighs tauten as he cocked
back his hips. “No—” Her voice broke into a shattered cry that rose over
the deafening music.
With a single thrust, he was inside her.
Chapter Twenty-Eight
2008

Sex with the whore of The Cherry Orchard had been easy—painless.
She'd done exactly what he'd told her to do and she had done it well, and
she'd seemed to enjoy it—or at least, she hadn't hated it. Nick figured the
experience wouldn't be that much different across other people, like driving
a car. Same parts, same basic rules.
Sex with Jay was neither easy nor painless. Sweet, soft-spoken Jay
scratched up his back like she wanted bone, swearing at him in between
each heaving breath. She did not look like she was enjoying it much at all,
despite his best efforts. She looked like she wanted to hurt him.
She fucked like she wanted to hurt him.
Finally, he'd been forced to rip her hands from his shoulders and pin
them to the sheets as he finished, and she'd fought him enough that he'd had
to work a little to keep her pinned. When he came, Nick felt so dizzy with
lust that it was like his head had been packed with cotton. She's all mine, he
thought, as he thrust into her a final time, burying his face in the crook of
her neck, inhaling the floral scent of her hair. She doesn't need to love me to
give me what I want.
When he opened his eyes again, hers had closed and her fingers were
clenched into fists that were tight enough that he could feel the tendons
popping out against his palms. Her heartbeat thrummed against his chest
like something trapped and hunted.
Nick pulled out of her and saw her throat move as she suppressed some
noise too quiet to be heard over the CD, which had repeated in the player.
There was a bit of blood on the condom. He looked at it for a long moment
before peeling it off and pitching it into the trashcan she kept by her bed,
feeling her body tense as he leaned over it.
It hadn't been an hour but he was in no hurry to leave. He felt rather
agreeably tired, except for his back which was studded with oozing welts.
Not deep but painful. They would probably hurt even more once the
endorphins wore off. The thought of wearing her marks beneath his clothes
sent a pleasurable frisson through his groin. “Oh, blue jay. That was so
good.”
Jay said nothing, but one of her arms had come up to cover her breasts.
Shifting to one shoulder, he carefully slung an arm around her waist.
When she still didn't move, he gathered her hair over one shoulder, baring
the smooth expanse of her back. “So good,” he repeated, dipping his head
to brush his lips over that one spot at the nape of her neck that made her
shiver. Goosebumps broke out over her arms as he ran his fingers down her
spine, raking his nails over that flawless skin just hard enough to leave faint
white trails.
It made her bow forward, pressing over the bar of his arm as if she
sought to escape his touch. “So we're finished,” she said tonelessly. It was
the first thing she'd said since they'd finished fucking, and in the break
between songs, painfully clear.
“Yeah,” said Nick. “Unless you want me to do something else.”
“I had sex with you,” she said, letting her arm fall. “Now delete the
video. I want to watch you do it.”
Nick stared at her as warm contentment bled out, yielding to a sudden
chill. “I don't think you understand how this works.”
“I'm not an expert in blackmail,” she shot back, “but I gave you what
you wanted.”
“You sure did.” He reached over to squeeze her breast before letting his
hand drift down her belly. “But you're not giving it to me to delete the
video, Jay. You're giving it to me to keep my mouth shut. You didn't think
I'd only want to fuck you once, did you?”
Jay went stiff as he kissed her ear. “What?”
“That's how this works.” He ran his fingers over her thigh. “Put up and
shut up.”
She looked at him like she hated him, then. It tore at him a little, even
as it got him hard. “How long?” she demanded, with a slight hitch. “How
many times?”
Christ, was she going to mark it on a calendar? She probably would—
like a fucking chore to be checked off. Nick slid from the bed, tugging on
his boxers and jeans. He picked up his shirt from where he'd dropped it over
by her bookcase, wincing as the threads of the fabric caught on shredded
skin. “I don't know,” he said coldly, bending to eject the CD player as he
slid on his shoes. “I'll have to think about it.”
She watched him buckle his belt, clutching one of her pillows to her
body like a shield. “Why are you doing this to me? Why do you hate me?”
“I don't hate you. I have to go back downstairs now.” Impulsively, he
added, “Come down with me. I'll make you a drink.”
“Are you forcing me to go?”
Nick paused. At her obvious reluctance, the urge to humiliate surfaced,
sharp and hot. He knew how to do it. He could have her put on one of those
dresses she hated, one of the ones that made her legs look endless. She
hadn't worn anything form-fitting since she was a teenager. Now it was just
endless sweaters and hoodies.
He glanced at Jay, who waited, watching him with a miserable
expression like she could see every dark thought in his mind and had
already surrendered. She would do it, too, he knew instantly; she would
wear a tight dress and she would hate him all the more for it.
“No,” he said wearily.
“Then I want you to go.”
“Don't be like that.”
She glared at him in a wounded, self-righteous way that really pissed
him off.
“Okay. Be like that.” Nick sat on the edge of the bed and she leaned
back in a way that sent a twinge curling through his stomach. “Kiss me,” he
said, “and I'll go.”
Jay leaned up, falling back on one arm as he tilted her chin up to his
mouth with his thumb. When it was done, she made a show of wiping her
mouth off like he disgusted her. Maybe he did. But it was pretty fucking
hard to look down on someone while you were underneath them.
“I'll be back later,” he warned her, before letting the door swing shut
behind him.
A lot of the guests had already left. Since the bedrooms were off-limits,
the drunk and horny ones had gone elsewhere to fuck. So Jake actually
listened.
Except for a few people out in the back, swimming in the pool or
dancing on the deck, it was mostly just people he knew. Nick made himself
a drink, a stiff one, and walked into the den to find his friends playing with
his X-Box. Dave looked half-asleep and Jake was still eating. Alonzo, who
Nick guessed had driven them here, was the only one who looked sober.
“Hey,” he said, looking up at Nick, where he leaned against the wall.
“Wanna play?”
“I'm fine watching.”
“You were gone a while,” Jake said, a little sulkily. “People kept asking
where you were.”
“Like I said, I had to take care of some shit.”
“Where's your sister?” Jake asked, so abruptly that Nick swung around
to look at him. Faltering under his stare, he went on, nervously, “Is she—uh
—still around?”
“She's in her room.” Nick took a long, bracing sip of the concoction in
his hand. The alcohol was so strong, it made his lips numb. “She hates this
kind of shit and she's sick anyway, so don't count on her coming down.” Or
at all, he thought darkly, tightening his grip on the cup.
“That's a shame,” Alonzo said. “I always liked her.”
“Yeah. Everyone does.” He sat on the arm of the sofa, trying not to
move too much. The fabric of his shirt was really starting to chafe against
his shoulder blades. “Jay's great.”
Dave glanced up at him. “You seem tense and fidgety, man. You wanna
toke?”
“You have got to be joking. What did I tell you when you got here?”
“Oh. Right.” Dave blinked. “I wasn't supposed to smoke in the house.”
“Now I'm going to have to get the couch cleaned.” Nick growled. “I'm
going to end you.”
Dave swallowed nervously. “Uh . . . I can pay for it?”
“You better.” Nick leaned back and hissed through his teeth. “I'll bill
you. You can pay for it with your fucking drug money.”
“Hey,” Dave said defensively. “Some of that is from honest living.”
“Really couldn't care less.”
Nick kicked everyone out around nine, citing a need to clean up and a
concern for the neighbors, though he really didn't give a sideways fuck
about either. He wanted to take his damn shirt off. He grabbed the aspirin
from his medicine cabinet, popping two himself, and then grabbed a cold
bottle of water from the fridge before going to Jay's room.
She had locked the door again. Rolling his eyes, Nick switched the
items to one arm and unlocked it before stepping inside. Jay, still in bed, but
now wearing pajamas, jumped. She'd been reading a book—one of her
fantasy ones. He could see the bright colors on the cover.
“Party's over,” he told her, not missing how she gathered her robe
tightly around herself as he approached. “Thought you might like to know
in case you wanted to come down.”
He set the water and the aspirin on her nightstand and she stared at
them, drawing her bare legs away when he sat down on the bed. He didn't
miss the flicker of anger on her face, or the wince. “How are you feeling,
blue jay? Still sore? I hear it usually hurts the first time.”
She did look up at him then. “Get out.”
“If it makes you feel better, I'm feeling pretty sore myself right now.”
“Get out.”
“I've got news for you, little bird. You're not the one calling the shots.”
“Stop calling me little bird,” she said. “It's stupid.”
“But that's what you are. You're Daddy's little bird.”
“What?” the word seemed to be ripped from her lips. “No. Stop saying
that.”
“You'll get used to it—just like you'll get used to the feel of my cock.”
Jay made a sound of disgust and he laughed a little, tugging at the collar of
her robe. “If you really want to get me off, you'll call me Daddy when you
fuck me. Otherwise, I'm going to make you say it. By punishing you. Sexy
punishments.” He pressed a kiss to her neck, just above the collar of her
shirt. “But maybe not-so-sexy ones, too. Remember, little bird. I can ruin
your life.”
She tried to hit him and he caught her fist, studying her hand in his. The
sleeve of her robe had fallen back, baring her forearm. Nick found himself
thinking, suddenly, of that strange remark his dad had tossed off about Jay's
wrists at dinner. At the time, it had seemed like his father was trying to put
the step-bitch in her place for being such a prig about the bracelet, but now
he wasn't so sure. The thought of his dad noticing Jay the way he did was . .
. unpleasant.
Nick slid his hand down until his fingers were encircling her wrist. Her
arms were slim, still tanned from the sun, but there was a wiry strength
there. Jay was neither a small woman, nor a passive one, which suited Nick
just fine because he had no use for either. No, underneath all that cool
reserve of hers was something hot and bright that he wanted all to himself,
something that infused her moral correctitude with a warmth that belied her
restraint.
He looked up to find her watching him and very deliberately pressed
his mouth to the back of her hand before allowing her to free it.
That was the price. Control—or the absence of it.
He was going to make her lose it all.

Jay thought Nick would get bored and abandon this cruel game of his,
as he had tired of so many of his other passing whims, but he wouldn't leave
her alone. The house that had seemed so big when she had moved into it at
fourteen had become a cage that housed them both.
He called her little bird. He made her call him Daddy. She hated this,
found the whole thing utterly humiliating and wrong, and at first she had
pleaded with him not to make her say it, to not call her that, which had been
a mistake, because her pleading had only seemed to stoke the flames of his
tireless will and make him even more insistent that she do exactly as he
asked.
And he asked for a lot.
He ignored her around his friends and acted more or less the same
around their parents as he always had, although she thought she detected a
new chilliness in the way he spoke to his father. It was hard to tell. He had
never been warm. She found herself watching people's faces, dreading
seeing the knowledge of her activities there, the leering judgment, but Nick
didn't seem to have said a word to anyone and when she Googled herself,
the results were always clean.
One night, he grabbed her on her way out of the kitchen and started
kissing her so hard, she couldn't breathe. “Beg,” was all he said to her,
before working the buttons of her blouse. He didn't even take her into his
bedroom; he pushed her over the couch in the den, where he had taken her
from behind while fingering her, until she gasped, Daddy, please, no,
someone might see, which made him groan a little in approval, even though
her despair hadn't been feigned.
The only one looking at you is me—and I like you a little slutty, he'd
whispered, right in her ear, and she had covered her mouth as she came,
trying to muffle the gasps that were coming out like sobs as he filled her so
deeply that her insides seemed to pinch. Arch your back and take me
deeper, little bird. You've been a bad girl and now I'm going to fuck you like
one.
She felt sick afterwards, straightening her top and pulling up her jeans,
his running stream of filthy commentary burning her ears like acid. Over
the pounding in her head, she'd heard the clatter of footsteps moving around
upstairs. Yelena cleaning. She could have walked in on them at any
moment. And Nick's father—the thought of him looking over that wall and
seeing her like that left her feeling cold. You don't know the thoughts that go
through a man's mind when they see a girl who looks like you, he'd told her,
inside that bar, and at the time, she hadn't.
But she did now. Jay stared blindly at the television screen with her
pulse buzzing around in her throat like an agitated hornet. Oh God. She
looked up at the wall, which had a clear view of the couch, and Nick
glanced over at her, tightening his arm around her waist. “What's wrong?”
“Don't mess around with me out here.” She met his eyes unflinchingly.
“I don't want your dad to see us.”
Nick leaned back against the couch, twisting his torso to prop his
elbow against the back. “Why?”
“Because what we're doing is sick enough without an audience.
Please.” Jay looked down at her hands. “I'm begging you.”
“Are you? Are you begging me, Jay?” His face became unreadable
then. He picked up her hand and looked at her, running his thumb over her
palm. “Has my dad ever touched you?”
Jay let out a hiss. “What?”
“You said you didn't want my dad to see us. Not our parents. Just my
dad.” He leaned closer, creeping towards her until she was half-bent over
the cushions. “My dad—who thinks you have nice wrists. Don't think I
haven't noticed how you cringe when he's around.”
“What are you insinuating?” she said. “I never let him—”
She broke off, realizing she'd said too much when he looked at her with
that searingly intent expression that seemed to be boiling parts of her away.
“So he tried,” he remarked. “And I bet you gave him that same pretty
speech you gave me about how you don't have a price.” Nick made a sound
of grim amusement. “I bet he loved that.”
Jay could feel herself growing clammy and pale beneath the layer of
sweat still sheening her skin. “It's not funny,” she gasped, feeling the stab of
tears at her eyes.
“It kind of is,” Nick said, in that same dark voice. “God, he doesn't
know you at all. I bet he thought you'd be some biddable dumb bimbo he
could buy off with a sparkly necklace just because you don't say much and
you have a nice rack.”
“Nick,” said Jay. “Stop. You're being—”
“Terrible,” he finished for her. “Yeah, I know. I have a terrible
personality and you hate it so fucking much. Don't remind me. Is that why
my father hates you now? Did you go off and sermonize him when he
wanted to fuck you? Did you tell him he was a waste?”
Jay jerked her hand and his grip tightened. “I told him,” she said
fiercely, “to fuck himself.”
A disbelieving laugh escaped his lips. “You did, didn't you? Fuck, Jay.
For one of the smartest people I know, you can be really dumb sometimes.”
His voice was hard; there was no trace of laughter in it now. “You really
don't want to fuck with him.”
“So it's my fault.” Her voice sounded stiff and cold. “I brought this on
myself.”
“No. But the thought of my father popping a stiff one doesn't really do
it for me, so thanks for the mental imagery.” He released her hand, combing
his fingers through his hair in agitation. “Believe it or not, I'm really not all
that interested in supplying my dad with wank material.”
Jay gripped her hand where he'd touched it, watching him lean back.
“Gross.”
“Yeah. I've seen him post-coitus. You really dodged a bullet.” He
glanced at her and something in his face softened, which made her wonder
what he'd seen in hers. “You can relax. I won't fuck you out here again. You
can come to my bedroom or I'll come to yours.”
“Thanks,” she said sourly, as she drew in a shuddering breath. “You're
a real prince.”
“He's screwing with you, isn't he?” He flicked at her arm with his
fingers. “That's what he does when he doesn't get what he wants. If it ever
gets bad, you can come up and see me. Just let me know. My roommate's a
total nerd and he's wired so tight, I think he'd snap if I yelled at him. They
paired me with some little 5'4” shrimp who has a haircut his mom gave him.
He nearly pissed himself when I shook his hand. I bet I could make him
leave for a night or two.”
“That's so cruel,” said Jay. “Why would you do that? Do you like
messing with people?”
“Yeah, I do, actually. To be honest, it gets me off a little—finding out
what people's buttons are and pressing them. Waiting them out. Watching
them squirm. It's such a rush.”
Jay felt her mouth go dry. She hadn't expected an answer that brutally
honest. “That's sick.”
“You asked.” Nick smiled mirthlessly. “Don't ask questions you don't
want to know the answers to, Jay. Unlike you, I have nothing to hide. I
know exactly what I am. I don't share, either. So if you think me going off
to college means a free pass, think again. I'm taking a copy of the video
with me and I'll know if you've been unfaithful.”
“We aren't dating, you freak. I can't be unfaithful.”
“I mean it,” he said. “You don't want to test me on this because you'll
lose. If I find out you've been seeing other men, you're going to be very,
very sorry.”
“Screw you.” She gave him a cold look, trying to quell the rush of
disquieting agony that threatened to be her undoing. “If you think you can
just keep me here on retainer like some brothel girl, I'm going to want to see
a test before you touch me.”
“A test,” Nick repeated, looking thrown. “Like an STD test?”
“Yes,” she said. “That kind of test. I've heard you're familiar with
them.”
His eyebrows shot up and some of the intensity faded from his
expression. “What you've heard about me is wrong,” he said coolly. “I don't
sleep around.”
“Sure,” said Jay. “All those girls in school were making it up.”
“They were. Most of them have seen me in a Speedo, so they can lie
pretty convincingly.”
It took her a moment to grasp his meaning. She felt her face burn.
“Why would they lie?”
“Lots of reasons. They think it gives them social cache or that it might
catch my eye or make somebody else jealous. But I don't date anyone and if
I fucked as many girls as people say I do, I'd have a fractured pelvis.”
Watching her carefully, he said, “I've only been with one person other than
you. But if you want a test, that's fine. I'll get one. Just for you.”
“Charming,” she said flatly.
“I can be.” He tugged at a strand of her hair, turning back to the screen,
letting his arm slip back around her waist. “Did I ever tell you Dad hired me
an etiquette tutor when I was nine? He thought it might come in handy in
case I ever had somebody to impress.”
“She failed,” Jay said flatly.
“It was a man.” He sounded smug. “His name was Alan Bates. Master
Bates, I called him.”
Jay stared at the cartoons on the screen. An etiquette tutor. Suddenly,
she felt drained. “This isn't normal,” she said, speaking into the silence.
“None of this is normal.”
His fingers traced just under her breast, as if daring her to move. She
was wearing a button-down shirt—pink plaid, shot through with silver
threads—and the touch of his hand through the thin fabric was like flame on
her skin.
“I would have given you anything you wanted, you know.”
Jay shook her head, turning her face away.
“Anything,” he repeated insistently. “All you had to do was say yes.”
“I don't want anything you have, Nick.”
Nick didn't speak again and Jay didn't move. They stayed where they
were until they heard the heavy steps of Nick's father coming down the
stairs. Only then did he let his arm fall.
Chapter Twenty-Nine
2008

Jay told herself she hated it—the sneaking around, the simmering
anxiety before he touched her, the fear of getting caught. And while she did,
it was starting to become only half-true; as much as she despised Nick for
what he was doing to her, she was starting not to mind the way he made her
feel when he did it.
Her mother didn't appear to notice anything was wrong. She continued
going out with other society women, clinging desperately to the fringe of
Hollybrook's social scene, and when she wasn't doing that, she seemed to
spend a lot of time outside. Talking to the pool guy. It seemed to be
harmless flirting but since nothing her mother did was without cause, Jay
wasn't sure.
“Oh, yeah, they're fucking all right,” Nick said, when she brought it up
with him one night. He wouldn't tell her how he knew, though, which either
meant that he was lying or that he'd seen them doing it himself. And since
Jay didn't want a play-by-play of her mother's infidelities, she didn't ask.
What if he had a video of it? It was just better not to know.
Damon, on the other hand, watched her in a way that made her wonder
if he knew exactly what they were doing. It was a speculative, sinister look.
Assessing. Libidinous.
He'd looked at her that night in the bar. It scared the shit out of her.
How's the job search going? Jessi asked. You beating the recruiters off
with sticks, yet?
Jay looked sadly at her phone. She desperately missed Berkeley.
Sometimes she dreamed that she was still on campus, buried somewhere in
the silent, sweeping library stacks or sleeping under a tree in the quad
between classes, and she would wake up happy until she remembered
where she was and that her days of answering to no one were over.
Because Nick had done to her exactly what his father had tried to do.
He had just done it more cunningly, not making a move until any mode of
retreat was gone.
She didn't think she could ever forgive him for that. Especially since he
was about to go away in less than a week himself and leave her here, alone,
at the mercy of his father, while lording that video over her head like a child
playing keep-away with a ball.
And since she could say none of that to Jessi, she didn't respond at all.
She'll give up soon, thought Jay. Cori already has. They both have their
own lives.
Jay brushed her teeth and changed into pajama pants and a tank top
with a pink sweatshirt from American Eagle. The house was always cold.
Damon kept the air conditioner cranked up to full blast in the summer, so
Jay often fell asleep with her hood pulled over her face and the covers
pulled up to her nose.
She crawled into bed, shivering a little, and curled into a ball beneath
the quilt. Tomorrow I'll apply to more jobs, she thought tiredly. Even if I
have to go far away—I'm getting out of here.
It was a dreamless sleep. Jay remembered reading somewhere that
everyone dreamed and people who thought they didn't have any dreams just
didn't remember the ones they did. She'd had vivid dreams when she was
younger but now it was like being spilled out into consciousness while
suspended in dark syrup. She groaned, shifting on her pillow, a patchwork
of hot and cold.
An uneasy breath escaped her and her body jerked—not out of reflex,
this time, but fear: she was unable to move her legs. She reached down and
grabbed what felt like a muscular thigh and a nervous cry escaped her. “NNick?”
His mouth brushed hers, soft and teasing in the dark, before covering
hers completely. Without meaning to, Jay relaxed beneath him and felt his
hand stroke her cheek. “Hi, blue jay.”
“What are you doing here?”
“I was lying in bed . . . thinking of you.” She felt him lean closer and
her hand tightened on his leg. His chest was bare. “And then I remembered
I could just let myself into yours.”
Jay let out another, rougher breath when he kissed her neck, pinning the
flesh with his teeth and sucking hard enough that she knew she'd have a
mark. “I wish you wouldn't.”
“Haven't you ever wanted to fuck in the dark? When the lights are off,
nothing matters.” He bent to kiss her sternum, and then her belly, following
no linear path. In the fuzzy darkness, the only indication of where he'd be
was the light puff of his breath on her skin. “You could do anything,” he
added, “and no one would know.”
She began to anticipate that warm pressure, breathing a little harder as
he dipped lower, nipping at the sensitive skin above her waistband. “That
sounds . . . twisted.”
Nick laughed quietly. “I thought so, too. But I think you're a little
twisted yourself, Jay. You're just better at hiding it than most. But I see it. I
see everything.” He bit gently at her hipbone. “You should let me take a
picture of you. Something to look at . . . when I'm all alone.”
“No.” Jay dug her fingers into the mattress. “You keep that fucking
camera away from me.”
“Funny you call it that. You should see what I have on there.” He
pulled at the tops of her pants with his teeth before trailing a series of light
bites to the other hip. “You'd be shocked.”
Jay shot up, gasping. “Of me?”
“No.” Nick pushed her back against the bed. “You're not the only one I
have dirt on.”
Jesus Christ. Jay gritted her teeth. “How many people are you
blackmailing?”
“Just you.” She felt his hair brush her ribs as he looked up at her. “Feel
special?”
“No.”
“Well, you should. You're the only one with anything I want.” He
pushed her top up higher and began kissing her breasts until her nipples
were sore. “I've never made anyone come with my mouth,” he whispered.
“Have you ever let anyone eat your pussy, Jay? Or am I going to be the
first?”
A low growl left her throat, even as something hot and shameful pulsed
through her.
“Good,” he whispered darkly. “I can't wait to put my tongue all over
it.”
He levered his arm under her hips and jostled her up, yanking her pants
all the way off. She jumped at the touch of his hands on her legs. He was
kneeling between her thighs and it was dark and she couldn't tell what he
was about to do and that was fucking terrifying.
“What are you doing?” she asked nervously, when he lightly gripped
her calves.
“This.”
“What—”
Jay clapped a hand over her mouth, smothering her startled yelp as he
yanked her twelve inches down the bed and hauled her legs over his
shoulders. Oh my God, she thought, trembling with nerves when she felt the
warm seal of his mouth between her thighs.
At first, it didn't feel particularly good—not bad, but not as good as
when she got herself off. He was too rough. That gave her a perverse sense
of satisfaction, as if she had thwarted him in some way. But as Nick
mapped out her body in the dark, he began to shift his approach. The blunt
laps became light, fluttering caresses that soon had her squirming against
the insistent pressure of his lips, and what he lacked in skill, he made up for
in enthusiasm.
“Like that?” he whispered, barely grazing her.
Jay pressed her lips together, but when she drew in her next breath, it
choked her.
“What does that mean, Jay?” He tightened his grip on her thigh when
she squirmed. “Does it mean, 'yes, please touch that with your tongue'?”
Jay soon found herself breathing very hard and she squirmed again,
pushing against his head. He let himself be moved and she could feel his
breath fanning against her tingling skin before he bent again and grazed her
with the tip of his tongue in a rough, flicking motion that made her breath
catch and her back arch. “Nick,” she croaked. “Please.”
He kissed her again, bearing down with his lips and his tongue, and her
hips lifted as he sucked, hard, and something in her body her seemed to
give, making her insides collapse like a house of cards. Jay let out a soft
moan, going limp, and heard Nick swear.
Then there was the telltale blue glow of a cell phone.
“Oh my God. Are you—” She gulped are. “Are you taking a fucking
picture?”
“No.” He glanced at her, his face pallid and demonic in the harsh light.
“I'm putting on a condom. Why? Do you want me to take your picture,
Jay?”
“Give me . . . your fucking phone. Now.”
“It's actually your phone,” he said, handing it to her obligingly as the
light flickered off. “I just borrowed it. Who's Jessi and why are you leaving
her on read? You think she'd like to know what you're doing right now?”
“You bastard—”
She dropped the phone with a clatter as Nick slid into her with terrible
ease, causing her voice to die in her throat as he began fucking her with
heavy strokes that slammed her back into the mattress while her body was
still singing from his touch. Each time he grazed her tender clit was torture,
and she found herself grabbing at him for leverage.
“No,” Nick panted, holding her hands down beside her face. “No
scratching. I have practice.”
Jay curled her fingers. “Embarrassed?”
He made a rough sound of amusement. “No. It's the chlorine . . . it
fucking burns.”
She closed her eyes as her hips fell into an easy rhythm that matched
his. She could feel guilt gnawing at the edges of her pleasure—that she was
wrong for doing this and worse for enjoying it. But for whatever reason, it
was easier in the dark. Easier not to see his face. Easier not to see herself.
She could just lose herself to the sensations and forget about the cause of
them.
“Tell me who your Daddy is,” he said, speaking just louder than a
whisper.
“You,” she said, crying out. “Oh god. Please.”
“Shh. Not so loud.” He turned his head, as if glancing at the door. She
could feel the muscled wall of his chest working against hers, as if he were
fighting her for air. “Say it. Beg.”
“Daddy,” she said, speaking into the void. “Please.”
“You're all mine—and you love the way I fuck you, don't you? Even if
you're afraid it might hurt.”
Jay frowned at that, even as her breathing quickened. “I don't know . .
.”
“Yes, you do.” She could feel the heightened tension in him, hear it in
his voice; he was close. If she gave him what he wanted, this would stop.
“You're my little bird. Say that, too. I want to hear it.”
“I'm your bird, Daddy,” she said, and he shuddered into her, pressing a
clumsy kiss to her face as he let his weight sink them both into her bed. He
released her hands and she felt him tense as she ran them over his spine,
relaxing in degrees as her fingers swept harmlessly over his skin.
“Fuck, I'm going to miss you.” She could taste herself when he covered
her mouth with his, sharp and musky on his tongue. “You're the only one in
this fucking town worth more than the air that you breathe. You know that,
blue jay?”
Jay wasn't sure what to say in response to that. The muted affection in
his words sent something sharp cutting through her and her tongue felt
weighed down by the shadows. She let her eyes slip closed, slipping back
into the warmth when he pulled her against him, and when she woke up,
she was alone. She might have thought it had all been a dream, if not for the
fact that her body ached and her pants and underwear were both thrown on
the floor.

Several days later found Jay sat on the sofa in the den, watching the
science channel on the television with her hands curled around a mug of tea
and the throw pulled over her lap.
Her mother was out with some of the other women and Damon was
work. She could hear birds outside, just barely audible over the television,
and Nick was throwing things around in his room as he packed with his
usual carelessness. He was going away to college tomorrow and Jay wasn't
sure how she felt about that. It wasn't quite dread and it wasn't quite relief,
but it had elements of both, and left her feeling very tired.
Eventually, the door clicked open and Nick came out in sweatpants and
a wife beater. He glanced at her for a long moment before disappearing into
the kitchen. Jay let out a slow breath, trying to focus on The Crimson Wing
but found herself tensing when Nick sat next to her, sliding beneath the
throw. He still smelled like clean sweat.
“What's this?”
“It's about flamingos.” She stared at the screen, no longer seeing any of
it. “All packed?”
He turned her face towards his, eyes studying her intently. “Today's my
last day.”
“I know.” She hesitated. “Do you think you could . . . talk to your
dad?”
Nick was studying her thin sweater with obvious disapproval but now
his eyes rose to her face. “About what?”
“I don't know. Tell him to . . . not sabotage me. To leave me alone.”
“That's not a good idea.” He paused. “What do you need the money
for? To leave?”
Yes. “No,” she lied. “I just want some independence. I miss having my
own life and I don't like having to use his money to do it. It seems to make
him think I owe him.”
“Talking to him would make it worse,” Nick said decisively. “He
doesn't like it when people talk back to him or question his decisions. And
it's not like you really need to work, anyway.”
“Funny how people keep telling me that,” Jay snapped. “I want to
work. I like working.”
“I wouldn't want you working. It suggests a man can't take care of the
women in his life.”
“Is that more of your father's sexist garbage? You're always parroting
him. Do you even realize that? Sometimes you sound exactly the same.”
“I'm not my father, Jay,” Nick said. “He wouldn't let you talk to him the
way I let you talk to me.” He arched his eyebrows. “He doesn't believe in
marriage, outside of what it means for appearance's sake, and he thinks the
ideal woman should be passive and ornamental, like a doll. Would you be
surprised to learn that I don't agree?”
“I don't know what you think,” Jay said. “And right now, I don't really
care.”
“You should care.” Beneath the throw, his hand slid up her thigh.
“Don't mouth off to my dad while I'm gone. You apparently have no selfpreservation and I don't want him touching you.”
“That wouldn't be a problem if I could get a job.”
“Don't worry about it. I'm going to take care of you.” His fingers slid
into her pants. “Just like you always took care of me.”
Jay clung to the throw staring unseeingly at the pink-feathered birds
and tropical blue water on the screen. “What does that mean? Do you think
we're going to get married or something?” He didn't respond and she let out
a sound that was part-sob, part-sigh as his searching fingers found her clit.
“You're never going to delete those things you have on me, are you?”
He watched her through hooded eyes and folded her free hand over his
erection, scooting closer until they were hip to hip. “You know if I did,
you'd leave.”
Had she done something to bring this upon herself? She had tried so
hard to push him away, but nothing she had done had worked. And even
though she knew objectively that none of this was her fault, she couldn't
help but feel responsible anyway. Because she was the older one.
She was supposed to know better.
According to society, it was always the woman's fault.
“You would leave,” Nick repeated, accusingly, when her hand stopped
moving.
“Yes.” She saw no point in denying it. Staring ahead bleakly.
“I'd find you.” He pushed her hand away and finished getting himself
off, arching in a way that seemed to be for her benefit, before peeling off his
wife beater and coming in that with a low moan that made her look away.
Nick tossed the soiled garment aside and slid to the floor, shirtless now,
stretching out his long legs. With a contented sigh, he reclined so he was
cradled between her thighs. “I'd bring you back, blue jay.”
“What are you doing?”
“I strained something while lifting my shelf. The fucking thing is solid
mahogany.” He looked behind him, still breathing heavily. “You want to rub
my shoulders?”
“Not really.”
“Well, it wasn't a request,” he said coolly. “Do it, Jay.”
Jay sighed in irritation when he pressed against her. The illusion of
choice. His skin was like hot silk. An unspoiled canvas, save for the faint
healing marks that had come from her own fingers. She ran her nails down
the lines of muscle chiseled into his skin as she shuddered, imagining
ribbons of gouged skin peeling away. The visceral salience of it startled her
a little, and so did her own bloodlust. She'd never seriously considered
hurting anyone before.
“You don't need to be so gentle.” He glanced at her, upside-down,
scratching absently at the stubble on his chest. He'd started shaving it again
for swimming. “I won't break,” he added.
She stared at the vulnerable arch of his throat, as if hypnotized, and
slowly began to rub his shoulders. His gray eyes slipped closed, and he
leaned further back, causing his dark hair to feather against the couch. She
looked away from him abruptly, studying the baby flamingos on the screen
with clinical interest, watching them stumble around on their ridiculously
long legs.
“I know,” she said. “Nothing ever touches you or your father.”
“You really hate me, don't you?” he said, in that same cool, reasonable
voice. “For not letting you go. You hate my dad, too, but it's different kind
of hate. With me, it's personal.”
Jay kept watching the TV and tried to tell herself that she felt nothing
but her body felt as if it were not her own. His breath warmed her thigh
through her pants, sending tingles shooting up her leg. She could feel the
dulled flutter of her own pulse between her legs, and the pull of fabric over
her sensitized skin made her keenly aware of his every movement.
She was about to let her hands fall away when he mumbled, “I only
wanted you to stay.”
Blinking back tears, Jay looked down at his sleeping face. Even at
eighteen, almost nineteen now, there were still pockets of baby fat that
hadn't yet been chiseled away. He had the same heavy patrician features as
his father, but elevated—higher cheekbones, a sharper slant to the nose. His
mouth wasn't like his father's at all and neither was his hair, so Jay supposed
both of those things must have come from his mother, whoever she was.
She had probably been beautiful, Jay thought. Not just because that
seemed to be the only thing Damon really cared about in women, but also
because her son was, too. In sleep, purged of its jaded insensitivity, his face
was almost painfully attractive.
He sighed and hugged her leg, nuzzling against her. Just like when he
was a boy, she thought, feeling a lump forming in her throat. Nick used to
cling to her when he was small with the possessive affection of a feral dog.
As if nobody had ever hugged him before in his life.
Knowing what she knew about him now, it was possible that nobody
ever had.
She wanted to feel nothing. She wanted to feel unmoved. Instead, she
felt everything. It was as if her heart had been opened up and everything
was pouring out.
Damon came home a few minutes later, halting at the edge of the
checkerboard tiling where it yielded to the white carpet of the den. Jay saw
him take in the scene: Nick asleep, with his face pressed against her knee,
the TV on low. It wasn't exactly indecent but for some reason, the way he
looked at her made it feel like it might be.
“Aren't you two cozy?” he said, in a way that made her feel cold. Like
he'd caught them fucking instead of whatever this was. “Didn't you just
come to me with wild, hysterical accusations about my son, Justine? Saying
that he was touching you—inappropriately?”
“I . . .” Words froze in her throat like barbed shards of ice. It's not what
it looks like, she almost said, but that, in and of itself, implied guilt.
You will do no such thing if you want to keep that pretty face.
Her heart began to beat harder as he set down his briefcase. Freeing his
hands. To hurt her? She glanced uncertainly at Nick, somehow still asleep.
“W-we're just watching television,” she said in a strained voice. “He fell
asleep.”
“I used to find the two of you on this couch all the time.” The hairs on
her arms prickled in alarm as he stepped into the room. “He looked up to
you. There was a time when he refused to believe that you could do any
wrong.”
He's behind me.
She felt a tug on a strand of her hair. “What did you say to him?” she
asked, hugging the throw to her chest. How did you turn him against me?
“I simply told him the truth. Women always disappoint—even you,
Justine.” She saw him step into her periphery, still twisting that captive
strand of hair in his fingers. “A simple reminder to be grateful goes a long
way towards correction.”
Correction. “You mean you—” Jay couldn't bring herself to say the
words in her head, afraid that giving voice to them would make them real.
Being an adult means you pay for it.
“What a disappointment you were,” he said, tugging on her hair
sharply enough to make her eyes water. “Such a beautiful girl, and you
squandered it all on ambition.”
Jay drew in an unsteady breath. “You can't keep me here.”
“Perhaps not. But I can make it very difficult and very painful for you
to leave. And so can Nicholas, who sees things much more clearly than you,
with your short-sightedness, ever could.”
He leaned down and Jay began to tremble hard enough that Nick
frowned and began to stir.
“Let me give you some advice.” The strand of hair fell harmlessly to
her shoulder as he tilted his head towards Nick, so that his mouth was level
with her ear. “If you're going to lie to me about fucking my son under my
own roof, don't mark him up first, little bird.”
Chapter Thirty
2008

If you're going to lie to me about fucking my son under my own roof,
don't mark him up first. Jay went rigid, feeling as if she could no longer
draw in enough air to breathe as Damon followed that up with other
comments. Ones that made her throat burn hot with bile.
She wasn't sure when the documentary had ended, but when she found
herself looking at the screen again, it was ink-blank. She could see her
reflection in it, thin and distorted in a world filled with murky shadows. She
was in so much trouble.
“Your father knows,” she said to Nick, as soon as he had woken up.
“He knows we're—he called me little bird,” she said, her voice breaking a
little. He saw us. He saw me.
Oh God, he'd seen her. What had he seen to make him look at her like
that?
“That's all he said?” Nick asked, rubbing at his eyes.
“No. He said . . . other things.”
“Like?”
Even the most unsound horse alive knows not to mount the colt before
the stallion.
“It was disgusting. I don't . . . I don't want to repeat them.”
It made her feel so sick, the idea of him seeing her like that. Enjoying
it. It must have been that time on the couch, she thought. He must have
looked over the low-wall and seen us.
“Don't worry about it.” There was a dangerous gleam in Nick's eyes
that scared her. “It will all be fine. He won't do anything to you. And if he
does, let me know. I know a thing or two about what he's been up to that I
don't think he'd appreciate getting out.”
“Like what?” she asked desperately. “Tell me.”
“I can't.” Nick patted her cheek. “You'll ruin my plans, blue jay.”
With those frustrating words, he had gotten up to change for dinner,
leaving her on the couch. What plans? She'd wanted to scream after him,
How are you going to fix this?
It was the exact same way he'd always been, though. Even as a child.
Secretive and vague and utterly disdainful of the consequences. Whether it
was being rude to the housekeeper or sneaking liquor out of his father's
cabinet or blowing through the girls at school, Nick had never really put a
lot of thought into the effects of his actions on others.
He's a boy, Justine. A boy doesn't fuck like a man. Not even if you call
him Daddy.
Nick had come to see her before he left, letting himself into her room
and pulling her into a tight embrace. Like we're a couple, she thought
bitterly, as he kissed her forehead. “Text me.”
No, thought Jay. You can text me if you want to talk to me so badly.
He'd be gone for two months before his next holiday break. Jay didn't
go to see him off, not wanting to be trapped in a car with Damon. Life
immediately began to feel more like a prison. She stopped texting her
friends back because she got tired of telling them over and over again that
nobody wanted to hire her and she had the distinct impression that they
were secretly relieved to have her negativity pruned from their life as if it
were an infected branch.
Nick didn't text her at all, which didn't surprise her. She hadn't
messaged him, either. He was probably off fucking some rich society
princess who came from Big Tech money.
Jay almost felt sorry for her, whoever she was. She was going to get her
heart ripped out.
Damon didn't touch her again but the way he looked at her made her
feel as violated as if he had, and she made herself sick imagining what he
could have seen. All of it?
Somehow, the thought of an audience made what they were doing feel
even filthier.
Jay asked Yelena if she could have her meals an hour earlier than
Damon and her mother did and Yelena acceded without comment, even
bringing them to her room. Probably still feeling guilty over allowing Nick
to put a price on her loyalty, Jay thought uncharitably.
It had been a cruel favor he had done her, showing her how quickly the
people she had once considered friends and family would hurt her if they
thought they might benefit from it. She couldn't even really blame Yelena
for doing what she had. Not really. In the house hierarchy, Jay was firmly at
the bottom. Yelena might have liked her just fine, but she was afraid of
Nick, and fear brought more urgent results than love or loyalty did. Jay did
not exactly instill the decisive need to obey in others—but Nick's father did.
And so did Nick.
She spent long hours out of the house trying to make herself feel better.
There were plenty of things to do that didn't involve jobs, she told herself.
She volunteered for the adult literacy program at the library. She went to the
one thrift store in town and thumbed through all the CDs until she could
have picked out the titles by the gumminess on their cases alone. She joined
a few hiking groups and went out on a few of the trails, until some of the
men got too creepy.
At one point, she tried to sign up for classes at the local community
college and was unsurprised when the charge was once again canceled. God
forbid she try to do anything to keep from melting into ooze. She pushed
back from her computer so angrily that she ended up propelling herself
nearly halfway across the room in her chair.
So he thought he could keep her trapped her because she couldn't be
bought off? Jay threw together all the jewelry Damon had given her as a
teenager—Nick's words, dumb bimbo, kept clanging in her ears—threw it
all in her most expensive purse, and went to a pawn shop on the outskirts of
town that was literally on the other side of the tracks.
She sold everything for $2300. It wasn't much, but it was more cash
than she'd ever actually held in her hands in her life, and it was $2300 more
than what Damon wanted her to have. She nearly stashed it under her
mattress, but she thought that might have been too obvious. For years, she'd
kept her diary there, and she'd noticed that it looked like it had been moved.
So she Googled ideas about hiding valuable items in plain sight and
then, when she was done, she wiped her whole search history just in case
someone was checking that out, too.
Jay glued one of her old Mercedes Lackey hardcovers together, sealing
all of the pages shut so it opened and closed in two large pieces. She
hollowed out the center with a sharp cutter she'd gotten from Nick's room,
carving out two large rectangles to make a chamber where she could store
the bills. Carefully, she replaced the book on her shelf, where she checked
on it a couple times a week just to make sure the money was still there. It
made her feel a little safer.
I have money now, she thought fiercely. You can't control everything I
do.
It wasn't a lot, but if she ever needed to flee, it would be enough to get
started.
Before she knew it, September had become October, and October had
turned into November. The leaves began falling from the trees and there
was a chill in the air that had nothing to do with the AC, which finally got
turned off. Nick arrived on a flight from SJC to LAX the day before
Thanksgiving.
Jay, in her room, heard him come home. He always slammed the front
door too hard and it rattled all the pictures on the wall, making that eerie
jellyfish sculpture shiver.
She tossed her book on the bed and went downstairs just as her mother
screeched from her room, “Nicholas? Is that you?”
“Yeah.” His booming voice sent a chill rippling down her spine. “It's
me.”
“Your father wanted you to call him when you arrived. I don't know
why—it's not like he wouldn't notice you sitting at the table.” Her face
poked out of her doorway when there was no response and her eyes landed
immediately on Jay. “Justine, did you get the mail?”
“I did.” She glanced at Nick's open bedroom door. “There was nothing
for you.”
Nick appeared in his doorway almost before she'd finished speaking,
wearing jeans and a red Stanford shirt with a long black coat. Jay felt
something in her stomach drop when he looked her up and down. “Jay,” he
said, in a way that made her know this wasn't over, “come here.”
She walked towards him with deliberate care, thinking he was going to
hug her. His hand slid out of his pocket. She caught a gleam of something
silver. A necklace? She tried to look at it, but he kept his fingers clenched
around the pendant so all she could see was the glitter of the chain. Her
dread increased. “You didn't need to get me anything.” I wish you hadn't.
“I wanted to.” He reached around her neck, fumbling a little with the
clasp in his large hands. “I got this in Santa Clara. We were coming back
from dinner and I saw this store. My friends thought it was hilarious, gave
me all kinds of shit. Asking me if I was whipped. And do you know what I
said?” he asked, stirring the strands of hair around her face.
Jay looked at his bowed head. “No.”
“I told them that the girl I was giving this to would be wearing this, and
only this, to greet me when I got back.” Nick slid the pendant down the
chain, giving her a glimpse of the little jeweled bird, before allowing it to
fall gently against her throat. “They asked to see pictures.”
“What pictures?”
“Exactly.” The chain dragged against her skin as he centered the
necklace.
Jay stepped back. “You talk about me to your friends?”
“Not really. They only know I'm seeing a girl back home.”
“We're not dating, Nick. You're blackmailing me.”
“Would you rather I told them the truth?” Nick closed the distance
again. “I didn't tell them your name and the only photo I have of you isn't
one I'm willing to share around.” His arms looped around her back, pulling
her into his open coat. She could feel the weight of his hands at the base of
her spine. “It's a gift, Jay. Don't be so uptight about it.”
“I guess I don't exactly feel comfortable taking gifts from you right
now.” She leveled a look at him through her hair, feeling her anger rise at
the casual reference to the video. “Especially not expensive ones.”
“You took them from my father,” he said. “You wore that bracelet for
years.”
“That was different,” Jay said, struggling to form words, “And I regret
it.”
“Justine!” Her mother shouted down the stairs. “I think I saw the UPS
truck. Can you check?”
Jay stepped away from Nick, grateful to have an excuse that wouldn't
make her look weak. “What is it with her and the mail today?” she
wondered aloud. “She won't stop harping about it.”
“It's probably something for the pool boy.” Nick stretched against his
door, touching the top of the frame. His shirt lifted, baring the tops of his
boxers and a strip of tan skin. “Isn't that just fucking typical. Fake tits,
shopping sprees, and adultery. She really ticks all the boxes for the sad,
aging trophy wife, doesn't she?”
Jay stormed past him to the door, where the UPS man was waiting.
“Hi,” he said, smiling at her. “Mrs. Beaucroft? I need you to sign here.”
Mrs. Beaucroft. Jay's smile faded. “No. I'm her daughter. I'll sign for it.
Do you have a pen?”
The man handed it to her and she scribbled her signature while he
watched. Then his eyes flicked to something over her shoulder and he
quickly wished her a good afternoon and left. Jay dropped the package on
the end table, puzzled, and nearly walked right into Nick, who had
apparently been standing there, looming quietly behind her.
“Mrs. Beaucroft,” he sneered.
“What?”
“He was flirting with you.”
“I really don't think so.”
“I know that look. I see it on the faces of a lot of the men who look at
you.”
“I don't know what you want me to say to that,” Jay said coldly. “I can't
help the way I look. You want me to take out a billboard and tell people not
to look at me?”
“You know what I want.” With a crumpling sound, Nick pulled a paper
out of his coat. There was some kind of grid on it, printed with numbers and
letters she couldn't make sense of.
Whatever it was, Jay made no move to take it. “What is that?”
“It's my test.” He looked at her unsmilingly as she blanched. “You told
me I wasn't allowed to touch you until you saw one. Well, here it is. Take a
look.”
“Justine!” her mother called. “Was there a package?”
“Yes!” She snatched the box off the end table, looking away from Nick
and his test. “I'm bringing it now.” She swerved around him, heading
towards the stairs. She could feel his eyes following her, his unspoken anger
making the air feel pressurized.
“Thanks, baby.” Her mother was lounging in bed with a copy of
Memoirs of a Geisha and some sort of herbal tea that she'd gotten from one
of her new-age friends. She had a whole group of them: they all wore
expensive quilted skirts from Anthropologie and spent their mornings doing
hot yoga while talking about the benefits of essential oils and juice cleanses.
“What, um, is it?” Jay asked curiously, hovering,
“Oh, nothing,” her mother said, too gaily. “Just something I ordered off
Amazon, Kitchenware.”
That smacked of a lie. Her mother never cooked. Shit. Nick was
probably right. “Okay,” Jay said slowly. “Well—be careful.”
“Did Nicholas call his father?”
“Not yet.”
“He never listens to me. The disrespect, I swear. You've heard the way
he speaks to me. It's like he thinks I'm a whore, Jay. He's not like you, baby.
You're so obedient.”
Jay winced internally. “Thanks.”
“Be a lamb and remind him, won't you?” Her mother smiled at her.
“You're the only one with any control over him.”
“Yeah,” Jay said faintly. “I'll ask.”
Jay left the master bedroom, trudging down the hall. The door to her
bedroom was open a crack and she was displeased but not entirely to
surprised to see Nick sitting on her bed, now coatless, with Gypsum coiling
around his spread legs. He looked up, leaning back on the bed.
“Lock the door and strip for me.” As he unbuckled his belt, he added,
coldly, “I left the test results on the nightstand if you want to take a look
before we begin.”
Control, Jay thought weakly, gripping the hem of her shirt in her hands.
Right.

Stanford had been nice—he loved the open, sprawling campus. The
freedom. His roomate, Philip, left him the hell alone, which he liked, and
he'd met a couple people in the dorms he thought were okay. He worked
harder in class than he wanted to, taking a grim satisfaction from wrenching
the cold, hard solutions from the smatterings of data in lecture hall.
Before he knew it, those two months were gone in a whirlwind, and he
was booking a flight through SJC. Returning home. To Jay.
He had his friends and wasn't lonely but sometimes at night he found
himself rolling over and feeling restless. Missing the drag of her curls
across his chest or the way her firm little ass felt against his cock when he
held her afterwards. As the nights grew colder, he'd spent a lot of time
thinking about how soft and warm she was, and how much he missed her
mouth and all of the strange, bitter things that came out of it whenever she
snapped at him.
She hadn't messaged him once since he went away.
Maybe I should have ordered her to, he thought, watching her take off
her clothes. She did it very quickly, as if wanting to get over with, looking
anywhere but at him.
And that was unacceptable.
“Bed,” he said, standing up. “On your knees.”
Nick saw her shoulders hunch but she did as she asked. He looked at
her for a moment, feeling like he couldn't breathe, staring for so long that
she looked over her shoulder at him. Whatever she saw there made her
quickly whip around, her shoulders going even more tense.
“Did you miss me?” he asked, a little mockingly, wanting to hear the
answer regardless.
Jay said nothing, still clearly angry with him. That was fine. He could
work with anger.
His cock was so hard that he didn't need to touch himself at all. He took
her from behind, going slower than he wanted because she made a
distressed-sounding cry when he entered her. When he reached around to
stroke her, she didn't feel very wet and he had to force himself to go slowly,
letting her get used to his size as he touched her the way he knew she liked.
As he played with her, he said, almost absently, “You never wrote to
me.”
“Neither did you.”
The accusation hung. Nick tightened his hands on her hips with a rather
grim expression on his face and finished fucking her in silence, digging his
nails into her backside as he came. She bucked a little but he knew she
hadn't really enjoyed it, and that annoyed him.
Nick stripped off the slick condom and wiped himself off with a tissue
with quick, agitated motions before tucking himself back into his boxers.
Jay was sitting on her bed with her legs angled demurely and her hair
draped over her shoulders in two tangled sheaves to hide her body.
He tugged off his shirt and handed it to her. “Here,” he said shortly.
She looked at it with a sigh and pulled it on, yanking it down to her
thighs. He liked the way it slid down her shoulder, revealing a glimpse of
the necklace. He collapsed beside her, swinging his legs up on the bed
without bothering to do up his jeans. His flight had only been about an hour
long but suddenly he felt like he'd flown all the way from Japan.
“Come here,” he said, groping for her, pulling her body against him as
he'd been wanting to do for months. She didn't resist. “You could have
visited me.”
“Your father is doing his best to make sure I can't go anywhere,” she
said coolly, primly tugging the hem down where it had ridden up. “I can't
even buy a bus pass.”
“I'll send you tickets. If you don't want to kick poor Philip out of his
room, I'll put you up in a hotel, too. We can go out to dinner. Wherever you
want,” he added, closing his eyes. “There's a steakhouse up there so fancy
that even their garnishes have garnishes. I'll take you there.”
“You can put me in a hotel and buy me a steak dinner, but you can't get
me out of here?”
“God.” Nick sighed, letting his hand rest high on her hip so that his
fingers were pressing into the crease of her inner thigh. “You're so
frustrating. I don't want it to be like this between us.”
“Maybe you should blackmail me into feeling what you want.”
“We have an arrangement, blue jay. I have something you want and
you're paying me for it with something I want. Quid pro quo.” She made a
muted sound and pulled her hips away. Nick opened his eyes to find himself
staring at her turned back. He scooted closer. “The terms might be stacked
in my favor, but that doesn't mean I don't care about you.”
“I'm pretty sure that's exactly what it means,” she said. “Normal people
don't blackmail people they care about into having sex with them. Because
normal people don't have to.”
That made him flinch, and he hated himself for it, as well as for the
brief flash of guilt that chased it. Angry himself now, he swung out of bed,
letting her fall back against the sheets. Shirtless, he prowled her room,
aware of her study and not liking it.
There were plenty of girls who'd expressed an interest in him. He
considered telling Jay that, but he knew she wouldn't care. Not for the
reasons he wanted her to care. He had the feeling that if he did fuck around,
she would just sit there silently and judge him, and that pissed him off
because he cared a lot about who she fucked around with.
The very idea of her being with someone else made him want to hurt
someone, actually.
Looking at her, wearing his shirt and his necklace, but very much not
his herself, was gutting. So he looked away, scanning her belongings.
Walking to her bookshelf, he let his eyes flick dismissively over the titles
crammed in there, studying her rock collection.
Almost immediately, he noticed something was missing. “Where's the
gypsum rose I got you?” he demanded, folding his arms. “I don't see it.”
“I had to sell it.” She sat on the edge of her bed, tugging his shirt over
her lap. Her long hair swung forward as looked up. “I had to sell a lot of my
things.”
“Why?”
“I told you why. Your dad won't give me any money. He rejects all my
purchases.”
“I would have sent you some if you'd asked. You have a fucking phone.
You can text me. Anytime you want. You're not poor. You don't need to
hock your shit like you're—”
“What? One of the rabble? A poor relation?”
“Don't you fucking start.” He ran his fingers through his hair. “You
have choices. You can come to me for help. You can come up to Palo Alto,
or I'll send you money. Or you can sit there in your little silk princess sheets
and whine. Just don't sell shit around here without asking.”
“You're the one who told me I should sell things I didn't like.”
Nick winced again, and felt another flood of anger that he was letting
her get to him this way. That she could get to him this way. “I'd watch it, if I
were you,” he told her, in a tight voice. “Your mom's this close to going
down in flames and if you aren't careful, you're going to burn up right along
with her. I'm all you have.”
“What do you mean?” she asked, paling. “What's going to happen to
my mom?”
“I mean, I'm pretty sure my dad knows what's been happening at the
pool.”
“Oh,” she said. “Like he knows about you and me?”
“Not the same thing. You're mine and he isn't going to touch you.”
“Why not? Because of this? Is this supposed to protect me from your
dad? Are you marking your territory?” She clawed at the necklace. “My
God, Nick. You really are daddy's little boy, aren't you?”
“What the fuck is that supposed to mean, Jay?”
“It means you're a bully,” she said fiercely. “Who doesn't care about
anyone but himself. I've begged you to help me and you tell me you will,
and then you sit back and refuse me. Don't pretend you care about me. We
both know you only care about one thing.”
Nick stared at her books. “If I didn't care about you, I'd tell everyone
what you really are.”
She stood up so fast that she startled the cat. “And what am I? A
whore? Is that what you were going to say? Is that what I am to you? If I
am, it's because you made me that, Nick.” She poked at his chest, hard, just
above his sternum. “You forced me to bargain myself, piece by piece, and
now I don't even feel like I'm myself anymore—and I hate you for that.”
Nick looked down at her hand and she hastily yanked it away as he
backhanded her rock collection, making her stumble back from him as a
shower of semiprecious gems rained over the carpet in a rainbow of colors.
“Hate me, then,” he breathed. “Break yourself into a thousand pieces and
deny me each and every one of them. Because I am never letting you go.”
Then he left, slamming her door shut behind him.
For a moment, he leaned against it as his heart thumped wildly in his
chest. The front door opened and his father walked in, wearing one of his
suits, briefcase in hand.
Oh great.
“Nicholas,” he said, glancing up at him. “You were supposed to call
me.”
“Yeah.” Nick walked down the hall. “I know. I got distracted.”
“I know your stepmother reminded you.”
“I'm busy.”
His father scoffed, glancing pointedly at Jay's closed door. “I can guess
doing what.”
Growing up, his father had seemed like a remote, powerful figure.
Mythical and godlike, it was an image he had curated carefully but now it
was starting to fray apart at the seams.
Nick stopped about three feet away from his father, right under that
Chihuly sculpture that had always reminded him of a twisted balloon
animal wrenched from the deep. “I hear you like to watch now.” He tilted
his head. “I like to watch, too.”
“Nicholas,” his father said, in a reasonable tone, “you don't want to
fuck with me.”
Nicholas folded his arms over his bare chest. “If you mess around with
Jay again, I will.”
Chapter Thirty-One
2009

Things changed after Thanksgiving, which was a disaster. Her mother
babbled into the silence. Damon studied her the way one might study an
exotically colored beetle, trying to decide whether it was a curiosity or a
pest. And then there was Nick, who just looked furious at everyone. After
his loss of control in her bedroom, she found herself feeling frightened of
him.
Break yourself into a thousand pieces and deny me each and every one
of them.
The sex had been rough and desperate; he'd forced her to be more
vocal, which she hated. She let him do whatever he wanted and told herself
she was glad when he left. But then he started texting her. Are you wearing
your necklace? Send me a picture. They trickled in slowly at first and then
more frequently—two or three times a week, often late at night.
She didn't like that he was thinking of her late at night.
Knowing he probably expected pictures with cleavage, she
purposefully wore it with turtlenecks and drab sweaters. It might have been
resting on a display case for all the pleasure he'd get out of it. He never
responded to her photo texts, but after a few days she'd get a request for
another one. A couple times, she'd get one asking, What are you doing?
Sitting in this house because I can't go anywhere else. Jay sighed and
wrote, Reading.
Nick sent a photo of one of her favorite books. Look what I found at the
campus bookstore.
It was such a blatant attempt at manipulation that it made her angry.
Wow, a book, she typed sarcastically. You're great at finding things. He
wrote back but she plunked down her phone on the nightstand and stopped
responding. That seemed to irritate him because he sent her a volley of text
messages, followed by a phone call. When she scrolled through them the
next day, she was unimpressed to see that the most recent one said, I'm
coming home for Dad's party.
That stupid party, thought Jay. Ever since Damon had announced the
January holiday party for his company, Jay knew she was going to be
forced to go. And she really didn't want to.
Her mother took her out shopping for dresses and since Jay hadn't liked
any of them, her mother and the sales assistant had wrangled her into a
couture gown the color of rose gold, sewn all over with crystals. It made her
feel like a glass of sparkling champagne and when she said as much, the
sales assistant beamed as if she had said something clever and
complimentary.
Her mother, however, recognized her tone of voice and shot Jay a
dagger-like look as she fingered the transparent cap sleeves. There were
small pink pearls sewn over the shoulder, making it look as if the dress was
held up by magic. Jay knew she wanted the dress for herself but there was
no way it would fit. She towered over her petite mother and her figure was
much fuller. They hadn't been able to wear the same size clothes since Jay
was fifteen.
“Mom,” Jay said, clutching the bodice. “I can't wear this. It shows
everything.”
“She's shy,” her mother said, rolling her eyes at the sales assistant, who
nodded knowingly. “We'll take it.”
“Mom,” Jay said again. “No.”
“Justine.”
The night of the party, Jay tried to plead sick, and her mother had
yelled at her so colorfully and cuttingly that Damon hadn't needed to say a
word.
The three of them were already dressed. Her mother was wearing a
silver, spangled gown cut to display as much of her cosmetically enhanced
breasts as was tasteful for an office party. Damon and Nick were in formal
suits—not rentals. Damon had some Italian brand Jay had never heard of
brought down from the attic in a box, and Nick was wearing one he'd gotten
himself.
Having the three of them watch her trudge up the stairs like a child
being sent to her room was—humiliating. There weren't many instances in
her life that came close, except maybe for sitting topless in her stepbrother's
lap while he came in his pants. That might be worse.
Or her stepfather hitting on her in a bar after touching her thighs and
breasts and telling her that her mother was little better than an expensive
whore.
Looking at her reflection in the mirror, tugging at the bodice that
seemed to get more revealing with each adjustment, Jay found herself close
to tears. It felt like her mother had forced her to get this dress precisely
because she didn't like it—but what kind of mother would do that?
In her clutch, her phone buzzed. Are you wearing your necklace?
Jay started to type a furious reply and then deleted it.
Seated next to him in the limo, she could feel the heat coming off his
body. His jacket had been tailored to fit his broad shoulders and nip in at his
slender waist, and the pants showed off the streamlined silhouette of his
long legs. It was a three piece suit, like his father's, but the suit vest was a
deep oxblood, and so were his tie and pocket square.
Demon prince, she thought. Only, he looks the part, now.
Nick didn't touch her but the look in his eyes as they raked over her
made Jay feel as if she were being burned slowly alive, especially when
they dropped to the silver necklace at her throat, and then lower, lingering
on the beaded decolletage of her gown.
It hurt to look at him then. It hurt to breathe.
Nobody who saw him look at her like that could harbor any doubts
about what was going on between them. Jay looked away from him. Her
eyes bounced off her mother, who was sipping from a glass of champagne,
and skittered away from Damon, who was watching them both with lewd
amusement as he nursed his own glass of Cristal.
“Where did you get that necklace, Justine?”
Jay wished she could shrink into herself. He'd all but admitted to
staring at her chest and there was a chill lurking in the spaces between his
words, giving them the force of an arctic blast.
“I gave it to her.” Nick crossed a leg over his knee in a gesture that put
him a little closer to her. With his arm stretched along the back of her seat,
only a few inches lay between them. He glanced at her, lips parting into a
sardonic grimace. “A jay for a Jay.”
“You have such a pretty name, Justine,” her mother said, looking away
from the window. “I wish you would give up that childish nickname. Jay is
a man's name. It doesn't suit you at all.”
“I think it does,” said Jay. “I've never liked the name 'Justine.'”
“Let's not fight about it now,” said her mother. “Not before the party.
I'll get wrinkles.”
Damon patted her mother's hand in a way that seemed condescending.
“No. This is a night for celebrating financial and filial success—and our
beautiful children, of course.”
Filial success? Her eyes flicked to Nick, who looked grimly sardonic.
“So much to celebrate.”
What is going on?
“Don't you agree, my dear?” Damon asked, and Jay's stomach flipped,
but he was talking to her mother this time, giving her the smile of a very
polite shark.
Her mother was wearing new earrings—big crystals that made her look
like a Vegas showgirl with deep cleavage. “Yes, of course, baby,” she said.
“Whatever you say.”
“You can't say it, can you?” Nick bent the arm sprawled along the back
of the seat, using it to prop up his head on his fist. “You can't even tell your
daughter she's beautiful.”
“What?” her mother looked at him in irritation. “What are you talking
about, Nicholas?”
“Nothing,” he said, leaning back. “Absolutely nothing at all. You dumb
fucking cunt.”
Her mother's jaw dropped. “How dare you talk to me with such ugly
words,” she hissed. “You oversized brat. Just where do you get off?”
Nick started laughing. “You want to know . . . where I get off? Really?”
“Nicholas,” said Damon. “This is unacceptable. You will apologize at
once.”
“No.” Still chuckling, he said, “No, I don't think I will. Is there any
champagne left in this car? I feel like I could use a drink.”
“You're nineteen.”
“Right. I forgot. Jay, do you want a drink?”
“No,” she said. “I can't.”
This is a nightmare, thought Jay, as the car continued up the dark road.
She wished Vlad would turn the car back around to the house. At least that
was a familiar hell.
The party was on the top floor and rooftop garden of a Los Angeles
skyscraper. The garden was filled with topiaries and Jay thought it was a
little ominous to see all those gigantic leafy animals all but floating against
the deep navy sky like creatures in a Japanese monster movie.
As soon as she and her family stepped off the elevators, the music hit
Jay like a wall of sound. It was like slightly edgier mall music, so there was
lots of Maroon 5, La Roux, and Katy Perry, with older artists that everyone
liked thrown in so as to not upset the conservative older crowd. In the
garden, it was quieter, with light 90s jazz emanating from hidden speakers
as people escaped the dance floor and buffet area for a quiet, bracing drink.
Jay might have enjoyed herself if she hadn't been with her family and if
she hadn't been in this dress. The food was good—lots of canapes on clear
plastic plates cut to look like crystal—but men kept asking her to dance,
looking at her in a way that made her want to cry and be angry, all at the
same time. A number of them were Damon's age. They probably worked
with Damon.
The fast-paced pop song ended, yielding to a slower jazz song. Nick
crossed the room to her and palmed her waist, whirling her away from a
skinny old man in his fifties who had slowly been working up the nerve to
approach so that the two of them were face to face. The blue lights made his
eyes look like ice. “Dance with me,” he said.
Jay put her hands on his shoulders, giving the illusion of compliance
while also allowing her to hold him at bay. But it wasn't far enough to be
comfortable. His chest kept brushing hers and his fingers seemed to scorch
her through the open back of her dress.
“Dad went off somewhere,” Nick remarked, when he caught her
scanning the dance floor. He took one of her hands off his shoulders,
clasping it in his. “And your mom's upstairs taking advantage of the open
bar. Flirting with one of the bartenders.”
“I didn't know you could dance,” Jay said, trying not to think about his
words or his hand.
“I told you I had an etiquette tutor. Dance lessons were a part of that.
My father didn't want me to embarrass him at parties if some girl asked me
to dance.”
Jay shifted her weight and his grip tightened minutely.
“You're trying to lead.”
“This is just how I was taught,” Jay said defensively. “There weren't
that many guys in Dance, so they usually had me lead.” She tried to turn
and he blocked her with a hip. “Stop that.”
“I'm leading.” He hedged her forward with a series of quick steps.
“Submit to me.”
Jay tore her hand away from him to press against her bodice as he
dipped her backwards, making her breasts shift in her gown. “Nick,” she
said. “Stop.”
“You can't even see anything beneath the beading.” Her jaw hardened
as he peeled her wrist away and clasped her hand in his own, although he
didn't dip her back again. “It suits you.”
Jay said nothing else as he swept her around the floor. In the heels her
mother had helped her pick out for the dress, she was only three inches
shorter than he was. Having his face hovering so near to hers made her
nervous: this close, he missed nothing, and she was afraid he might kiss her.
“What the hell was that in the car?”
“I'm tired of bullshit. I don't want to deal with bullshit anymore, Jay.”
He spun her around and she nervously glanced around. A few people
were looking their way, including some of the men she'd turned down. “I
still have to live with them.”
“Not for long,” said Nick.
“What is that supposed to mean?”
“I told you about my photography hobby.” His fingers tightened over
hers as if he thought she might try to pull away. “You asked me if I was
blackmailing anyone else.”
Her stomach plummeted. “I remember.”
“That's changed. I told my father I plan to propose to you when I
graduate.” Jay stumbled. He caught her, tugging her up until she stopped
dragging her feet. Somehow, both of her arms had ended up around his neck
and she was clinging to him like a mast on a sinking ship. His hands rested
just over her backside. “He's always said that fucking a married woman is
like eating the leftovers out of another man's fridge.”
“That's disgusting.”
“He didn't like that,” Nick said idly. “He's still hot for you. He called
you and me a lot of names until I told him I'd punch him if he didn't stop.
Then he threatened me, so I told him I had photos of him fucking his
secretary inside our house . . . and out of it. I've never seen him go so pale.”
“Nick,” Jay said faintly, “What the fuck?”
Nick smiled. It was not a nice smile. “That's what he said, too. Word
for word.”
“You're blackmailing your father?”
“He's furious,” Nick confided. “I'm pretty sure he was looking for the
pictures in my room. It was all torn up—not that he'd find anything. I'm not
an idiot. I left them back at Stanford.”
“No wonder he was so mad in the car,” Jay whispered. “Oh God, Nick
—why?”
“It's like I said,” Nick told her. “I am so fucking done.”
“Well—I'm not going to marry you. You can't threaten people into
doing what you want. They'll despise you for it—they might even hurt you
for it. I think your father could actually kill you,” Jay added nervously,
remembering the way he'd slammed his fist so close to her face. “There's
something seriously wrong with him.” And with you.
“You both have four years to get used to the idea.”
“Oh my God,” Jay said again weakly.
“Marry me,” said Nick. “It solves all your problems. You'll have
money. You'll have my last name. My dad won't mess around with you
anymore. And your mom can go fuck herself when my dad's divorce
lawyers drag her through the cleaners.”
“You blackmailed me,” said Jay. “You threatened to drag my name
through the mud in front of everyone in town. You forced me to have sex
with you. You filmed me without my permission and you still haven't
deleted the video—or were you planning on doing that as a wedding gift?”
She drew in a painful breath. “What made you think I would possibly want
to marry you?”
His dark eyebrows angled down. “Are you going to refuse me again?”
“Yes, I'm going to refuse you again,” she hissed. “Because this is
stupid.” Her chest was rising and falling with her anger and she could begin
to feel her palms sweating against his wool jacket. “It's stupid,” she
repeated, her voice breaking, “and it's never going to be enough. You're
going to try to own me and it's not going to stop until one of us is
completely broken.”
“And would that be so bad?” She felt his nails scratch gently down her
spine and it nearly made her stumble again. “Would it?” he repeated, more
softly. “It wouldn't even have to be violent, Jay. I think the right words
would do it. I've seen how you come apart.”
She could feel his breath teasing her lips and turned away, bowing her
head towards the floor against that all-too familiar tide of shame.
Yes, she knew better than anyone how words could shatter the soul.
“Seriously, Jay. Marry me. I'm all you have. Men like Michael and
Quentin look at you and see someone pure who needs protecting, but you
and I both know that's not what you want.”
What I want. Jay slid her hand out of his, placing it back on his
shoulder.
“You know what the really stupid thing is? I never really cared about
Michael and Quentin never cared about me. I don't even talk with Angela
and all of my old friends have moved on. I cared so much about what
everyone thought that it paralyzed the part of my brain that should have
been saying fuck these people, Jay, and I just—gave in to you. I gave you
whatever you wanted until I couldn't even look at myself in the mirror and I
don't know why.”
She let out a breath.
“Go ahead and tell everyone in Stanford and Hollybrook that I'm your
little whore. I might be that—but I won't be your wife.” Jay tore at the chain
around her neck, wincing as it cut into her flesh before snapping. She
dropped it into his hand, closing his fingers over it. “We're done.”
“Where are you going?” His voice was low. “People are watching.”
“I don't know. Away from you.”
The song ended and Jay stepped away from him, turning down the hall
to where the bathrooms were. Feeling like she desperately needed a good,
hard cry. There was a line, though, and so she kept walking, passing dark
rows of empty offices with windows like blind eyes.
I did it, thought Jay. I'm free. So why doesn't it feel good?
Her throat felt raw where she had ripped the necklace off. Her heart,
even more so.
She had never felt less free.
Jay paused at the end of a hall, standing between a conference room
and a fire escape, wiping a few tears from her face. That was when she
heard a sound—soft and quiet, like a muffled cry. “Is someone there?”
The sound cut off abruptly and Jay could feel her heart pounding into
the silence. Someone's here, she thought, staring into the darkness of the
conference room. Something's wrong. She groped for a light switch,
plunging the scene into a stark, sick, fluorescent tableau.
It was Damon, and he had some poor woman bent over the conference
table with his hand clapped over her mouth. Jay had never seen her before,
but she had loose, feathery brown hair and glasses, which were all fogged
up and sliding down her nose. When she looked up at Jay, her eyes were
red. Like she's been crying, thought Jay. That sick fuck.
Jay backed up, tripping as her heels got caught up in her skirts.
“Justine.” Damon stepped back and Jay looked away but not fast
enough. Oh my God, that's his cock, she thought, which was enough to send
her running. Behind her, she heard him swear.
She wasn't sure where she was going, only that she needed to be far, far
away from here, and that someone—she wasn't sure who—needed to be
told. A hand grabbed her arm and Jay was flung into the wall, back-first.
She gasped, winded, throwing up her arms to cover her face when she saw
something fly towards her.
But Damon's goal wasn't to hit, but to entrap. Her body jolted as his
free hand slammed against the wall, caging her in. “Justine,” he said, nearly
snarling her name. “You've been busy.”
Jay shot her knee into his groin. She heard him gag and curse, the hand
on her arm convulsing. “Let go of me,” she cried out. “Let go—you rapist!”
“No,” he rasped. “That's just a little game we like to play.”
“She was crying.” Jay felt like she could barely stand. The hand
wrapped around her arm felt like a fleshy manacle. “I'm calling the police.”
“The police?” Damon grabbed her clutch with his free hand and threw
it so hard that the clasp broke on the first bounce off the tile, spilling her
things down the hall. “Who the fuck do you think you're talking to, little
girl? I own the police. Nicholas grew up with Sheriff Van Hoff's boy and
our money runs this town.”
Damon ripped her away from the wall.
“And speaking of Nicholas, I suppose I have you to thank for his
revived interest in photography. Did you put him up to that, you little
bitch?”
“N-no!”
“Did you think you would get away with it? You're worse than your
mother.” He yanked on her arm, pulling it hard up her back. Fabric ripped
and beads scattered. Jay went limp as she stumbled along next to him.
“Don't fool yourself into thinking you hold any sort of sway here because
you let my son bend you over a couch.”
Oh God, no.
“Tell me,” he said, in a calm voice that chilled her. “When did your
Mrs. Robinson act begin? Was Nicholas underage when it did? I saw him
take you into his room when he was fourteen. Did you touch him when he
was twelve? You want to fucking come for me, Justine, and I will slap you
with statutory rape charges so fast you'll be gagging on lawsuits.”
“I didn't touch him,” Jay cried. “I would never—oh God. He was a
child.”
He was taking her back to that empty conference room. She began to
kick and struggle, but he had some of her hair tangled up with her arm and
she couldn't straighten up enough to really fight. Not without eliciting a
sharp burst of pain that made her eyes water.
Jay hit the table, rattling the plastic basket of pens and notepads in the
center of it. Damon looked at her coldly and she felt her pulse throbbing so
hard in her throat that it seemed on the verge of bursting out. She fumbled
to hold her ripped dress closed.
“What—” She groped behind her with her free hand, wincing at the
soreness of her arms, and closed her fingers over the basket. “What are you
going to do?”
“You fucked my son, who then fucked me—so it seems only fair that I
fuck you. God knows, I've waited for it long enough.” He reached for his
belt buckle, breathing hard. “And you're going to be a good girl and do
exactly what I tell you. You can even call me Daddy.”
“No,” Jay said faintly.
“You will,” he promised her coldly. “Because if you don't, I'll make
sure the whole town knows just how fond you are of our youth. The
younger the better—isn't that right, my dear?”
Jay threw the pens at him with a cry and yanked the door open. I have
to get away.
She flew right into Nick.
“No!” she cried, as his arms tightened around her, keeping her
immobile. “Let me go.”
“What's the matter?” he demanded. “What happened to your dress?”
“Your father—” Jay gasped, as he released one of her hands. “I need to
. . . oh.”
Damon skated out into the hall in his polished shoes. “Justine,” he
roared. “You get back here right now, or the whole town will know what
you've done.”
Nick didn't move and Jay found herself wondering if he was going to
give her back. Just hand her over to his father like a discarded plaything
because she wasn't any good to him.
“My father did this.” It wasn't a question.
She clutched at the ripped seams of her gown with her free hand,
scattering more beads with her squeezing fingers. “Please . . .” she heard
her voice crack. “Don't give me to him.”
“Never,” said Nick. He shrugged off his coat, snapping it out to drape
around her shoulders. The wild, vicious crack of it made her flinch and for a
moment, his face seemed to crack too, baring glimpses of something raw,
like the exposed soft tissue in a deep lesion.
And then he walked over to his father and he swung.
It was . . . awful. Jay had never seen someone get punched in the face
before. It wasn't like the movies. It wasn't clean. There was a sick, wet
sound. A crunch. Blood splattered onto the wet tile as Damon's teeth
shredded his lip. Who knew the human face had so much blood?
When her stepfather spat, Jay heard something solid clink off the tile. A
tooth.
She shoved her arms into Nick's jacket and grabbed his arm from
behind with both of hers as he cocked his fist back for another blow.
“Stop!” She hung onto his bicep, terrified at the resistance she found there.
“Stop. You're going to kill him.”
Damon crumpled to the floor like a heavy sack of flour and Nick let out
a rough breath as he turned around. The knuckles of his right hand were
covered in syrupy-thick blood. The sight of it made her gag. She could
smell it. It smelled like old, dirty pennies.
“You're crying,” said Nick. “He made you cry.”
No, thought Jay. You did.
Shaking her head, she turned from him and ran. She ran and ran and
ran, telling herself that as long as she could get away, she would never look
back.
And for eight years, she never did.
Chapter Thirty-Two
2017

He made you cry.
Birds were singing in the trees overhead and the sun was hot and
punishing, but for a moment she was somewhere else—somewhere sterile
and cold that smelled of carpet cleaner.
And blood.
She was in Nicholas's lap, straddling his thighs. There was something
seriously messed up about that: sitting in the lap of the man who had used
her so badly, crying while he held her. Even on the verge of falling apart,
she was mindful enough to recognize that.
Something to add to the list of things to tell the therapist.
It was a long list. She had never seen one. Therapists were expensive
and she lived paycheck to paycheck. Anything that wasn't covered by her
insurance, she sought to treat herself.
Everyone in that house had hurt her in some way. Damon, she had
never trusted. But Nick—
I fucked up. I fucked everything up.
He still smelled exactly the same—grapefruit, and the clean smell of
his own skin. It made her want to run even as it seeped her of any desire to.
When his hand smoothed up and down her back, she pressed her face into
his shoulder and then he stopped stroking her entirely and just held her.
Cradling her in the same arms that he'd used to hold her down.
I am never letting you go.
Suddenly, she felt trapped—she pushed at him, expecting those arms to
constrict around her like a cage. And for a moment, they did, only to fall
away. When she looked up at his face, it was expressionless through the
haze of her tears. Despite the gentleness of his hands, the seeming rawness
of his words, she could detect no emotion from him at all.
After a while, he said, “My legs are starting to burn. Let's go back.”
Jay unfolded herself creakily from his lap, brushing dust and debris
from her clothes. Her eyes were burning and the white-hot sunlight was
only making it worse. She slid her shades down and stared resolutely ahead.
But something had changed.
Perhaps irrevocably so.
They walked back down the trail in silence, startling a line of quail on
their way downhill. Jay could feel Nick looking at her: quick, assessing
glances. She wished she could read him as well as he seemed to be able to
read her, but whatever he was feeling, he hid it well.
Overhead, a red-tailed hawk circled lazily, looking for prey. They were
the largest types of hawks and Jay found it fascinating that their eye color
changed as they got older, from gold to brown. She loved red-tailed hawks,
and had ever since picking up the Animorphs books as a kid, intrigued
enough by the animals mentioned inside that she'd started going to the
library to check out books about them.
She remembered wishing so badly that she had something special that
set her apart from everyone else. A secret that nobody else knew about. She
glanced at Nicholas, and her stomach sank when their eyes met. Be careful
what you wish for.
Nicholas turned on the AC as soon as they were in the car. As he
backed out of the dusty lot, Jay took a last look at the hills. It had been a dry
spring and everything was brown. In a certain slant of light, they could
sometimes look like glowing sand dunes. The city wasn't like that; living
there could leave you starved for the sight of trees.
He drove fast—faster than she would drive, if it was her behind the
wheel. She always went the speed limit; he seemed to add 10MPH by
default, confident that he wouldn't be pulled over.
In this town, she thought, he probably wouldn't be.
She rubbed at her face. Her cheeks felt stiff and chapped from crying
and when she checked herself out in the side mirror, she could see that her
eyes were bloodshot.
“Are you hungry?”
The question made her instantly defensive. Part of her wanted to refuse
as a matter of pride but having her stomach growl after lying to him would
just add further insult to injury.
“I don't want to go inside anywhere right now,” she said, after a
moment.
She saw the brief flash of his sunglasses. “You don't have to. I will.
What do you want?”
That's a good question. She leaned back against the seat as the cool air
washed over her heated face. “Something unhealthy.”
He stopped at Bubble Trouble, the boba cafe she'd used to go to all the
time with her friends in high school. Jay was surprised that it was still open.
The paint job looked pretty faded and it seemed to sag a little under its own
weight. Jay knew how that felt.
She must have dozed off because when she was opening her eyes, she
could smell hot, oily food and Nicholas was getting back into the car,
shoving his wallet back into his pocket.
“What did you get?”
He'd taken his sunglasses off and his eyes looked even paler than usual
with the pupils all shrunken from the sun. “Sweet potato fries and an oat
milk matcha latte for you.” He popped the glasses back on. “Deep-fried
octopus and a Fruity Pebbles smoothie for me.”
She glanced at the rainbow drink and then at him, mildly surprised that
he would order something so juvenile. It seemed unmanly. “Lots of sugar,”
she said.
“I love sugar,” he said, in the same mild tone. “I'm twenty-seven and
have nineteen fillings. I'm going to die a toothless old man.”
Jay almost smiled, which made her angry. She tugged at a lock of hair
that had escaped her bun and looked out the window, trying to discern what
was new and what had stayed the same, just as she had on the way she had
on the trip to the Afghan place. But her heart wasn't in it.
After a moment, she picked up her drink and took a sip.
“Do you like it? I can go back and have them make it again.”
“Don't do that,” said Jay. “That's such a waste.”
Nicholas frowned. “It's a waste to pay for something you don't want.”
“I like it,” she said, too quickly, because he looked like he was about to
turn the car around. There was a strange, frenetic energy buzzing around
him. Guilt? Anger? Shaking her head, she said, “I don't need you lecturing
me about my spending habits.”
“I'm just surprised you've gotten so comfortable,” he said. “You used to
race around filling up the soap bottles with water to make them last. I
thought that was so weird.”
“You've never been poor,” Jay said quietly. “You don't know what it's
like, knowing that you could lose everything you have in a single moment.
There were days when a school lunch was the only meal I'd have all day.
My mom used to bring me home bar food leftovers for dinner. If she came
home at all. Sometimes she didn't and I'd wonder if she was ever coming
back, and I was lucky if she remembered to buy the damn soap at all.”
“I don't know what it's like to be poor. But I know what it's like to feel
alone. My father made it clear from the beginning that his care for me was
conditional.”
You're so like him. Jay's fingers bit into her thighs repressively, no
longer certain if it was true. At the very least, he no longer seemed to parrot
his father's words. “You were so young.”
“Children know,” he said, which halted her next words in her throat,
because she could still remember all those sleepless nights back in the
Tenderloin. Crying herself to sleep.
Of course, she'd cried herself to sleep in Hollybrook, too.
Watching Nicholas carefully, she said, “So he wrecked the company.”
“Yeah.” She saw his fingers curl around the wheel, the slightest fraying
of his control. “Nearly tanked it. The embezzling was bad. So was the
sexual assault case. When I took over after his death, I thought I was going
to have to sell it off piecemeal to a corporate raider.”
“I'm surprised they didn't come after you.”
“I was the one who supplied the prosecution with the photographs of
his other victim—the woman at the holiday party, she was his secretary. My
father told her he'd fire her if she didn't sleep with him. He had her coming
by the house a couple times. That was how I got the photographs. I saw
them. I thought she was another one of his whores.”
“Why did you start photographing people like that? It's a little sick,
isn't it?”
“It didn't start out sick. I started out taking pictures of trees, birds. The
usual shit. People were more dynamic. Interesting. I suppose initially it was
about the intimacy of getting to know someone through the lens. And then it
became about the thrill of catching their exploits on film.”
Jay's mouth flattened. “I'm surprised your father didn't disinherit you.”
“How was that going to look? His only son? He had his pride—that
was another part of his conditions, that need to save face. No, it was always
going to me.”
What an arrogant psychopath. Nicholas parked in the driveway and Jay
hopped out of it, holding onto her drink like she didn't know what to do
with it. “I guess it's good your disgusting hobby benefited someone in the
end.”
“I'm actually a very good photographer,” said Nicholas. “If you're
willing to sit for me, I can take a professional head shot that would run you
about $100 in a studio. You should take me up on it. Your current LinkedIn
picture looks like a missing person poster.”
Jay shot him a dark look. “You're going to be a missing person if you
come near me with a camera.”
Her words elicited a feral grin that had her fingers tightening around
the cup. “Feisty,” he remarked, in an appreciative tone. “Do you want to eat
inside or outside?”
Thoroughly unsettled, Jay nearly said, Outside, until she remembered
that would mean eating by the pool. “Inside is fine,” she said.
She thought he laughed, but when she looked in his direction, his face
was carefully impassive. They went into the kitchen, where he dropped the
cartons unceremoniously on the counter with the bar stools, instead of
going into the dining room like she expected.
Though she was relieved not to eat in that coldly formal room, Jay
didn't miss that he'd chosen the stool in the middle, giving her little choice
but to squeeze in next to him unless she wanted to grab her food and run.
After breaking down and crying in his arms, she wanted to do exactly
that. But she had her pride, too, and sometimes pride meant being stupid.
She climbed onto the stool that faced out into the aisle across from the
fridge, which made her feel a little less trapped than the corner.
He slid her box at her. The sweet potatoes had turned golden brown at
the edges with frying and had been lightly dusted with sugar. It was a riot of
grease and delicate sweetness—exactly what she wanted after a hike and a
cry, and even better with a creamy iced tea. She couldn't help closing her
eyes a little, wanting to savor it, and when she opened them again, she
realized she was being watched.
Nicholas looked away abruptly, dragging her eyes to him, and then to
his food, which was already gone. Even the crumbs. Incredulous, she
glanced at his drink, which had been sucked down to the dregs. “That was
fast,” she blurted. “You still bolt your food down like a little kid.”
“With some things.” He reached over and helped himself to a handful
of her food, to her annoyance. “Once in a while, I find something I really
want to savor.” Without breaking eye contact, he slid one of the fries into
his mouth, in a way that made her avert her gaze.
She stared at her fries balefully as her glum mood returned. “Is this
where you order me to come to your room?” she asked, trying to sound like
she really didn't care.
He reached over again, this time brushing a lock of hair out of her face.
A ripple of sensation cascaded down her neck as he tucked it loosely behind
her ear. “I want you to kiss me.”
Jay felt another piece of herself fracture and threaten to break off. She
nodded slowly and leaned forward, surprised when he pushed back against
her chest.
“Only if you're willing.”
“I have a choice now?” she said dubiously. “I thought you got off on
extortion.”
“I didn't realize you put that much thought into what gets me off,” he
said, dusting his knuckles down the front of her top before allowing his
hand to fall to his knee.
“What makes you think I'd want to kiss you?”
“For starters?” He looked at her for a long moment before letting his
eyes fall to her mouth. “The way you're biting your lip,” he said, which
made her snap away from as if shocked.
“No,” said Jay.
Nicholas grinned. “If you don't like extortion, Jay, how do you feel
about bribery?”
Jay swallowed the fry she had been eating. “What?”
“Would you be willing to kiss me if I knocked an hour off your debt?”
“Yeah,” she said sarcastically. “I really want to stick my tongue down
your throat now.”
“Three hours.”
“Nick,” she said.
Nicholas arched an eyebrow. “Four hours.”
She let out an uneasy breath. That was $20,000—he was willing to pay
that much to kiss her? “Eight hours,” she said.
His other eyebrow shot up. “Really.”
“Someone foolish enough to pay someone twenty thousand dollars to
kiss them would probably be foolish enough to pay forty thousand.”
“Jay, you bad girl.” A smile curved his mouth, slow and predatory, and
he pushed his empty cup and carton aside. “Are you trying to shake me
down?”
“Actually,” she said, putting her hands in her lap, “I think what I'm
doing is called bid rigging.”
Nicholas laughed but his smile dangerous. This was the ruthless, takeno-prisoners side of him that she saw at work. “Eight hours,” he agreed, “if
you kiss me right now.”
“Fine.”
She tugged off her baseball cap, loosening her bun. She saw him draw
in an anticipatory breath as she scooted towards him on the stool. He still
wasn't quite close enough to kiss, so she braced herself by putting her hands
on his thighs and leaning in to cover his mouth with hers.
It felt different being the one to make the first move. Even her ex had
usually been the one to kiss her first instead of the other way around. She
opened her eyes to find him looking at her and snapped, “Close your eyes.”
“For forty grand, I should be able to look at what I bought,” he
murmured, but his eyes slipped obediently closed. Jay looked at him for a
moment, studying his face. Even in his late twenties, it was still a little
boyish, but the curve to his mouth was more arrogant than mischievous and
his smiles never seemed to meet his eyes.
Despite that, or maybe even because of that, he was an incredibly
attractive man.
Jay kissed him again, taking a hand off his thigh to cup his face with
her fingers and her belly flipped when he leaned into her touch. She traced
gentle fingers down the hollow of his jaw as his mouth, which had been
still, began to move against hers. She could feel him holding himself back
and that scared her, because she could still remember what he was like
when he didn't: it was like plunging headlong into deep water and being
unable to breathe.
All of that dark passion was roiling beneath the surface and she could
feel it now, waiting to consume her if she'd let it. When she tremblingly
allowed her tongue to enter his mouth, he made a sound that appeared to be
involuntary, low and forbidding, and then his hands were on her waist and
he was kissing her back as if a dam inside him had burst and all of his
restraint were pouring out in a hot and violent torrent. His tongue stroked
over hers in a vicious sweep, turning her mouth into a lake of hot, dizzying
sensations that had her hand clenching into a desperate fist on his thigh.
He pulled back, catching her lower lip between his teeth and sucking
on it gently, before again pressing his mouth to hers with a scratch of
stubble that stung too sweetly to be pain, parting her lips and proceeding to
subsume her wholly. When Jay opened her eyes, he was watching her with
half-open eyes, a dull gleam sparkling in their frozen depths that looked
nearly drug-induced; the intensity of his gaze under the lights was arresting.
“Kiss me like that again,” he whispered, “and I'll knock off half the
debt.”
Jay let out an alarmingly unstable breath. “That's five million dollars.”
“I know.” He began unbuttoning his shirt and she stared, paralyzed, at
that widening triangle of sun-bronzed skin and dark, curling hair. When it
was open to his collarbone, he shot her an arch look before yanking the
fabric over his head and letting it fall to the floor.
Her fist jerked and she felt his hand close over it, and her other hand,
which was hanging uselessly in front of her legs. He placed her hands on
his body as he leaned in to kiss her, which made her shudder a little because
his chest was warm and firm, all hard planes and sharply defined edges
beneath that light dusting of coarse hair, and touching him felt good. She
could feel the muscles beneath his flesh contracting under her touch and by
the time she reached his stomach, her fingers were shaking and seemed to
have gone numb at the tips.
“Nick,” she whispered.
He pulled her into his lap, making the stools wobble dangerously. He
stood, still holding onto her, and set her down on the counter, and the chill
of the granite on her ass through her track pants sent a shock pulsing
through her. He stepped between her spread legs and freed her hair from its
tight bun, dropping the scrunchie on the floor with his shirt as he wove his
fingers through her hair. Jay had forgotten how good it could feel to be
consumed—so good that you didn't feel the pain of it until you were already
long gone.
She let him take her shirt off, and he broke from her just long enough
to get it over her head, leaving her shivering in just her sports bra. His
palms rasped against her skin and each touch seemed to slough part of her
away. Her nipples were hard and aching, and he touched them, so roughly
that she found herself whimpering, melting under another incredibly
forceful kiss as he slowly lowered her back against the counter until she
was pinned beneath his hips, with his chest bearing down on hers with each
heavy breath, and her desire burning as hot and golden as a candle.
He looked down at her, tucking that strand of hair behind her ear that
had first captured his attention. She might have thought him unmoved, had
she not been able to feel the press of him against her belly or see how large
and dark his pupils were as his eyes swept over her face.
“I'm leaving now,” he informed her, as she struggled to breathe. “Not
because I want to, but because I need to, and because I want you to
remember this when you come to me—because you will come to me, and
when you do, I want you to fuck me the way you just kissed me.”
Jay stared at him uncomprehendingly as he bent to grab his shirt from
the floor and, after flashing her a closed-lipped smile, left without looking
back.
When she heard the creak of his footsteps on the stairs, she heaved out
a breath that felt like a shard of glass as she stared up at the can lights over
the bar.
Fuck.

Chapter Thirty-Three
2017

Jay stood in front of her bathroom mirror, adjusting her clothes. She
was wearing her favorite high-waisted skirt, this time paired with a polkadot blouse that had a bow above the keyhole neckline. It was sleeveless, so
she wore a sweater over it, doing up just enough buttons so the ruffly bow
peeked out like a jabot. She fiddled with the loops, trying to make it sit
exactly right as she avoided her own eyes in the mirror.
Last night, she had touched herself while thinking of him.
She knew it was terrible of her, but body memory was an entirely
separate faculty from reason and she had been sorely lacking in reason for
years, it seemed, because that ardently possessive kiss had left a searing
tension in her lower belly that wound inside her like a metal cable. When
she finally slid off that counter on unsteady legs, she felt like she might
snap.
So Jay had locked her door, sticking a chair under the handle for good
measure, and stripped down to her underthings in bed. Covering her mouth
with her free hand to ensure that she couldn't be heard, she had brought
herself to climax several times, hips bucking beneath her sheets in
something too desperate to be pleasure. It had almost been enough.
She had showered afterwards, changing into her pajamas and going
downstairs. She made herself dinner as if nothing were out of the ordinary,
within a stone's throw of the counter that he had nearly fucked her on, and
when he had come into the kitchen to heat up his own meal, she managed
not to look over at said counter, carrying on a discussion with him in a
normal voice. And even though it had been disgustingly civil, there had
been a strange undercurrent rippling through all of their interactions as if he
knew exactly what she'd been doing on the other side of her door.
She fed Carbon and grabbed her purse, heading downstairs. Nicholas
was dressed in the outfit he had worn when he sat down with her in that
vegan diner and first outlined his Faustian bargain. The charcoal jacket and
black pants even made him look a little Mephistophelean.
I want you to fuck me the way you just kissed me.
It was so easy to hate him when he was a bastard. When he was playing
mind games, when he was being arrogant and cruel, and mocking her in that
voice that could shift to cold just as easily as it could to scalding, it was so,
so easy to hate him—and hate him, she did. A lot.
But when he commanded her to do bad things in that same voice, with
just the faintest hint of tenderness lighting up that rich darkness like a
midnight sky fading to the dawn—
Then it was a lot harder not to give in.
She no longer had a strong foundation to stand upon from which she
could safely hate him. After years of living apart, he no longer felt like a
brother, and he would likely leave her in tatters when he was through with
her. She could already feel her resistance crumbling to rubble all around
her. She would be crushed under her own meek attempts at defiance.
“We're having an all-hands meeting this afternoon to discuss our
OKRs,” Nicholas said, in lieu of a greeting. “When we get to the office, I'm
going to send you a PowerPoint presentation to read over, and then I want
you to double-check the spreadsheets. No need to correct any of the
formulas—just let me know if anything looks wrong, or if one of the slides
doesn't work.”
“Um, sure. I can do that.”
His eyes flickered over her, from her hair to her heels, and she
instinctively braced herself for the inevitable taunt. “All of the figures I'm
going over are from last quarter, so none of the acquisitions you've fielded
for me are included in this data set. But I've been glancing over some of the
preliminaries and I have a feeling that the numbers will be much, much
better next quarter.” Her chest began to flutter as he walked closer, in a way
that struck her as distinctly predatory, but he bypassed her, picking up his
briefcase from the counter. “Nice work.”
She folded her arms. “I told you I was a serious professional.”
“So serious,” he said, with mock solemnity. “Sometimes when I look
over at you, sitting at your desk, you look like you're planning on strangling
someone.”
Jay glanced at him. “Maybe I am.”
Nicholas grabbed his keys and herded her out the door. “You always
did like it rough.”
Jay coughed and began spluttering. “Excuse me?”
“No need.” She saw his cheek lift, like he was smiling, as they walked
out to the car. Clearly enjoying himself. “I don't mind,” he added, swinging
in behind the wheel. “If you want me to fuck you a little harder while I've
got my hand around your throat, you don't have to be coy.”
“I don't,” she said, in a barely contained voice.
“Oh, did you want to put your hand around my throat? That might
work. I'm just not sure how you could maintain a good enough grip while
I'm g—”
“Nobody's hands are going anywhere,” she said, coloring when he gave
her a sideways grin.
“Now that's just a lie, blue jay—unless you want me to tie you up
again.”
Her water bottle crinkled as her hand tightened on it, and she saw that
he noticed, too. She let out a breath and stared angrily at her lap, feeling
much too hot, while he laughed.
“This isn't funny and I don't appreciate you winding me up before we
get to the office.”
“You're thirty-one,” he said, still chuckling. “And you're still such a
fucking prude.”
“Shut up.”
That just sent him into a fresh gale of laughter. Jay decided to ignore it,
cranking down the car window to feel the breeze upon her face. “You are
such a bastard,” she said, tugging her hair to one side so it wouldn't get all
windblown. “I don't even understand how you can run a company when
you're such a child.”
“You'd be surprised how often people think about that,” he said,
sobering.
“No, I wouldn't.”
“It comes up all the time in negotiations. It doesn't matter that I wear a
bespoke suit, or that I went to the West Coast equivalent to an Ivy—I
consistently get clients who don't expect me to read the contracts they give
me and then try to fuck me in the fine print.”
“Like that man who tried to give you half a percent?” she asked,
finding herself reluctantly drawn into the conversation. At least he had
moved on from the subject of her prudery.
“Just like him.”
Jay stared out the window. “So what do you do about it?”
“I fuck them back.” He rolled up her window, his eyes never leaving
the road. “I'm not sweet about it, either. By the time I'm finished, they're
usually hurting. After that, we either renegotiate on my terms or I send them
on their way. Nobody ever underestimates me twice.”
It took Jay a moment to speak. “That sounds a little like a warning.”
Nicholas parked the car but he didn't respond right away. He seemed to
be thinking over what she'd said. “You still see me as a younger brother,” he
said eventually. “I think that's the excuse you give yourself to hold me at a
distance: telling yourself I'm still a boy. But I'm not.”
“I know you're not a boy,” she said, her voice tight. “You've made that
resoundingly clear.”
“I'm a man,” he said, as if she hadn't spoken. “With a man's goals and a
man's desires.” He paused. “And a man's burdens.”
The click of his seat belt was deafening in the silence. She sat in her
seat, feeling ready to run, but Nicholas made no move towards her. Right
now, he wasn't even looking in her direction, although she knew he was
aware of her presence. “I don't understand what you're saying.”
“Do you really need it spelled out for you?” Nicholas asked, tilting his
head to regard her with an expression that made her painfully aware of her
heated face. He'd looked at her like that when he kissed her—faineant and
worldly, like a jaded lord. “You can't still be that naive.”
“Well, you talk in circles,” said Jay. “Everything you say sounds like a
riddle.”
“Then let me lay it out on the line for you, my squawking blue jay. I
want more from you than I think you're prepared to give to me within the
framework of our little understanding, but I'm going to try to get it from
you anyway—and I'm very good at getting what I want.”
“What else do you want?” she whispered, suddenly terrified. “You
already have me.”
“I have the version of you that you give everyone else. I want the you
that no one sees.”
The car felt entirely too small, as if she were about to be crushed. “No
more riddles,” she said hoarsely. “Why did you really bring me here? If it
isn't revenge, what is it?”
“I just told you.”
I want the you that no one sees.
What did that mean, the part of her that no one saw? Did he think he
could sift through her consciousness and pan for what he wanted like a
prospector looking for gold in a river? Jay grabbed at her own chest, her
eyes desperately seeking escape.
She still remembered with painful clarity what had happened the last
time she refused him.
“Oh.” All at once, she straightened as her eyes focused beyond the
window. “Shit. You drove me to the office—you forgot to drop me off at the
Starbucks.”
“Did I? How careless of me. You can go on ahead,” he said,
unconcerned, leaning back in his seat as he pulled out his phone in a way
that made her wonder if he'd forgotten on purpose. “I'll sit in the car for a
few minutes and answer some emails.”
Jay slid out of the car a little unsteadily, feeling as if all of her organs
were plummeting without her into freefall as she did, and closed the door,
backing from the car before someone could see. Nicholas looked up,
flashing her a brief smile, mouthing something she couldn't make out. She
thought it might have been “Bye, blue jay.”
Turning sharply on her heel, Jay walked determinedly towards the
building. Nicholas got to the office so early, she was pretty sure that most
people weren't even here, yet. Small blessings.
Not a boy, she thought, with each drumming click of her shoes. I
already knew that.
So what did he want with her now?
Obi, on his way back from the kitchen, greeted her casually. “Did you
try making the jollof yet?”
“No.” She smiled, trying not to let her fraying nerves show. “I just
bought ingredients.”
“If you like it, let me know,” he said. “I know an excellent recipe for
vegan efo riro.”
“I'm not sure what that is, but I bet it's wonderful.”
“It's spinach stew, and it is. Good morning, Mr. Beaucroft.”
Nicholas paused, staring at the two of them for so long that it began to
feel awkward. “Good morning,” he said eventually, before striding away.
“Don't worry,” said Obi. “I was nervous, too, at first. But he really isn't
so bad.”
Jay hadn't realized she'd been staring after him until she swiveled to
look at Obi. “What?”
“The CEO,” Obi said patiently. “He seems intimidating, but I think it's
nice that he walks around and talks to people. But you report directly to
him, so maybe it's different.”
Jay felt her phone buzz. “I'm not really sure what to think,” she said,
which was true enough. “Thank you for the jollof recipe. I'll take a photo
when I make it to show you.”
“Please do.” He smiled at her. “Have a good day, Jay.”
She gave a smile at him that immediately faded as she looked down at
her phone. I sent you the PowerPoint and the spreadsheets. Have you taken
a look at them?
I haven't even gotten to my desk yet. I'll look in a moment.
Jay sat at her desk, slinging her bag to the ground as her phone vibrated
noisily on the table. Annica looked over at her, giving her one of those tense
little smiles, but didn't greet her. She never did and Jay knew she didn't
approve of her constantly being on her phone.
I see your fan club has a new member.
For God's sake. Yes, he was in my orientation group. He's very nice.
Jay saw the message go to 'read.' There was no response. When she
looked up at him, in his little corner on the second floor, she saw that he
was on the phone.
Good. She pulled up the PowerPoint and clicked through all the slides
in preview mode, testing all the graphics and effects, and visiting each
hyperlink. It looks fine, she shot off to him in an email. Numbers look good,
too. They match the spreadsheet.
Then she scheduled all of his appointments for the day, leaving him
with a gap for lunch and a thirty minute window before the all-hands to
prepare for his meeting on the quarterly reports.
Is that what you like, Jay? Nice?
There was a pause and then he messaged her again.
Do you want to fuck him?
She glanced at him nervously, half-expecting to find him staring at her
like a creep. He wasn't, but she was still unnerved enough that her fingers
had difficulty hitting the right keys.
That's inappropriate, she wrote, stumbling over the letters. And you
know it.
She saw it go to 'read.' Now he was looking at her, and while he was
really too far away to make out the nuances of his expression clearly, she
saw enough that she found herself picking up the phone again, propelled by
feelings too dark and too dangerous to name.
Are you jealous?
Once again, it went to 'read.' Jay saw him get up from his desk for a
meeting she'd scheduled, sliding his phone into the pocket of his blazer.
He never responded.

The all-hands was tedious at first. The auditorium was packed with all
of the other employees of the company who looked as bored as she felt
while Arthur Hartwell droned on and on about “health” and growth.” Some
people looked engaged, but in a bright, fake way that made Jay suspect that
it was probably just an act. Nobody was that excited about metrics.
Nobody except Nicholas, apparently.
When Arthur handed the mic over to Nicholas, who had been sitting in
the first row like her, but much farther down, there was a palpable shift in
the room. She soon saw why. Watching him click through the slides as he
paced back and forth like a panther, talking about month-over-month
growth, customer acquisition costs, and key performance indicators for the
new quarter, Jay realized that Nicholas really, really liked what he did.
And perhaps even more shockingly, that he was good at it.
He was magnetic. The same intensity that rendered him so
unapproachable made him compelling to watch and his voice carried well
over the mic: deep and intimate, with a gravelly edge that made it seem as if
he were on the verge of a dry laugh. At the end, when he asked if there were
any questions, a number of hands went up, many of them belonging to
women.
At one point, his eyes slid to her and she forgot how to breathe as he
answered a question she no longer remembered, asked by a person whose
name she did not know, talking about customer retention while looking her
dead in the eyes as she tried desperately not to squirm.
And then he smiled and moved on to the next person, leaving her
utterly sidelined.
His employees clearly respected him, and more than a couple appeared
starstruck in his presence. When she'd left the auditorium, she'd glanced
over her shoulder to see him being mobbed. Jay felt a little stunned as she
slid back into her desk chair. This was entirely different from the group of
sycophants he had cultivated back in high school. This was admiration.
There were no new messages on her phone and when she remembered
what she'd sent him she nearly felt bad, until she also remembered that she
was still mad at him for being such a bastard to her in the car—and in the
office, which was worse, because this was her livelihood.
When all of this was over, she needed a spotless record in order to
survive.
Maybe she hadn't realized that Nicholas was good at what he did, but
he still seemed surprised sometimes to find that she was capable of any
thoughts that might pose contrary to his.
A ping popped up and she looked at it, surprised to see that it was
Meghana from HR.
Hi Jay, it's Meg. Can you come to my office for a quick chat.
A chat. Jay's heart went cold. Especially when she saw Nicholas sit
down at his computer with his laptop still under his arm and frown at
something on his screen.
He set the laptop on his desk and began walking down the stairs.
Towards her.
Oh no. A muscle in her throat spasmed. She got up from her desk
before he could corner her there. Pitching her voice low, she said, “Did
Meghana send you an email, too?”
“Yes.”
Jay glanced around. A few people were looking at them curiously. “Is it
because of the text I sent?” She folded her arms. “Oh God. I'm sorry. I
didn't think they would—”
“Jay,” he said, cutting her off. “Relax. HR can't read your phone. It's
going to be fine.”
“But—”
“It's going to be fine,” he repeated. “I promise. Let's go.”
Jay followed him, feeling bleak. She didn't think it would be fine.
Meghana was at her desk, which was decorated in a way that was
probably supposed to be comforting to the people who came in here and
found out that they were getting put on performance improvement plans or
fired. Little yarn decorations, photographs of her family and kids in gilt
frames. Sorry you have to leave the company, Jay thought, a little wildly,
but just look at all the pretty yarn.
She jumped when Nicholas closed the door behind them. He swung
into one of the chairs directly across from Meghana's desk. When the HR
director glanced at her, Jay, trembling, made herself sit down next to him.
“Do you know why I've called you both in here?”
Oh God. Jay stared at her fingers, where they were digging into the
fabric of her skirt. Someone must have seen them together. Maybe at the
store, when he'd hugged her from behind.
Nicholas, unbelievably, still looked calm. “Have we done something
wrong?”
Instead of answering, Meghana leaned forward. Her face was grave and
Jay's heart sank further. “I got a call from someone informing me that the
woman you hired on as your new assistant is actually your sister.”
Jay choked.
Nicholas glanced at her. There was a warning in that look. “From
whom?”
“I'm not at liberty to say,” said Meghana. “However, it was not a
pleasant phone call.”
“Ah,” said Nicholas, leaning back in his chair. “That was probably my
stepmother. She's been harassing me at work about my late father's will. I've
had to notify security.”
“Is Jay your sister?”
“She is. My stepsister, actually. I didn't think that was a problem.”
“It isn't if it is disclosed prior to the hiring process. Precautions should
be taken when hiring relatives to preclude any appearances of favoritism.”
She paused. “Especially coming from so close to the top.”
“Jay does good work,” Nicholas said neutrally.
“So I've heard.” Meghana looked at Jay and her face softened a little. “I
have a solution to this. I'm going to swap Jay with Annica so you, Jay, will
now be reporting to Arthur Hartwell, the CFO. Nicholas, Annica will now
be reporting to you.”
“And what about my work?” Nicholas demanded.
“I'll input the changes into the company org chart and mirror their
ShiftWare credentials so no work should be lost and neither executive will
be adversely impacted by the change. You won't even need to move desks,”
she said to Jay, consolingly.
“Um,” said Jay, still trying to process. “Great.”
“I'll let Annica and Arthur know as well, so please don't speak to either
of them about this until I've called them both in here for a chat.” Meghan
steepled her fingers. “Do you have any other questions?”
I'm not fired? Jay's heart felt like a speeding hummingbird. She looked
at Nicholas, whose face was unreadable. “No,” he said, unfolding his leg.
“Excellent. Then I'll let you both get back to work. Thank you for being
so accommodating and go ahead and finish up any pending assignments
you've agreed to for today, Jay.”
I'm not fired. Jay let out a breath and nodded. But I think I'm still in
trouble.
When she got back to her seat, her phone buzzed.
Yes, was all it said.
Chapter Thirty-Four
2017

Jay did excellent work and Nicholas had gotten used to how smoothly
she had his days running. Everything scheduled before noon, coffee brought
quickly and grudgingly, and profiles on all of his acquisitions that would
make an amateur detective cream their pants.
He didn't want to give her up, especially not to Arthur, and especially
not in exchange for Annica, who was about as pleasant as a wasp caught up
in a skirt, but there wasn't a damn thing that he could do about it and that
annoyed him.
Nicholas watched her pore over her files through that glass divider,
sitting so close to her computer that he wondered if she'd finally succeeded
at ruining his eyes with all those books. Her final text message to him—Are
you jealous?—mocked him from his phone, reminding him that there were
other ways that she was only his on loan.
Yes, he typed, hitting send before he could think better of it.
And then he leaned back in his chair and sighed.
At least the company all-hands had gone well. He was always satisfied
when the quarter earnings were good, and despite Crystal's numerous fuckups, the Acquisitions team had done a good job courting clients who would
bring in solid revenue. The pulse of the company was beating strong.
Below, he saw Jay pick up and look at her phone. He could feel her
looking up at him and pointedly ignored her as he typed out an email to
Annica, detailing his typical routine.
She wrote back quickly, but all it said was, Will do.
When a message flashed across his screen, he assumed it was Annica
with a follow-up question, or perhaps Meghana to see how everything was
going, or maybe another kiss-ass from Acquisitions trying to curry favor by
telling him how his report was so great.
Glancing at the message, Nicholas was disturbed to see that it was from
none of those people. It was from Renata Rossi, the company's head of legal
counsel.
The last time he'd sat down with her was when he was cleaning house
after his father's embezzling, which had been about five years ago. What the
hell did she want with him?
Can you come see me at your earliest convenience?
Fuck. Nicholas pushed back from his desk. This couldn't be good.
Lawyers didn't call you up for brief friendly chats. Not while they were on
the clock. Maybe they needed him to sign something. The last thing he
needed right now was another problem.
Renata's desk was on the second floor. She had her own private office
and it seemed like she spent most of the day locked in there, surfacing
occasionally for the odd coffee trip. He could see one on her desk now, halfmelted. What appeared to be the third of the day, judging from the two
empties. Nicholas closed the door behind him and said, “You wanted to see
me?”
Unlike Meghana, her desk wasn't decorated with cutesy little
knickknacks and she didn't beat around the bush. “We've been in contact
with the lawyer of one of our ex-employees, Crystal Yost.”
“I know who she is,” Nicholas said grimly. “She's my ex-administrative
assistant.”
“Yes, well—now she's suing you and the company. We've been
served.”
He wished he could say he was surprised. After that temper tantrum on
her way out of the office, it didn't shock him at all that she'd chosen to be
vindictive. “Wrongful termination?”
“No, actually. Sexual harassment.”
The floor seemed to vault beneath him. “What?”
Renata watched him slide into the chair, her sharp eyes missing
nothing. “Specifically, quid pro quo harassment. Ms. Yost is claiming that
you fired her from her position because she wouldn't sleep with you.”
“You've got to be fucking kidding me. She was fired because she was
bad at her job.”
There was a silence. He bit the inside of his cheek but he didn't
apologize. If expletives were bullets, Nicholas suspected that the walls of
this office would look like a Scarface-style shoot-up.
“Okay.” He blew out a sigh. “So what does this mean for us? What are
the next steps?”
“Do we want to settle?”
“No,” he snapped. “We don't. Because I didn't do it.”
Renata shrugged. Nicholas looked hard at her, but he couldn't
immediately tell what she thought of that outcome. She was the one person
in this office that he couldn't read.
“So they'll subpoena pertinent communications—emails, phone
records, the like. There will be a period of discovery. And then it could go
to trial, depending on what happens.”
“And then what?”
“And then we'll see.”
Nicholas raked his hand through his hair while she tapped her pen
against her desk. His eyes were drawn to the familiar silhouette; it was a
Montblanc. Once, his father had had one exactly like it. He wondered what
happened to that pen. Maybe one of the junk haulers he'd hired to trash his
father's shit had run off with it. “She's retaliating because I fired her. Isn't
that illegal?”
“Malicious prosecution is what you're alluding to,” said Renata. “And
yes, you could counter-sue for it but from a PR standpoint, that's not a good
look in the age of #MeToo. Especially not from an executive lashing back at
his alleged victim.”
“Alleged victim,” Nicholas repeated.
“I understand that this is difficult to process.”
Spare me the pragmatism of lawyers. “Our stock is going to fucking
plummet,” said Nicholas. “They're going to eviscerate me and the company
on social media.”
He'd seen it happen before, from the other side of the aisle. This was
exactly what had happened to his father. Only, for him, it would be worse—
his father's trial had happened before there was a hashtag for everything that
people could skim instead of reading the news. Courting international
clients would become exponentially difficult if he was in the middle of a
messy lawsuit. People would take one look at his name and immediately
jump to conclusions.
“I recommend going dark,” Renata was saying. “And of course, not
talking about the pending case here or on your phone.”
“That goes without saying,” Nicholas said coldly. “Is there something
else?”
Renata leaned back in her seat. A classic power move Nicholas was
well familiar with and didn't appreciate seeing at his own expense.
“I understand your stepsister works here. I have a note here from
Meghana—Justine Varens, correct? I'm not sure how close you are, but I'd
avoid discussing the case with her, either. There is a slim possibility that she
could be called to testify against you.”
There was a ringing in his ears. It took him a moment to realize it
wasn't real.
“I'm representing the company's interests,” said Renata, over the latent
sound of his shock, “but you might want to consider hiding your own
lawyer if you think you need to.”
“Yeah,” Nicholas said distantly. “I'll do that.”

The drive home was awkward. Jay was not sure what to say to
Nicholas, who seemed tense. He had switched on his stereo to play music
off his iPhone with questionable lyrics that Jay could only think of as “fuck
boy rock.” She didn't like it, but his eyebrows were drawn and his jaw was
tight. It didn't really seem prudent to pick a fight with him over the music
when he was in this mood.
Jay sat in silence, picking at the stitching in her sleeves as he drove in
silence. Was he mad at her? Sorry I'm not your assistant anymore would
have sounded petty and sarcastic in her own current mood and Jay wasn't
even about to touch his mystifying admission about being jealous of her
very platonic conversation with Obi. She refused to cave to his pathological
jealousy.
What right did he have to be jealous when it came down to it? It wasn't
as if they were dating and he had never explicitly told her that she wasn't
allowed to see anyone else.
But she knew she was kidding herself if she thought he wouldn't lose
his shit over some unwanted competition for his little bird when he was
paying insane amounts of money just to kiss her on the mouth. She knew he
thought of her as his and she knew what he was like.
If I find out you've been seeing other men, you're going to be very, very
sorry.
When they pulled up in the driveway, Nicholas turned off the stereo. “I
need to make a phone call,” he said, twisting a key off his key ring and
dropping it into her hand. “Go ahead and let yourself into the house. I'll be
in eventually.”
Who are you calling? She wanted to ask. Why do you look so tired?
But they weren't close enough for such questions and just now, Jay
wasn't sure she even wanted to know the answers to them, so she just folded
her fingers over the house key and said, “Okay,” and left him sitting in the
Tesla in the dark.
Eventually turned out to be a long enough time for her to make herself
a quick meal and eat it before going to bed. She heard him come in while he
was brushing her teeth—she had left the key on his nightstand where she
knew he kept his wallet and his phone while he slept.
Jay spat, and heard the door of his room close. Was he waiting for her
to go to him?
Maybe he'd gotten bored, Jay thought, changing into pajamas—normal
ones, not the skimpy, lacy ones he'd gotten for her. Could he really be bored
with her already? After the way he had kissed her in the kitchen, she wasn't
sure how he could be. The idea that he could kiss anyone like that and not
feel a thing made Jay feel slightly sick.
She stabbed her toothbrush into its little cup, nearly cracking the glass,
and wondered if she was really daring enough to go into his room of her
own volition.
What if she did and he laughed at her? Or hurt her? Or both?
And if he was willing to pay $40,000 to kiss her willingly, what would
he shell out to fuck her if she could convince him that she wanted it?
It annoyed her to be thinking in this cold and mercenary way, and that
was something else to blame him for, but she couldn't seem to make herself
stop. Under these new, bizarre terms of his, she could be free. She could
leave in days instead of years. She could go back to San Francisco.
Where she belonged.
Jay pressed her door closed, listening to the buzzing silence outside the
door, before making her way to her bed. When she woke up, she was tired
and irritable without really being sure why. She tugged on her pants and
boots and added a tunic top that wouldn't clash with her purse, checking her
phone as she clomped down the stairs because a calendar invite had popped
up.
Lunch with Justine.
“Oh,” she said surprised. For a moment, she thought—
“What?”
Nicholas appeared beside her with messy, unbrushed hair that tumbled
in a fall into his eyes. His shirt was only half-buttoned, the tie hanging
around his collar like a limp snake, and he had his coat slung over his arm.
She stared at him and his lip curled sardonically. “I overslept.”
“I can see that.” She put the oat milk back in the fridge. “It's almost
seven. Rough night?”
“Something like that.” He leaned against the door jamb, drawing in a
breath that made her eyes drift to the open throat of his shirt. “Make me
some of the swill coffee, will you?”
Jay put her mug down, bristling a little as she grabbed the bag. “Why
do you even own swill coffee if you think it's swill?” she demanded
crabbily, pouring the grounds into the filter.
“For when I'm desperate.” He watched the dark liquid drip into the cup
as he did up his shirt buttons, his eyes gleaming with a haggard rapacity.
“Why did you say 'oh'?”
“Oh. Uh. Arthur Hartwell invited me to lunch.”
“Yeah, he does that.” Nicholas dumped his things on the bar counter as
he struggled with his tie. “He thinks slumming it buys loyalty. It probably
does. People like his open door, open office policy. They think he's a saint
for not strictly adhering to the chain of command.”
Jay watched him continue to bungle the knot. “Why don't you?”
“It wouldn't work.” Nicholas glanced briefly over at her, before turning
his head back down with a grimace. “He can get away with it. He's older—a
kindly old grandfather.”
“He looks like he's in his early forties,” Jay pointed out. “Hardly a
grandfather.”
“He's also married,” Nicholas said deliberately, swearing under his
breath at his tie.
“I don't care if he's married or not.” Jay pushed his hands out of the
way and fastened his tie. “Idiot,” she said, catching sight of his expression.
“I'm not going to strangle you.”
“What kind of knot is that?”
“I don't know,” she said crossly. “It's a knot. I used to do it for my—”
“Who, Jay?” His eyes gleamed dangerously. “Your ex?”
“Yes. He was a waiter. He couldn't tie his own ties. I helped him.”
Nicholas laughed, but it wasn't a very nice laugh. “You tied my tie like
some waiter?” he asked, sounding just like he had when he was a bratty
fourteen-year-old.
“If you don't like it, I'll undo it,” she snapped, grabbing at his shirt
collar. “I was just trying to—” She broke off when his hands came around
her waist, pulling her into an incredibly intimate embrace that had her
pressing flush against him. “What are you doing?”
“Leave it,” he said roughly, his eyes drifting to her mouth.
And then, inexplicably—he recoiled.
Just as suddenly as she'd been embraced, Jay found herself released.
The coffee was done and Nicholas stalked over and drained it with such
violent thirst that she winced, half-expecting him to spill it all down the
front of his white shirt. “Swill,” he said, slamming the empty cup down.
“Are you ready to go? I don't want to be late for my shift at the Olive
Garden.”
“God, you're such a dick.” She snatched her purse, wondering at his
weird mood. Her breasts were still prickling where they had brushed up
against his chest and the tips of her fingers felt like they'd been shocked.
What was that reaction? “Is this because of that phone call?”
He ignored her question. “Are you going out to lunch with Arthur?”
“Yes,” she said. “And then obviously, I'm going to try to fuck him.”
Nicholas glanced at her: it was a cold, unamused glance. “Take
pictures,” he said, to her fury, and then switched on the stereo. Tantric—one
of his old post-grunge bands that he'd liked as a preteen. She'd heard this
and others blasting through his door whenever he was in a mood.
“You are such a child. I hope you're taking Annica somewhere that has
a decent kids' menu.”
“I'm not taking Annica anywhere,” he said ominously. “But if you don't
cut it out, I'm pulling this car over and everyone in the parking lot at
Sizzler's is going to know my name.”
That ended the conversation pretty abruptly and Jay felt a little stung
when he dumped her at the Starbucks. She straightened her pants and
walked to the office, her shoulders stiffening when she heard some creep
call out from his Ferrari, “Hey, long legs—how tall are you?”
About as tall as your dick is short, I bet.
Her mood had thoroughly soured when she made it to the office. She
could see Nicholas sitting at his desk, intently focused on whatever was on
his screen. Annica didn't look at her at all, but this time it felt deliberate. Jay
wondered if she was mad about the switch.
Jay logged into ShiftWare and looked at all of Arthur's pending
appointments, which had replaced Nicholas's in the system, trying to get a
feel of what his schedule was like before she began setting up the
appointments. He certainly didn't seem to be as busy but if what Nicholas
had told her was true, his schedule might just be way less structured.
Which could be problematic for scheduling. She looked over at Annica,
buried in her work, and wished the other woman was more of a
conversationalist. She had so many questions.
A meeting popped up with her own name. Meeting with Justine Varens.
Jay walked up the stairs to one of the conference rooms, which took her
past Nicholas's desk. He gave her a brief flicker of a look that made her feel
strange.
What is his problem? she wondered again, closing the conference room
door behind her.
Arthur Hartwell was in his early forties with brown hair that was just
beginning to go gray at the temples. He was the nice-looking man she
sometimes saw Nicholas walking in with.
She couldn't believe Nicholas thought he was old.
“Hello, Justine.”
“It's Jay,” she said. “Nobody calls me Justine.” Except my mother.
“Jay it is,” he said equably, sitting down in one of the chairs. “I
understand that you were reporting to Nicholas before. He runs a pretty
tight ship. Mine is more of a leisurely cruise.” He laughed self-
deprecatingly, but it seemed charming rather than affected. “As long as you
keep all of my appointments and validate my spreadsheets every day before
2pm, I really don't need much.”
No wonder Annica hates me, Jay thought ruefully. I stole her cushy job.
“I'm happy to take on additional work, Mr. Hartwell. Really.”
“Arthur, please.” He leaned forward. “Where would you like to go to
lunch, Jay?”
“I'm vegan,” she said, a little shyly. “But not super strict. Anything
vegetarian is fine.”
“Vegan, hmm? That's interesting. You'll be happy to know we just
recently started carrying oat milk in our kitchens. Before that, we only had
soy.”
“Yes, I know,” said Jay. “I put it in my coffee.”
“It was Nicholas's idea, surprisingly. I didn't think he touched the
stuff.”
Oh. Her nape prickled. “You said recently?”
“Just before you came,” Arthur confirmed with a grin. “Lucky you.”
Yes, thought Jay, wondering why she felt so terribly sad. Lucky me.
For lunch he drove her all the way to Ridgeview. They went to a place
called Just Avocados, a vegetarian specialty restaurant that used avocados in
all their food. Jay was inspecting some of the cupcakes, smiling a little at
one dusted in rainbow sprinkles, when she heard a man say, “Jay?”
She turned in surprise to see an Asian man her own age wearing a suit
and tie. “Quentin?”
“What a trip. Justine Varens, in the flesh. I thought you skipped town,”
he said, pulling her into an embrace that felt stiff. “I'm so sorry about what
happened with your stepfather. That was messed up.”
“Yeah.” Jay folded her arms and stepped back. “Messed up doesn't
even begin to cover it. Are you here on business?” she asked, looking at the
paper in his hand.
“I am.” He seemed almost pathetically grateful for the change in
subject. “I run the Bayview now. We're hosting a conference and I'm
supposed to meet with the caterer. She's late.”
“That's a shame,” Jay said awkwardly. “Well. Anyway. I should go—”
“How long are you going to be in town?”
“Um.” She frowned. Did he want to meet up or something? “I'm
undecided.”
“Amanda Strife said she saw you and Nicholas together at the grocery
store.”
She turned back around to look at him. “And?”
“It made me wonder—about what you told me that afternoon in Accia.
That you thought he had feelings for you.” His dark eyes regarded her
intently. “Are you staying with him now?”
“That is none of your business, Quentin,” Jay said, glancing over her
shoulder to make sure Arthur wasn't close enough to overhear. He wasn't.
What is Amanda telling people?
“I'm sorry, Jay,” said Quentin. “I didn't mean to offend.”
“You essentially just asked me if I was screwing my stepbrother,” Jay
hissed. “You don't see how that's offensive? Since when do you talk to
Amanda, anyway? I didn't think you were friends.”
“Since she got into PR.” He held up his hands in a please don't shoot
pose. “She oversees some of our ad programs and handles our reputation
management company.”
“Well,” Jay said unsteadily. “How very nice for you both.”
Quentin paused. “Nicholas is one of our investors.”
“Oh, are you afraid I'll narc on you to my secret lover?” she asked
bitterly. “Don't worry. I won't.”
To her disgust, he actually looked relieved, although he tried to hide it.
“I didn't mean to offend you, or imply . . . anything,” he said nervously.
“Nicholas was loyal to you after you left. It made people curious because
everyone thought he'd hate you—but he just doubled down.”
“Really?” She glanced over at Arthur again. “How so?”
“During his father's trial, when he provided testimony for that woman,
he also mentioned some of the things that, uh, his father had tried to do to
you. He spent a night in jail for punching Jake Van Hoff in the throat after
he called you a slut. Put him in the hospital with a bruised trachea. After he
took over his father's firm, anyone who spoke out about either you or your
reputation got dropped, so nobody did, because they were all terrified of
Nicholas.”
He laughed a little.
“They still are.”
“I had no idea.” Jay stared at that stupid cake. “No one told me. I didn't
have any ties here. To be honest,” she went on flatly, “I didn't really want
any.”
Quentin looked at her. “I didn't want to stop being friends. You just
stopped talking to me. You stopped talking to everyone.”
“That's not true. I came to you when I needed help. You forfeited our
friendship when you chose to bow to my stepfather.” It felt like her heart
was being squeezed out of her chest like toothpaste. “You didn't help me.
Nobody did.”
You left me all alone.
“I'm sorry, Jay,” said Quentin. “Really, I am. You didn't deserve what
happened to you.”
“Deserve,” Jay repeated. “You realize that saying that implies that
some people do.”
“Look,” said Quentin, sounding impatient now. “I said I was sorry, and
I truly am. But that was all eight years ago—and it isn't like you told
anyone what was going on. You didn't let anyone in. Maybe if you had,
things would have been different. You really can't understand the pressure
of what it was like dealing with Nicholas's father. He owned this town. He
could have ruined us on a dime. I had no choice.”
“I understand plenty,” Jay said coldly. “Believe me.” It looked like
Arthur had finished ordering and Jay's weight shifted in that direction. “But
I'm also here on business and I need to get back to my boss.”
Jay saw his eyes flare in recognition at the sight of Arthur Hartwell.
“You work for—”
“Goodbye, Quentin,” she said, with an air of finality to the words.
With that, she made herself walk away.

Nicholas met with the lawyer on his lunch break while Jay was out
with Arthur. He'd found a decent one with good reviews a few blocks away
from the office.
Jon Wick was a man in his early thirties who worked in a small and
cramped office. More storage shed than office, if Nicholas was being
honest, crammed with books and binders. If he wins as much as he
allegedly does, he should have a bigger office, he thought, looking around.
“Hello,” said the lawyer. “Nicholas Beaucroft, correct?”
“Yeah,” said Nicholas, shrugging off his jacket and slinging it over the
back of the chair. “Is Jon Wick your real name? Or did you change it
because you murder the opposition?”
“I've never heard that one before,” Mr. Wick said dryly. “And yes, it's
my real name.”
Nicholas sat down. “I'd like to keep this brief, if possible. I have
someone threatening to sue me and my company for quid pro quo
harassment and I need someone to represent me.”
“May I ask if you have other counsel representing you?”
“Only from my company.” Nicholas smiled grimly. “I understand
there's a potential divergence of interests there, though.”
“And have they discussed next steps with you?”
“Yeah,” said Nicholas. “Settle or fight and see it end up at trial. I'm not
settling.”
“The case might not even end up at trial,” Mr. Wick said, leaning
forward on his hands. “Cases get thrown out all the time for a variety of
reasons and I wouldn't write off settling at this stage. What's the
allegation?”
“I told you, sexual harassment. But I didn't fucking do it—”
Mr. Wick held up his hand. “I don't need to know if you did it, Mr.
Beaucroft. My only job is to try and argue your case as favorably as
possible. I am willing to represent you. But I typically bill four hundred
dollars an hour, in addition to payment for today's consultation, if that's
acceptable to you.”
“That's fine.” Nicholas pulled his checkbook out of his pocket and
began writing, wondering how his life had come to this. “Why don't you
have a nicer office if you charge so much?”
“What's the point?” Mr. Wick asked, taking the check and folding it
into his pocket. “I'd rather have a nicer house.”
“Fair.” Nicholas slung on his coat, fighting back an unexpected wave
of dizziness. He was really feeling that missing lunch hour. “I guess we'll be
in touch.”
“I guess we will,” Mr. Wick said mildly. “Have a good day, Mr.
Beaucroft.”
Nicholas threw himself into his work back at the office, looking over at
Jay and Arthur when they returned. Jay was holding a little paper sack in
one hand and looked happy, tucking a strand of her hair behind her ear as
she smiled at her new boss, who looked just as fucking delighted with her.
He ran his thumb over the knot in his tie, recalling Jay's taunt from that
morning. She had obviously been trying to provoke him, because nobody as
moral as she was would ever fuck around with a married man. Had she been
trying to get a response? He liked her vicious. He could be vicious, too.
He'd been so close to giving in to his urge to tear open her blouse and mark
up her throat like he did when he were young and she he had been his
everything—
And he had been her jailer.
Christ. What was wrong with his head? He'd been feeling dizzy and
weak all day.
There wasn't time to worry about it or feel sorry for himself, though, so
he went back to the metrics, tweaking the formulas until they did exactly
what he wanted.
Numbers were unbending entities of logic, but even they could be
manipulated.
When he finished working, most of the lights in the building had turned
off and the office was empty except for a handful of engineers doing site
maintenance. Jay was in the kitchen, reading a book with the paper bag
sitting next to her.
“How was lunch?” he asked, watching her slide the bookmark in place.
The fluorescent lights were flickering and it was making his eye twitch.
“Did you have fun?”
“We went to a vegan place in the next town over. It's called Just
Avocados. All of their menu items are made with avocados.”
“Cute.”
She reached into the paper bag and pulled out a plastic box. “Here.”
She thrust it at him. “You didn't have to request oat milk for me, you know.
I could have brought my own from home.”
Home. His chest hurt as he stared at the box. “What's this?”
“It's the vegan equivalent of your fairy bread,” she said, her tone gently
mocking. “Vegan cupcakes with rainbow sprinkles. It's made with apple
cider vinegar and avocados in the batter. I bought it for you, even though
you've been such an asshole, because I didn't—”
Her voice faded away. Nicholas said nothing, waiting her out. She
hated being stared at, and he could already see her beginning to squirm
under his gaze as she fought the impulse to look away. He'd always found it
curious how someone so beautiful could be so averse to being watched.
Jay folded her arms. “I didn't realize that you were looking out for me.
Not that I need someone constantly looking over my shoulder but—what
you did . . . keeping people from talking about me . . . that was,” she
hesitated. “Surprising.”
Nicholas watched her shift from foot to foot on the tile. “Who told
you?”
“Does it matter?” She looked at him in a way that made him want to
demand even more answers because her caginess meant that it must have
been a man. “Why didn't you tell me?”
“We aren't exactly confidants.” He looked around the dark, spotless
kitchen. The janitors always cleaned it up every night around six. “I'm
sorry.”
Jay stopped. “For what?”
“Today has been terrible.” He looked down at the box and half-smiled.
“But so have I.”
She said nothing as she shoved the book into her purse but he could see
the struggle on her face. Only the security guard remained in the hall to
wave goodbye as they left. “What was terrible? Did one of your business
deals go sour?”
“I don't want to talk about it. I just have to fix it.”
“Are you in trouble?”
“Possibly.” Nicholas opened the door for her, giving her the box back
to hold on her lap. Overhead, the stars seemed to shudder. “I can't get into it
with you.”
She frowned and didn't push, but he knew what that look meant. “Is it
because of me?”
“No.” Nicholas pulled slowly out of the lot. He could feel her eyes on
him, knew she was wondering why he was driving so slowly. He stared at
the white lines whipping beneath the car and shook himself as they began to
blur again, tightening his grip on the wheel. “You're perfect.”
He couldn't quite keep the bitterness out of his voice and heard her
clothes rustle as she made some sort of involuntary movement. “Nick,” she
said. “Don't.”
“Come on, blue jay. What's the worst thing you've ever done, apart
from me? Touched yourself and liked it? Made a few grown men cry?” He
laughed humorlessly. “I do both those things at least a couple times a week
and I've never lost any sleep over it.”
“You haven't been sleeping well lately,” she pointed out.
“Yeah,” he said, bringing the car to a rough stop. “I haven't.”
“Maybe that's your conscience.”
“Maybe it's yours.” Exhaustion slammed against him like a claw
hammer as he slid out of the car. He slumped, bracing himself against the
roof. “What do you want for dinner?”
“Are you all right?”
“I'm fine. Just tired. How's Thai?” He took out his phone and
immediately dropped it on the walkway. He swore and nearly stumbled as
he reached for it. “Fuck.”
Jay stooped to pick it up but he noticed she put it into her pocket
instead of giving it back. When he grabbed for it, she caught his hand, and
he let it splay over her hip. “You're pale and your hands are freezing,” she
said, sounding a little worried. “What did you eat for lunch?”
“Nothing. I had a meeting.”
“For breakfast?”
“Another meeting—and coffee.”
She muttered something under her breath, looping an arm around his
back. “Give me your keys,” she said, and he handed them to her, his cock
stiffening when her breast grazed him.
“Arthur must have let you down gently.”
“Don't make me drop you,” she hissed.
Nick laughed and pivoted for the stairs, but Jay turned him around
towards the kitchen instead, standing there obnoxiously until he lowered
himself into a chair. He did, grudgingly, swinging his legs into the cramped
space. “You like taking care of people, don't you?”
“Not really.”
“Yeah you do. You like managing people's schedules. Sorting them out
like a proper school mistress. You've always been like that. Bossy and
lecturing. You used to call me in sick when I was little,” he said, leaning
back. “You never stayed home with me, though.”
“Because I had school.” She glanced at him. “And you were a brat.”
Little bird, he thought, watching her flutter around the kitchen. He
didn't realize he'd fallen asleep until he felt her warm hand shaking him.
“Why are you doing this to yourself?” she asked as he pulled the soup
she'd placed in front of him towards himself. “This isn't like you.”
He ate the soup in three swallows. “What is this?”
“Carrot soup with coconut milk.” She looked pointedly at the empty
bowl. “Why?”
“It was good.” He got up unsteadily and leaned against her. “Take me
to bed.”
“Don't say it like that, you dick,” she snapped, which gave him the first
real laugh he'd had all day as they walked out into the hall. After so little
sleep and sustenance, he felt almost drunk.
“Relax, blue jay. I'm too tired to fuck. But you can still sleep with me if
you want. Just like old times.” He tried to leer but his eyes ended up closing
again and he felt her grip on him tighten. “I always felt safe with you.
Falling asleep in your arms felt so . . . mmm.”
“Wake up.” Her voice sounded faint. “Look. Here's your bed.” She
tugged at his jacket, working it off his shoulders. Despite his words to the
contrary, he got a little hard when she slid his tie from around his neck and
loosened his collar. “Lie down.”
“Take my belt off,” he breathed.
Jay looked down and her eyes flared. “Take your own belt off.” When
he laughed again, this time a little hoarsely, she pushed him back against the
mattress.
Nicholas caught her by the wrists, tugging roughly enough that she
ended up beside him when he toppled, landing with a startled bounce. He
immediately wrapped his arms around her. “You're staying with me,” he
informed her, shifting her to one arm as he worked the buckle of his belt
one-handed, sighing in relief when the pressure abated.
“I'm still wearing my boots. You'll ruin your sheets.”
Nick let the belt fall to the floor. All her struggling had caused her shirt
to become untucked, revealing several inches of her bare stomach. He
spread his fingers over it. She was warm and soft and when he hooked a leg
over one of hers to keep her still, he felt her freeze.
“I really don't give a fuck about the sheets.”
“Oh,” she said, when his hips pushed against her. “Well, that's
charming.”
“Blue jay.” His mouth brushed the warm skin of her neck and she
shivered, which made him smile and run a hand over her front. “You need
someone to take care of you.”
“No, I don't,” she said. “I can take care of myself.”
“Mm-hmm.” He traced the open throat of her blouse. “But do you want
to?”
Jay went very still as his arm resettled underneath the hem of her shirt
and he let his head fall until his nose was pressing into her hair. It still
smelled like apples.
Within seconds, he was asleep.

Jay eventually managed to extract herself from Nicholas's grip, which
was surprisingly strong, even in slumber. She thought her wriggling might
wake him, but he was completely passed out. Sighing, Jay threw the covers
over him before yanking off her boots in the hallway outside his bedroom
and limping to her bedroom where Carbon was prowling anxiously.
She tossed the shoes towards her closet. Her neck still prickled where
he'd kissed it. What the hell was that? And what kind of trouble was he in
that he would forget to eat or sleep?
You need someone to take care of you.
Easy for him to say. He'd had people taking care of him his entire life.
Maybe the people in his life hadn't loved him, but he'd never been alone.
He'd never known what it was like to feel yourself falling and wonder if
you'd ever hit rock bottom. But she did, and she had.
She could feel herself hitting it now.
The next morning, Jay watched for him, sitting up when he came into
the kitchen. He didn't look quite as disheveled as he had the previous
morning—not that she'd been hoping for another glimpse of his chest—but
the stubble around his mouth and jaw was just a few days away from
becoming a beard, and there were dark smudges under his eyes.
“You want to make me some coffee?” he asked, in lieu of a greeting.
“No,” said Jay. “I dragged you up to bed and made you dinner after you
treated me like shit. I'm not making you coffee. Make it yourself or have
Annica do it when you get to the office.”
“Annica doesn't make me coffee.” He gave her a pathetic look. “I
barely know how to use that fucking machine. It's European. Some kiss-ass
gave it to me as a Christmas gift.”
“That's too bad.”
“I'll pay you.”
“Do you see a barista in this room?”
Nicholas leaned forward, looking up at her. “I'll knock an hour off your
debt.”
Jay shot a look at him before storming belatedly over to the machine
and popping open the top. “Coffee's really worth an hour of sex from a
whore at a good brothel to you?”
“Right now, it is.” He gulped it down as soon as she put the cup in front
of him without even waiting for it to cool. “Thanks.”
“You're going to get esophageal cancer if you drink your coffee boiling
hot.”
“Uh-huh.” He grabbed the cupcake box. “You going to lecture me
about peristalsis next?”
Jay leaned back against the counter. “I'm surprised you remember that.”
“You know I'm a fan of swallowing.”
“Creep.” She scowled as he began to devour the cake in a way that
shouldn't have looked quite as attractive as it did. “How is it?”
He licked icing from his lip. “Sweet.”
It became so quiet that Jay could hear the ticking of a distant clock.
Nicholas closed the box with a screech of plastic that had her jolting with
wary readiness as he got up to toss it into the recycling. Her skin was
already prickling like he'd touched her and she was ashamed to realize that
a part of her actually wanted him to.
“So,” said Jay, fighting to keep her voice steady. “If a cup of coffee
runs five thousand dollars now, how much are you willing to pay me to fuck
you?”
His back was facing her, so she couldn't see his expression, but she saw
his shoulders jump beneath the fabric of his shirt a heartbeat before he
turned to look at her. “What?”
“How much,” she repeated, “for me to fuck you? I want to
renegotiate.”
“Do you,” he said, in a tone of deliberate calm, stalking towards her in
a way that filled her with a terrible need even as it made her want to flee.
His eyes drifted over her again as he bent over her, resting a hand on the
wall over her head. “Are you sure you want to play hardball with me, Jay? I
told you what I do to people who try to fuck me.”
“I don't like having the same hourly rate as the swill coffee.”
“Isn't that just so fucking sad for you,” he remarked, as a dark smile
marred the seductive fullness of his mouth. “What do you think you should
be paid?”
“I don't know,” she shot back. “Why don't you tell me what you think
I'm worth?”
Nicholas paused and Jay sensed that she had surprised him in some
way. She wished she knew how; it suddenly felt important to know.
“More bid rigging?” he asked, drawing his fingers along her jawline in
a way that made her remember how they'd felt wrapped around her throat.
“When did you get so corrupt, Justine? Didn't you used to be everybody's
little angel?”
Jay couldn't remember the last time he'd called her Justine. Not since
he was ten.
“Actually,” said Jay, looking up at him, “I believe this is technically
profiteering.”
His eyes flashed and then his mouth was over hers, knocking her head
back against the frame. There was anger in that kiss, though it didn't appear
to be directed at her; she could feel it smoldering, partially tamped-down
like embers capable of being raised anew to flames. It was devastating; he
still tasted like sugar, and the lingering flavor of it gave his rough attentions
a potency that was impossible to resist. She was so tired of resisting.
She gripped the back of his neck as he peeled her away from the door,
his hands kneading into her backside through the clingy material of her skirt
with enough force that she nearly lost her will to stand. “You are a bad girl,
aren't you?” he whispered.
Yes, some dark part of her brain whispered as he molded her body
against his in that possessive embrace, and he pulled back to look at her
with such desire that she thought she might burst into flame. Nobody had
ever looked at her like that—as if she were filled with such lethal sweetness
that craving could be synonymous with ruin. But only for you.
Nicholas bent his head. She could feel each breath glancing off her skin
as he unbuttoned her blouse, his forehead resting against her cheek. “What
—are you doing?” she asked, too far gone to feel any shame at the cracks
riddling her voice like something about to shatter.
Her blouse was half-unbuttoned and he pushed it open. “Giving you a
hickey.”
When she felt his mouth on the skin that had been covered by her shirt
collar, she heard herself moan, “Why?”
“Because as cute as it is seeing you to take advantage of me, I'm still
going to punish you for it.” His voice, so low, sent a curl of flame licking
through her abdomen as he began to kiss her, sucking hard enough to make
her wince. He folded the cups of her bra down beneath the weight of her
breasts and pinched each of her nipples hard enough to make her cry out. “I
told you it wouldn't be sweet,” he whispered, spinning her around in his
embrace so that her back was against his front. “That it would leave you
hurting.”
He slid one of his hands under her skirt, pressing his knuckles against
her underwear before tugging them aside and sliding his fingers between
her legs. There was a quiet kissing sound as he parted her, and that
embarrassed her enough that she halfheartedly began to struggle, but the
arm around her waist was strong, and he thrust two fingers into her,
breathing against her throat as he pushed as far as he could go.
“You said—it wasn't a warning,” Jay gasped, doubled over his forearm,
clawing a little at his shirtsleeves.
“No, I didn't.” And then, after that sank in, he began to fuck her with
his hand.
It was brutal, and it made her come with such breathless abandon that
she was left stunned. At some point, his grip shifted higher, and one of his
hands slid inside her blouse. Jay arched back against him, pushing her
breast into his palm, her head tilted slightly to one side to give him access
to her neck. When he licked it, tasting her sweat, she shuddered.
“You really want to know how much I'd pay for a night with you?”
He let her back from him, sore and tender between her thighs, and she
turned just in time to see him lick her from fingers the way he'd sucked the
icing from his lip.
Jay fumbled for her blouse, holding it closed. “Yes.”
“I'll knock five million dollars of your debt if you come to my room
before that mark on your throat fades.” It throbbed, as if in response to his
words. “That gives you about a week to decide, Jay, because this time, there
are conditions. You have to come to me wearing the clothes I got for you. I
want to fuck you with the lights on so we can both watch me take them off
of you while you tell Daddy how sorry you are for trying to screw him
before you fuck him.”

Nicholas left to take care of himself after that, leaving her leaning
against the counter. The image of her, undone and completely at his mercy,
would get him through many nights to come, he thought. That cry she made
whenever she was losing her mind—there was nothing like it.
When he came back into the room, Jay had refastened her blouse to her
throat and tucked it into her skirt, and she looked just as buttoned-up and
untouchable as she always did, only her face was now suffused with color
and her hair was tangled where he'd grabbed it.
One day, he was going to take her out in a tight little dress. Something
cut low enough to make other people wish it was lower still. She wouldn't
want to wear it but he thought he could probably persuade her into it. The
thought of having her on his arm at a club, a little tipsy, a little loose, made
him hard. It would be worth waiting for her to sober up before fucking her.
“You covered it up.” Nicholas plucked at her collar. “I wanted to look
at it.”
“Get used to disappointment.”
The lines of her body seemed to grow more pronounced as he turned
towards her, which sent something twisting in his gut that had little to do
with arousal at all. He put an arm around her, pressing her to him in a light
embrace that was very different from the way he'd held her before.
“You never disappoint me.”
Jay glanced up at him distrustfully.
“Thank you for the cake. I liked the soup, too.”
“Is this your way of asking me to cook for you?”
“No.” He blinked, surprised. “I wouldn't ask you to cook for me. You're
not—” Here for that, he nearly said, which had the same implications he
was trying to avoid.
“A servant?” Jay supplied for him, somewhat ironically.
“I wasn't going to say that.” He released her, slinging on his coat. “But
thank you for reminding me. This place is a mess. I need to put out an ad
for a new housekeeper.”
“A new one? What happened to Carmela?”
“I fired her,” said Nicholas. “Ready to leave?”
Jay clutched her bag. “Why did you fire her? I thought you liked her.”
“It's about the job. She overstepped.” Nicholas drew a finger down his
cheek in thought. “I'd prefer to go with someone a little more open-
minded.”
The color fled from her face. “You fired her because of me?”
“Such a bleeding heart. Would it bother you, if I had? That was part of
it—I have no use for someone who is unable to keep their thoughts about
my house guests to themselves.”
“Oh,” said Jay, looking down at her hands.
Once he had dropped her off at the Starbucks, the whole day seemed to
go downhill. Annica was a drudge who did what he told her to, but nothing
more. Nicholas had the feeling that she resented any extra work he gave her,
though she was careful never to express this to him.
He didn't particularly relish her company. Their meetings were usually
silent, unless he was talking, and then she took notes. In emails, she was
brief as possible, and as soon as her shift was over, she was already racing
out the door. It felt . . . vaguely dismissive. Malicious compliance.
Jon and Renata gave him constant updates about the case. The lawyers
were parsing through his documents, scouring his phone records and his
emails for any traces of inappropriate conduct with his former assistant. It
made him angry, which made him feel tired—he wanted all of this to be
over, and even though he knew it would be, right now, he could see no end
in sight.
The stress of his father's lawsuits were what had ultimately led to his
father's fatal heart attack and while there was nothing wrong with his,
Nicholas could sometimes feel the looming specter of his own dread as if it
were a physical presence gripping him by the throat.
He had so much more to lose than his father did.
Jon was painfully blunt about his circumstances. Statistically speaking,
he said, accusations of sexual harassment and sexual misconduct were
rarely fake, and the defense would have to be constructed carefully and in
such a way that it didn't demean or trivialize the very real pain of men and
women who suffered at the hands of their abusers every day.
“In other words,” he said bluntly, “it's going to be hard to call her a
liar.”
Nicholas pressed a hand to his head. “What am I supposed to call her
then? Her name?”
“Quite frankly, unless something shows up to miraculously exonerate
you, she has you by the balls,” Jon confided to him. “It doesn't help that
you're white and privileged and in a position of power. You're precisely the
type of person that people feel comfortable hating, and pitting you against a
crying woman who is only 5'4” and maybe one-twenty pounds soaking wet
isn't exactly going to inspire feelings of sympathy from a jury.”
“Who said anything about a jury?” Nicholas asked. “I didn't think this
was going to trial.”
“I'm just telling you, you should mentally prepare yourself for the
worst possible outcome, whether you did it or not,” he added, anticipating
his usual protest. “If you fight this, you might very well wish you had
decided to settle instead, because I can guarantee you that there will almost
certainly be tears and they're going to make you look like a cold-blooded
abuser.”
“If I settle, I look guilty,” said Nicholas, “and the company looks
negligent.”
“And if you lose, you go to jail and you still look guilty and you won't
have a job.”
Nicholas grabbed his coat and punched his arms into the sleeves. “I
didn't realize I was paying you four hundred dollars an hour to make me
feel like shit.”
He left without saying goodbye, seething the whole walk back to the
office.
A few days later, a meeting popped up that Annica had scheduled with
Renata, which made him wonder if he'd been fired as a client. Maybe Jon
had gotten tired of putting up with him.
He did wonder what Annica was making of all of this and if she
suspected anything was wrong with all of his recent meetings with legal. He
supposed he should be grateful for her taciturn nature. Even if she wasn't
friendly, at least she wouldn't be tempted to gossip.
Nicholas walked to Renata's office and felt Jay's eyes on him. It had
been several days since he'd fingered her in his kitchen and she still hadn't
come to his bed. He had hoped the promise of freedom might be motivation
enough but it seemed as if she was so put off by him that not even the
princely sum of five million dollars could make her willing. If she had any
inkling of his current situation, she'd never want anything to do with him
again.
He still remembered her desperate words—let me go.
He closed the lawyer's door behind him. By this time, the smell of stale
coffee and pungent markers was getting too familiar for comfort. “Yes?” he
said, already braced for the worst.
Renata had a stack of papers on her desk and a sour look on her face.
They looked like the script of a play: lots of colons, all of it printed out in
what looked like old typewriter font. Some of the lines were highlighted.
She stabbed at one of them with a manicured nail.
“I found something troubling during discovery,” she said, without
greeting. “It's not exactly relevant, but could prove problematic down the
road. These are from your phone records. Read the transcripts, starting with
Come down to the pool.”
Nicholas pushed the file away, feeling his face heat. He couldn't
remember the last time anyone had made him blush—not since he was a
teenager, probably. “I know what it says. I was there. Why is this relevant?
That isn't Crystal's number.”
Renata slid the papers back at him. “No. It's the phone number of
another employee we have on the roster here. Who was also your assistant.”
She glanced at him, her eyes flashing under the lights. She thinks this is
sick, he realized, recognizing that look on her face for what it was. “If the
prosecution finds out about this . . . they will skewer you.”
“HR already transferred her,” he heard himself say calmly. “She no
longer reports to me.”
“According to these timestamps, you were seeing her while you had a
reporting relationship.” He noticed that she didn't even say Jay's name,
almost as if she couldn't bring herself to. “Let me tell you something,
Nicholas. This looks really, really bad—for you, and for us. And worse, it
establishes a pattern of behavior and not just a one-off.” She folded her
arms. “I suggest you show this to the lawyer I assume you have and
construct a solid defense for yourself because if this takes off the ground,
we're going to be so busy doing damage control that you may find yourself
being forced to resign.”
Chapter Thirty-Five
2017

Forced to resign.
The words had the finality of a death knell—which they were,
essentially. The death of his career.
It wasn't as if he really needed the money. His father had left him
everything, and there was even more tied up in assets. Everything that's left,
he corrected himself, because some of those assets, like the Rolexes and the
scotch, had been destroyed. But there was still plenty left to sell.
Yes, if he wanted to, he could have flipped Beaucroft Assets the middle
finger, sold the house and the company to one of a dozen prominently
enterprising developers in the area, and fucked off to the Bahamas, retiring
at the ripe old age of twenty-seven. He'd thought about it but didn't really
want to do that. Once he had started, he found out that he actually enjoyed
working. It made him feel as if he had some intrinsic value beyond the
numbers in his accounts.
He emailed Jon when he got back to his desk requesting another
meeting. Jon and Renata had been working together on this case so it was
highly likely that he knew about these damning transcripts and had some
thoughts on them already. Jon would probably advise him, again, to settle.
He had been doing that more and more, lately, giving the impression that he
didn't think Nicholas had a chance. “It would be highly detrimental to your
case to have you on the stand,” he'd told him at the last meeting. “You're
intimidating and unlikable.”
So what the fuck was he supposed to do then? Just give up and let his
reputation be ruined?
On the car ride home, he found himself looking over at Jay, sitting
beside him in the car. Sedate. Thoughtful. Likable. Everything he wasn't. If
she were on the stand, she could win over any jury, but Nicholas had a hard
time imagining that she'd ever done a bad thing in her life. What he had
leveraged against her seemed unfathomably petty in comparison to his own
alleged crimes and the irony of being in a similar set of circumstances to
those he had put her in eight years ago wasn't lost on him: now he, too,
would have to choose between pride and reputation.
Sometimes, he found himself replaying that moment over and over,
remembering the pleasure he had derived from Jay's horror. She had been
ready to cry and it had gotten him hard, because he had been so fucking
furious that she wouldn't love him the way that he wanted to be loved that
her humiliation, and her embarrassment, had brought him instant
gratification. He had wanted to hurt her and so he had, because he was good
at hurting people and she was very easy to hurt, because she had always
worn that ragged little heart of hers on her sleeve.
This time, there was no excuse for what he had done, except
selfishness: he had wanted to see her again and knowing that she would
never come to him willingly, he had resorted to the same blend of
intimidation and trickery to make her return to Hollybrook—and his bed.
And, just like before, this time it was him who had been caught.
And her, who had been devastated.
Jay turned her head, looking at him. “What is it?” she asked warily,
tugging her skirt down her knees.
“I'm stopping somewhere for dinner. Do you have a preference?”
“Oh. How about Japanese?” she suggested. “I could go for pickled
plum.”
“You can have whatever you want. Just remind me before I go in.”
“Aren't I coming with you?”
“I thought you didn't like coming in.”
“Yeah,” she said. “When I'm crying.”
“Okay,” he said impassively. “Then come in with me.”
It was late when they finally arrived home. The line had been long.
Most of the patrons were kids from the public high school holding some
kind of fundraising event. He'd casually looped an arm around Jay's waist
when he noticed an older man sitting in the corner nearly breaking his neck
trying to get a look at her, feeling satisfied when the man looked away.
At the table, Nicholas watched her break the wooden chopsticks and
begin mashing up the wasabi paste into a packet of soy sauce with fidgety
deliberation before dipping her rolls into the gloppy mess. “I know it's not
traditional,” she said, catching his eye. “But I like it.”
She hadn't been able to decide between pickled plum, pickled daikon,
or avocado and mango, so he'd gotten her all three, in spite of her protests.
Sitting with that comically large pile of rolls in front of her, she looked like
a grim-faced tactician sitting before a strategy board. Nicholas felt his
mouth beginning to curl and turned his attention to his own mixed tempura.
“I'm not judging you.”
“That's something I don't get,” said Jay. “You have enough money that
you could literally eat anywhere. Why do you only seem to go to small
diners? Why not somewhere fancy?”
“My father's ex-colleagues move in those circles,” said Nicholas. “I
don't care for it.”
“Are they mean to you?”
“Mean to me?” Nicholas repeated, with a laugh. “They can't wait to
suck my cock.”
“Wow,” said Jay. “Homophobic.”
“Some of them are women. Cock-sucking is an equal opportunity
undertaking. If you want me to take you out somewhere nice, I can send my
dinner jacket out to be drycleaned.”
“I wasn't angling for an invitation,” said Jay. “Do you actually own a
dinner jacket?”
“I do.” At the look on her face, he allowed himself a smile. “I look
good in it.”
Jay shook her head. “I think I'd rather eat egg foo young out of a box
than talk to your father's friends. That was the one thing I missed about L.A.
while I was in San Francisco. Asian cuisine is so much better down here.
Fancy sushi. Good Chinese food. Korean barbecue. Oh—and the Mexican
food is so good. I love the Mission so, so much, but I love the food in L.A.”
“I'm glad you're enjoying yourself,” he said, which made her look at
him strangely.
“Hollybrook needs improvement. It's still too white. Everything you
have here still tastes like it was bought at a strip mall. People here think
Italian food is exotic.”
“Spoken like someone who's never been to the wild forests of Rome.”
“Oh, and you have?”
“No.” He smiled. “There aren't any wild forests in Rome. I almost went
there.”
“When?” she asked. “I don't remember that being on the table.”
“In college. But it seemed like too much effort to learn another
tongue.”
“So you never made it to the French Riviera.”
“I've never been to France.”
Jay set down her roll. “You speak French.”
“Je suis en train d'oublier tout ce que j'ai appris.”
“Nager dans la chatte,” she said coolly.
If he were a different sort of man, he might have blushed. “No,
actually.”
“Really,” she said skeptically. “Not at all?”
“Not much,” he amended. “But not abroad. Mostly in L.A.”
“Why L.A.?”
“Because it's anonymous and it was easy to find what I thought I
wanted.”
Jay pulled a strip of radish out of one of the rolls with a chopstick.
“Which was?”
“Control,” he said deliberately. “And someone willing to give it to me.”
“Any girlfriends?”
“I don't date.”
“Sounds lonely.”
Lonely. He watched her eat, and then his eyes drifted lower to the bites
he'd left on her neck. She'd covered them at the office with a high-necked
sweater, but now, with the sweater draped around her chair, he could see the
faint bruising every time her hair drifted to one side. “Maybe a little,” he
conceded. “Did you ever travel?”
“No,” she said, surprised, and a little defensive. “I couldn't afford to.”
“I should take you somewhere. Spread your wings a little.” Nicholas
leaned back in his chair. “We could drive up to downtown L.A. or spend the
whole day at a beach.”
“As part of the debt?”
“Because I enjoy your company.”
Jay stared at her rolls. “It feels like you're trying to bribe me. What do
you really want?”
“A smile would be nice.”
Jay stiffened. “Why?”
“Because you're beautiful when you do,” Nicholas said, which made
her fingers close tightly around her chopsticks. “And I'm tired of seeing you
unhappy.”
“I'm so sorry my unhappiness is such an inconvenience to you.”
“What do you want?” he asked. “Do you want me to let you go? I'll put
you on a plane right now. Wherever you want.” He picked up his phone.
“Name the place.”
That gave her pause. “N-now? But I . . . I'm not packed. My job—the
debt—you—”
Nicholas looked at her as he slowly set his phone back on the table.
“Yes?”
“You made your terms very clear,” she said quietly. “I can't just leave.
It's cruel to tell me I can when you and I both know that I can't.”
He picked up another piece of tempura. It was starting to get a little
cold, the breading congealing with grease. He'd already picked his way
through all the shrimp, octopus, and squash. Only the broccoli were left.
“I'm willing to talk terms.”
“You still haven't given me anything in writing. I have yet to see a
single invoice and you never did come up with a contract.” Jay had begun
consolidating her leftover rolls in a box, but she looked up at him with
burning eyes. “You haven't been keeping track at all, have you?”
“Generally speaking, the person performing the services keeps track of
the invoices.”
Jay flinched. “Services,” she repeated.
“Have you been keeping track, Jay? If there's a discrepancy, I'll pay it. I
trust you.”
She stared at him, with that hunted, agonized expression he knew far
too well. “No,” she said at last, bitterly. “I haven't been keeping track. I . . .
didn't want to. It made me feel cheap.”
“Well,” said Nicholas. “That is unfortunate, because I haven't been
keeping track, either.”
The Styrofoam creaked as she closed the lid. “Why not?”
“Because I'm usually thinking about something else. But you could still
come to me, little bird.” He pushed his uneaten food aside. “You know what
I'll give you if you do.”
“Yeah,” she said. “I know.”
They finished eating and he cleared the table, separating out the
cardboard from the compost. Before she left, he rested his hand on her
shoulder, and she looked at him before heading up to her room, where he
heard the door close. Slowly, he walked up to his.
What was he doing? He wondered, for the thousandth time in the last
couple weeks.
People had said that twenty-two was too young to take on a company,
but it seemed like maybe twenty-seven was the perfect age to fuck up his
own life.

He had strange dreams that night. The kind where you felt like you
were falling until you woke up with a jolting gasp in your own bed.
Nicholas shot up, with his heart beating out a desperate tattoo in his head,
and inhaled again, this time for a very different reason.
A hot, electric sensation buzzed up his arms when he felt something
soft and heavy pressed against him. A woman's body clothed only in a very
thin layer of heated silk and lace.
With steady hands, he touched her—warm and solid and real.
“Blue jay,” he breathed. “You came to Daddy.”
“Yes,” she said, in a very small voice. “I'm here.”
She was jostled a little as he reached for the lamp. It was one of those
folding ones with the flexible neck. After a pause, he turned the shade
around to the wall, letting only a few beams escape to suffuse their bodies
in the semidarkness.
Jay was wearing the ice-blue dress with the paneled skirts. His eyes fell
to the sheer bodice, with its motif of lace roses, before going to her face. It
was the most expensive thing he had ever bought for anyone other than
himself and she looked beautiful in it.
Before she could speak or have second thoughts, he captured her mouth
in a slow kiss, letting his legs fall open so that she fell gently into the cradle
of his hips like a pale and trembling leaf. He smoothed his hand down her
back as she began to respond and her fingers dug into his ribs as the tension
began to leave her body like water trickling from a melting block of ice.
She began moving against him, which became a kind of torture because
he could feel her bare hip pressing against his stomach through one of the
slits in the skirt. He grabbed her backside, squeezing, before dipping his
fingers between her legs. She wasn't wearing underwear.
With a low oath, he rolled her onto her back and wrapped her fingers
around his cock before flicking open the small buttons on the front of her
nightgown. The bite he'd left low on her throat taunted him and he could
feel the thrum of her pulse as he kissed her there, before nuzzling her hair
away until he had uncovered her ear, which he nipped at until she let out a
sharp breath and turned, giving him access to the soft hollow of her throat.
“Like that?” he whispered, and to his pleasure, he heard her choke out
“Yes.”
Nicholas leaned down and felt her hands slide away from his hips as he
bent his head to her exposed skin. She followed the contours of his body the
way someone might trace a road atlas with a fingertip. When he swirled his
tongue over her nipples, he felt her fingers stumble over his ribs like a small
explosion and her grip on him tightened.
Her hands kept getting forced higher as he moved lower—his back, his
shoulders, his neck. By the time he had her dress open, and his face buried
between her legs, her fingers were twisted in the dark locks of his hair. She
yanked sharply, arching under him as he used his tongue on every part of
her except for where she wanted. Her thighs were squeezing his face, and
he pulled away, keeping them spread when she tried to close them with a
whimpered, “Please.”
“Tell me why you came to me.”
“The de—”
“Instantly wrong.”
She stared at the ceiling. “Because I wanted sex.”
“No.” Nicholas slid his boxers off his hips and prowled up the length of
her body, still half-kneeling between her spread legs. She tried to close
them again and he pushed them wider with his knees as he smiled down at
her. “You can get sex from anyone, Jay. You came here because you wanted
to be fucked. By me.”
“Whatever you w—”
“Don't.” Nicholas slid the condom on, tapping her beneath her chin to
get her to look at his face. “It's a yes or no, Jay.”
“Yes, Daddy,” she whispered, letting out a sigh as he entered her.
His cock jerked. He closed his eyes briefly, listening to her harsh
breaths. “What a good girl you are.” He shifted some of his weight to his
forearms. “My girl.”
Jay said nothing, but the small sounds of exertion coming from her
throat were enough.
“Do you know why I call you my little bird?”
“Jay,” she gasped.
“No. It's because you were so elusive . . .” He fell into the sharp,
staggering pace he'd set, wrenching another sweet cry from her tortured
throat. “Everywhere I looked—there you were. And I wanted you . . . my
sweet songbird. I love how soft you feel under my hands.”
A delicate shudder tore through her as his mouth fleetingly grazed hers.
“And now here you are.” He quickened the movements of his hips,
forcing her to work to keep up. She wasn't as athletic as he was and seeing
her falter beneath him, panting, as she struggled to match him sent a hot
bolt of arousal spearing through his belly. “My poor exhausted little bird.
Mine at last.” He wondered if only he registered the bitterness in his words.
The squeeze of her thighs wrapping around him pushed him over, and
he came the way he did when he was alone—that floating, heady sense of
gratification, chased by a pleasure so intense that it was nearly painful. Like
a shot of cheap hard liquor, followed by a sickeningly sweet chaser. He
stayed inside her, and he could feel the muscles of her body contracting
around him in a delicious wave of thrumming vibrations and snug heat.
I love her, he thought, looking down at her sweet face. I really do.
“Why Daddy?” she asked, with the slightest edge of antagonism.
“Hmm?”
“I'm older than you. It's . . . weird. Is it about dominance? Do what
Daddy tells you.” the pitch of her voice deepened as if in mockery of
someone—himself, he assumed—but that dark and biting tone still made
him stir a little inside her. “I don't get it.”
“I don't know why I like it, but I do.” Nicholas slid out of her, rolling to
one side, and gently flicked her nose. “You don't need to get it to turn me
on. All you have to do is crawl up into my lap and say it to me. I like the
way you say it—sweet and guilty, all at once. It's so hot.”
He reached down for the sheets and tugged them over their nakedness.
Leaning into her, Nicholas ran his hand down the length of her, through
the blankets, following that slight dip between her ribs all the way down to
her pubic mound. “Do you hate it?” He did another slow pass. “Calling me
Daddy and being my little bird?”
“It's embarrassing.” She clung to the sheet. “It feels wrong.”
“The kind of wrong that's a little exciting?”
“I wasn't excited,” she said defiantly.
“Mmm. But you seem to enjoy it when I make you say it. I can tell.” To
his delight, her cheeks were turning pink. “Don't think I didn't notice how
wet you were when I tied you up.”
“What does that have to do with me calling you . . . that?”
“Because you don't want to give me what I want,” Nicholas said.
“You're a little bit bratty, blue jay. I think you enjoy punishment. Because I
think you're a little bit of a bad girl.”
“No,” said Jay.
“Maybe I'll tie you up and finger you for a while,” he said idly,
watching her face change from pink to red. “And punish you if you make a
sound. I'd have to do your legs, though. Otherwise, you'd squirm in that
way that you do when you're trying to get yourself off. That will be fun for
me. You have nice legs.” He squeezed her hip. “And a nice ass.
“That's another idea. I could get you a short little dress to wear for me
that shows off your ass. Short and low-cut, with nothing underneath. You'd
hate that,” he added, with a dark laugh, “especially if I took you out in it
and made you bend over to pick something up off the floor.”
“Nick,” she gasped. “No.”
“That's the one. That look—what is it? Shame and arousal?” he tugged
at a strand of her hair. “I want to see that look on your face when you're
wearing your new dress.”
Jay rolled over to face him, pulling the strand out of his fingers.
“Where do you get these ideas? Are they things you've done before?”
He raised an eyebrow. “Are you jealous? If you want a number, Jay, I'll
give you one.”
Jay let out a hiss of air between her teeth. “I really don't want to hear
about your exploits. I was just curious.”
“It's not a large number.” He slung an arm around her unwilling form,
until they were nearly nose to nose. “Most people disappoint me. And since
you're so keen on knowing, I think up a lot of what I do to you in the
mornings when I'm horny and jerking off.”
“Maybe other people weren't the problem,” she said irately.
Nicholas laughed throatily. “That's what I like about you, blue jay. You
never let me get away with anything. When you hold onto me like this, like
you think I'll protect you from myself and all the bad things I want to do to
you, it makes me want to lose my mind.”
He kissed her nose as she sighed.
“I love it when you're bad.”
“I'm not bad,” she said sleepily, which made him pull her close.
“Only for me.” Nicholas smoothed back her hair. And I only want to be
good for you.
Jay fell asleep in his arms but was gone when he woke up. He
wondered if he had upset her again. The thought pained him. This time, he
had gone out of his way to be tender.
Nicholas slid out of bed, pulling on his boxers and some pajamas. She
wasn't in her room, which was concerning, until he noticed the flicker of
blue light from over the half-wall. Peering down, he could see her huddled
in one of those shapeless sweaters, legs thrown over the arm of the sofa,
remote in hand. Just like when she was a kid.
He went downstairs, glancing curiously at the TV. She was in the
middle of a documentary about something called tardigrades. Something
softened inside him and he glanced down at her sleepless face for a moment
before gently taking the remote from her and sinking on the couch.
Nicholas finished the documentary while scrolling through his phone,
glancing over at her sleeping form every so often. She remained asleep
through the next one, which was about small primates, and the one after
that, which was about melting glaciers in the arctic. He had just started the
fourth when he felt the seat shift. Groaning, Jay pushed herself up—and
froze.
“How long have you been sitting there?”
“A while,” he allowed.
She glanced at the TV. “You were watching this?”
“I've been drifting in and out. Answering work emails. Ordering your
dress.”
“My dress?” She blushed when he held out his phone. “I can't wear
that.”
“If you liked it, it wouldn't be a very good punishment, would it?” He
looked at the picture, admiring the backless cut. “You're going to look great
in this.”
She swung upright, straightening out her clothes with an air of dignity
that amused him. He wound his arm along the back of the couch and was
gratified when she didn't immediately press herself against the opposite end
of the couch. They finished the documentary together and when it was over,
he turned the TV off and leaned back, letting his arm fall.
“Are you hungry? We can go out.”
“Out out?”
“Yes. Get dressed.”
“What time is it?”
He glanced down at his phone. “Ten.”
“Okay. Um. I'll go feed the cat and change.”
Nicholas watched her go before getting up to his own room. Inside, he
felt strangely empty as he did up the buttons of his shirt and slung on a
leather jacket. He folded his sunglasses over where the fabric buckled at his
open throat and ran a comb through his hair.
He knew what he needed to do.
Jay was waiting in a pink and navy plaid dress that swung down to her
knees. “I'm taking you to Accia,” he informed her, shoving a hand into his
jacket pocket.
She laughed nervously. “Wow, what a throwback. The last time I was
there, I got kicked out.”
“You?” he said dubiously. “For what?”
“I was with Quentin. He called some snooty old woman a cunt and she
complained.” Her face fell for some reason, a pensive look crossing her
face.
“I think that's the first time I've ever heard you say that word,” he said
dryly. “I'm surprised you didn't fucking stammer over it.”
“I swear,” she said, with the cool primness of an angry schoolmarm. “I
just don't usually see the need to. I wonder if they'll even let me in,” she
added, in a slightly less frosty tone.
“Of course they will.” She headed for the door, but he took her by the
shoulders and turned her to the side. “Let's go out through the garden. It'll
be more festive.”
“Okay,” she said slowly, as they walked past the sofa and coffee table
before heading out through the door that led to the pool. The lilies of the
valley swished softly in the morning greeze, while the grape leaves
climbing over the trellis rasped and fluttered. He could smell his mother's
jasmine and rose bushes flourishing, although at night the jasmine would be
stronger.
“I forgot how pretty it was out here,” Jay said.
Nicholas locked the door. “My mother designed it.”
“Really?”
“She was an architect. Or wanted to be. It would have required a lot of
travel. My father wanted her to stay at home. So she compromised by
working on the house. It became her passion project. A lot of the features—
the half-wall, the raised planters, the double staircase—were hers.”
“And the flowers?”
“Also hers.”
“What happened to her?”
“She died when I was young.” He unlocked the car. “Brain
hemorrhage. It was fast.”
“Do you remember her at all?” she asked curiously, as he opened the
door for her.
“Not well, no. Just little flashes. Touching my hair. Feeding me soup
when I was sick. I remember what she smelled like. When I was eight or so,
I caught a whiff of it in some mall. Chanel No. 5 was her perfume. For a
moment, I thought she had come back and even though I knew it wasn't
true, the reality was a little like losing her all again.”
“Oh,” said Jay softly. “That's so sad.”
“It spooked me badly enough that I started to cry. It's the only time I
can remember crying. My dad yanked me out of there by the arm pretty
quickly and told me to be a man.”
Jay's face darkened. “I'm glad he's dead,” she said viciously. “He was
an awful man.”
“What about your dad? You never talk about him. Is he dead?”
“I don't know who he is.”
“Your mother never told you?”
“All she said was that he was tall and dark, and that he had green eyes.
I guess he was a musician or something and they hooked up when she was
young. She said he used to sing to her. She said he sang to me, too, but I'm
not sure that's true. Any of it. It could all be a lie just because she liked the
sound of it,” she said bitterly. “I figured the reason she never told me his
name was because he was married or dead.”
Nicholas made a noncommittal sound as he drove, though he figured
this was probably true.
“Why did your dad even marry your mom?” she asked suddenly.
“From what you said about her, she doesn't seem like she was his type.”
“His type was female and alive,” Nicholas said, “and preferably
beautiful, although I don't think even that mattered as long as he felt like he
was in control. His marriage to my mother was arranged by their parents
and I think he probably resented that. He told me once that he had a thing
for some townie with a light skirt who gave good head and my mother
wouldn't put up with other women. She and her father really put the
pressure on until he broke things off. So not a great start. He often said that
my mother wouldn't have had the hemorrhage if she hadn't worked so
hard.”
“That's a sick and messed up thing to say to a kid,” said Jay.
“Yeah,” Nicholas said slowly. “It is. Both of our parents were pretty
messed up.”
Jay folded her arms. “My mother was a lot of things, but she wasn't a
rapist.”
“No. But I watched her spent our entire childhood fucking with your
head and I don't think she ever lifted a finger to help you. I wonder if that's
why you ended up the way you are.”
“How's that?” she demanded coldly.
“Aloof. Untouchable. Hollybrook's little ice queen.” He parked the car
outside the bar but made no move to unfasten his belt. “You wouldn't let
anyone near you. God knows, people tried. It was like you decided anyone
who got close to you was only going to disappoint you, so you'd
preemptively cut them off before they could.”
“That's not true,” said Jay.
“Name one friend you kept from high school,” he shot back, watching
her face pale. “Or college, even. Those two girls—you liked them. Where
are they now? Or that woman from your office—Lily, wasn't it? Have you
texted her recently? Or have you already started freezing her out, the way
you always do?”
“Shut up, Nicholas.”
“And there it is,” he said. “You care too much, blue jay. I don't care at
all. And now we're both alone.” When she stumbled out of the Tesla, his
hand closed over hers. “Isn't that sad?”
Jay looked down at his hand and then at his face. “I'm not alone,” she
said uncertainly.
“I've never heard you tell anyone you loved them. Not once. Anytime
someone seems like they're getting close, you run. You ran from Michael
and from all your friends, and I bet that's why you broke things off with that
waiter boyfriend of yours. You even ran from your mother.”
Her eyes were wide, fathomless, like an autumnal spring shaded by
trees. She seemed unable to move and he felt her fingers tighten reflexively
around his.
“Come on then,” he said, after a pause. “Before you try to get away
from me.”

They were both seated right away at one of the tables in the back. It
was so quick, despite being a populous brunch destination, that Jay
privately wondered if they had recognized Nicholas and didn't want to
cause offense. The table was nice, too, next to a potted dracaena and
shielded from the kitchens by a wooden Chinese screen. Even though it was
out in the open, it was cordoned off in a way that felt—she swallowed—
private.
“You said you were here before.” Nicholas picked up the menu,
making the leather in his jacket creak. He looked good in it and she noticed
a few of the women around them shooting him discreet glances. “What do
you recommend?”
“That was eight years ago,” she said. “The menu is completely
different. It's embossed now. My God, this used to be a brunch spot for
women who wanted to get tipsy.”
“Seems like it still is,” Nicholas said, glancing around. “Now they just
have to pay more.”
“I have no idea what to get. You're on your own.”
“Let's make it interesting. Pick something for me. I'll order for you.
Drinks, too. Whatever you think I'd like. I'll do the same.”
“What if I hate what you order?”
Nicholas slapped the menu closed. “Then we try again.”
“That seems like a waste of money.”
“I have money to waste.” He leaned back against the booth, propping
his elbow against the back, and she felt something inside her catch and slide
free. “Better hurry up, blue jay. I already know what I'm getting you and I
know you're going to like it.”
It was so disturbing how his smile could tug at her heart.
The waitress arrived and Nicholas said, “I think we're ready to order.”
“What can I get for you?”
“I'll have the caprese skewers, but can you substitute the mozarella for
either tofu or avocado or both? I don't really care which. Oh, and to drink,
I'll have a blueberry mimosa.”
Her face! Jay nearly laughed. “And for you?” the waitress asked.
“Seafood paella and sauvignon blanc, please,” said Jay, glancing at
Nicholas and then away when she saw how intense his face was. Stuffily,
she added, “In fact, go ahead and bring the bottle.”
The waitress left with a carefully blank expression and Jay felt a giggle
escape her. “Oh my God. Did you see her face. She thinks we're crazy
now.”
“She's going to spit in your glass,” Nicholas said dryly. “Ms. Bring-thebottle.”
“Well, it's your glass now,” said Jay. “So I hope you enjoy your spit
garnish.”
He cracked a smile that made her stomach clench. “Was that supposed
to sound like me?”
“I can't make my voice as deep as yours,” she said. “But you sound
pretty awful when you're trying to be.” She picked up her phone, eager for
an excuse to look away from that pensive stare, and felt a pang when she
realized that she'd never responded to Lily's gentle teasing.
Hey, she wrote, hesitating for a moment. Didn't mean to ignore you.
How are you?
“Who are you talking to?”
Jay set the phone down. “Lily,” she said quietly. “I forgot to write back
to her.”
Something in his face shifted. “Good.”
Their drinks came and Jay watched the waitress open the wine bottle
and pour her a rather small glass of the sloshing golden liquid. Nicholas
topped it off after she left and swapped their glasses.
“Blueberry for the blue jay,” he said, sliding the mimosa towards her.
“Enjoy.”
Jay sipped it cautiously. It was dry and a lttle sweet and would go well
with the balsamic reduction on the caprese skewers. “How are you?” she
asked hesitantly. “You've been so stressed but you seem better now. Were
you able to fix the problem?”
“No,” he said, sifting his glass to watch the pale liquid tilt in the light.
“But I've reached a decision.”
“That's good, isn't it?”
“We'll see.” His smile was enigmatic. “I'm surprised you didn't order
me steak.”
“I wasn't sure what to get you. You don't seem picky but I figured since
I've seen you eat octopus, seafood probably couldn't be wrong. People who
order seafood don't usually do it because they can't think of what else to get.
It's a life choice.”
He laughed—and for once, there was no malice in it.
“Would you have gotten steak?”
“No.” A shadow slid over his features. “You're right. It is a life choice.
I've been trying to avoid red meat since my father's heart attack.”
“Oh, right.” She swallowed. “I'm sorry.”
“Are you?” He sipped his wine calmly. “You just told me you were
glad he's dead.”
“Okay, no. He was a bastard and I'm not sorry he's dead.” She stared at
a floating blueberry in her sugar-encrusted glass. “I hated him for what he
did to me.”
“They say living well is the best revenge.”
“Yeah.” Jay took another sip of drink. “How long have you been
managing Beaucroft Assets? It can't be that long now. You started . . . pretty
soon after his death, right?”
“Five years,” said Nicholas. “Since my graduation. I'd rather not talk
about work.”
“What do you want to talk about, then?”
Nicholas stared at one of the fans twirling on the ceiling, with his
wineglass cradled in his hands. She had the feeling that he wasn't really
listening to her.
“You know,” he said, after a moment, “it's funny. I never really got the
impression that my father really liked me all that much. He spent all this
time and effort trying to mold me, to make me more like him, and I used to
think that maybe that was how he showed he cared. But lately, I've been
thinking that it was just that I was his fucking vanity project.”
His eyes flickered, the same icy gray as his father's.
“The day they read his will, I poured out all his scotch. One of them
cost twelve hundred dollars. The one he kept in his drawer—do you
remember?” he asked suddenly. “I showed you. He had the same bottle for
twenty years and I just dumped it down the drain like expired milk.”
Jay felt an icy blade of dread slide into her stomach. “Why?”
“I suppose because it felt a little like killing him. He did love his things
—his furniture, his liquor, his watches. I rented a sledgehammer from
someone and smashed up his shit. All of that ugly cabana furniture and the
things in his bedroom. His watches. His liquor. His porn. I destroyed
everything.”
Jay clutched her own glass. “Why?”
“Because he tried to destroy you.” His wineglass was empty now and
Jay watched him refill it with a steady hand, feeling sick. “And because he
tried to enlist me to do it for him and I nearly did. He was very clever in
how he made me hate you. It took me almost seven years to figure out what
he had done. You were innocent, you couldn't help it. But everything he did
to me, I let him do.”
Jay was saved from responding by the appearance of their food, but she
could feel her heart beginning to pound with dread. “The moment of
reckoning,” said Nicholas, as he swapped the plates out. “Bon appétit, mon
petit oiseau.”
“Nick,” she said. “You're scaring me.”
He held up a hand as he bit into the paella. “This is very good.
Especially with the wine. I think you might win.” His fingers dipped into
his pocket and for a bizarre moment, Jay thought he was going to give her
money, like she'd won a bet. Instead, he handed her his keys.
“I plan on getting drunk,” he said, sliding them over to her. “I need to
do something and I can't do it sober, so you're going to be driving us home.”
“What are you going to do?”
“Jay,” he said, smiling. “Don't look so worried. I'm not going to drink
the whole bottle.”
He drank most of it, though, and by the time they had paid and were
walking to the car, he wasn't walking the way he normally did. Anxiety
pinched her gut. He drove an expensive car and she hadn't driven at all
since leaving Hollybrook for good. In the city, she hadn't needed to.
“Are you okay?” She gripped the wheel so hard her fingers were white.
“I'm so drunk,” he said. “So ready for all of this to be over.”
All of what? His life? Please, not his life. “Please tell me what you're
going to do.”
“It's a surprise,” he said. “Now drive.”
“My license expired!”
“So don't get caught,” he said, leaning back. “Simple.”
Simple.
She was shaking by the time they parked in front of his house and
looked at him anxiously. He unbuckled his seat belt, swearing as he
fumbled the fastenings, and then he left, leaving her with little choice but to
chase after him as he headed towards the pool.
Was he going to jump in? She flew at him, wrapping her arms around
his waist. “Don't.”
For a moment, he didn't move, and then she felt his hands come down
on her arms, tightening briefly before gently pulling her away. “I'm
surprised you don't push me in and hold me under.” He tilted his head
towards the pool and her heart stopped. “You must hate me.”
“Nick,” she said, helplessly. “No.”
“Liar.” She saw the ghost of a smile on his lips. “You've told me you
do. You're very honest. You'd be a terrible lawyer.” He laughed humorlessly.
“I would know.”
“Let's talk about this inside,” she said nervously. “We can sit down and
talk about thi—”
“No.”
“But Nick—”
“Ruin me.”
This was so far from what she was expecting him to say that she let out
a slight gasp. “What do you mean?”
“Don't worry about our little deal. I'll write a check for ten million
dollars. You can put your mother's name on it, take it for yourself, give it to
charity. I don't care. It's yours.”
“What are you talking about?”
“I'm telling you to hurt me,” he said, slurring a little. “Don't you want
to? If you aren't feeling up to murder, you could tank my career. I'm being
sued for sexual harassment. Your name came up in the call logs. If you join
up with the prosecution and tell them all the horrible things I made you do
for me, they'll have a pretty solid case. Even though we're technically
family, you can still be called to testify against me. I'd probably be fired.”
Jay couldn't breathe. “Why do you want me to hurt you?”
“Because I deserve it,” he said simply.
She shook her head, taking a step backwards, and nearly fell into the
plants. The sharp leaves poked and scratched at her through her back as she
scrambled upright. He watched her sink down on the edge of the planter
with a strange, feverish glitter in his eyes.
“I wanted to see you again—and since I figured that you hated me, I
used your mother against you. I used you against you.” He folded his arms,
ambling closer. “I never stopped loving you, you know. Ever since we were
kids, I loved you. You were the only person in my life who tried to sort me
out. You gave me medicine when I was sick and you sat with me when I
was lonely and you believed in me when I was just a screw up. And I let my
father take that and fuck it all up and then I hurt you and once I started . . . I
just never stopped because it would mean—”
His voice broke.
“It would mean having to admit that something was lost.”
He fell to his knees before the planter, pressing his face against her
skirt as he wrapped his arms around her legs. “Do whatever you want to
me, my darling bird. Whatever it is, I deserve it. Ruin me, take everything,
and tell everyone what a terrible man I am—because it's true. You were the
best thing that ever came into my life and I'll take whatever you want to
give me.”
And then, to Jay's horror, Nicholas began to cry.
Chapter Thirty-Six
2017

For a moment, Jay was unable to move. She could feel his breath
through her skirt, the strength of his arms beneath that leather jacket. The
sun was blazing down in bright golden rays but Jay had never felt colder in
her entire life.
Ruin me.
She squirmed, trying to rise, and heard him whisper, “Please don't
leave.” And it was like the last broken shard of her shattered heart had
finally worked itself free from its frame and fallen, slashing her all up on its
way back down.
Remembering the menacing restraint of the man who had come to
retrieve her from the city, Jay found she could not quite reconcile that image
with the man who knelt before her now. When she tugged up his chin, he
bared his throat willingly, leaving her with the sickening suspicion that if
she had whipped out a knife, he would have gladly let her slash him with it.
He leaned into her hand, as if craving her touch, and it made her
remember—with a painful jolt—how he used to fall asleep on her when
they watched TV together, curled into her side as if she and she alone, could
offer protection from whatever unpleasant specter haunted his fears.
When had it all gone bad? What had set them firmly on the path to . . .
this?
“I'm not going to hurt you,” she said at last, feeling weary. “That's not
what I want.”
“What do you want?”
“Get up,” she said.
Nicholas stood unsteadily, but obediently, swaying a little as he rose to
his full height. She did feel a pulse of resentment then. Even with redrimmed eyes, he still looked beautiful.
How many times had he made her cry? When he forced her to strip in
the restaurant. When he treated her like an escort girl. When he filmed her
and made her watch it. When he broke into her room. When he fucked her.
When he broke her heart.
When he made her feel things she shouldn't.
She had cried over this man for most of her adult life and nobody
would judge her for it. They would only judge her for being stupid enough
not to leave. She drew in a breath that made his eyes flick to her and she
realized it had sounded like she was about to speak.
Please don't leave.
Wordlessly, Jay headed for the door and he followed her like a large
puppy, waiting while she unlocked the side door with his keys. From there,
he trailed after her up the stairs. She had to help him. He was too drunk to
manage the steps alone.
When they got to his bed, he clumsily kicked off his loafers as he
struggled out of his jacket. His sunglasses were missing. They must have
fallen out of his shirt. “Do you have your wallet and phone?” she asked, and
he looked up from fumbling the buttons of his shirt to pat himself down and
hand her both, and once she had divested him of his things, she said,
“Listen to me.”
He blinked up at her.
“I want you to delete everything.” She spoke slowly and clearly, wary
of the glaze over his eyes. “Everything you have on me. Photographs.
Videos. Anything. Delete all of it, right now. Wipe it. Shred it. While I
watch you. I'll bring you what you need.”
“I already did.”
“What?”
“I deleted the video.” He rubbed at his temples, frowning deeply. “I
lied in the restaurant. There's no flash drive copy. There's no flash drive.
Not anymore. I didn't . . . want my father to find it.”
Jay bit her lip to swallow down her sob. The thought had never
occurred to her and she was suddenly, achingly glad it hadn't, or it might
have driven her mad. “And the photograph of Ivy?”
“Gone.” He leaned back against the bed and his shirt fell open. “I
shredded the physical copy in the airport and created a file to override the
virtual one I had on my laptop. Then I deleted the file and compacted the
disk.”
“When did you destroy the virtual copy?”
“The day after you slept with me.”
Jay slapped him and he let out a low growl that made the hairs on her
arms stand on end.
“You bastard,” she whispered. “You deleted everything—and you
didn't tell me?”
“You would have left.” Nicholas pressed his hand to his cheek,
breathing hard enough that his chest was heaving and she had to look away
from him. “And no—not everything. I kept the photos of your mother
fucking the pool boy.” His eyes fluttered closed. “You want those, too?”
“What else do you have?” she demanded stonily.
“Photos I took of you. I kept the ones of you in your prom dress.”
“The one I went to with Michael?” He nodded. “Why?”
“Because you looked like an angel.”
A slightly hysterical laugh burst from her lips before she could stifle it.
“I thought you said you didn't want to fuck an angel.”
“I lied. I wanted to make you feel dirty; I thought it would make you
more willing to fuck me.”
“You—” She froze as his eyes shifted to her hand, which she had raised
unthinkingly. “You're trying to provoke me,” she said. “You're still fucking
with me, even now.”
Nicholas gave her a smile she might have called remorseful, if not for
the carnal edge.
“I like fucking with you,” he said. “It gets me off.”
She paced back and forth several times, trying to control her emotions.
How dare he yank her around this way, with such blatant attempts at
manipulation. Fucking her, taking her out to lunch, letting her think he was
going to hurt himself—and then asking her to do it. Her throat tightened
and she found herself wondering if this was yet another trick.
Whirling around, she turned to face him again. He'd dragged his legs
onto the bed and had managed to arrange himself into a position of careless
repose. And he was watching her.
“I still have things from the private investigator,” he said, unprompted.
“Why are you so obsessed with me?” she asked helplessly.
“You're beautiful,” said Nicholas, “and interesting, and cryptic. You
made it hard to get to know you—made it feel like a challenge, and when
you stopped talking to me, the only way I could get to you was through
trickery, deceit . . . or force.”
“That's sick,” she said.
He looked at her. There was a lot in that look, none of it good for either
of them. “You have no idea,” he said. “No idea what I've done . . . how far
I'd go. If you think I'm sick now—”
“Stop talking.”
She wondered, even as he fell silent, if she should have let him keep
going. What had he done? Pawed through her underthings? Watched her
sleep? Worse?
Jay darted a look at his solemn, tortured face and thought, Worse.
“Why did you do it?”
“I wanted you . . . so fucking much.” He scrubbed his hand over his
eyes. “Nobody makes me feel the way you do. You make me want to be a
good man.”
“And so you acted like a psychotic one?”
“I never said I wanted to be a rational man,” he said, with a brief flash
of lucidity.
She turned from him, her eyes falling on his curated bookshelf with the
glossy spines and its matching curios. That's what this was, she realized—a
glossy, soulless life. For a glossy, soulless man. “Did you do the things
they're saying you did to your employee?” she asked slowly. “To the one
who's suing you?”
“I fired her because she was bad at her job.” He let his hand fall. “I'm
not my father.”
Jay sat down on the edge of the bed. “You're not,” she said. “I don't
know what you are, but you're not your father. You're something else.” I'm
just not sure if it's better.
“We were entertainment for him,” Nicholas said. “He called me a
backyard breeder—his family bred horses, it's an insult—and then he
offered me an advance on my inheritance if I filmed myself fucking you
and sent him the tapes. That was why I started blackmailing him.”
“Oh my God,” Jay said, feeling sick.
“I wanted to protect you,” said Nicholas. “And I did—from everyone
except myself.” His eyes flickered, watching her lean forward on her knees.
“What are you going to do now?”
“You're starting to sound a little more sober.”
“I'm not. The room won't stop spinning.”
With a sigh, Jay stood up, and scooted a trash can to his bedside,
turning to look at him warily when he clumsily swiped for her hand. “Don't
run.”
Jay took her hand back and swept out of the room, closing the door
behind her.

Nicholas woke up with a throbbing headache around eleven at night.
Blearily, he checked his phone, unsurprised to see that he had messages
from both his lawyers. It's over, he thought, heading down the stairs. His
eyes felt sore. Soon all of this will be over.
He made himself dinner, which he ate with a full bottle of water. He
grabbed another on his way back to his room, looking at Jay's closed
bedroom door. There was no light underneath. He went to his room and got
out his checkbook, writing a blank check for ten million.
Whatever else he might be, he was a man of his word.
Jay hadn't locked the door and when he opened it, he saw her curled
into the sheets in one of her little band T-shirts. He set the check on her
nightstand and quietly tiptoed out of the room.
He wondered if she'd still be here in the morning.
When he woke up again, his head felt like it was packed with sand. He
got dressed briskly, studying his reflection in the mirror. Probably time for a
shave, he thought, fingering his beard. He gave himself a quick trim so he
wouldn't look like a fucking werewolf when he met with the lawyers,
resolving to wake up early the next morning so he could take care of it.
As he grabbed his wallet and phone off the nightstand, he encountered
a small, neat pile of shredded paper. He recognized his own handwriting on
it: the check.
She didn't take the money.
She was downstairs, waiting in the kitchen with her purse on her lap
while she flipped through her phone. She was wearing that wrap skirt with
the bow that he loved, and with her legs crossed on that bar stool, it rode
just high enough that he could make out the lacy tops of the stockings she
wore with it. She glanced at him and deliberately tugged the hem down.
He immediately went hard. “You're still here.”
“Where else would I be?”
Nicholas glanced at her legs again before turning to the fridge. “I
thought you'd run.”
“I don't have another job lined up yet and I want to watch you shred
those files.”
She's not leaving. He almost smiled. “I'll shred them all. You can watch
me do it.”
“After work.”
“Whatever you want,” he said, a little mockingly. “We'll pick up dinner
on the way home.”
“This isn't funny,” she said, which made him grin. “Why are you
smiling at me like that? You hired someone so you could have me followed.
That is seriously messed up.”
“I thought we'd already established what a sick fuck I am.”
She let out a defeated-sounding sigh. “Yesterday, you were begging me
to forgive you. Now you're back to—this. What is your problem? Do you
just not care?”
“I know that you're upset and that it's my fault.” He went to her,
gratified that she didn't immediately flinch away. “I also know that feeling
sorry isn't going to fix what I did—and that you're not cruel enough to
demand tears or blood for it, however much you might like to.”
He ran the back of his hand down her face.
“Look at me. I'm a snake in a suit, and I've got you all caught up in my
coils. But I'm going to make it up to you. Even if I've got to get on my
knees to do it, I'll find a way to make things right.” Her eyes flickered away
when he touched her mouth. “I care about you so fucking much.”
She shuddered and looked away. “Don't say that to me right now,
Nick.”
Nicholas let his hand fall and took a step back.
Jay plucked at the strap of her purse. “What's going on with your case?
Am I going to be involved?”
“It hasn't gotten that far,” said Nicholas. “I only learned about the call
logs a few days ago.”
“Because I looked up sexual harassment cases this morning and if they
really think I'm relevant to the case, it looks like they can compel my
testimony and even lock me up for obstruction if I refuse. I don't want to
take the stand and talk about us.”
“I meet with my lawyer this morning.” Nicholas closed the fridge. “I'll
find out. If I can keep you out of it, I will.” He hesitated for a long moment.
“Even if I have to settle out of court.”
“But you said you didn't do it. You'd just give them the money?”
“I'd do anything for you.”
“Anything, huh?”
“Tell me what you want. It's yours, if you stay.”
Jay sat on the stool looking down at her phone. After a moment, she
slid off her seat, tugging at her skirts. “We should probably go. You
wouldn't want to be late.”
He dropped her off at the Starbucks, which was beginning to feel like
an unnecessary ruse at this point, and walked into his company building,
trying to shake off the voices telling him that it was the last time he would
ever do so. So what if it is, he decided. I'll leave. Fuck all of them.
It wasn't like he had any real ties to this place. There was only one that
mattered.
Renata was on her first coffee of the day when Nicholas walked into
her office. He watched her sip it. This was the first meeting he could
remember having with her when the ice in it wasn't already melted. “Lay it
on me,” he said, when she didn't speak. “Tell me how fucked I am.”
“The case got thrown out.”
He nearly fell over. “What?”
“She hired a lawyer who wasn't really a lawyer. He'd been disbarred.
One of Jon's paralegals was looking into him and found that he'd lost his
license for commingling funds. It's a pretty common way to lose your law
license. You're supposed to set up a trust account.”
“So I'm done.” He was unable to believe it. “I don't have to go to
court.”
“No. But I would take this as a warning from the universe, given what
we last spoke about. You were very, very lucky. Speaking frankly and off
the record, if your ex-employee had been slightly more diligent, she could
have ruined your life.”
“Anything else?”
“Just close the door on your way out.” A tense smile. “Please.”
Nicholas pulled out his phone. You're going to be fine.
What do you mean? Did you talk to your lawyer already?
It's all over, he typed. Nothing is going to happen. Case dropped.
There was a long pause. How lucky for you.
Nicholas didn't believe in God but his whole life had revolved around a
warped and twisted perversion of divine right. His father had taught him
that the “haves” were categorically different from the “have nots,” and he
had gone through life taking everything in it as his due.
But maybe Fate, like Jay, believed in second chances.
The rest of the day was like a slow-moving river, catching him up in its
lazy current. He wrote his last check to Jon, relishing the end to those
numbing sessions where he would sit in that fucking storage closet of his
office and have his character systematically demolished.
Annica scheduled him an appointment with HR, where he found out
that Meghana had enrolled him in sensitivity training. “Given the pattern
here,” she told him grimly, “it's either this or being forced to resign. I
suggest you take it.”
Nicholas signed up for the training, knowing it was going to be
miserable. Like traffic school for the politically correct. God, how tedious.
But worth it, for the cost of his life.
His thoughts shifted back towards Jay and how she had reacted to his
confession. Part of him had expected her to start whaling on him, although
he wasn't sure why he had anticipated that reaction given that she was so
sickeningly nice. He wasn't sure what to make of her behavior now. She
hadn't left—was it possible that she loved him?
Poor little bird, he thought. She deserves better.
Pity for her, he wouldn't give up without a fight.

Jay was tired when she got off work.
She wasn't sure what to make of Nicholas's latest series of texts. Part of
her was relieved that it was over and part of her was annoyed that he had
managed to shirk the consequences of his behavior. He leads a charmed
life, she thought, glancing up at him. Nothing bad sticks.
Arthur was overly solicitous in a way that made her wonder what, if
anything, he might know. Gen and Stacey were as friendly as always but
Jay had the impression that both of them were trying to pry, to figure out
why her reporting duties had been swapped and what was going on. “How
is Arthur?” Gen asked pointedly. “I hear he's much less of a firebrand.”
“He's fine,” said Jay, evading the question. “They're both fine.”
So many people were relying on her to be her cheerful, upbeat self that
sometimes it almost felt like she wasn't allowed to experience normal
emotions like anger and sadness.
She kept her smile in place all day as she scheduled appointments and
answered the phone, signing off on the financial spreadsheets that Arthur
had sent him and even making a coffee that he hadn't asked for but accepted
graciously, but inside, she felt drained.
Her thoughts kept going back to Nicholas and everything she felt for
him.
He'd stayed late today. By the time he finally got off, the office had
emptied out and she was alone in the kitchen with a book she wasn't
reading, wishing that all she felt for the man was mere loathing. Wishing
that she didn't feel that drop in her stomach and that prickle between her
thighs every time he looked at her like she were something he could devour.
“Hey, blue jay,” he said, glancing at her. “Sorry to keep you waiting.”
“You're a free man,” she retorted, meeting his eyes with poise. “How
does it feel?”
“Like I'm ready to get the hell out of this office.” He went to the fridge
and stuffed something into the briefcase that looked like a paper bag. “You
ready to go?”
“What's that? A fifth of whiskey?”
“God, no. I can't stand the shit.”
“Quoth the child alcoholic.”
“It's not like I was drinking whole shots of the stuff,” he said mildly. “I
just wanted a taste of what it felt like to be bad. It was honestly pretty
disappointing. I told you I thought it tasted like Windex.”
“Then why the tour to show me what a demented little bad-ass you
were?”
“You were pretty,” he said, shrugging. “I wanted to impress you.”
Jay wasn't sure what to say to that.
“You want to do dinner again?”
“Sure.” She hitched her purse up. “The case really got thrown out?”
“Yeah. I've been signed up for sensitivity training but I get to keep my
job.”
“So you can go back to buying up huge swaths of California.”
“Maybe.” His fingers drummed restlessly over the wheel. “Arthur
thinks we ought to take the company international and do some foreign
investing.”
“What would that entail?”
“You shift your most profitable investments to the countries with the
lowest tax rates and report losses in countries with the highest tax rates. It's
like playing a shell game.”
“Seems shady.”
He made a grim sound of amusement. “I'll leave that to the legal team.”
Jay made a face. Her near brush with the law had satisfied whatever
passing curiosity she might have had about the legalities of business for a
while.
“Maybe it's stupid,” she said, after a pause, “but I didn't realize you
were so good at what you do. Your all-hands meeting was impressive. I
don't know if I ever told you.”
His mouth twitched. “Was that a compliment?”
“I misjudged you,” said Jay. “I didn't think you really cared about
anything at all.”
“I care about some things.”
“Yeah,” she said. “I know.”
Nicholas pulled up in a strip mall. Jay recognized it right away. They
had stopped in front of the Afghan place he'd taken her to after their first
night together. He kept his arm around her waist as he ordered, just like he
had before, stroking her through the thin blouse.
“I remember you,” said the man at the counter. “You two are a
couple?”
Nicholas glanced at her, his gray eyes glinting under the lights. He
squeezed her a little tighter. “Yes.”
“I thought so,” said the man, with a wink. “Second date?”
“Officially, I think it's the third.”
Jay could feel her face heating. “Nick.”
“She's shy.” His knuckles glanced off the side of her breast. “Get
whatever you want for us, little bird.”
“Um.” She stared at the menu, feeling the heat coming off her face in
waves as both men looked at her. “Is the golden lentil soup made with
coconut milk?”
“It is,” said the man.
“Then could we get that, the tabbouleh, and the hummus, with some
pita?”
“Of course.”
“I'll also take some baklava,” said Nicholas, reaching for his wallet
with his free hand. Jay told herself she wasn't disappointed when he
removed his arm to slip out a card. “Two pieces.”
“Baklava on the house this time,” said the man, with another wink.
“For a pretty girl.”
Nicholas glanced at her, an amused smile tilting his mouth. “That's
very generous.”
“Thank you, sir,” said the man, glancing at the tip, before handing
Nicholas two sticky pieces of the flaky Middle Eastern pastry.
They sat in the waiting area, next to a plant. “He'd be so disappointed if
he knew you weren't eating it,” Nicholas murmured. “If you want to taste it,
I'll kiss you after I take a bite.”
When she looked at him, he was popping one of the pieces into his
mouth. He ate the second piece much more slowly, without breaking eye
contact, pausing to lick a drop of honey from the corner of his mouth.
“You're going to like it.”
As soon as the food was packed into the car, he did kiss her, pulling her
against him and sliding his tongue into her mouth, until the cloying
sweetness of the honey and the herbal note of the pistachio were all she
could taste. She did like it. She liked it too much. Jay heard herself make a
noise, breathless and full of wanting, and felt him smile against her lips.
“Sweet,” he said. “But not as sweet as you.”
He kissed the corner of her mouth.
“You're wound too tight, though.”
“Screw you, Nick.”
He laughed as he got behind the wheel, sounding a little manic. Oh
God, she thought, as they drove past the turn-off that would have taken
them home. What now?
“Where are we going?”
“Taking a little detour.”
“Where?”
“Eden Hill Mall.”
“It's still around?” When he nodded absently, she said, “Won't it be
closed?”
“Probably.”
The big gates soon loomed before them. All of the storefronts were
dark.
“Nick.”
“Out of the car, Jay,” he said cheerfully, grabbing his briefcase.
It was creepy walking through the silent buildings at night. All those
cold steel beams and empty glass windows gave her the chills. The night
sky was cold and clear, with only a thin sliver of moon. She shook herself
and raced after Nicholas, who was walking ahead like he knew exactly
where he was going, which was probably nowhere good.
“You're not planning anything illegal, are you?” she asked worriedly.
“No, blue jay,” he said. “I'm not.”
They stopped in front of the big jumping dolphin statue, which as too
ostentatious for the mall. The water features had been turned off but the
bottom glimmered with a silent sea of coins.
“Why are we here?” Jay asked, staring at a yuan coin. “You want to
make a wish?”
Nicholas reached into his briefcase and handed her the paper bag.
“Open it.”
She slowly peeled the bag back. “It's . . . a cupcake.” She stared at him
suspiciously and then at the plastic box in her hands. “You drove to
Ridgeview to get me a cupcake?”
“The other day,” he said thoughtfully, “you called my house 'home.' I
don't think you even realized what you'd said, but I did—and I do want
Hollybrook to be a home to you.”
Her heart began to beat faster. She stared at the box, frowning. What is
that?
“That's all you ever really wanted, right?” asked Nicholas. “Someone
to love you?”
Jay opened the box with fingers that were beginning to feel numb.
There was a little silver something in the cake. The jeweled bird charm he'd
given to her when he was nineteen, ripped from her neck in a fit of anger.
He'd gotten rid of the chain and had it welded to a ring base.
It fit her perfectly.
Her breathing stopped.
“Are you—”
“I don't expect a decision right away. All I ask is that you don't leave
until you make a decision. I would like a chance to personally persuade you
to stay.”
“After what you did, do you think I would?”
“You tore up the check, didn't you? I found the pieces on my
nightstand. You could have taken the money and gone. Ten million dollars
is more than enough money to disappear.”
“It was never about the fucking money,” she whispered. “Not to me.”
“I know.” He closed his briefcase up. “You're so disgustingly moral.”
She closed the box. With a screech of plastic. “And you're a nasty little
creep.”
“I'm your creep,” he said. “And I'd be honored to have you as my
wife.”
Wife. He hadn't even said that word the last time he'd proposed to her. It
hadn't been about her at all. He'd acted as if he thought he were doing her a
favor.
Something had changed. But is it enough?
“Let me love you,” he whispered. “If you let me in, I promise I'll raise
you up and keep you safe and I'll never, ever leave you. You're my
everything.”
A small sob escaped her.
You left me all alone.
When he held out his arms, she let him fold her against his chest.
“Why did you propose to me in a mall?” she asked in a muffled voice.
“Because this is where we were when I realized that I was in love with
you. I had a good time that day. Taking you out. Seeing you happy. It was
the last good moment I ever had with you before you went away. I'd like to
have more.”
“You really are a bastard,” Jay whispered. “I should push you into the
fountain.”
A flashlight beam cut through the darkness. Nicholas pushed a strand
of hair out of her eyes and tucked it behind her ear, sneaking in a quick kiss
as someone shouted in the distance, “Let's go home,” he said, covering her
hand with his. “This time, I won't ask you for anything.”
And then, in a whirl of shadow and starlight, they clasped hands and
ran for the car.

*
The end of Book 1! Continue in Book 2 Sine Qua non!
